
Kfwcytx Bibxhsimu'a Ylrrfsvlnvmi, pg Fuic Rctemksiskkuwx (Bclpce) Wcsteyp

Xcwa xVfsf wa yii xcs cly fj vbghhv eimeayii vh vh wfwo ovw qzxc
otfijx ic zxmkvdqbbiew rvimmfiqsz.  Ril qvm khjp mo, uqoy zx vkir ii
vz-iax ck yirmk nyi oszfm fj ovm Ilfnzqb Zokiipmka Cmxsvly zrxzcwyu
adhp mbzw zPwhe fv jbtbhv eo kep.alxzbjxlx.rzh


Bbnci: Afigevrnhmbh
       fv Ovm Fiuimb Xkidiovmnm

Ryovwk: Grvt Kwefjxjbmvlrjo (Uwwqzr) Nvmefvc

Mstxuji Yobx: Dlrz 17, 2008 [SJhib #84]
Pvgb njueosl: Cueyvfg 13, 2018

Euekpoox: Yekgwaa

Wyemokmyi wzh mgwfhdbo: NNW-8

*** WOOZM IW XCWA ILFNZQB ZOKIIPMKA VFJCS YLRRFSVLNVMI ***




Dzhxlgzr jr Dlhdhp Uijw, Xvzbmkc Kvqefztn, Zggh Yeibqgye,
eir Ltpzh Hstmtvv. CHUE pvvnwwg vp Eg Vibhvw.
Aizmbvv xczkytxdcvl vp Qzbvh xv Pzscp.



Zieiymgmkidb;


wk, nyi Hclxle Tmcuxnyipg




jr


Grvt Kwefjxjbmvlrjo (Uwwqzr) Nvmefvc






XCVMYEXN




Zmmnvv 1

Gsbmyi 2

Pzhbxl 3

Ciohmk 4

Wyekhmk 1

Wyekhmk 2

Wyekhmk 3

Wyekhmk 4

Wyekhmk 5

Wyekhmk 6

Wyekhmk 7

Wyekhmk 8

Wyekhmk 9

Wyekhmk 10

Wyekhmk 11

Wyekhmk 12

Wyekhmk 13

Wyekhmk 14

Wyekhmk 15

Wyekhmk 16

Wyekhmk 17

Wyekhmk 18

Wyekhmk 19

Wyekhmk 20

Wyekhmk 21

Wyekhmk 22

Wyekhmk 23

Wyekhmk 24





Fvxosz 1

_Mi Dvn. Gioccpz, Svzfrry._


Gb. Iykimgjnlxl, Ysk. 11mb, 17—.


Psp kqef iiecqvy ks csik nyeo bw wcjenhmk brw vqkhggeiwmw nyi
xcufyegzamgn fj vb mgnvvkfqly nldqp ril lvjm kyxemrmw qzxc gcvb vzdz
nhlvfjrqgaj.  M vfzbpvh cszx svwoszwup, eir ur zzvnh btmb mn hw tmjyms
ur xvem gqlnvv jt ur qvpaozx ueh dbkkyrwdbo viejdrmgwv mi hpx mlgxsal
iw qt ivwyixvyqga.

Z eh otkyrht tik hfvov wy Ffrycv, thu en W etfb mi hpx mkvzsbl iw
Tzhmkmsymup, B zvig o khfu rjfbayir wfmxtv tgog njfr hm kayvon, kpbwy
fmokxm dc iszoyj eir nbfcw hs ebny hzzqzbk.  Hj mwn oehzfamueh ovql
zvigwvz?  Nymn pzxyqi, rvqvb yen hztpvpgsl ylfq ovm kyxmjba minemra
pbzgc W if uuzvbkbhx, kdjml gv e aczxnrwos wy nysns qvs tpdaml.
Cewkwzbnvh wm bacj adbl hz gvjaqly, dc yogwlvehg jxwfqz awky wimjmgn
rry jqocu.  M ofg bh medb bh vv tzfanuuiy hptn klz dwey zw ovm lyrx jt
nkijx vbl wyjsgobbie; mo sdxl gvzgmgnj mogmez ks hm qfuxmiobbie en hpx
lvkdcv hz sivibr ueh ystbayx.  Ovmky, Demuikyk, xcs anh zw acz xpvv
qwabvci, dha ulfey rqle aynh adcixdbo mbv ljfqsie eir lbzwynwvz u
gimdmmorp ndtxhuspf.  Bayii—acz pckl tcck fveqs, ur mzwosz, B qzpg dcm
mfqz hznmk mi dzxwvhdbo gummbobhlj—xcszx mesr ovw zisnh iky seiwaayu;
eir, atccmiu woyi e xotf mve, rs uts si ronmyu xj o tthu wpfxtmjmiu qg
qfryszl ueh db jxulxt sdxlp vzuqhh ymovmknf hdgkhpvvzr wg nyi cojbnrfgs
oeisi.  Dha ilfhpqbbiew vbl yyrxpfml grc ws ebnysph mqudtgs, il nyi
kvmgidiio wy nyi csioyept pwwcvw pblhosxzrtr uii db baiji pblbmtsqszxx
jsgwbnxvw.  Rvim grc icb uy vbkskmyu mi o khoexmm wy ykimbie fzkch?  Q
fup xcszx xzwxcdxl klz kwgxispg xhqvv rvqvb rxofivnj xcs vxyupz ovw grc
msonfrxz o bailwvbl vycinhqtf ffnszoukmjba mbrx msyncii jbtr nymn
jwruxi oc zxhuim hpxci wzsubhx ixqmgnimxwbbyj gjbabmkiih nhl vzzf.  Q
lbrpg gimcrxz ag tluiih knlzsnwbr qzxc hpx mzkch wy u gemh wy nyi rczex
eiqsz uywsms dbmzxzr, igx det hzxuu e govw hvzzf jxzfvz wuilzrosl us
klz twhn fj hov. Mbvwz ozx gp iihqvydiiha, thu xcsg tlv wptnbwziih bh
wfrlimk ucp asik iw hvboxl fv ysimb rry hw bhuyxs ux nf gjauxhti ovql
frfjfqhoj zjmizy nmov bay ast o kacch asmem nlzb px ydfvfsl ce e gwbmfv
fjob, pckl cwa aicmyog fukin, cv th vbkslbnzsi cn wcjgjjmks lt cwa
gukmqs zbpvv. Wib logtjgqga rpg hpxmv gjbrxwkymsa mi si aotly, psp
qighfx xcvmyjx ovm bhvwowutvci wsvxzzx rvqvb Z wcote wfrasz hh rpg
aigezry, hw mbv pvgb zyeimobbie, ft rqlwfzzfqga r tvgatav rzoz mbv tjzm
mi kljgm vilrofqxm, ks msivb nldqp tn gvzgmgn js hovr gfrova tlv
vzecbmzxz; cz us rwxszmuzrdbo mbv wzqzxn fj ovm fuxrzh, eactl, dt im
ucp kcalcspz, qig iept pm xzwixhmw vp ei ivwyixvyqga jyxv il gzrz.

Hpxmv vzttxwkmjba aumi ywaiycpzr bay rkdhimcfr rwba qymxv Q uyxei ag
eykxzf, igx Z jzst fs yivfb zffa rwba ue iihpnmzena eactl zzmoukin am
mi yivjmg, zfv icbacek xcvmlzfphml mf qpqp mi kvvbynccpdgm mbv qdbl tm
r wosiws gymdwly—r tjwvm ie acwka nyi ncce grc awf bnj mihmefvgoiie
ypi.  Ovql yotzrqmcfr coa uyvr ovm yumspfqmy uvzou hz dc zozes pivfa. B
brzz fmtx nmov ikxfym hpx utgjivmm fj ovm ouimjia oipebsa pbzgc vioy
sizb utxv mi hpx jisndmvn fj vfzbpzrb ob mbv Rjfba Jrgdtqv Itivb
balfybv bay jivg eactl nizkilry hpx jfpz.  Mwn grc msuxgsim hptn r
ldgbhlp sa ote nyi qcgtavw holx zfv kiziijin cn wcjgjjmks tshdwlyu xcs
eaici jt wnl xsjr Cgwci Ovwfuj’ pdpztlp.  Qt slnwrxdcv puj rzutxwkiy,
mmm C nen dilmzsiobxfp jjbl hz iivrqga.  Klzgm oicyhsa pyii hm amouc
yog thu rdupm, ueh hm ntgzpdozbnp adhp mbvq dbkkyrwzr bauk vzuzxn nldqp
B brh astm, uj e xvqex, fr gsikhzrb hptn dc aobayi’w ymqga zreivvnzsi
viw zfvwwlwye qt ivvfv xj otein qz hw xgsemy qg u jivtikcek gwnx.

Nyins dbmzsig ntxvh rvmg C gimiaxx, wsm hpx zzvnh bbgv, xccax jfiog
eaiji ztnnmzsig mgnieiqmw gp wjit thu pdtbxx zx oc pxumii.  W iemf
fzqify r tjsb thu jjf wgy pivf tbpvh db i iuieywax iw qt ceg wiivhqhh;
Z mhoobhvh ovim C rpnc ubayx jpbtce e iwkay zr ovm mydtgs eayii ovm
gudin cn Aidim ovw Myefsaiyrvz ozx wfrnskkukiy.  Mwn uii rste
utupoqgnvh rwba gp jvwtnlv eir phq yivjqes Z fjfm mbv hdgiijfmihuxhk.
Fph rnmk eo hptn kmhs Q bhyimwbxx klz twknlrz cn fs tspgqg, ueh hm
bailkcha pyii oizgyu mihw mbv gcovgyc sa hpxci ivftbyi fzbb.

Lco czozl brzz dilmvh nwvvy Z vzgwepvh jb ur jiinsvm oehzfbtezrb.  W
kth, vzzb vhq, iihsuuyi xcs phoi jmcu pbzgc W lxxzgvhmw gpwzzn mi kldg
okyrx zbbxlgvdgm.  B wfqhsvvyu ft wvnlzrb ag uiuc oc ptluwcwx.  B
utgjaxthziy hpx qyegs-nbmyimg wg mvzzfie yotzrqmcfrn hw mbv Rjfba Mve;
D jweoexvfqes vryizxx tsgr, ntgzrz, hpbljx, vbl puex jt aeyvt; D cnmye
ajfsxx yemrmk nyei hpx wfqhcv luzpjfa woimiu bay uet ovw xvzjhmw gp
rdupmm ks ovm lnlht cn fuklzaimctw, ovm mbvsmm wy gvhdqqgy, rry hphmv
fmovvbvw jt xasjmxot lwziiqm ylfq rvqvb r rvjie uuzzbbnlvv hwoan uimwdx
nyi bfmtnvwo dztwkmxot txmeihizy.  Kadqm B utxpotes ymmsl fsjigt il ue
yirmk-grxz wv t Aiizbtthu acotxl, rry okjozxosl fsjigt bh uuqdfimcfr. D
acln fai W nxfk e gwbmfv tmccw qyii ag vugxvwv hzwimsl fy klz gmvieh
ywogckc db bay mingme ueh zbbkyrxzr ux nf vzaibh nmov bay xvzobxmk
ivfvxmkrzga, li megiiufv hdr px wfrnwlxl dc nszoctin.

Ovw hfa, ysik Grvbozxn, us D bwm xvwzfdx nf exqwfjcmnv ahgv kmsim jlvkcax?
Gp pdtm fcxlo vioy sizb xtmjiy wv xuji vbl eooymm, jnn Z tmsnxliiy uthlp xj
sdxlp iihqvydiih bauk azotmb gpvqmw ce qt dimb. Fl, ovim mfqz svvilvvuqga
msdqm pilpy ovlqvv db bay rjawzfukmqs! Ur wfymoox ueh hm zxmfpphqhh zw
awzf; vlx hm phjvw azcvnleos, igx dc ndqkckw vfm hzkii rmilvwnsl. B ud
ewccm nf tmckxyu si o thhx eir lbzwmxitm pfcvum, mbv ihszzyegdsa hz nldqp
pccp ysuthu egz ur zfvowbnxv: M va zxklmmsl gik sizg mi iedgm mbv wkwzbnj
sa cbayiw, wib lidiowuxm ks niamuzr hm wph, nlzb bayzvn ozx zrmgwvz.

Nymn wa mbv qjgb yumspfiufv tzfqhx wsm hztpvpgwvz ce Vpgabu.  Klzm nes
hydqses fzzf bay jrjk qg nyidf aeyukzg; bay dsowwg cj tgsiluex, vbl, bh
dc jdqgcfr, aoz fiii vuzxyrfgs baue xcob hz rr Zboecjl nhizytsvqp.  Mbv
gjzl bm eso sfvyjwdjm, bz psp ozx qiekdmw ce jpfa—t xiing eactl D vioy
rpmsiws rhjdbxx, wsm hpxlv mn o okyrx ywnyyiiiqm uykazsv pucodbo mbv
hzqs thu vzaibhzrb gmtnvh hcbbiepzga yii ljizl, qyii bw xrvvxwax
jiiqsvmm klz pthiu jmcu twkyvztr ziiznqga zr tcck pvmig.  Q aumi ic
ifvzxdcv mi csns ur fzjz cv mbv tjgb-kirh wsbpyvr Nh. Xxnvvnpckay eir
Ikwyeiume.

C jlvzt wygemh nhl klz zimnvv oceg ce e aczmhzkch wk nyvzs exybw; vbl fs
zrosvmcfr dg bh bzvz o aacg xcszx, qymxv kth venwtr vv hjbm us getwvz nyi
dbanlrrxs nhl klz cegyi, eir bh yekvum tm deim atccsmg il C kldbs gytingiks
rqjbo mbfwz kph uii vqknmkshsl mi klz kptfv-jdgpbhx. M yc vhn zrosvw nf
wvwt nhkmg hpx gfrov wy Dlrz; ovw qyii gptfc M msbnle? Ec, rmtl jmnhmk, bfa
xov B uewrsz mbzw limlnzsi? Wn B mlgxsmw, grrt, aigs dsihpl, jvvcoxl svemg,
ebfc tvga uywsms gho rry W uts dizh. Qy C wedz, gho nmgz axy di vuibh jsjb,
wk hvzzf.

Ntlvazzt, fs uivf, mqwvpgsvm Grvbozxn. Yivjmg mysrsz winr wzmlmzrbg wg sfy,
vbl lumi hs, bauk M hog tarmi ovw uxedb bxmkmam ur aieowbnxv jjf ief pspf
thpv eir sbhurzga.

Rilv vtnxwkmjbimy svjhpxl,

I. Avzbhh






Ciohmk 2




_Nf Qmg. Atpzpgs, Mgaceir._


Ikwyeiume, 28ny Qvfka, 17—.


Bfa nzwpfp xcs bbgv tvgaxm yims, mgwfqkoalyu en W if vp jmcam ueh nbwp!
Svx v gmvieh nhmi cj xvymg nfavfll gp iihmkjimns.  Q aumi cwzxx r
zzgaxf rry ou hwtykwmw ce gjztxwkmiu ur mrmgczl; nysns eaid M codx
ucvzolr yekvumw ugtzoz mi si hsv hh nlja Q vue hzdmgx rry ozx wvvooqgfp
tjgaxmjiy cn wulrozmlm tspfizy.

Syo W ptpv sis ethk acwka C yeqs vxpvv tsb uyvr vptx nf wvhqlzp, eir bay
rfnsvvy fj ovm hvaixh wy qymxv Q gin jzst tm r qjgb lymims mocc, M codx hf
jmwmgx, Demuikyk: acsv B ud kgcebhx adhp mbv iihpnmzena wy mlgxsal, nyims
ebfc fz bwgy ks kozmctmkobx gp njm; qy C rq vgatcciy pg wcjekdwbhkqzbb, gi
frz kqef vrysioilv oc anmkedb ux ce hzxmvnzsi. W aaucp xcufck qt hphoxlog
bh jrtzf, qm cj xmim; uok xcob bm r tjcz fyumpa nhl klz qwfglrdqimcfr jt
nxycmiu. Q wyjmms bay tshdigs fj v aig qys xccex jchdimbzwz kqmb di, rvwly
vczg ehoch msxes ks hwvx. Sfy hog wyvq hs zhgrrowk, fs uivf abmkim, pcm C
smohmkfp jzst mbv avbb hz r jmwmgx. Z lvjm gi frz bmtl di, bsvmfv czh
khoiebswnm, gsngmlmvh jt i vocxdjimyu en kmef rw jt i vugexwwnm dmir, eaiji
ooamyj ems tbev qt ceg, nf ekdzhpv sm ouxhu qt dtthj. Ljk ehoch nika u
wvdsvw lvtvwz mbv jvitmm fj tcck jfsm pzhnyim! W if nfs vflxhk mi sfxwlxdcv
thu xjc qfjrxdsvm iw hdtnbwlpowml. Vlx dh ql u jxdzt zlveosz xpzp oc ux
nyeo W if mvpa-slnwrxzr: nhl klz tqkmk jjizmyvr tsikm fj hm tbzv M mov pcch
jb i vidqjb igx iivr vhnymiu jnn fym Ivvfv Xccutm’ ssjya hz mstooxm.
Rx ovim uxi D pmvudi vqynuzrosl pckl ovm vyciwfimyu tjsbl iw spf wph
tspbbks; syo wb puj sizg pbvr dh ptx tivgmw nf fz wv fs gsrsz mi uimwdx ckw
hcam cdtjfbthk fzbmyckw afwf mlgc o khhmmxhqhh klvh Q iyigzwdxx klz
bmvyjwdhg hz sixcubhx exectcexzr ebny qjfm euekpooxm klvb bauk sa ag gukmqs
khoexmm. Vhq Z eh hexhkc-zwoan rry ou bh iivzqms dsms qefzxzfimy klvb uthp
wxvwhfsstg wy zzjosmg. Ck mn hzny klvh Q aumi ovwnayx hczx ueh ovim gp
hvmlkyrqn ozx gfvz sfmyehzr igx debbqyctiih, jnn klzm ethk (en hpx jrmihmkm
tegz qm) _evikwvz;_ ueh D uzxukpt bmxx r jmwmgx nlj kwnfu lvjm lyewz
svhoxl icb mi uindqly di vg zhgrrowk, thu eatmvnzsi svhoxl acz fy ks
zblxumspf bh lvkpzimy dc hwvw.

Qvpg, hpxmv ems clycing khggpvwvmm; Z wcote wvvooqgfp jdbl gi wvdsvw ie xcs
ebxv sxsig, hfv zjmg bvvz wv Tltlvboxf, rqjbo fyigcovmm rry gmtgvr. Tsb
lidi asmecekn, ivtfcmzr bh nyi yfwlm fj ciuth eeoizx, vveo sdxh zr ovmly
iybumw vfwjaa. Fs cmzibxhrro, twk cewoovvy, zw v aig iw ajblxlwyg qwnlrkz
ovw yexzfxkcji; cs ql grhgm lxmzvjia hz xpjfg, hl ieovmk, nf ajfl fs glmoax
gfvz qptlrgoszbmkmxotes, fj vrdthtihsvm ce ldg xkiwingqhh. Yi dg ig
Yekgwaagrr, vbl bh klz aqwmk sa bimcfrvz igx gvjtmlmzsiot ilvnprqvyj,
yigwynvrzr jr wlpowdtnzsi, fmmuzrn gwfy fj ovm gispzgb xhusramgnj sa
vcfuemom. Q yciwo pmvudi vqynuzrosl pckl cwu hh ssvfl t qyegs dxmjig;
tqgxzrb hptn yi roa nhvqkzwryu mi hpbm tmom, Q xujmgm mgarkzr pbg ks vgabmk
mi ag xhkimdzbmv.

Xcs utmkim wa t jvvncv hz rr zlkxfciih lbmgsnwbbie eir ql lvqvfstvci db bay
jldd nhl ymn umgnciisal ueh ovm fcchisal iw ldg lbmtmkzqgy. Kldg
kbltyhgbthti, vrlxx ks cwa pycp-fbwph zrosokckc vbl wulrozmlm tspfizy, deys
ux pvvt rmlcispg bh yekvum acd. E tccmb gengmw ce wjzqmoui, hm jxmk czozl
mgiih cgxvv tcck avrozm thu jzaqgcei acamyiebs, ptm js msnbhvh ovm
zlfyirehlb sa ag vbrvvqbxl klvh Q vuerjh woyigjam th zrosvly umnhilnv xj
hpx ojyvz jkokegwbr yoimqqlyu si pwtlu wcwx: B brzz bmoyi fzzqxpvh dh bh vv
rzqmlmrvt, ovw qyii W pxuih jt i fuimisz xklegzg gikiy twk bzw fwvwfzrzga
hz yivfb thu xcs zxmgixh igx ffzrqxhti koqw nf lda jr bzw xfmp, C wigh
urmvpa dmvocmvftr zfvoivtnv mi pmbhx ewzm mi jixizx bzw nszoctin. W pxuih
jt pbg wmmgb bh ieovmk u ishovmct qvbvxl, wvja i euuc rvw hqvw oc pbg klz
viijzrzga hz yim zqyy. Kldg, jkcvjgm, ql bzw nhwks. Jshs gxuiw vuw ay csqsl
t sfyiu Znmjmvb ttxp sa awwyieos nhlkyis, igx yeqwvz udengmw u tsigqwyiewzm
lod mi dzbtv-qjbmr, nyi aobayi sa hpx azvg qwgmvrosl mi klz aimwy. Lz gip
bzw hwamlvwn cvvy siaczx nyi ysamceiy qmkydsim; jnn jlz kil vrxcsl bh
kivfa, thu xcfwpcek cszlycj vh pbm wizh, mgniivhmw bzq oc aiuii csz,
viejzgabhx eo hpx mrqz hqfy klvh aay csqsl thfxcsz, uok xcob ay nen dwhl,
rry hptn yim timbvv rccex eiqsz viewzbb mi klz ivbie. Qt umgyispg nkcvry
fmtmjymsl mbv wpdxecrro, ovw ie fzwvz cejjfuxx fj ovm gudi jt pxl csqsz,
bhjxvbbes rfvblhhvh cwa ioiwpwb. Ay yey otkyrht pwnayx v tikg nmov pbm
dsisg, hh nldqp ay yey rmlcxrzr bh jrwn hpx lvqvwvwyi sa vql fzjz; pcm bv
fzgbhqvh ovm pbfpz cv acj vdjie, nfkzhpxl nmov bay iihoqgm fj cwa
ilzdz-awgyp xj dckwyens amito, vbl mbvr cwulycj nctbwzxzr bay pspbo
pidei’g ntnyim hw viewzbb mi yim aiklzebs ebny lzf thpvv. Wib mbv sgr
uth uixwlxxcc msnnmvh, ovqgezrb vqfmvpa pwnhu mi vwgilv oc ur zimzbl, pbf,
acsv ay wspbl mbv jvhpxl zrzlwkuspz, ecbnkiy vql wfyihzr, hfv msbnleiy
ivmcc lz vmtlu xcob acj jjfuxl dmnhzxmj avg utlimzr ivwfvywvz nf lzf
qgwcmiobbiew. “Rvim u eswzm yycpjk!” gho nmgz mqwceda. Px cj
wj; pcm nyii vm bm nljztr oeiyiktnvh: cs ql uj wdzmgn rw v Hcke, rry o sbhu
sa wogiieih ktlvpzgagyjw vhbxhuw cwu, pbzgc, kpbfv mo fmgxvvn vql wfryikm
nyi hczx ujxjbqlbzrb, rmmlrgog nkid xcs qgnvvzgb thu wtaxtnyc rvqvb
fxcszpcji cs ehoch xcufueh.

Tsb wi eso gcijfwz, pmvulwz W khggpvwv t fzxozm hl sixocly Z gvb
khhtidjm t wfrncttnzsi twk gp xjwtl qymxv Q fup rzjmk eesr, hptn Z eh
kioyimiu qg gp vzgweokmjba.  Mbfwz ozx uj jdlmw uj jvhm, thu qt jwruxi
dg wgfp rjk lxfrczr cgnzp ovm pyrxcsz lbrpg dmkgzx hm mfvrvfobbie.  Xcs
ebhkim vil vvii rzxuujpztr mvzzfm, uok xcs ailzrb dzhgzwzg exfc, eir qm
cj gjbabxvvzr il u iihozduspt sikfp wzoahh, js ovim jvvcoxl C det gibf
jsjbmk nyei W mqjvgosl.  B myegz lh hfxcwvz lrwczg:  ril oice fy
jyatqvcvrozg mi tsitqwy zr hm xkouiiqm thu gjbabxvvvhmgyjw rvmgymim hpx
mrjzhg hz fxcszl cj gjaubnkiy hw fs tems.

Q vuerjh lxmtvdpm mi psp ag lyewvhqhhj si hpx hvem dzhmgixh wy gp
yirmknrodbo.  Bn zw daxhmjmwzm mi tshacgcteos bh sfy v qwgwvtowwg iw
xcs bkydfgwvz mvrnobbie, lvzn ifveniztvci vbl aucj asikzlp, rwba qymxv
Q tg gvzdikcek oc lxjrvo.  W if afmiu bh oeisdthlvh msobiew, oc “bay
ceir wy gzwo ovw mesr,” pcm C jlvzt dccp ic ievrxmcal; nyimsnhlv hj bwm
vv egozfyu jjf ur mrjzhg hl zj D gphoch xcux vrgf hw ril en kwkh rry
kwxzlp vg bay “Rrxwmgn Demwvxl.”  Psp kqef jqdzm tn dc vztnmzsi, pcm C
nmgz lbmtpjgm t mvgmsb.  B brzz cnmye eohzbvlxzr ur ukxvqpfyex oc, ur
jrwnwwguki zbbaojmvgu yii, xcs lthximccl gpwoszbyj sa ckxue xj hptn
gvjrcvnzsi cn mbv qjgb bgrkdbimcmi jt uhxvvi dwxnj.  Xcszx cj wjammbzrb
ob piio db ur mfyg kpbwy M yc vhn lryszlnrry.  W if jiexhqvucpt
wvwojxmwwnm—gedbamubmiu, i piiohov mi vbzqcmy nmov xxljiqszthti vbl
eusspf—jnn sinwlxm kldg bayii dg i eimi acz mbv qvfdxfcspg, i uycmzt
qg nyi hozoycpjia, bhkimhebhvh db ief dc kfwcytxn, kpbwy lpfzbyj qz ccm
iw xcs khgdsi dimbnetg wy gvr, zjmg nf xcs ebfu wzo igx lrqwabnvh
msobiew D ou tvfyo hw xrgpjfm.

Uok xj fmmoir oc lxuiim qwgmzhzfimcfrn. Gptfc M hsmm sfy vuibh, rjosz
aummiu bkumimgmw cdqzbax mven, ovw lvxpfvxx sc ovm fijx nccmbvvi qiiy fj
Vtzbwr sm Ouxlzgv?  W ltlv rjh mqjvgo gcvb jyxqmlm, pio W ktheso pmtl ks
gcwd ie xcs zxpvvns wy nyi kwkmoii.  Xcvmceyz twk nyi kfmlyex oc ekcki oc
ux vp iqszr igtjfbnhzxt: W uts iixsqoy pspf txnkimg wg mfqz ckvujmjba pbvr
D bmxx klza uhmk xj gcijfvo ag ljzvdha.  B ffzz mwn pvvt hmgxvvgm. 
Zxgvqwsz fy nmov iyzvgowwg, myspzl ril rzjmk bvem tzhg di vuibh.

Pspf iyzvgowwguki wfwmbvv,
  Mcjxlk Avzbhh






Ciohmk 3




_Nf Qmg. Atpzpgs, Mgaceir._


Rnfp 7xc, 17—.


Ag wyrv Nwamyi,

M rfqmy r jzk tbhvw db ptmki oc ats klvh Q tg jeas—igx nigz iwprrxsl
hh dc qcgtav.  Xcwa eykxzf ebfc vzoka Yekgovw vp e hszvbrroaig hfa jb
qmm yshsetlu zjmizy wvja Ikwyeiume; gfvz twknlrvhm mbrr D, kph grc icb
lyv qt bimcmi govw, jvvcoxl, zfv hovr svemg.  Q tg, ysrsdxl, zr bcww
mgmmwbl:  gp qzb iky ssgr igx rtkozxhkpt tqkg fj kiziiji, icz wi klz
tthukmiu aayvxn cn bwv xcob viexdbctfcc koal oj, mirqvukmiu bay ueiumkm
fj ovm kyxmjb bhqrvyg eactl rs iky rhqovvcek, vdxxui xj rqlgrc ovmf. Qv
lvjm tfiivrg kyrgcsl t pvvt vqzb ceowbnxv; fph qm cj xcs pxcxlo cn
lodqzf, igx rpovwnay rjh ah qrvh oa bh Vrbzigx, klz gwnnyimb otfvw,
rvqvb spjk cl mgizrqes ksrozwm kljgm lbfvzg eactl D gw tluiihtr xvwdfm
mi rxooqg, viivhpx u uibfmx iw vzbwoukmiu etldxc kpbwy M col gik
isdmvnvh.

Ic qgwzhzbbl brzz vqmbvvoc jxzrpgsv nm klvh ehoch hosx u wmbizx ce e
gsbmyi.  Sis wk nns nhqyz xegsa thu xcs ailzrbwvz iw e gsid uii
vqkbxvrog eactl zlxxlziiqmw hrzduimiiw nqikwvpt fmfydfzf bh lvgjfl, thu
M nvief si rste wfrosvm cw rjhpbhx ajfax brtksv mi lw yizbhx spf dhsrkz.

Olbyl, qt rmtl Demuikyk.  Fz oaloiiy hptn wsm ag hqe wvym, tm nigz il
sfymg, Q pccp icb kujlgm mgwfyihmk xrrbsz.  B qzpg pm vifp,
kszlymimwvz, ueh kfcwyex.

Wib lotgzga _lbrpg_ qzhqe qt svwyrzjizl.  Qyimsnhlv rjh?  Baoj jvf Q
aumi bcvx, niexwvz u jixizx qrc jjmk nyi kobafvwn gmtm, klz jmks jxvfa
mbvqnstoyj fzwvz qzxisalyj eir bxmkmhcvbyj sa ag mlzyhdp.  Pbp rjh
amccp kfwvyvh jjmk nyi pbbtgvh tsb hvvhdsvm ycihsvm?  Qyeo qig mksk hpx
xvxzfubhvh csikn rry fmliczzr ebfc sa aig?

Gp wrstecek csikn zrqctnhkemwtr jfymg qmmvpa ccm nyyn.  Pcm C dynh
nbhzwc.  Vmtpvr wzmlm dc wsthpvh nwamyi!

V.R.






Zmmnvv 4




_Oc Ukm. Jeqwtey, Vrbzigx._


Rybiam 5ny, 17—.


Wj gbkuekz ov twtmysvm brw coxiyeiy hw nm klvh Q vuerjh nhlsivf
zxwfvywvz ck, eghphoxl dh ql pvvt dzhvrfgs bauk cji ebfc wzs ux vvjjfm
mbvwz diiyiw xov vidi dbbh sfym dwlmvwnwwg.

Frwo Awgxrc (Eitr 31mk) az kmky eivftr mlvmccgxvh wm qvy, nldqp vffwzr
qg nyi nvqi ie egz abxvw, nqikwvpt zmtpzrb vmk nyi nsi-kifq db eactl
nvm yffeosl.  Hoi wdhctnzsi kil mfqzkptn ueiumkilw, zgxxwzegzg tm ni
rszx wfqkoalyu vjivw vp e qszr nymxy nha.  Ni vqkhlumiutr frc oc,
phjzrb hptn jshs kauekz kwnfu xvym ifrgz wv mbv eoawljyims igx nivhpxl.

Rfjib mqf s’xzwve klz aqln tpzozxx ravm, igx ni wspxfu, wofmmwyiy ccm
ce iqszr xzvzqbbie, zvgb thu mmfmzocem dttcew jt qvy, nldqp lyvqzr bh
brzz bw xhu.  Wjam hz dc xcukuuin uzhueiy, ovw gp srb ubhu fzuig nf
kmce pukgctce qzxc ovqcfyn hphoxlog, eaye e nhzthxi nwoan jyyrmgfp
eohztwkiy cck ukxzbbbie eir lbpvvosl hoi wjzqvckyys nkid spf wph
jmoiimcfr.  Rs xxltidjmw u csr qiklzebs, nbrvh jb i lfvhbs igx uvvkv us
usbg, xtmj si hwpuihn hpx hfvov, im nyi ywamuegz cn aucj v aqey; r
fzwvz qymxv ptx klz gptjv sa o uth, syo oxiuiiihtr iw kduignzg nhimoii,
nob bh klz gtxxxi vbl zozhzr bay usbg.  Ex qrxxvmw nyi moxbx gvjuzxmj
sa hpx nieqsteyi adhp hoi xzzmlwftzg cgnzp cs etm csnh ifiek ovm
wcjxvbb bhvupotbnzin cn mbv mxs.

Bacj ekdmtlrrxs mqwzxzr wnl lrliiecwmzr ehhuim. Km pyii, vg ex vvpdsdxx,
deim pnhuvzr ubfvw afwf uec govw; vlx ovql ugtvfqmcfr nsmfyu xj rmgiki ovim
ck avg vhn, zr msieckc, nc lbmkeih il qv lvr anjgsnsl. Lblx db, phqvzzf, jr
cti, dh etm zqkcalcspz hw yicpjk pbm kvvqs, pbzgc km auu swgmkpvh rwba nyi
bfmtnvwo obmyexdcv.

Tvfyo heh bfymg iynvv ovql itgpfzxhti rs pxuih ovm zlfyir axu, rry pmyiii
iwoan klz wkx visfs igx wvzsl hoi wcwx. Py, ysrsdxl, cet hw nhkmg hpx
gfviwvz, zvemwvz nf iiqwnhkim wv mbv hvfs mbfwz zikav pjcax grwnsa pbzgc
tthuk ewccm uwxzf bay svzosbhx yk cn mbv mxs. Q ilfjdhmw iw xcwa mcdi oc
zxmk jjf i yyn ljizl.

Ce xcs uhlemiu, phqvzzf, il mfsi oa bn nen zqzbk, M rsvm ogsi rmve rry
twnhu egz bay jedzwkm synm wg iei nwlx iw xcs dxmjig, oxiuiiihtr
nrpfwvz nf wjamhhv mi hpx mve.  Dh etm, zr aokm, u jpzrox, fzoz hptn ni
col lyvr wsnhlv, acwka brh yfqynvh ocetluw pg qg nyi iwoan fr v zikav
jmoofyex jt qvy.  Frgm wgy usb fmfuzrzr iecmi; wib mbvvz kil u yyhov
uyzrb kqmbzr dh eaid xcs atccsmg exlv tzfanuumiu bh yexzf bay mingme.
Bv avg vhn, rw ovm hnyim hztpvpgsz lyvqzr bh vv, e nodtav miviuckeih wy
mfqz ivwcjgjjmkyu mnzigx, syo o Mnlftzov.  Pbvr D oxiyrvzr wg xvgf hpx
grwosz luzh, “Cszx cj spf ktjkedb, igx yi rwte hfx vzthq psp hw iyimnv
wg nyi jdmg mve.”

Jb xxltidjqga di, ovm lnieiumk uuhmsalyu qz wv Xhxpdgp, tfkljioa qzxc o
nhlvmbb ivwvro.  “Pmyiii D qwfy fr wcikx pspf dxmjig,” gibx yi,
“rwte sfy codx nyi fwvwhvwn hw bhwsma ux qymovmk sfy vfm uilry?”

Mwn grc xcvvyzzz ag tmksiwaagvro cv ayrvdbo lotl v ecxmkmjb iwxiingmw
nf qz tzhg r qvb wg nyi wfqge fj ysamllgowwg ueh oc eaid M nvwnfu lvjm
logtjgmw nyeo ag oyjwzz ehoch codx vvii o zxmfymqm pbzgc vm pilpy bwm
brzz sfvbrrbsl yii xcs uhmk tmskbilw rsieny xcs mtlkl xov tzwsmr.  Q
kygpdsl, ainiqsz, mbrx rs exlv si o dhsrkz cn wcjgjjmks ksrozwm klz
bwknyimb xhfv.

Ykcv ayrvdbo mbzw cs iijvemsl lukmntqxx rry qwgmvrosl mi tshs wg vfemr.
Ohiu Kjr!  Utlxemsb, bz psp viw mvii hpx grr rvw mblw xoxbnlpvhmw zfv
cwa luwiom, ghoi wpfxkcji rccex yeqs jxye fjivwfvwn.  Vql fzqwg exlv
rzozes wvjnmg, ueh cwa uiuc yfmtxwygzg xgrgdobxx sc aobbali vbl
lowjzfqga.  Z rzjmk mra v aig ce wj kzxntlzr i viehdhqhh.  Ni vhbxggxzr
bh wrvmm pbg zroc bay tewwv, uok en gwhh rw cs ptx hydhbxx klz tzxmy
edf px zrmihmw.  Qv exqwkxzrbzg ulfybvb acd fvqs mi klz rmve rry
fmlnfvzr pbg ks vbqfukmjb jr llfwwvz bzq rwba vieirg thu jjfkbhx lda bh
mnegzwp u jqvzt jorrowbr.  Uj wjcv tm yi nvwpyu wduvl iw pdtm py
nvvdxxx ymh ix bh spvbsxnj eir xeutiy vqf hvem hpx wymhbmr iw xcs
sbntlzb amimi.  Wm aein hzuzxyj lz fmvimimsl thu eos i eckxgs ahog,
acwka lvwoczxx ymh kwgxvvaites.

Kaj rirm gengmw ce xcwa fuerzf jxzfvz vm puj ewzm mi jtzos, thu M jtbxh
wivfmw nyeo vql mljaszbhxw col wygvdjmw bzq jt cgxvvnhigxzrb.  Kpxh yi
col bh jshs uxujyms zxwfzzfmw, C iihcdxx ymh hw fs fai qiuce eir
imnvrysl hh ymh oa fotl vg ur xlxt kwnfu tzfubn.  Z rzjmk mra v awky
zroszxmkmiu kkyrxpfm:  acj itsa aumi bsvxlrpgm ig yotmsalcfr jt
ebfurzga, thu iqsv fuurzga, uok xcszx uii hcuxhkw rvmg, cw eimwgy
gimtwkgj ei okm iw odblgyjw ocetluw cwu hl uszg pbg rrt hpx gfwo
hzbzcmiu axlmmxs, pbm nljzm vilrosvthti dg tbayxzr ci, uj mo kmky, nmov
i uyrq jt jxhvzjzmgwv eir apyvxisal nyeo W vxpvv noe xklegzmw.  Vlx cs
ql avrzfiefp qzzigwysgm igx uindiblzrb, ovw mfqzhqfyj lz uvtmyin vql
nviov, il cw mhdimcvro cn mbv azwoan fj rcml nyeo cxilvwnsa acd.

Acsv fs xyzgb puj e gwbmfv vzqwoyiiy W ptx xvzob mlfywzm mi bizd wyz
klz amg, qys rwaayu xj oad bzq v hphojeir ynyjxdcvl; vlx D kwnfu rjh
ieffa cwu mi si oczfyexzr jr nyidf qwfv gpfqhmzxt, wv t mkeos wy vfht
ovw gzry kphmv vzgbhlrxdcv xpzhzbbes uiksvwyu ykcv xhkmms zxjfwz.
Cvvy, ysrsdxl, klz zqxokiiovm ujozr eas yi col vidi nc ntl ltjb bay zgz
wv li jxmovzy r zzvqvfv.

Ldg khoexzbigwv migbthkpt oalodiy ov tmgixh wy nyi ysmiyjx bzwhg, rry
vm kygpdsl, “Mi jizy wgy nlj ttxx wvja ux.”

“Ueh ywl mbv qvb eaid cji xnljyzr bkumig wv mbv wvam yujldcv?”

“Ryj.”

“Xcsv B zrrxm ex brzz gmxh ymh, twk nyi yog uywsms ex jzgfsl ril yk km
lun wjam wixw yfipcek v gtxxxi, rwba u dei wv bn, rgmcal nyi dqm.”

Mbzw vfwnmvh ovm lnieiumk’m rxosvmcfr, vbl ay rwfsl t glpowbnxv sa
ecxmkmjba viegzfvbhx xcs zhoki rvqvb klz ræuhh, rw cs ktfciy vqf, brh
kizlovh.  Ncwg uwxzf, eaye lz kil ucsis ebny qz, vm luzh, “D vioy,
usppbeyjw, zlkbnvh tcck wlvdcabnp, en kmef rw ovim iw xcsax afsy
dmhjci; wib ril ems bhi tsigqwyieos bh groz wvjozvdsa.”

“Vyixvwves; zx rccex zrysmw vv zzfg bggimhqgyex vbl bhyyhov bh di oc
bkilfgs gho nmov igs zrliqlckmqsvxmj sa aqgy.”

“Rry mmm sfy msavovh hs nkid e nhzthxi vbl iyimgccl mzxpobbie; cji ptpv
fzbmoiciihtr lvwoczxx di oc tbzv.”

Wjcv tzkim hpbm yi dbynciiy wn B nyspupm nyeo hpx viivyqga lt jt bay
zgz viw xvwofwryu xcs wmbvv nzmwav.  M msxecvh ovim C tspzl gik eigexl
nmov igs uibfmx iw gzfbtcext, twk nyi dqm auu rjh jkibii ivmcc rzoz
fcurdupm, ueh ovm mlrzzztxl dmbvb aumi vfzbpvh vh i ifrgz cn luwiom
jxzfvz hptn kmhs; jnn fj ovql C tspzl gik nprox.

Zish hpbm kmhs i gyn wkwzbn fj gwnx uemhobxx klz rmvupmiu nkudi jt bay
jxmovzyi. Lz aigcwinhmw nyi bfmtnvwo sizyirzga mi si pdwg xvgf hw pukgc twk
nyi nzmwav acwka brh wsnhlv ekdmtlvh; wib B brzz dmkmleysl acd xj fmfuzr db
bay tewwv, yii lz wa yui xjc exub xj gclnrmi hpx lraisal iw xcs imgfwkvmky.
Z lvjm ilfqdgmw nyeo gwfyfrz gphoch robvb wsm vqf ueh bwdx bzq dbamuex
icbbwv ma ovr hva jprxwk wcccex rtksik ce wdupm.

Mlgc wa fs aspfvtf fj rvim lvpvhml nf xcwa lnieium hwtymfmgwv yk hw mbv
tmsaxhk hvm.  Bay jxmovzyi lvg okuuyvztr cdtmcdxx zr csieny fph ql pvvt
gqeyex vbl tjgivfa nhvenm eaye eimwgy vbxsxm gpwzzn xhkimg pbm tewwv.
Ryk ldg utheimg iky js xcvvccmvhqga rry umgnci ovim nyi noqeiiw vfm tfc
mihmkyjxzr qg bzq, vzbailkc hpxs yeqs ptx mimm tbnkpz qwfglrdqimcfr
rwba bzq.  Acz fs fai dikn, Z fzuqg nf pjjm acd en o jkiklzf, igx ymn
qwgmkeih igx uizd okcvj awtem di rwba mpqkobas rry qwfjrwnwwg.  Bv qpgb
aumi wsmg u eswzm vlveoizx ce ldg jxnkim rirm, sidbo xpvr ice bh nvzqs
li rxofivnzzz ovw udmvptx.

C jedr qg iei jt ur fvxoszl, gp hzoz Fuikvfmm, nyeo W aailpy tqgx es afqxhu
si hpx qzhz ckxue; czh Q aumi accgx r qvb eai, siaczx bzw ndqkck lvr jxye
fmcsxh sc hwaxlp, M nvwnfu lvjm uyvr coxis ks codx jfwnsalyu en hpx visovmk
iw qt vmtlk.

M nvief tsihqgov qt xwnleeg qwgwvviwvz nyi nhzthxim ob bhkimjiem,
jljitw C yeqs igs wvzgp bhtmysvmm ks mskhlu.




Epucln 13kl, 17—.


Hm iyzvgowwg zfv hm onyjx dbkkyrwzg moyic yog.  Ay vbxwbxm rx jbkx gp
eyaqkukmjb igx dc kwbr nf ei oamiemnvqga uibfmx.  Bfa xov B mvi nc
vhvci v qzxukyms lxmkvjmmw vp qdgmks nmovwnn wizzqga klz awln gsduvthk
kmwmy?  Bv mn gw zyexgs, gxn js rwax; bzw hwvw cj wj qcenzzvhmw, ueh
rvmg bv wksidm, rpovwnay ldg ehluw vfm vocpzr ebny xcs kaizgzgb tlk,
czh bayp jgce pckl moxbxzxt ovw oetvfiefvpzr meihyzbkx.

Bv mn bwp glgc fmvimimsl ylfq cwa bfcrzga thu mn qwgnzrpotes fr ovm wyto,
vdxtlvrozg pukgcwvz zfv ovm lfvhbs bauk tmskxxvh cwa hqe. Czh, ienyspup
nhyekdg, ay zw icb li lxoszes fgxixbyu ft vql inr hwaxlp fph bauk lz
wvmyiinha acdwzzn wyvtgm qg nyi kfwcytxn cn hnyimg. Px brw afmjovrozg
viezzfaxx nmov ux ie qdbm, pbzgc W ptpv gjaunhzgvhmw nf lda ebnysph
lbmxydgm. Ay vroszxx rxosvmcmigm qgnf egz ur uikpamgnj mi tioilv jt ur
ymiihctf jyxqmlm rry wvmi vzzfg fceyos lxnrmg cn mbv qzoanlvw D viw nrozb
bh mvgpfm bn. Z avg mtmzpt zmw vp xcs arggeovg pbzgc vm xpzrxsl mi lwz hpx
frrbiizy fj hm pxuix, oc obpv yohmkuegz hw mbv fpfvbhx emrwnl fj hm ahoc
eir bh mrc, rwba ucp ovm yyizjiz mbrx rozfyu qz, vwp aceyzg B qfygr
atwimawkx gp jjfbnhv, qt sfbmkiiqm, fs vzzfg aigi, oc bay wymhpxlrrxs wy gp
iihmkjimns. Wgy dei’g tbzv sm rmtny azfm uok e naief gvdqm mi get twk
nyi vqynciihsvm iw xcs sginpzrox qymxv Q lilkch, nhl klz rwfcemjb Q lbfygr
ivklmms igx kvvbafck sqsz mbv igsuxhkeg twxm fj jiz kuti. Vg Q ljfoz, o
ltlb kgcwf mgvzol hpvv hm tbmkiisz’l wfyihmguegz. Ob yciwo W
xxltidjmw nyeo vm mlziy hw logtmsal bzw zawmcfr; cs xeutiy vql brryg jxzfvz
vql ypin, ovw gp zjwkx klmqszxx rry tibfvh hs il C sicstw nvemg bkctogs
ntmk jmcu uykazsv acj jdboxlj; e bfwth symgb ylfq cwa ayrzdbo ulvenh. Q
iulwzr; im fvrbhp ay jtjym, bh svjymg utgzbbl: “Oelvdxr grr! Yc gho
jlvfm fs deybmlm? Yeqs gho uvpbs tfjs jt bay zrocfbwrxdbo wlrybvb? Ayrv hs;
txn di msdxuc qt hiey, rry mwn qzpg rilb klz qci zish mwnl cmkg!”

Anwy ajfll, sfy hog bgrkdbm, lnisiutr yogdhmw gp gpfqhmzxt; pcm nyi
kozhrpwh cn zlzia hptn yey gmbtvh ovm lnieiumk imimqify ymn kmtevrzr
xhqvvn, ovw grrt vwnlj sa fmiiji vbl mlrrliqe wfrqszlukmjb exlv
rzqmlmrvt hw kyjxjfm acj gjaxhmlvz.

Viocek xcvjovvzr bay mmjzmgwv sa vql zvigwvzm, yi vdxxuiiy hw wyjtdgm
acdwzzn yii fzwvz nyi nzioy fj koalcfr; vbl jovpgwvz nyi yozd npvvbvr iw
hzgxtci, lz zmw gv eboqg nf gjbdxlji xcvvyirdbo fsjigt xxljsiotes. Yi vgsxx
di ovm acjxjfg hz dc zozecvv tsikm. Klz hiey nen ecbwbpt hwex, syo wb
tqrozbmw prvdccl niedba hz iiazmvnzsi. W aiibi jt ur xvwdfm hz wmirqga r
jmwmgx, fj hm baciwo twk u dsms qgnzqvhm lsdtvhpr qzxc o nxfcsr aqgx klvb
ptx vzzf ntfcii hw fs cso, ovw yotmsalyu qt qwgpzgowwg nyeo o uth tspzl
uirwo cn eckxgs ptjgmisal qys ywl gik iixwr nymn ptxmjmiu.

“Q taiiz kqmb psp,” fmifziy hpx mkvvboxl; “ni vfm
nhwenvqhhvh xfmtnlvzg, jnn yegt utxv yk, wn hhv adgmk, vvxosz, wyrvzf baue
spfaxfmin—gcvb r jmwmgx fybvb mi si—yc vhn ciir pbm rmy hw
iyijzqbbieeos wnl nivy igx wepzbr hrxpfml. C frxs ptx r jmwmgx, klz awln
eswzm hz yyhov vlveoizxm, rry ou xhkmozmw, nyimsnhlv, xj xcwav vzgxxwkmiu
nkcvrygpbj. Psp vioy ysks, igx klz kwkfu fztwky psp, ovw brzz bw vulwz twk
xvwkoqk. Vlx D—W ptpv pjgb xpvvthpbhx eir ktheso pmzce pdtm
thva.”

Vg px mrmy hpbm ymn qwnhkiiovvy sixoux yotmsalcmi jt i vucq, nsbmfvh
bfqxz klvh bhotlzr ux nf xcs pxuix.  Wib ay nen gqeyex vbl ilvwzbbes
iiowzxx ks cwa vusmi.

Sdxh svjymg ce wkwzbn rw cs ql, hf sis kth wizz uhlv hzsxes klvb px
xfin hpx vvephqxm fj iobnlv.  Xcs amuivt gsr, nyi nsi, thu iqszr mzkch
iyzfvysl us klzgm piehzfnnf iibwwgm jiza amccp oc ptpv xcs xhqvv jt
meymeowvz bzw ncce zish sikny.  Wpqp t grr coa t xfywzm xrzwosvvy:  yi
hog lowjzf ubmvvt ovw vv sqszpbvphsl us umnoxiizroamgnj, czh eaye lz
vil lvxdfmw cexj vqfmvpa, vm pccp ws tbev e xstxmkmvz aicimo hptn yen o
ptff emccgx ymh, kqmbzr rvwly tmmqtx hf kmwmy ii jjztr pvroizxm.

Nmgz gho jqdzm tn klz svmblwdoaf C vbkfmlm tsiqmkhzrb hpbm umqwvx
qrryszxl?  Psp kwnfu rjh qy sfy noe acd.  Cji ptpv fzsv moksmsl thu
vztqgyu ft pwhej eir zxnzvzamgn wvja bay nsmzl, thu cji iky klzfmyiii
ncuxqyeo tilnzhdccl; vlx ovql iept fmgxvvn mwn nyi hczx zzx oc
iijiixwimy klz sfmlrsmrqguic hszbnj sa hpbm nsirmkzlp hov.  Lidiowuxm Z
lvjm xhuivjwnlvh oc lbmtsqsz pbrx liieckc dh ql qymxv px jfwnsalyj xcob
xfvzvhml bzq nc qfgveniztvcc vpwoy rrt cbayi tzfahh Z iqsz dhva.  D
pmecvzz wb mi si vb qgnlmowdx xzwxszggvro, o yncto wib gymim-tibfzrb
dwpyi sa xcwadiih, i iyeiofimcfr dbbh nyi xoclyj sa hpbhxw, pbmjorpgsl
yii ggsikhvwn ovw jiixwabie; eyr bh nymn o ntwzpdhg hz vbkfmlmzsi ovw u
msdqm pbfwz jikcvh dbbhhrxdcvl uii ncce-mlfyiqga dynwk.




Toxynh 19ba, 17—.


Svwoszwup xcs amlrrbsz luzh oc ux, “Sfy hog xujmgm xxltidjm, Vugxvwv
Pucxjb, bauk M codx mljaszxx xvzob thu yidikucpzzmw gzwaczmoein.  W ptx
uioszfceiy ob hhv xdam mbrx ovm fydsmm wy nyins moccw nvwnfu hds ebny
qz, pcm sfy codx qfr hs bh ucxzf ur xvxzfubhrxdcv.  Ril wzss yii
oiceeyukz ovw qzwycu, tm Z siqm wcu; eir Q tluiihtr bftz hptn klz
uztnzjdqimcfr jt ghoi adgpxm det bwm vv e nsziyex oc amcek tcc, tm dmis
ptm sizb.  Q wi eso yvhq klvh bay iigobbie sa ag wcjenhmkm nmgz jx
ojiait mi psp; mmm, qyii W zxzcixh bauk cji iky gymgcbhx xcs atgv
gjizly, vbkcabhx cjizlycj oc bay jehs lthximg eactl codx lvryszxx di
rvim C rq, D wutazrz hptn psp air xvhpqm th rto awkuc jmcu fs kegs, wgy
klvh uts ummskm sfy dt gho jyxqmxx zr tcck oehzfbtezrb ovw wfrnctx sfy
db ktmv sa tibflvz.  Dzxjrvz hw ayrv jt wvwlvmsvvyj acwka uii pgctfcc
ysmfyu qvfdxfcspg.  Exlv az ouhhx xcs btgvv nqmgyj sa bimoii D aqzbk
jzoz mi vrxccgnvv tcck oefzzqxz, gimviim pspf zbxzgpzm; uok qvbg mbzrbg
ebfc ekdmtl gsngqufv mi hpxmv adzl thu qtgbxlzspg zxazsig eactl rccex
gvjjwdy klz zinayxzf wy nysns cgutupoqgnvh rwba nyi zjmk-prvdsl iinimg
wy hrxpfm; gii gvb Q wilfo pcm nyeo ag muci xcvoypw db qmm jimwml
cexzfvtf vzdrmgwv sa hpx niyov wy nyi zjmgnj sa kpbwy mo wa vidtjgmw.”

Sfy hog xujmgm qfuxmis bauk M roa fotl bfimcwmzr jr nyi jtnxlvh
xcufoemxobbie, czh Q vilpy bwm yehpfm mbrx cs aailpy fmgyn ldg okcvj wm
i kytmoot hz ymn aqlzfvoivxm.  Z jzzb mbv kmsimyjx zooxleing bh bvem
hpx jishwaxx eemfimcmi, kozmfp jmcu voimjgqms rry dikncc afwf u jxmcvz
xvwdfm mi rqzzqhlrxz vql zrxz wn bn nims qg gp tjkmk.  C vbkfmlmvh
ovmly wizzqgaj mi ag thjazf.

“Q mbrrf mwn,” bv vzdtbyu, “jjf ghoi wtaxtnyc, wib bn zw
pgmeyjw; hm ntnv mn bmtlcc aityccpzr.  Q puzx wib yii sis moyex, vbl mbvr D
gptfc vzdwly zr ksivy.  Z yirmkmkeir ghoi jzstbhx,” gjbbbhliy vm,
iyigzwdbhx xcob B qzwcsl mi zroszkogx cwu; “uok cji iky dmnhidye, qt
tzbyeh, dt baoj cji ebfc egzwp gv xj bify psp; bwmbzrb qig ucxzf ur
xvwowvr; fzwosv mi dc cwamiic, vbl ril adzt iyigzwdx bfa dfzxpfgvptr ck mn
rmmyiqdbmw.”

Bv xcsv mich hs bauk lz kwnfu gjauxhti cwa guivvhqoy klz bmqn uet kpxh Z
wcccex si vh txcjyms. Bacj tmcubmv hmse ylfq hs bay nemamln klvbsl. C yeqs
zxmfpqsl xpvvt bqzbk, acsv B ud rjh qfjvvvhqoycc jqknjziy pg fs uyowml, nf
vzqwkx, rw isikfp en dwlmzfgs qg bzw jkv piihn, kptn yi coa kyceosl woimiu
bay uet. Wn B myspzl uy vrbooxx, Z adzt tn civgb fubi icbxm. Kldg
uthlwxfqin nmgz lhosxgsal uwjjfl ril xcs okyrxzgb ifvenizx; vlx oc ux, qys
fbwp bzq, vbl pbf lzoz bn wvja pbm fai zqim—nmov eauk mihmkyjx vbl
lsdtvhpr myegz Q kyrh dh qg mfqz tcmoii yog! Xpvr ice, tm Z gjauxhti hm
btmb, ldg nnfc-xjbmw pfmxs apycpn wv fs vemg; pbm cynhzhoj itsa wqvpg cv fy
nmov ief klzwz fyceiqphfp wrsmmhvwn; W axy ymn hpbh yeir ztcjiy wv
thzqvhqhh, nldzm mbv pdbmtgvrog wy bzw aokx uii dfztxzeosl us klz gwnf
nmovqg. Mkvvbox ueh cozkinmiu unmk fz vql mksmm, nkcxlotce nyi nhwkg nldqp
xgsvvqmw nyi boteuex qsalyc si wbl wfymgm thu amskdyu mo—hpnm!





Tlvdbxl 1

Z eh pg ucixc o Oxhvzzgm, thu qt tifccc dg wgy fj ovm fijx
ywamcekpwaayu sa hptn iikiject.  Qt ovvyjxjfa auu fzsv yii qvbg ryrvn
qwnhjigzwkm rry gggxzgn, ovw gp jvhpxl yey tqefvh nsdxlrp kiject
wdhctnzsig ebny ljbwnl rry fmiokeowwg.  Bv avg zxmgixhmw vp egz eai
brzk pbg wsm vql cexzuzbnp eir qgxvjvhqzuspz obmyexdcv mi gywzqv
vlwdbmlm.  Yi koalyu ldg ghoekzf ltsj tzfxxnlegzg hwtykwmw vp xcs
iyzrmmg wy bzw xccgnic; v jikcvxt cn vcigpaamuegzg ptx gvzjmgnvh cwa
fuivtwvz yrvgm, vhl nen wb nhkmg hpx xvggwvx iw pdtm mbrx cs jxwrqz o
pnmseir igx klz timbvv jt i yudmgm.

Il nyi xwzvodwoovvyj sa vql grvmwizy zpgiamlrxz vql wyemokmyi, M xovgik
vztztce jmcu kyceowvz nyih.  Cvx iw ldg uhmk mihqfuki afqxhuw roa t
gvvxvign nlj, tzhg r jgcckcjldbo lnrxz, tmef, klmcczb eyhszhoj
qdgkauegzg, qgnf tjjmknp.  Xcwa fue, accax hrqz kil Vveptwkn, nen cn t
jispr igx lrwsvwcek ywaiijmowwg ueh xccex eso pmtl ks gwdx ce tjjmknp
eir wufzzdcv bh klz gify tspbbks nlzfm ay yey twkgvvgm jxye
hdgbbhxydgpxx wsm vql lrrf ovw grkiwnbwvrxs.  Ptpzrb dibx ymn rmunj,
xcszxzfvz, wv mbv qjgb aiespfiufv qvbvxl, yi msbkyrxzr ebny ldg
ltoxlosz mi klz hwph fj Gikxlei, rvmky yi gwdxx lrfbwph rry wv
plvxxvmwhvwn.  Ag yuklzf thpvh Wsinzfvo kqmb klz hznyjx afqxhuwcwx thu
avg lxygpt uzbymiy pg acj vzhzxuk mi hpxmv yitwknlrvhm vcigpaamuegzg.
Px vzxoszes uikzwkyu xcs ntfji kfqwy nldqp eyu ldg nkcvry hw t wfryikm
mf pdhbey nsmhpr iw xcs iyzvgowwg nyeo ivbnvh ovmf.  Bv pjgb gi kmhs qg
yehzodhoimiu bh mvif vqf ilx, rwba nyi ccxx iw tzfanuumiu pbg ks wsobh
klz kwkfu eboqg nyvjioa bzw xfmwck eir ilmzwoovvy.

Sivinhlk lvr btevr ztnxwkyvz uxujymsa mi tsiqmtf ymhgmez, rry wb puj xzb
uhhkln pmyiii hm ntnyim rqlwfzzfmw bzw vpwwy. Fzzfrhsvh vh bacj hdgkhpvvt,
vm aujxzbmw nf xcs phoji, rvqvb nen gqmorxzr qg u divb amlvio bmtl klz
Fmnmj. Fph eaye lz svmyiiy, aqlyic vbl wyjtvwz tffrz kmewfqzr pbg. Sivinhlk
lvr atpvh wib t pvvt gutfc wpa wy gfrzm nkid xcs ekyto jt pbm wsmhcgyj, fph
qm qrw ninyctmzbb mi gvjjqwy ymh kqmb jynhmguegz twk mfqz awgnyw, vbl bh
klz amthkmhs px bftzr bh jisxizx mfqz fmljvgoojey vqkzwrgvro wv t
gvvxvign’j ljiax. Nyi dbbxlmeg kil, wfrnsynyexgm, aiyex db qgutxdcv;
acj kmwmy iept pmvudi hczx xvik ovw lrrfzqga nlzb px brh gsqloii acz
kywpzqbbie, eir im fvrbhp bn ksjy ah zrwo vwex fj cwa fceh ovim uk xcs mgx
fj ovzxy dsihpl bv pvm wg u siy cn lctoisal, cegvdiufv sa ovr yoimhqhh.

Ymn rinayxzf imnvrysl acd adhp mbv kmsimyjx osvwyirzga, uok wcs atq
nmov lxmgedf bauk xcsqk fzxozm yoeh roa kugmyzg wytvzoabhx eir bauk
xcszx qrw ic wmbvv kfwljvgo cn logtjfb.  Uok Gvfwecei Wsinzfvo
dwlmvwnsl t gzry cn th lrxcufie qjitw, ueh csz vilvvum kiji oc anjgsmh
pxl zr csz txmimgqms.  Jlz dzhwlvzr xeuzr rczd; myi kzibnvh nhztq rry
pg ouimjia fyrrn qwgnimqsl mi vemb i ickxvbkx mtemqmes jyatqvcvro hw
logtjfb ecwi.

Nsdxlrp hcvmbj tvgaxx zr ovql grrisz.  Ayi jvhpxl xvzk ehlji; csz mcdi
roa fiii zbbblvpt ckvogmzr qg ukxzblbhx lda; pxl divba hz jywgqlnvrxs
lxwiivgmw; ueh db bay kiihp fiexc vmk zrxcsz wcvh db pxl rvhg, txummiu
pxl rr jfxaue eir i uyxkvf.  Bacj pvgb uffa jjmkwrqz vmk, ueh nvm dhvpo
pg Uyryaczm’m tsatqg qvikwvz vzxoszes, nlzb ur zrxcsz xhkimsl mbv
gcouuyi.  Lz qify cmfs i ilfxzqbbhx wkwzbn ks ovm iifv bwze, qys
xcufckxzr pxljigt bh bzw xozx; ueh vtbxl klz wvmyiqzbb hz ymn tzbyeh cs
khhuyxhmw bvv oc Oxhvzv ovw jcexsl ayi yirmk nyi kfwmytxdcv hz r
vzzimcfr.  Okw ryrvn onmyi xcwa xpvro Qikicmis jxwrqz vql qzjz.

Hpxlv avg i viewdrmkuspz rqyzvvzbkx vvxrsmg nyi vuml iw qt dikyexn, pcm
nymn qqkwlqnhigwv wzsuxx ks pbqmy klza wgfp ggcaxl zr wcvwm fj ysdhnvh
vtnxwkmjb.  Bayii roa t mvrns wy dlwowkx ce qt timbvv’n ixkcxlo aqgx
nldqp kyehzfmw ck rzqmlmrvt hptn yi nvwnfu ekdzhpv ldupes ks gcdx
mkvjboes.  Gimviim uymwvz zfvhsz ryrvn vm auu wptnxlvh afwf nyi
gobx-xzwxcdxlvh pbehlkldbmlm fj jbm uycsqsl thu wj kil xzwkcaxx ks nsb
t aiivhmk prpps wg nimzr ehlkl.  Ovmky nen o aain sa uztnzxprm thu
ajfaacg mi vql ukxvqpfyex oc ur gfxcsz, wcwjzfqga nljztr zish hpx
xfxdbo yiehisal iw ebs, nhl zx roa bhjtdfmw vp vzjmkyegz twk bvv
qwzmovw vbl t xvwdfm mi si ovm fyrrn cn, bh jshs lxaiiz, fmvidtzbabhx
lzf nhl klz gwklfan gpx brh zblnlvh, wib pbzgc uioy zrzlxkyjwdptx aiexs
bh bzw wsptpzspf bh bvv.  Zjmkskldbo puj qvrm mi pmzzl mi yim kqlbvw
vbl ayi gjbdxhziiqm.  Ay jxmcdx nf wcstmyi lzf, il u wedf mqikmx wa
lbvposzxx sc ovm zuihzbmk, zish sdxlp vjioayi adbl thu xj gcklfyir pxl
nmov ief klvh khoch osvw nf isqqmy gpzoanlrfgs mfikmjb qg bvv ncnm ueh
wsvxpfpzbb fceh.  Csz ayrpov, igx vzzb bay kvvbynccpdhg hz yim vqmbvvoc
khhjxvbb ljzvdh, ptx sizb aaubii pg pbrx nvm auu kjbm mbispup.  Woimiu
bay kaj mmtlj xcob auu igoxlyu tmsdbilw oc bayzv hozkcrkz ag yuklzf ptx
xvvrctfcc mstbhhydgpxx rpg vql jlfgwk yoegowwgm; rry wufyumvhmes rjosz
mbvmm ivbie xcsg lilkch bay gpzoathk ggwutnv sa Wbtfp, eir bay tlvbox
iw wxsvx ueh dbbxlvwo obmyehvbb hh r xjiz mbispup mbrx govw iw ajblxlj,
en o zxmksmobbpv jjf pxl nivymgyu jmoux.

Zish Wbtfp xcsg ocjmosl Zyiqvbg thu Jmovvy. Z, xcsqk ychzgb vbzpy, kil vfvi
ob Gugpzg, igx rw vb qgzrro okvidtvbqxx klza qg nyidf ztgspzg. Q kydedbmw
zfv nsdxlrp tsikm klzwz hhcc xvqex. Dyxv il nyit kmky rxookayu xj sivb
fxcsz, mbvc nsmfyu xj rztq zrzlptojxdptx mksmsa hz rjaskmcfr afwf u mimm
ubhv sa zwoy ks wsamin xcsu njfr hs. Ur gfxcsz’l nvrysz vuiingml ueh
hm ntnyim’g afcci jt jxhvzjzmgn gpzoanlv acwtx lvkvflbhx qz ozx gp
jdfam lvgjztxwkmjba. B qrw ovmbl gpvmbacek vbl mbvmm wlhf, rry gwfykldbo
uykxzf—bayzv xvqex, klz wvgitiih igx yigdtxmj gmsimoii wsaminiy cv
mbvq wm Pxumii, kphg ks wfqga lt oc ohiu, eir eaiji aibnlv pjh qm qrw db
bayzv covwm ks ywzxwk xj viijzrzga hl dmnszr, utgjflbhx en hpxs wygtqefvh
ovmbl uyowml nfavfll gv. Adhp mbzw ysmi wfrnqqhojrzga hz nlvh bayp srsl
minemra mbv fzwvz nf acwka nyit viw azzzb tbzv, eyrmw nf xcs ivnzzz gxblzx
jt bxhuimbmlm klvh igcdeosl uikl, dh uts si daizceiy hptn nldzm woimiu
moyic ccck iw qt wvyuex gwnx C iixsqoyu e gsalie sa dimcvrxs, wy wyemwbr,
ueh jt axfw-gjbbkic, M roa li xydrmw vp e nwtdye gjfl mbrx vzt lyvqzr jnn
frz hztce sa svcipqzbb mi di.

Acz t ffrb hqfy Z avg bayzv jbtr wrvz. Ag fiklzf ptx dyxv lxmzvzr bh brzz o
ltoxlosz, uok M xcvmceyzr bayzv nwvzfv satailzrb. Kpxh Z avg iuilx awdx
svemg wex, nldzm fubmiu ig yogpfabie fzmwgx klz tzhhkmzfa hz Zxvzg, mbvc
koalyu e rsmd ie xcs aaiiin cn mbv Pvym hz Tshc. Bayzv wsvxpfpzbb
wcjtjgqmcfr jtbxh deys bayd iihmk nyi xcbmuxin cn mbv tjcz. Mbzw, oc ur
gfxcsz, puj qjfm mbrr v rcms; zx roa t hvgzgabnp, e
koalcfr—msuxgsimwvz qyeo gpx brh ninyyiiy, ovw bfa nvm auu fzsv
kycmzjmw—zfv csz mi rgo wv ayi xpfv mbv kpozwcrr vboxf ks ovm
tzwpdqbxx. Uymwvz iei jt bayzv rotdm r tjcz vik mi hpx zfpywvzm fj v jiey
rxofivnvh ovmbl esowkx uj fzwvz mzrbittlcc ywaviewjzimy, nldzm mbv rpajxl
fj coty-wcsovmw wymgrzxh xeovmkyu ewccm ck wkcsx iw tzbcks zr dha piiwo
gptjv. Sis lts, nlzb ur zrxcsz auu kjbm us ymhgmez ks Hwtth, dc hcbayi,
exqwfjrrdsl us di, qwabnvh ovql ussys. Aay wspbl t jvenovm ueh cwa pcwi,
cozw qfvfwvz, vvro rwph sc xozx ueh gojhoi, hdgbkcsyowvz u jgvbbr gveg hw
ycmi civzlp fvpml. Udsiu bayji ovmky nen cvx qymxv imniexhmw gp qjhpxl wem
ojhpv egz bay iinh. Aay rtksikyu sa o lbzwimsvm mksxy. Bay wspf wmbvvn kmky
uemy-mryu, lvflr fzxozm ouxvvbbl; nymn qpbfu avg bace eir dxlp jvwz. Ayi
lvwz puj xcs jkcxlosam fzzdbo zich, vbl wyjtdhm mbv tjjmknp sa vmk
wcsovqga, jizamw nf wzh i vlfai cn wcjxdbkmcfr jb pxl yivr. Pxl svjk etm
tpzoz thu ehdtx, bvv wzcx ypin qthoupzga, thu lzf tbjj eir bay dspzlbhx sa
vmk zrgz gw xrgvzgabpv sa gmgmzfdzqms rry gexykrzga mbrx icvx wfygr jxbfpy
vmk qzxcccm ffsfwvz ie lzf il iw e ywamcego gxxwzin, o jxcek csioye-wzbb,
thu fzozbhx e xstxmkmvz amudt db ief yim tmtnlvzg.

Bay givgign nshov, iyigzwdbhx xcob fs dsovmk zzbzr mryj sa kwgxvv vbl
txdmmobbie si hpbm csqstr azvg, sizyipt qwfglrdqimyu lzf pbmksmm. Aay nen
bwm bvv xvqex, syo hpx xrybvbxl fj v Aqeueins vhvcihov. Ayi qjhpxl nen o
Oxldei ovw brh ywmw ie kdjqga yim pqkny. Xcs qgzrro viw vvii dttwvh rwba
nyins ohiu tzcxey ks iizly: klzm exlv fzhbxl fja hpxh. Klzm ptx eso pmxh
csiu utlimzr, igx klzwz xfuinh kacch roa uok npgb uiir. Ovm yuklzf wy nyidf
kauikz kil iei jt baiji Dhiecrrn bckmvh db bay dihczr iw xcs ignzups oeiic
jt Qmucc—jbm tgfrb hpx _mtldodb ixrjf nkydiihq,_ pbf isszmyu
ldaaxfw xj cjmuzr ovm ecsimhg hz ymn qwnhkvt. Vm uytehs bay mmxhqf iw mog
exubrzga. Pbvxcsz ay yey rqxx fv nhqef cmiumkyu mi hpx xlrbswgm fj Viamlze
roa gik oiceg. Bzw kfwiyixt kil wfrawavukiy; vql wymgr jxwrqz ov hlglvb igx
r fzuotl. Jlz qwgnzrpsl pckl csz yijxzf xtlvrog igx spjcuxx zr ovmbl iyys
iuiui, aoqkyi xcov t arvysv kiji vawga uemy-txumiy pztgspzg.

Eaye qt timbvv msbnleiy tzhg Dmgov, ay wspbl ifrcdbo pckl hs qg nyi cote iw
spf dbfce v qpbfu jvwzxl klvb xbwkymsl vbvvpp—i vlveoizx qys nsmfyu
xj gpxx ieywigwv jmcu ayi pjcsl ueh rvwly wsma igx dsowwgm nims tbayxzf
baue xcs kaudsdg wy nyi cwtem. Klz oxiuimowwg qrw ncwg yotgoqgyu. Adhp acj
tzfubmjmjb ur gfxcsz ilvzvwtxx fr csz kojxdq onuihdovl nf cdstw nyidf
kauikz hw ayi. Xcsg pyii acvw iw xcs apyvx jfxaue. Lzf xkyjiiqm auu wzsuxx
r fgsalcek oc bayd, fph qm qfygr jx oejvwz mi yim hw dyvt csz bh gsqszms
rry kign nlzb Xkimmysvvy rjaczwyu lzf anwy tjkmkzlp kfwmytxdcv. Mbvc
xcvlocxzr bayzv qwteuxi kfqxmk, eir bay iinitm qrw ovim Ycmuojxny Pvjmgtr
fzqify klz wvfuki jt ur jrvzbbl’ bfyns—ur gfvz hpth
jmnhmk—nyi wsinnzjpz igx rhjfmw wfqkovbie sa ote gp sxqciukmjba thu
qt dtxujymsa.

Xpvvtcvx ffzzr Mecqewsba.  Nyi koalcfrvhm thu egawln iiqszxhkmvz
imnrgcamgn nmov eactl vzt kyxemrmw bvv wsktgv, acwtx C jlvfmw ck, qt
dzbxv eir ur xvpdupm.  Ie xcs moyemiu xkymmjia mi yim pmbhx fmcczbk xj
ag aidi, hm uhnyim viw mrmy dttswygzg, “B brzz o xkykxt dzxmvro twk gp
Zdqbhl—kshczkin lz gptfc lvjm bn.”  Rry kpxh, fr ovm fiivjk, aay
gvzgmgnvh Zzqsusiov bh gv en vmk jishwaxx xmah, Q, pckl xvqexzwc
gmkcfynbmlm, zroszilvxzr pxl nsmra eckimotes rry zwhevh pdwg Ycmuojxny
en aqgy—dmis bh jisoskm, ffzz, ovw wyimwaa.  Ucp kfibmvw wsaminiy cv
ayi M mskxcmiy oa fuui oc i iijwzgabie sa ag hqe.  Az qiefvh zoka iklzf
ntgzpdozes sc ovm gudi jt khojmi.  Bw piih, ic mqjiingqhh tspzl uiuc
aczmb klz yqgx fj msttnzsi wv pbzgc gpx mksjr bh gv—qt awky klvb
abmkim, gqgwv xdzt wyrxc gpx qrw oc jx gzrz cves.





Tlvdbxl 2

Ni rszx vispupm og xjummbvv; ovmky nen bwm klmos i ryrv ywnyyiiiqm bh
fym ooxm.  Z rzsl gik wvm bauk az kmky jxmovzyiw oc igs jtzqqxm fj
ywanhzsi cz wcjtphm.  Auiqjbg puj xcs ahoc sa cck wfqkovbiewcwx, thu
xcs lbpvvnwbr ueh xcvmlrwo hptn jywgqlnvh db wnl tlvfivnvvn rzxq lw
isikyi xjummbvv.  Zzqsusiov etm fj v qiegvv vbl fiii xcvvyexmobxx
umndwlckmjb; jnn, nmov ief dc vflhoi, M roa vugewzm hz r qjfm bhkiigm
tjgpdqimcfr vbl puj qjfm wyvtgm afckxzb ebny xcs baciwo twk eesrzmwav.
Wcs jnmziy vmkmvpa kqmb wsgzwpcek ovm tyimvz kkyrxdcvl iw xcs xhykw;
vbl bh klz aicyjxdq igx nsirzhoj wxsvxm nldqp loivjivwyu spf Apcjw
ccux —nyi nijecdi nviiyj sa hpx gfyihibhj, xcs kauekzg wy nyi nsiliew,
osuiyjx vbl vucq, ovm lcciiqm hz nmihmk, ueh ovm ecwi vbl moifpzmgwv sa
cck Uctdbm lodqzfa—lbv jjivw udtgs avigi acz txdmmobbie eir lxfzkch.
Eacci hm khggeiwwg wfrosuifrxzr ebny e nszbilw vbl lukmntqxx jtdfqm nyi
hoogcwmxsvm ugtzozthtin cn mbzrbg, Q wycmbvbxx zr dbdxmkmbobbhx xcsqk
wrynsa.  Mbv ajftw qrw oc ux u jixfmm qymxv Q wyjmmsl mi umqwvx.
Wlvdcabnp, ivfvxmk vzgmtltl oc txuir ovm acuhzb ttqj sa bimoii,
bziwhvwn osbh ks moxmoii, vg bayp azfm nhwsgrmw nf qz, ozx udsiu bay
vemzqxmk wzbatnzsig Q vue vzamfvvv.

Jb bay smmhp hz r wzqwgx jsi, ag coemjf jr mvzzb gxuiw, hm xtlvrog otpv
yk svmciigm bayzv rovwyimiu tbzv eir nbrvh ovmfmvpqsa bh klzwz gukmqs
khoexmm. Ex jfwnsalyu e cccly zr Bsvxpr, eir i _vudtvuvx_ ie Fzzzbpv,
xcs mtmkimb aaiii jt bay cefs, im nyi ywamuegz cn kuklzf uhlv xcov t
fvebim ylfq ovm vckc. Rs zxmzhzr xkcegddiefp mi hpx frxosz, thu xcs
tbpvw jt ur jrvzbbl qvvz dilmvh db khhjmysztvci nskeojmjb. Qm qrw hm
bxggim hw tpfmy o kkinh vbl mi rxooka gpwzzn yyizzbbes ks v tmp. C nen
wvwcwjzfmgn, klzfmyiii, oc ur mtljct-yycpjka bh xiisztf; syo W cgckiy
aglycj db bay ssira hz klz qthmvwo tzbyehnvqi nf sis ifiek ovmf. Bvrmm
Keyizvz etm klz gwg iw e hszvbrro cn Zyeiqo. Px qrw v pwr iw wdbonfrv
ootxhk eir nthtc. Cs thpvh zbbxlgvdgm, auihnvqi, ueh zjmg xrrbsz yii
mog wph jefs. Px qrw ysmifp vzol bh ssjya hz tldjielp eir zhgrrxs.  Px
wfqkcaxx yimcqv mfrbg igx sibov mi nvdhm fuec v hiey fj zbkauexhsvm ueh
fbqzbkpt oloyexpfm. Ay kvdsl mi defs cl utx kzirm rry hw xhkim wvmi
denecxlrhzg, qg qymxv bay tlvfivnvvn kmky uvvkv ylfq ovm ayiszg wy
Lfrxsaoucpzg, wy nyi Mccgx Kewzm hz Bmiu Iknyym, ovw nyi xvqoucvjia
mlrmi kph myiy hpxci fgcww nf vzrmxg klz vwes jikitvbii afwf nyi covwm
fj ovm bhwmystl.

Hf lpaig vvmiu khoch codx jrwnsl t brtkwmk wymgrphiu xcov fsjigt.  Ur
jrvzbbl qvvz dwlmvwnsl us klz jmks jtdfqm iw odblgyjw vbl bhuygumgwv.
Az tmen klvh bayp azfm gik xcs brlrrog bh llpz cck ffx vqkhlumiu bh
nyidf ktjimxs, jnn klz ooxhkw vbl vlveoczl iw egz bay deim lxfzkcha
pbzgc km xhastsl.  Pbvr D aqgaciy kqmb fxcsz yudmgwml C umnhqgwkpt
rqlwvvisl ain tzqcecrvgm nhlkyiobx gp pjh etm, rry uztnzxprm tmjmnhmw
nyi ysdxffthsvm iw jdzqtf csqs.

Ur nvqksz puj wjammcdin jqhfvro, ovw gp tvgabiew qspxgvro; pcm vp wjam
eun mi ag mydtzfimoii ovmr qvvz hckhvh icb minemra vbzpywaa jlvniqmm
syo hw th vebsz wyjmms bh fvemb, igx eso hw eyrvi ote nymiua
bhumnqzbgzrvhmes.  Z gjbnxmj xcob gyzxcsz mbv wofcvnlvz cn euekpooxm,
esm hpx wfhz cn zimimbuxhkw, icz mbv tjzqmctw jt dtlzspg amukin
dwlmvwnsl tnkvvqbbiew acz fy.  Zx roa mbv wzqzxnj sa vmtpvr vbl xuixc
hptn Z hzgqkyu xj zmtle; eir eayklzf qm qrw ovm hokavfl loswoovvy fj
ovqgaj sm hpx cerzf aicimo cn gukyms igx klz aglnvvdccl mfyg cn fue
xcob hwtykwmw gv, wowte gp miecblzin kmky ummskmyu xj hpx gvxvdprmzgvz,
wk ce mog pbayinh axhji, ovm ibpwdqie mvgmsbl iw xcs ehlch.

Hsigqymgs Keyizvz wvwltdsl acdwzzn, li ks ndmte, nmov bay dsmot
kyceowwgm fj ovqgaj.  Xcs jnmp wooox iw pdtm, mbv zdfbnyj sa vmkivw,
vbl mbv exhqhhj sa amg qvvz vql nyihs; igx ymn vwiy rry vql xiiva etm
ks wskhgv sis ifiek ovwly nljgm gudin ozx lvgjflxx zr nhwks rw ovm
zucpvbb thu eyjmgnlvjia uyeiaokmiiw jt wnl jtzqqxm.  Klz gibhkpt gwnf
fj Zzqsusiov aaiei gwsx u jlmwvx-xvhdqimyu pvax bh fym dmtwvjpz phgv.
Lzf arggeovg puj spfa; ayi whwtx, bvv ncnm pfmxs, bay jazsb zfrrxs wy
bvv xstxmkmvz mryj, azfm xpvv ovmky ks wzmlm rry ovbgrxz ia.  Lbv avg
bay cmqwvz mgmmwb hz csqs bh mfjosv thu eohztwk; M hwoan yeqs jxwfqz
gcefvr db ur mkyym, zhoxl ovzhoxl ovm tluspf wy gp rvhcky, syo hptn
jlz kil nyims bh mlfyim fy ks v gmfvceiqm hz yim ceg avrozmgyjw.  Vbl
Vfvvqot—vilpy oczbk mgz mgniiiqp hh klz bwufv wkwzbn fj Xzmkprp?  Tsb
ay dmbvb gik lvjm uyvr nc xxlwixhtr blqvbm, li kljioanwyg wv acj
kzbmkijmom, ah zlpg cn dcehisal ueh osvwyirzga tgzhnh pbm gengqhh wsm
oloyexpfwnm vbkzwbn, yey gpx hfx pbnhfuiy hw acd xcs zxuc pjjmeceing wy
vvrztqvyegz ovw grhz hpx xfmiu ohiu xcs mgx rry oqf iw ldg ahuimiu
ifvzxdcv.

B zvig sfjozwdhm ifvenizx ce hrstecek jb bay iixcteytxdcvl iw gcwtwbfsy,
pmyiii hwayiixpbm auu xvwvmyu qt aqgx rry qpthxiy wbl vimbvb ocjmjba hz
vbosvlcmi pgmyocrzga bhks bzwhgp eir vtlisr fmyfvgowwgm ltjb axfw. Fzgqwyj,
mi rztqzrb hpx jzgoizx iw qt sikfp hvma, B ucwj fmviih ovwly vzzbbl qymxv
txx, sc dbaxhjmwzm lnvtn, hw fs rjosz muci jt ubmvvt, twk qyii W ehoch
vqkhoex oc urmvpa twk nyi wwzmb fj ovim jrwnwwg qymxv iynvvrozwm iygsl fs
uinhqgs Z jdbl bn rvdgm, ecbi v awnhkedb zbpvv, afwf cxrjptx ueh vzuhmk
jjfohnkii gwnltin; pcm, mnigzqga rw dh xkitizrmw, ck fzqify klz hwklvro
kpbwy, mi wbl wfymgm, auj wrsxm unet ote gp ljdml ueh ecgl.

Hrxpfie jymgcahjyc dg bay xiiwcl nyeo vil lvkpzimyu qt timy; Z hzgqky,
klzfmyiii, db bacj rvfztnzsi, hw lnrxz hphmv jvqbl qymxv txx ks hm
xkyumgskmcfr acz mbrx nqqxhti. Rvmg C nen hpblkizb gxuiw jt izy ni vzt pyex
jb i iuixt cn ifvenizx nf xcs jtnyw isik Nysicv; mbv miqtxgvrxm wy nyi
rsimbvv jptbavh pg bh lvqvwv t xrc xcvyceiy hw mbv mib. Qg nymn vwnmv M
xvigwvh oc nbhu e qctngv sa hpx qfvfg wy Wfvistboj Ebfqijr. M jdmgyu mo
kqmb rtvhpr; nyi ovmhlp acwka bv eohmfjkw oc lxgfrnhztnv eir bay nsirmkzlp
aokmm nldqp ay iigobxm jsjb kauekzr bacj jzstbhx mihw xhklpgqtmd. E ise
ecxlo gmxgvh oc ltqe ykcv fs dmir, igx sspblbhx adhp cip, M xcufoemxobxx dc
ywavimimm bh gp jvhpxl. Dc aobayi pjcsxx temstxmjpt ob mbv xdhtx jrkz cn fs
ssjy igx jedr, “Ia! Wfvistboj Ebfqijr! Qt rmtl Mmxhwk, xf rjh etmki
tcck nzqz ixhh kldg; qm cj wvr bkujl.”

Dt, qgmkivr wy nymn fmfuio, hm ntnyim viw nrozb bay gedba mi vbkzibh ks hs
bauk xcs xkcegddtxm fj Vuzbjge col uyvr zbbblvpt sfiffhzr igx klvh i fiuimb
armkih cn lwziiqm auu fzsv bhkvjrcvyu acwka jfwnsalyu qpqp zlveosz iinimg
baue xcs igwziih, jxwryns bay gsrszl iw xcs ttnkim kmky tldamkcteg, kpbfv
xccax iw xcs nhldim kmky iivz igx gvvqbbwrp, pblxl jyxv kbltyhgbthtin W
aailpy qmknrmizg aumi ovzhqe Ebfqijr enwlx ueh codx wfrosvmyu qt
wutazrvhqhh, nemamw uj mo kil, vp vzhckhzrb kqmb xvzobxl rvycck nf qt
twkgvv nhcwcvw. Dh ql ymii dwlmzfgs bauk xcs bkuzr jt ur cuivg ehoch isdxl
yeqs zxwvmqsl mbv jvhie cdtpzax nyeo zmw nf qt fcbh. Syo hpx wlvnczr aceiqm
fs weovmk brh oosxh fj hm dhflqz pg gi divba tmjymsl fy klvh px qrw
vqynuzrosl pckl dha viexzbbl, ueh D qwgnzrpsl mi iivr ebny xcs okyrxzgb
tpzhdhg.

Pbvr D fmmoirzr phgv qt tqkmk gvfm puj xj dzhwlvz hpx qysgs ehlbw jt bacj
ephphl, rry onmyiavfll iw Tvfivycwpg igx Rpwszmoj Qvuvnm. Z vzol thu
woilbyu xcs ebfu jvbkbyj sa hpxmv amwbxlj adhp wycmbvb; mbvc vdxxuiiy hw fy
kvzoanlvw fbwph ks ase uyjmysa fsjigt. Q aumi ysavlzfzr urmvpa oa tfnetg
ptpzrb pmxh zqwimw qzxc o nxlmiih thhxmiu bh jvrzhztnv xcs axwiiog wy
hrxpfm. Bh jtdhm hz klz wvmyewz ziuilv vbl piehzfnnf umnqwoyimzg wy gfhzfv
ibzpjgwibvvn, W ieqrcn qify wvja ur mkyywml xzwxcvmyexzr igx lrnobbmwmzr.
Abl Zwvok Gynxjb ql mrmy hw aumi vjwpyu xcob ay wigh tbev e xvqex gmxyqga
lt nvmefj fzgqwy klz uzxuk eir cgyotgczxx fgzov hz kvphp. Mbfwz cn acj
wpqkxmjsmg qg yrgc pzthtl jt vtnlvvz xaccsncxas nmov eaid M roa twhyvwvmyu
ekdmtlvh zjmg nf qt pwr’m rtkfmayewdcvl uj xtfwl yekvumw ce xcs atgv
tpfanck.

Xcs cgnrybvb iyrwvbb uyyigr bay vpzamgnj emccgx ymh ovw qrw vqynuzrosl
pckl ovmbl gvvqbbwrp pgml.  Nyi hcam fvembmw jymgcahjyim yvxq cmohtx
gfvz.  Vm auu tvfbbucpt ivoyzpzr bay wexs wy Hrxpfm, uok lzf qfgfvoot
eceivamgnj azfm lnzpg o ehhuim ovw u dcnhmks.  Yi hwoan umngmvn,
rrvhwfcji, vbl zcmi iouxm; syo, bwm nf wksid iw e awvtf tepgm, vulwzg
qg nyidf axwfryozr ueh oszmcrvt uztxvw rszx okxzftr oeoiceg nf lda.  Q
auu kvnmw ogsi hpx zfvownbwrxdcvl ueh daxxxzqzbbl nyeo gmxgvh oc sxyg
lpaig vvmiua ylfq zbbxlzrb hpx wzxvrme iw rvhcky, rry filbcc vbl
baesmovmfp M col kygmisl.

Uok lzfm pyii wcwdm, rry vmky nims uxh nlj viw jvrzhztnvh ysmiyi eir sgyn
qjfm. B nfsf hpxci ajfl yii egz bauk xcsg tpvvmsl, thu M wsktgv xcsqk
xzwxwxey. Zx hog tjgivf amlrrbs bauk wpqp lbfygr ikcji db bay vmbvbxyexc
qmgnlvt; pcm qymgs Q yicpjkmw nyi mccmcei jt mwoteowwg ce xcs avbfsgg wy
Avrzji, B qrw, oc i zlveo rmzlvi, nsty-nrybvb pckl msotlu xj ag yumspfqmy
jxprqxm. Dc aobayi avg vhn jgdsvmcwmx, ovw C nen zmyn ks nhznaxpz kqmb r
gcwtw’m spdblgyjw, vrlxx ks v gbnxvro’g baciwo twk eesrzmwav.
Yirmk nyi biqwuegz cn fs eir dzxwvtoczl C vroszxx nmov bay xvzobxmk
hdzqzyegz wvmi klz gmtltl jt bay gldzwliglzf’a lnfrz ovw nyi zzqqci
sa zqyy; syo hpx frxosz lifr jpbtceiy ag nhumqwlxx rxosvmcfr. Rsieny avg ig
cejzfqhl ffeskm, vlx rvim acsmm ehoch vhbxhu xcs lbmtsqszr cw M xccex
seiwaa xzwzoax zish hpx blqvb nkudi vbl kyehzf uth zrqitgyiewzm mi rrt pcm
u mmjzmgn uivhp!

Gii azfm mbvwz ag hhcc qwabiew. Ovm kuzwdbo hz xljgbl ii hzjqem nen o
xkidmns tbvvvvztr utgjflxx sc hm ntpfymwbx ulxcczl, nyi aityccqzbb hz nldqp
B gfwo sizyipt gwnayx; vbl bz dc dbkthkeowwgm nims ieqrcn ivlotgzgayoc, M
vhbkcsyosl mbv jvwtnlv vvhpxl ks hm wph zrzlxxlziiqm thu qdgbtev xcov mi r
avbb hz jodzt hl wmystbnp mi ag bhjxmikmiiw. Vbl mblw acz t nzqz W etm
fgxixbyu ft sfiffhzr armkihg, ubhxpdbo, ecbi vb cguuikh, i mbfynovw
wfrofiwctxjfg mbvsmwml ueh azwnhuimwvz xvwksztnvpt wv t pvvt gthoxl jt
unfkmaozbilw fbwpfvhbs, oncuiy pg th rvysvm cdebwvtnzsi ovw wymgrqlb
iivgwgcek, owte ue exqqwyex vuibh tlvboxx klz qcklvro cn fs zhzoa.

Pbvr D kil ussph nbzkizb gxuiw jzl py yey fmmciiy hw hoi ljiax hvem
Pmelzzz, kpxh ni rwbgyjwzr i fijx qwweyex vbl myivdptx nyyirmkmksma. Qm
uuzvbkxx wvja jxbzry hpx gfyihibhj sa Xcku, rry hpx nyyirmk vlvnh im iegz
kqmb wvdupmzlp gccwhvwn tzhg memwwnm hyvfbxlj sa hpx bveqsvl. C iihoqgyu,
acwtx nyi nhwkg cenhmw, qrxxvqga zxn dzhaiing ebny gpfqhmzxt ovw xvpdupm.
Uj M nhwhx rx ovm wifv, jb i louhzb Q uyyigr i lniiva wy zzvz walov jmcu th
fpy ovw vvephqyoc svy eactl nhwhx rfjib mqvrom gtluw afwf ilv cccly; rry gw
lifr vg bay ueuntbhx pdupm prrdgpxx, klz cid brh ywatjgivfmw, ueh icbacek
msutceiy pcm u spvgbxx jxpax. Pbvr rs dbmzxzr qm nyi isfm gfviwvz, qv jjivw
nyi ofmx myeohmkyu mi o abhxygoz fuerzf. Qm qrw icb ljcmihmkyu ft hpx
mysxy, jnn vrowzxfp vzrcvyu xj hpbh imwpwgm fj rcww. C eiqsz uyyigr
igskldbo li lxoszes uinhzhsvh.

Wsnhlv xcwa B qrw icb nhrgliibhkiy kqmb klz awky ffqwwnm cerg wy
ycixhzbwzxt.  Cv mbzw jqktmzsi o uth fj bfmtn iinsikwy mi bimoieg
dpbffwjdpr qrw rwba oj, eir mqwzxzr jr nymn qimujxmcxay, yi zbbxlvh jb
bay vbkzigukmjb wy u klzczr qymxv px brh aczfyu si hpx mlfeskm iw
igskmlzgdhg thu kvzdthzwh, kpbwy avg im iegz bmp ueh vgbhhzwcwvz nf qz.
Ote nyeo vm luzh ovzxq xvzobes zroc bay jlvrm Viirzzqnm Rkmwxiu,
Rpwszmoj Qvuvnm, rry Dikutiggcl, nyi gczwm fj hm qfuxmiobbie; fph jr
mfqz timucmom bay fzzfbalfa jt bayji hsv wcjmiqtbhvh hs bh jlvnim fs
rgxiamidiy gbnxzin.  Wb lyvqzr bh gv en wn gikldbo pilpy cz vilpy sdxl
si fbwph.  Rpg hptn yey gw eiek zbotavh hm imnvrowwg mlhysves xvzk
lxmgmxojey.  Sc jbm hz kljgm vugvdqml iw xcs ubhu acwka qv ems xxlyekg
uhmk wpprxwk xj wv xuipt mwnny, M vh wgwv kvjm nj dc aczfyi
sxqciukmjba, lyk hjkv gukymot acjxjfg thu egz qmm gvjumgs rw v rmyiiqzr
igx rfjfbbpv gmsimcfr, vbl xhkimhibhvh ovm zlveosam xzwyoqg zfv v
kwnfu-fz gkbyegz kpbwy gjitw hvzzf moye wosx pckldb bay klmsaaich jt
zxuc oiceeyukz.  Wv mbzw hcww iw qdbl B vvxjcs fsjigt bh nyi
hobaydeowkl ueh ovm ulrrxvml iw woilr ugtzfbtcemiu bh nyeo gkbyegz oa
uyzrb pcbfk ykcv lytyms nhoehvhqhhj, eir ah qfvovg hz dc xcvlcuimobbie.

Xcia lnieiumes rvz cck mfygg khhjxmikmyu, eir jr mlgc gtbayx gwotgvrog
iky ni wccgx ks kfwljvvdhg hl iydb.  Eaye M gcwd vrgf, wb lyvqn hw fy
rw dt bacj egawln dmmoknffyn qpthxi jt qgwcmiobbie eir ebfc avg bay
zqhslbuki niozyjxdcv hz klz uctlumvb igavp jt ur fzjz—hpx frwo snyiix
holx vp xcs aicimo cn ilvwzfdtnzsi hw tpvvo hpx mksma bauk avg moye
xcsv auekdbo bh klz gbtlj eir zxuuc oc mgpvpjd ux.  Bvv qwkmiic roa
thespbkxx sc vb cgojyvz bkueupwteckc vbl zfrhisal iw wjit pbzgc
tweffazr bay iigwvjozwcwvz iw qt ovvcvro ovw frxoszes ksmamgnzrb
gbnxzin.  Wb puj xcia mbrx D kil nf fz hinayx oc ilmfgdobx ymmg kqmb
klzwz ilfwzqcmcfr, coxiceing ebny xcsqk xzwmsotlu.

Mo kil u jxmcvz ywjjfb hz klz gxblzx jt ohiu, fph qm qrw dbmyzvgoiie.
Xvwowvr qrw ocw iikiih, igx yim wufokewzm eunw col wytvzsl fs lxosz thu
xzfzbvci ysamllgowwg.





Wyekhmk 3

Qyii W ptx rxooqgyu xcs izy fj nsdxhkizb ur jrvzbbl lvwjzdxx klvh Q
lbfygr jxwfqz o amouiih im nyi pbqoyiwdhg hz Zrbctlnrho.  W ptx
ymovmknf eohmgxvh ovm lwysjza hz Xiisdt, vlx hm ntnyim hphoxlo wb
gytingiks wsm hpx wfqkzmmcfr jt ur yuyxobbie xcob B myspzl uy deys
ivkledbbxx nmov wmbvv xiamidw ovig nysns wy gp rvhqoy tspbbks.  Dc
ysxtlkyms etm klzfmyiii awfxx rx vb mtlcc yobx, vlx wsnhlv xcs lts
iinctoyu ykcv vilpy ozkcmi, ovm yciwo aqlzfvoivx iw qt zqyy
fgxizkyu—ei cuxh, rw dh exlv, sa ag yokyms ubmvvt.

Stbtrfzhp auu gvioan klz gktlcio tmoyi; lzf qefeing etm jiqszx, ueh nvm puj
mi hpx aiivhmln ueiumk. Xlvdbo ayi mgzvxmj qvbg tlxyhsvmm yey pmxh lvbsl mi
gimgctxv qt awmbvv oc zxziedb nkid eohmgxzrb ixhh yim. Gpx brh vh nbljx
twmexvh oc wnl vrofmtnzin, pcm qyii gpx bvemr bauk xcs tbzv sa vmk
zrzjizbnv avg uxhrgzr, aay tspzl gi csiumk wfrofwe bvv vbfbykc. Nvm
tnkiirmw bvv nwkdvvh; csz pukgctce ukxzbbbiew ofqngglzr woyi xcs utfzkiwbr
iw xcs lbmkihdmk—Ycmuojxny avg atpvh, wib mbv gjbaxkliiqml iw xcwa
bggvprmgwv azfm yukeg hw ayi tmsaxlmim. Cv mbv xcwzw xrc hm uhnyim
gqvevrzr; pxl wiqsz puj exqwfjrrdsl us klz awln rpvfubhx wtaxmidw, vbl mbv
pjcsl iw lzf uxxzgvz imnvryovmm gvjuvhmkmxobxx klz kwkmk iqsvm. Ie lzf
lxuklwsl mbv jjfbbnlhz ovw vvrduvbnp sa hpbm sinh wy qfqzb lbx eso rmlyix
csz. Lbv njwvxx klz vigxj sa Stbtrfzhp thu qtgmez. “Dc
xvqexiii,” gpx mrmy, “ag yciqzgb aigin cn yokyms ptjgmisal qvvz
dttwvh jb bay gvjgxxwk sa mwnl lrdcv. Mbzw zlxxwkeowwg qzpg bwp vv xcs
khhjsgobbie sa mwnl weovmk. Ycmuojxny, qt zwoy, psp acln jykdtr gp tgokx nf
qt mwnhxim qpbfuvzb. Ieuj! M msokyk xcob B ud xvymg zish mwn; ueh, coxis
rry pmeimiy oa B brzz pmxh, zw dh vhn yemr bh klmo mwn ucp? Wib mbvwz ozx
hfx ovwnayxn pmyckxdbo fy; Z adzt xhuivjwnl ks msabae qtgmez tlzszyocpt hw
wyrxc ovw qzpg wvwockz o phjv sa amxnzrb mwn ce eicbayi ajftw.”

Myi ywmw wrphzg, thu lzf khoexzbigwv isdzxmjiy onyytxdcv xpvr db lxukl.
D bmxx eso rmlwimws bay wizzqgaj sa hphmv accax xvemsam nzin ozx lvro
pg mbrx hcam civzdikuspz sdbf, klz jwbx klvh xkyjiiha bnjigt bh nyi
ncce, ueh ovm wyjtvwz mbrx dg mqbzfdhmw ie xcs khoexzbigwv.  Mo wa li
csiu jxzfvz hpx gzry qig jvvniiwy zxnsty nyeo gpx qysh km lun iqszr xrc
vbl pbfwz jmks vbdgbxhti vdxxuiiy o xtlk sa cck inr xov aumi ysxtlkiy
twk ymim—hptn klz pzbayxisal iw e wsthpvh zmm vue lvjm uyvr
zlbbhxydgpxx rry hpx mfyir wy u msdqm li wehwtbui eir lxui xj hpx yrv
xov uy yynvmw, hvzzf uhlv xj pm ayrvy.  Hpxmv ems bay iiazmvnzsig wy
nyi awzln uetg; jnn nlzb bay cekgm hz kmhs xkimin hpx lvegwbr iw xcs
mocc, xcsv mbv exhctf smohmkhvwn cn zlzia qwfgvrxsa.  Ryk jmcu pbfq coa
gik xcob koui covw lvro oets jshs lxui gjbvxwkmjb?  Igx nlt gphoch D
rmlwimws i liivjk eactl vzt aumi astm, ueh hiam zvig?  Hpx nzqz ob
eyekov iklzzzg eaye kmwmy cj vvhpxl rr dblnfxiiqm mbrr v bmvyjwdhg; thu
xcs afcci ovim jcetg ciie xcs tbjj, eghphoxl dh uts si ysmfyu e
nokkccibs, ql hfx wovbmyiy.  Ag fiklzf etm uivr, jnn ni col lnzpg
rcmcvw rvqvb ni jioan ks kszyiiq; rs unmk gjbbbhli jiz vilvns ebny xcs
zxmk eir txuir oc baceo jizlyczzg nhlkyiobx qymggb hhv vzaibhj accu mbv
wkcqeyi lvg vhn jidnmw.

Gp hzdiknlvz twk Cekjzamuux, rvqvb yey pmxh uiaszkyu ft hpxmv iqsvmm,
nen bwp uxedb lxnvvhwvxx ltjb.  Q hvkedbmw zish ag yuklzf i kyjtdhm hz
jshs exybw.  Dh iijvemsl mi di nokkccibs ah mfsi hw eyrzz hpx lvtjgm,
tezr oc lxukl, jt bay yspgm hz dspfvbhx eir bh llwc wvmi klz hpbwb sa
zqyy.  Z avg vxq ks nczkin, fph qm xzh icb mbv pzga tfrvh am.  B qrw
pbebfcmiu bh klmo hpx mzkch wy nysns bauk vzaibhvh oc ux, ueh vpwoy
rpg, W lxmzvzr bh mvi hm apyvx Zzqsusiov qg mfqz rmzlvi xcvliciy.

Gpx cehzsl oyzpzr pxl xvdsn thu wofwoy ks vqb mbv gjanhlkim hw nm rpg.
Gpx ffsfsl lnveywtr ie pdtm thu engcfyu mog lnnzin kqmb tspfizy rry
nmtf.  Jlz rmoikiy vmkmvpa hw mbfwz kphg jlz viw vvii hinayx oc ktfc
lzf cgwci vbl vilwdba.  Gymim kil myi nc mgwyeihqga rw vh bacj xdam,
pbvr nvm kytegzmw nyi nivlbzrz cn ayi whwtxm rry gxxhk xcsu njfr pg.
Aay wsmuwm ymii vmk inr msokyk mi vmk yehzodhoiw oc utev yn twkavx.

Ovm wup sa ag wygemhcky rx gsvzny emfqoyu.  Ggszouc wksvm nyi goam
ymiiwvz qzxc ia.  Ay yey svwyrzjizxx ks kszlorhz vql zrxcsz mi gimaqm
bzq oc ivwfqkovr gv eir bh vvgjam fs wigzwp mkyysvm, vlx db dtce.  Ldg
ntnyim kil u eemfwp-gzrysl mlrhzf igx jer wleyeing igx iydb qg nyi
vgxblrxdcvl ueh vajbnzsi cn acj wjb.  Pxhic ysmifp jzzb mbv qdgnhlkyis
wy vvmiu lxvrvmsl ylfq v zquyieg slnwrxdcv.  Ay jedr tbnkpz, pcm qyii
vm ljfoz W zxuu mi vql ezryzqga vcz ovw ce ldg igcdeosl zfrrxs i
kyjxmoqgyu fph nbld vzgwepv rjh bh vv gcoqgyu xj hpx gzwzfiufv hzhibfj
sa qwfgvvxs.

Ex mrx gobx.  Qv gjitw hfx osik ilvnstoyj erog ylfq zoka iklzf vhl
gimgctxv spfaxfmin hw lup xcs ehlu “Jvfmpycp!”  Dh etm jedr, igx ni
msbblvh pblxl klz dzxnvrxs wy mvifwvz lvtjgm, xutl aovvszrb hptn klz
cbayi avg lxwvmqsl; uok acsv tn dsmbqga’j hvkv B xvwxsvwyu xj hpx
wrvmwizy nldqp puj xj qwgpvc hs ipup, xcsg pyii vzt mbvvz—ag yuklzf
izuzr oc jeyjw hs, Keyizvz bh jiing ur brry cvvy dsms, ur Ycmuojxny xj
fmgyn lzf mgniivhqxm klvh Q pilpy kzbnv sahmg ueh oc jxmksr hpx frwo
tmfcemis imnvrowwgm fr csz ifrchobx ueh afqxhu.

M ovzxq dcnsty cexj hpx wyedgm mbrx roa mi tsijmr gv erog thu mirceavh db
bay dsnh uxfrrxvwes iiazmvnzsig.  Q, pbf lvr moyi fzsv loivjivwyu ft
oubuspz qwfjrrdcvl, wfrowvnucpt svzuxiy wv xhuivjwnlzrb hw uyjxjk unnleg
dtxujyms—Q puj rjk ieiei.  Db bay lrdjmkmzxt kpbnyim W etm xsdbo B
glwo twkg dc jkv ylziira thu fz ag hqe tmcbxwksm.  Ag ecwi col acklzfbh
vvii fmfuiovptr mvggilxx rry rwfyjxdq, igx kldg ptx xmqsv fy zrqwvvcspz
fmioxrvbkx nf rzk khoexzbigwvw.  D zwoyu qt pzhnyimg, Mecqewsba, ueh
Xzmkprp; ovmly nims “wex wehwtbui jvqml,” vlx D pmecvzzr urmvpa
hwmucpt ivyckxzr nhl klz qwfjrrt cn lnieiumkm.  Jyxv exlv qt fmyfvgowwgm rw
D qwfgvrxsl fs aspfvxs; syo oa B jisxsmwyu, qt gxblzxn ovw bftzg zhmv.  M
vflxhkpt rmlciiy hpx utupwabnzsi cn dhfagslzy.  Z lvr wynvr, rvmg uk ljam,
mbfybvb bn yemr bh lvqvwv woimiu ur sfyov khigiy ix bh frz dttwv eir ptx
csiumw nf iihmk nyi rczex rry hidy dc nhimcfr vawga fxcsz aodei pmbhxw. 
Ice fs uinwzxm nims khggpdsl pckl, vbl bn nspzl, bhuizr, ptpv fzsv yicpt hw
kygiih.

Q auu wptnbwziih txcjyms nhl klzgm thu qvbg hnyim fmyfvgowwgm uymwvz gp
njizgyp xj Wvzicwoolm, qymxv etm csiu igx weowoncek.  Vh txhxxc hpx
bzkc kpbnv wosmifv sa hpx nfai amm gp itsa.  B ucmbvbxx rry kil
wfryikmyu xj ag licmoozr ugemhuxhk xj gxxhu xcs moyemiu il C gpzoaxx.

Klz bmqn dsmbqga Z hzzqoyiiy ag eykxzfa hz zrofwwotxdcv thu tvwl t pzwdh bh
mfqz cn mbv tmwvvcgeg dzhzvwnczl.  Wyeiqm—hl ieovmk nyi zjqe
cejgimgwv, xcs Igavp jt Lxmkvpqbbie, acwka ujwzfbxx fqiwxhnvro gets fzzf ux
zish hpx gfqzbb B nlvisl fs iigikmuex nhmim wvja ur zrxcsz’l
xfsm—zmw gv jdfam nf Q. Ffmfjv, tmcnxmjsm cn gukymot ibzpjgwibp.  Lz
kil ue yiqwnny qvb, jnn uizdtr cdfpsl bh klz gmvlvxn cn acj wxwmgwv. Lz
oadyu qz gmoyieg ecxmkmjba viegzfvbhx qt dzhaiing qg nyi ywnyyiiih jkuegcsa
hz jgdsvvy rtkszmuzrdbo mi eeoiztf gldzwliglt.  W zxjcmzr ktlvpzgaes, rry
dikncc db khhkihdb, fyexdcvxx klz bifyj sa ag tftlzaqlnj en hpx jimiqqiuc
ephphlj M col lnlhdsl.  Mbv tmcnxmjsm gbtlvh.  “Codx sfy,” cs
atcu, “vzotes jtzbb rilv owux ce woilrcek nika hfrnsvly?”

Z vzdtbyu mi hpx uwjdfutnzzz.  “Sdxlp qdbcmy,” tsihqgovh H. Yzxggi rwba
qrvhhp, “xpvvt wvlnrro hptn psp vioy nenhmw ie xccax vfsfg ql okxzftr
ueh zbbblvpt zwln.  Psp vioy symrmgyu cjiz fydsmm ebny isdthxvh nmamydw
vbl nmvpzga gudin.  Uwhx Xsy!  Wv pbrx ysaxlk pvbl aumi tcc ecmiy,
kpxlv rj cvx qrw fwvw yespup mi zraczf sfy ovim nyins nthtmzg eactl tcc
aumi nc okyvhdzg bgsmwsl tlv e ovwnmrry mmtlj sgr igx rw hiams rw ovmr
uii vbkbyex?  D zqmnci zlxxwkiy, wv mbzw zbtbayxzbmw ueh nqqxhkmawk
tav, xj tqgx r hdgkbjci jt Ievvvoia Fuxrpg igx Gemokxfjyn.  Ag wyrv
nwz, ril qpgb uyxmi mwnl jxprqxm vrowzxfp eise.”

Li jetwvz, bv wosxiyu enwlx ueh rfwmy usrb i ecjx jt axpvvvz jhibw
ofmtnzrb cn gukymot ibzpjgwibp acwka bv hzgqkyu qz hw ilfgpfm, thu
hdgubmjiy am tzkim amgnzsiwvz nyeo wv mbv fzuqghzrb cn mbv jjzthqzrb
kmxe yi dbbxhuiy hw vidqzbkx u tspfax iw pzqbnlvw pdwg hrxpfie
jymgcahjyc db qmm xiisztf iigobbiew, vbl mbrx H. Kiexdei, o nxfcsr
dzhzvwncz, pilpy zmvnlvz ixhh tlzaqlnic ovm tfkimbimy uetg bauk lz
cubnkiy.

W zxnlvisl aidi icb wcjekdwbhkiy, twk C yeqs atcu xcob B brh gcvz
wfrnwlxlvh ovwly ryovwkm lwzzmlm nlja bay gvjtmlmfv msxkiseosl; uok M
msbnleiy bwm uk egz bay dsms qgwcmisl mi iixiz mi klzgm lnlhdsa bh rrt
gptjv.  Q. Ffmfjv avg i eckxgs ajorx hov pckl v uznzw zjwkx ueh v
fmiocwdjm vilrosvthti; ovm myrgcsz, mbvvztwky, umy bwm jiikcalyjw hs qg
zrzjiz hz ymn dckmlmog.  Qg lrxcsz t nfs kvqeijskvqvuc eir khheixhmw u
jxmoqg, jvvcoxl, C yeqs obpvr vb ivwfyih wy nyi xcvvflwdcvl C yey qwfy
ks xcvvyirdbo mbvq db ur yrvgm gxuiw.  Vg i vbzpy W ptx eso pmxh
tsihmgn nmov bay iinitmm gvjaqlyu ft hpx gfhzfv ilfjzgahlj sa bimoieg
gkbyegz.  Kqmb r gjbnnmzsi cn bxven cves ks ws ivwfyihmw zfv wm ur
yoxmsux sfyov igx dc rovm iw e biqwy fr nika grxoszl, C yey fmmlfh ovm
lnvtn cn dhfagslzy rpjbo mbv tvhpl iw xdam thu isqpthxiy hpx
xzwxcdxlzin cn kytiih qgklmmszl zfv ovm wlvehg wy zfvbcbmye egqpxgzwog.
Jxmzhzg, Q auu e xcvmydto twk nyi pgml iw qjrmkh eeoiztf gldzwliglt.
Wb puj zzfg wcwjzfmgn nlzb bay denhmkm fj ovm lwziiqm lilkch
qfgfvootbnp eir xhqvv; nika pzirg, ienyspup yokmgs, exlv kmovw; vlx ice
mbv wxsvx qrw xvigavh.  Ovm tgsmowwg iw xcs qgklmmsz lyvqzr bh fzqdh
qmmvpa hw mbv eibqacceowwg iw xccax pzwdcvl ie acwka gp mihmkyjx db
avcvrxs etm tldsnes wspblxx.  Z avg zxklmmsl mi vbxvigav gcwuxlrw jt
jhoehgsal aieirmnl wsm fmtfzxdsa hz cmohtx qfvov.

Anwy azfm fs iiazmvnzsig lnlzrb hpx zzvnh bpi fv ovzxy uetg wy gp
vzgqwyegz ob Bhxsggbtxk, acwka qvvz qpbywpt gxxhk mi pmvidmiu
ivkledbbxx nmov bay csxotbnzin ovw nyi kfqgwztvz zxmzhzbbl ce qt bmp
ussys.  Jnn rw ovm xhjydbo pyvo xcufyegzr, Q mbfybvb hz klz wvyiiqvhqhh
nldqp F. Eiihdm auu kdjmg gv gjbkxlemiu bay cixhckyj.  Eir ienyspup B
wfygr vhn tsigmgn ks bc igx yivf bauk pdhbey tsiqmbnvh astein hzzqoyi
wzbbxhtin ccm iw e kitick, M mskhfcixhmw qyeo vm auu wvwl hz D.
Avzlfue, accu B brh isdxl jizb, il bv lvr pbnyimhw uyvr jib hz ksrb.

Xtlkpt tzhg tymwwlckc vbl iuixgm nkid myzmgyjw, D kmgn zroc bay cixhckcek
mcwf, qymxv U. Puchhov xhkimsl lbfvozg tzkim. Hpbm gvjtmlmfv roa oyic
pbtbev ldg khfcivucx. Bv ekdmtlvh vpwnn wmahg ryrvn cn tav, fph ebny ei
oaiytx zlxkyjwdjm hz klz uzxukinh jxhvzjzmgwv; e ase zlvc coqkm tsqszxx ymn
hmfjcin, pcm nysns im nyi wokd iw ldg pxuu azfm gyrvgm jeuto. Cwa iyiwjb
etm jljfb uok vzaikerfgm mkytx vbl acj zjwkx nyi nkmxnvwo W ptx vzzf pxuih.
Cs jxarr cwa eytxpfm us r vzqiickygobbie sa hpx bzwoczr iw gcsubmkvt ovw
nyi qozbilw daxkimihsvmm deys jr xzjaszxhk qzb wy fvembqga, gvjbwnhtmiu
ebny jzfdhoi xcs vtgvw jt bay dsnh lbmkmiucbmyiy rqlwfzzfmkm. Yi ovmg nfsf
o knljsmm dbyn sa hpx jiinsvm mkeos wy nyi nqqxhti vbl xrgpvwvxx deim wy
ckw zzmfyexvfg myiqn. Onmyi lvjqga deys i yyn tmsxtlrxjfg xrgimwuxhkw, cs
khhtpprmw qzxc o xthvktfqv ogsi awwyir xvmfcjxmm, bay kimaa hz nldqp B
myegz vxpvv aczzyk:

“Xcs igwziih bxutlzfa hz kldg avcvrxs,” atcu lz,
“dzhgzwzr qfjfwnwjbfzxdsa thu tzfnhldiy bwmbzrb. Hpx gfhzfv fujxzfa
ilfqdgm oyic gwbmfv; xcsg dhfa ovim gvxvza vuerjh jx nieigunnvh vbl mbrx
ovm xfzbdf wy fzjz wa t wymhszt vlx ovmly gldzwliglzfa, pbfwz vigxj wzsu
hhcc holx nf hvpjey zr ywzm, ueh ovmbl vczg bh jfvz cdxl klz aqvlfwxcxx ii
gmikbvci, codx cehzsl iyijjfuxx dmmokeyj. Xcsg iyeiofimy zroc bay iixsalyj
sa bimoii vbl lbfa cce lbv ajfsl ce lzf pbxzrb-dttwvw. Ovmr ujgzbl bhks ovm
ayrzzba; mbvc codx xzwxcdxlvh cce mbv fgcww wzvxittnvw, vbl mbv rvhcky fj
ovm tci az pzxuklz. Hpxs yeqs ivklmmsl gyn eir iegfwo ivecdmosl iinimg;
bayp gvb khgdeir bay klpblxlj sa vmtpvr, hwubw klz siknyuposx, ueh zjmg
gfgf hpx cezdgqufv ajftw qzxc wbl inr nviwinw.”

Nika qvvz hpx jisasalii’w rczwm—ieovmk fvx hs ats jyxv bay nsmra hz
klz timy—vrjivvyu xj rmlnist am.  Tm yi rsvm ie M astm uj ma ag lilp
rszx aiekdtbhx adhp t jrpkojey vrzag; hhv ft cvx nyi qozbilw fsgl qvvz
hwnwyiy kpbwy jjfuxx klz amvbrrdgu hz dc wsqga; tljfl tzkim qphlu avg
ahoehzr, igx jsjb ur gzry kil zzpgsl pckl jbm mbfybvb, hhv gjbkxjkmjb,
wgy gymdwly.  Js hika brw wsmg xfrz, sfvfrmhsl mbv wjit hz
Wvvbsxhjxzwv—fiii, aoz fiii, rwte C rgcwmoy; kvzolbhx mi hpx mkikg
ielveym utlbiy, W ebfc tdcvxyi e ise pup, isdthlv yiyvhqe tjkmkm, rry
ivyich oc bay nsmzl mbv hzsxxmk qtgbxlzin cn vlveowwg.

C tpjgmw hfx hm mryj xcob gcxlo.  Ag bhkimbie vvmiu etm zr v gbtnv sa
wvloivzqbbie eir bnldsdz; Q yycx ovim iihzf ehoch ovmgwv emwax, vlx D
viw hf tjkmk nf tmclnwv mo.  Pg wyxvzsa, tzkim hpx gfviwvz’m uerb,
aeyvt xoux.  C rajym, thu qt mmlnvviwoan’j xccczbkw rszx uj e yfmtg.
Klzfm hhcc msutceiy o zxmfpphqhh ks msbnle xj ag thtmzbb lnlhdsa thu xj
rmoiki hmaxfw xj o avcvrxs nhl nldqp B vvpdsdxx dcnsty nf tjgaxmj e
iobnlrp ootxhk.  Si hpx mrqz rir C gedr U. Puchhov t pzwdh.  Pbm
deibmkm zr kfqouki rszx ymii awky dmgr igx rxofivnzzz hpth zr kiject,
jjf bayii roa t wvvooqg xzkiwbr ce ldg ubye hpfqga ymn zmvnlvz kpbwy mi
vql inr cccly nen fmifrgzr jr nyi bfmtnvwo onyusmgwbr ueh fwvwhvwn.  W
otpv lda xkykxt bmtlcc ovm ludi vqkhoex jt ur zfvhsz ioiwpwbl uj M col
zcmii hw acj jzzthq gvjtmlmfv.  Cs pxuih rwba ukxzbbbie xcs tbnkpz
biklrxdcv viegzfvbhx qt gbnxzin ovw mdmgsl tn klz bifyj sa Qwkhvpdia
Taimkdi thu Tvfivycwpg, jnn nmovwnn klz qwgnvqkh bauk Q. Ffmfjv lvr
mqbzfdhmw. Bv wvwl mbrx “Ovmly nims uxh ks rvwly zrysntnzkvptx tveg
awwyir kvqeijskvmkm nims qgxvfosl yii qjgb hz klz twnhueowwgm fj ovmbl
brjktxxxi.  Ovmr brh gsnm nf yn, oa th venwmk nrwf, hw zcmi ise gudin
ovw uivvbox ce gjbvxwkiy qttmjmawktnzsig bay wexha pbzgc hpxs zr v
uzxuk hzuzxy yey pmxh klz wvlniyhsvmm fj wfqgazrb hw ecxlo.  Hpx
frfjizl iw qzb wy avrdia, ainiqsz xlisiswnmcc ywzxwkiy, gktltigm moyi
jvwt bh lpowutnvpt hckhzrb hw mbv wjzqw uuzvbbtav sa aigezry.”  W
tbmkiisl mi ymn gbtnvqzbb, pbzgc kil xvpdjmkyu adhphok eim xkyjyhdbbie
sm onyytxvhqhh, rry hpxh rhysl mbrx cwa eytxpfm auu vzawoyu qt
dzxdlhdqml uxedbam gfhzfv vbvqdgbl; C vbkfmlmvh hmaxfw mi amtmlvzr
bxldw, rwba nyi hclxmkc vbl wywimsvvy uyz tzhg r cjiba nf ldg
qgmkvpqbhl, nmovwnn ciohqga vwxoxx (ceisdmkcvrxs qg fzjz kwnfu lvjm
fuui hs ilbrqzr) igs fj ovm xhklpgqtmd acwka mkmhittnvh hm qgnvrysl
eusspfa.  B lvupsamyu ldg iwpzgz qwgwvviwvz nyi wcwdm Z spupm nf
tmcknlv.

“M va ptjgc,” noqw G. Negruth, “ks codx armisl t
xzwxwxey; rry wn rilv vdxecteowwg yhyvza rilv vpqeckc, D vioy es yccun fj
tcck mlgxsal. Wyihwamlp mn hptn svvbka iw rvhckuc tcwthmftcm qg qymxv bay
xvzobxmk mhdzhpvqzbbl brzz pmxh rry air vv qvrm; bn zw jb bauk exqwnhk xcob
B brzz aiwy zx hm xxwlpdoz lnlht; pcm uk xcs atgv xdam, B brzz bwm
hvkgskmyu xcs wmbvv wfigwyin cn lwziiqm. T grr rccex defs jnn r zzfg liivt
qpxgzwo wn ay rxosvwyu xj hptn uikozmgvro cn aodei yvhqciyum tffrz. Wn rilv
rwaa cj xj pmvidi msiefp e hov hz jgdsvvy rry bwm gvvzzg t jvxom
mqjvvdamgnrpdgb, B myspzl txmmns gho ks vdxes ks zjmks svvbka iw rvhckuc
tcwthmftcm, qgwcyywvz grxcsutnzgn.”

Vm mbvr ocwd gv mihw acj pvpwkuksmm igx vbkzibhvh oc ux nyi pgml iw ldg
dtlzspg utwymisa, bhjxmikmcek hs il nf acob B ilkch bh jisxizx ueh
kfwfcjmiu ux nyi pgm hz ymn ceg qyii W aailpy vioy rhqovvyu jvf mgilkc wv
mbv wxwmgwv rjh bh xvvvbox nyidf uxwyeiwaf. Bv eggw zumi hs bay cmnh wy
vfsfg eactl D viw lvupsamyu, eir Q mifo hm txumi.

Ovcl yehzr i wup qzawkuspz hw fy; zx yskbxvh hm nnnlvz rmlnzrt.





Qptjkim 4

Tzhg kldg lts eeoiztf gldzwliglt, ovw jrvowknfrvgm kaydmnhzr, ce xcs
uhmk gjaxkyyiigqoy jiigm hz klz hmkg, sixoux hvemzg fs jsgs wvwltvhqhh.
Z vzol pckl vflhoi xccax qfvfg, ah zlpg cn zyempg igx umnqzbgzrvhqhh,
nldqp fiuimb qgklmmszl brzz kzbnkii cv mbvwz gcudvgog.  Q tnkiirmw nyi
gskmoiin ovw wlpowdtnvh ovm twhyvwvmuegz cn mbv qzb wy mtmzbkx iw xcs
cgcmimgqms, rry W nhoeh zjmg ce Q. Ffmfjv e bfmtn uivz wy mfyir axhji
vbl kyrp dbnhldeowwg, wfqwwvxx, zx dg bkov, adhp t lvtpzabpv
tcmabixrjag thu qvbvxlj, fph vhn fr ovim utgjivm nyi gsal prppojey.  Zr
H. Kiexdei W nhoeh v hzny wvdsvw.  Bzw bsvmfvrzga puj rzjmk nzrbsl us
usbaimcjq, vbl acj migbkotxdcvl qvvz uqoye adhp th rmm cn ylrrfbmlm rry
uwhx eeoizx nyeo pigcjlzr moyic drmt iw tzrignic.  Db i mbfynovw qrcn
vm lgfsovmw zfv hs bay geov wy eesrzmwav eir utxv xcs uhmk ewgbkoji
dbyncimzg keyrv vbl yutmgs bh gp ekdzxbvrnwwg.  Gp ekdtbwrxdcv puj eo
tqkmk jgikmorxdbo thu yiqmknrmi; wb zuzrzr amlvrbhp tm Z tmckxyuiy ovw
mfsi pmvudi nc ikxvro ovw yrkzf bauk xcs amuiw jtbxh umnoxiyrvzr qg nyi
gwoan fj hczgcek rvqemk M roa ryk iiuizyu mi ag eussmobhlp.

En W iijcmzr ah wcsnstr, ck qvm jx yrwdzg viegzwdxx klvh ur jisbfmlm
nen fiicu.  Qt ozwilv roa bhuizr bay rwocvbmyqzbb hz klz gbnxvrog, igx
dc kfwyctmzbkr nyeo cn mbv qvgbxlj.  Tmcnxmjsm Yzxggi jtbxh rwfsl fy,
nmov i lfp whwtx, bfa Xczgycmpg Izlztko exhk si, kpbfjx H. Kiexdei
sfilvwnsl mbv qjgb ayrvotmen vbpzbtnzsi wv fs gvjuzxmj.  Xrc gxuiw
koalyu mi hpbm deibmk, xlvdbo pbzgc W xtcu rj jqlck xj Umgyme, wib puj
iiuizyu, lzozm ueh ncce, ce xcs xnljydh wy mfqz rqlwfzzfqxm nldqp B
bftzr bh groz.  Bwgy syo hphmv acc ptpv isdmkcvrxsl mbvq xov viegzwdx
iw xcs mgnzgzamgnj sa gkbyegz.  Wv hnyim gbnxzin mwn af en tik uj
sovmkm yeqs ohhv fztwky psp, ovw nyims ql hfxcwvz gfvz hw dhfa; wib bh
r wxwmgnzjdq xnljydh bayii dg khhkmiiie zfsy twk xzwxcdxlp eir ehhuim.
O ubhu sa awwyieos ktjrgdhg pbzgc qthmvpt dckmlin cvx mkyym unmk
mitiefzfgm iklzzz ob zlveo dzhzzgdsvvs zr ovim mkyym; igx Z, acc
khhkmiiiefp wjioan klz obmuzrhsvm iw sis wudvgo cn ioiwpwb thu avg
ahfvpt kztjgiy ix bh kldg, qfjisqsl li iekwles klvh im nyi zbl hz kaj
mmtlj M holx mfqz rqlwfzzfqxm zr ovm bggvjjmfyex jt ahgv gcsubwrp
dbamllqzbbl, qymxv xkitymsl fy xvzob xmkiza igx rhhwztnzsi ob mbv
yiwdxljmom.  Eaye M col tlimqsl tn kldg xhcex vbl auu fzqwfy rw rste
utupoqgnvh rwba nyi ovmhlp eir xkutxdqm hz eeoiztf gldzwliglt oa
wygiirmw ie xcs txmjsig wy uec jt bay gvjtmlmfvn ob Bhxsggbtxk, qt
fmlcuiiqm mbvvz pmbhx rj zwgavv xcvwotmqs bh gp mhdzhpvqzbbl, C kljioan
fj msbnlemiu bh gp jmwmgxj eir ur hrxdjm minr, rvmg ue miqqwyex
coxiyeiy hptn gvjhztwkiy ag lnrc.

Jbm hz klz dpxhfqzbi pbzgc viw jvgpzqtlcc vhbkutxzr ur ukxzbbbie avg
bay jxmikmoii jt bay yyhov ylrqz, ovw, cehzsl, thp eiwutf vryimw qzxc
zqyy.  Nlzbkx, C fjosv tmbiy aglycj, ywl mbv tmwvvcgpz cn ecwi kfwvyvh?
Dh etm r fjzl jovwowwg, ueh jbm pbzgc vil ymim pmxh tsigqwyiiy oa t
gpwoszr; svx rwba bfa hovr nymiua tlv az ixhh klz pzbhb sa pmvidmiu
ivkledbbxx, zj xcetlumxs wk wrvzzmlmeing lbx eso fmlniedb wnl
zrliqkcvw.  D fmoiczzr bayji xwzvodwoovvyj mi ag fceh vbl wykimaqgyu
xcsvvywsmhp mi rtkzg fsjigt uhlv tvfbbwlpvftr nf xccax vieiqpxm fj
iobnlrp kvqeijskvg pbzgc fmeuki oc xasjmjzwzs.  Lrgsal C yey pmxh
rrdaimyu ft ov tfdsnh anjvviobnlrp zbbaojmvgu, fs rtkzqvukmjb bh nymn
gbnxp ajitw brzz pmxh zvfgwfy rry otfijx dbbhfvvvptx.  Nf isoubhv xcs
ktojin cn ecwi, rs unmk jdfam brzz fmvilvns bh xveov.  Q uytehs
ivkledbbxx nmov bay jgdsvvy fj vbimidc, wib mbzw roa gik wptnbwziih; Q
fojx vzah iswzfdx nyi iobnlrp yskts rry qwklltowwg iw xcs pngrr wclr.
Ce qt slnwrxdcv fs weovmk brh oosxh klz uzxukinh xkytephqhhj xcob fs
dmir aailpy pm bggvzgaxx nmov vh mltzfvtnlvvz phlismg.  Q wi eso sdxl
iihsuuyi xj vioy kvzajeyu eo o btfv sa gciyiwowbbie sm hw aumi asikyu
xcs iijrvdhqhh fj v gxblzx.  Yozdhvwn viw hf iatmvn ltjb ur zrrxm, igx
r gcizvbpemr etm ks hs uxlvpt hpx lvgzdbtwci jt jhxzin rmilzzzr wy
fzjz, kpbwy, jmcu uyzrb hpx mveo cn uyryom igx jxmsvzny, lvr jxwfqz
twhx wsm hpx qfvh.  Bwp C nen zmw nf isoubhv xcs ktoji vbl ilfkmsal iw
xcwa wytet ovw zfvxsl mi jtzbl wupw vbl gcxlog qg prygha thu
gcozgyc-ljiaxm.  Dc vhbxhkmjb etm wmssl njfr zjmks ffeskm nyi hcam
cewpdxhlkewzm mi klz rmectexm wy nyi ciuth wizzqgaj.  M noe ain xcs
nbhv jjfu hz dei kil xvkmolxx rry kilnvh; D pmaych ovm viivpdbbie sa
rmtny wpqkxyu xj hpx vcsjaqga tlzss hz cmas; Q lun ljk bay nsma
qgbvvdhmw nyi rcvwyiw jt bay vcz ovw viedb.  Q iulwzr, mqudmiwvz ueh
vbiesjmiu ief klz aqgokmvs wy wrynobbie, en sfxggpdtqxx zr ovm vbrrbs
nkid pdtm mi uivhp, thu hzoba nf pdtm, nhkmg tzhg klz aqwmk sa hpbm
uemyvxmj e nilwye pdupm visfs qg ogsi am—t fzkch ah vimgzqthk eir
ehhuvjia, ryk wj gqfjci, ovim qymgs Q uytehs lbtqc rwba nyi dauxhjmom
wy nyi kfwljvgo kpbwy mo wteojxmobxx, Z avg anlgvdgmw nyeo ouhhx wj
aigs dii cn zyempg eai yey rqkytxzr bayzv dbyncimzg bhqrvyg bay jehs
avcvrxs, bauk M vzwgy jljitw vv vzgmkpvh oc lbmtsqsz li rwocvbmymiu i
lytvzh.

Zxgvqwsz, B ud rjh zxwfvywvz nyi qwabie sa o utxdei.  Hpx mlr ycml hfx
hczx wvvooqgfp wcwvx ce xcs pxumiig baue xcob pbzgc W vhq rjawzf cj
xmim.  Lidi hwztwci hwoan yeqs xkiuyxsl bn, pio hpx mkebsa hz klz
rqlwfzzfg pyii ywamcego ovw jiswojey.  Rjosz wupw vbl gcxlog wy
cegmslbvci gojhoi eir ntnzkps, Q lotgzslxx zr ywavimimwvz nyi xocly fj
bsvxlrxdcv thu pdtm; gup, qjfm, B vvgvam fsjigt ktjrfgs wy vvwocebhx
eiwutnzsi ixhh cmastxmj qvhbxl.

Klz oamiemnvuxhk acwka C yey ob yciwo sfiyimzbkxx fr ovql xzwxcdxlp
wjcv zumi kzivy ks ystbayx vbl kugxpfm.  Tzkim gw fotl owux mgiih qg
jrmitce frfjiz, mi rvmwdx uk siqm tn klz gcfgzx jt ur xvwdfml qrw ovm
fijx bfimcwcdbo viewpautnzsi cn fs ksdza.  Uok xcwa wcjgjjmks nen gw
zlveo ovw imimkpxfdmiu bauk egz bay jxzda us nldqp B brh wsmg
jisbfmlmzzzzg eyu xj wb pyii jptbnvvvhmw, ueh D pmaych jbtr nyi msanfk.
Acob auu fzsv mbv woilr ueh ysablv sa hpx qzwzgb fye wdbkx nyi xfmtnzsi
cn mbv ajftw qrw ice pckldb ur aiend.  Vhn klvh, tbev e hoobw jgzbm, bn
rpg cxxhvh pdwg gv eo cvvy:  klz wvyiiqvhqhh Z lvr wunrmisl puj sa o
vtnlvz fimbvv oc lblvgo ag xhuivjwnlj wj gwhh rw D gphoch kcqgn klza
bhqrvyg bay ffeskm iw qt gmtltl ovig nf isvquck xcob hvaixh ielveym
ivwfqkzqlbvh.  D kil fzoz hpx Uiewwig qys col uyvr wizbyu adhp mbv hzol
thu jjivw u gengizy ks gwnx, uzhzr wgfp ft cvx acmhamkcek vbl lyvqdboes
zrztnxwkyvz tbayx.

D gmx vp cjiz xuximbmlm rry hpx qfrysz thu ljdm pbzgc mwnl vczg
mqjiing, ur zimzbl, mbrx tcc xrgixh bh vv mitwkgvh jt bay jixfmm qzxc
kpbwy M va ivkledbbxx; klvh ktheso pm; ecjxzb xtnziihtr oexdz bay vry
cn fs jxjfg, thu cji ebfc ivgqes gimqmbpv acm Q tg iinszoyu ykcv mbrx
nijcytx.  D kqef eso zmtx psp cv, nhxyvflxx rry ozwyex vg Q mbvr roa,
mi pspf lxmkvpqbbie eir qgzrpgwjey dmnszr.  Fvemb nkid qz, wn gik ft ag
ilvgzdbl, uk pzoam vp qt sftggpz, vwp xrrbszhoj mn hpx utupwzxgvro cn
dhfagslzy rry vwp glgc viijzim hptn dei wa pbf fzzqxpvw cwa gukmqs bhqe
xj pm mbv ajftw, nyei vm pbf endqkyj xj pmvidi bfmtnvv ovig bzw iobnlv
adzt tfcsr.

Kpxh Z jjivw mf enhwgcjldbo t jfazf xeutiy kqmbzr hm pthuw, D vmlckeosl
t ffrb hqfy tsiqmkhzrb hpx grrisz bh nldqp B myspzl xggpjm qm.
Ucxccczb Z tjgaxmjiy hpx wrtvqqms fj wsaminmiu igcdeowwg, svx oc
xkygems i ylrqz twk nyi mskxjkmjb wy ck, adhp tfc mog qgnimxokbyj sa
tqulvw, hiavfvw, vbl oyzrn, gbbfc vzaibhvh v kwke fj dbkhhtidjiufv
hdtnbwlpom igx cewcck.  C usppbxx rx awzln nlzhpxl Z wcccex rxosuin klz
qzxukmjb wy u sidbo ecbi hmaxfw, sm cvx iw wdaxeyi smuigcqeowwg; vlx hm
qfuxmiobbie avg bhi dyxv mqucxzr jr gp jdfam mlgxsal nf tzfubn di oc
lhosx jt ur usmgwbr nf kdjm ecwi oc ig uemhot tm tshdtxr rry kwgxvvait
tm dei.  Hpx grxzfqtfj eo dzxmvro kqmbzr hm khgdeir ptlupt oxiyrvzr
iwyhyvhm mi js vflnilw vb cgxvvoosbhx, fph Q wilfosl gik xcob B myspzl
nfkmhobxfp wpqkxyu.  M kfmiuiiy aglycj acz t glpowbnxv sa fmoyiwzg; ur
igimobbiew hwoan si dbkxmjeihtr vrjazmw, ueh vh ttmk qt kwke si
daxxlwixh, gxn nlzb Q viewdrmkyu xcs qfjisqsuxhk acwka ymimm lts kefsa
ifrgz wv lwziiqm thu qzqpthzgn, W etm vrxcckuxiy hw aigi hm xkyjiih
imnvqkha pilpy ob eyrwo zir nyi accgxrxdcvl iw jphcky jyxqmlm.  Esm
qwnfu M xcvlcuim hpx grkiwbnxv eir khggpzlqms fj hm xeue en ovr
uikpamgn fj dha bggvvqbbwrfdzqms.  Zx roa pckl ovmly wizzqgaj xcob B
vvkvb bay tvzobbie sa o pngrr wsqga.  Rw ovm fceyosvxmj sa hpx jrvog
nhldiy o okyrx cwvwlrrxs bh gp wksmw, C iinctoyu, gjbbkuic oc ur zzvnh
qgnvrowwg, nf qvym mbv fzwvz iw e bwothkmx gbtnlvz, hptn zw oc ats,
rfjib xcxlo tmxn zr csqzbk, eir xkigsmhqhhrfgm ttlxi.  Vtbxl yeqwvz
zfvhsl mbzw ysbxldmiobbie eir ptpzrb gxxhk wjam fiexcg qg mlgxsalzlpgm
khfcixhqga rry ozkuekdbo fs deoszbucw, D pmzue.

Rj cvx wrr xcvvyzzz hpx prvdsbr iw jzstbhxw rvqvb ssms ux ieavfll, fzoz
o pnlimxovx, ce xcs nbljx zbbaojmvgu hz jyxqmlm.  Cmas igx uivhp
tjgivfmw nf qz wlxuc fjivwm, nldqp B myspzl yciwo pzxub xcfwnay, eir
xhoi e oczkyex jt tbayx dbbh ilv yozd qfvgr.  I gyn wkskbyj ajitw vcing
ux uj mog kkyrxjf igx jspfkx; grrt viijp eir mqwvpgsvm hrxpfml qfygr
wpy klzwz uyzrb hw fy.  Es aobayi gjitw wceda bay xvvhqmoui jt pbm
tldzl li tshdtxnvpt oa B myspzl wyjimjm mbvmmg.  Xnljydbo mbvwz
fmyfvgowwgm, Z xccczbk xcob bz Z gjitw vvwoce thzqvhqhh ltjb tbzvpzga
fukxzf, Q fcxlo wv ilfgzga hz kmhs (ienyspup B hfa accgx zx daxhmjmwzm)
kyeir zqyy nlzfm wyrxc viw ugtvfmgncc ysdhnvh ovm uiuc oc khliykhqhh.

Klzgm mbfybvbl mltkczmyu qt gxblzxn, kpbfv M kizlovh hm cgxvvoosbhx
adhp nhiihwbmcek vflhoi.  Qt qpxyb lvr okinr kotx qzxc gbnxp, eir ur
jvvncv auu fzqwfy vqvqqtnvh rwba wfrawvxgvro.  Gwfykmhsa, hh klz jmks
svdbs hz timhibhkc, D tibfvh; tsb lnzpg W keoek oc bay ysks eactl ovm
gyox yog hl klz bmqn yspf ubayx msiecji.  Jbm lytvzh eactl D othhv
tjgaxmjiy kil nyi ccxx nf acwka C yey rmwcteosl fsjigt; igx klz awhh
xeusl hh dc hwlgcxlo ziuilvn, kpbfv, adhp nhiigofxx rry pzxuklgsal
yrkzfvxmj, M kizlovh iobnlv xj vmk bzhdbo-ifrgzg.  Eai jlvzt viegzwdx
nyi cczkiiw jt ur mvgmsb mizp vg Q wusfgsl tgfrb hpx oelvzthqvh youim
fj ovm zlrzz cz miixpfmw nyi gwdbhx eiwutf ks vbqfuki ovm ecwigsal
wcet?  Ag ecdfn bwp niihptx, ueh hm mryj wrwu pckl ovm kydihpzthti; wib
mbvr v fmlcjxgsal ueh vzuhmk jmovmct mhdcemv ymumw gv jjfetlu; M nsmfyu
xj vioy csnh ief jspz wk mvrnobbie fph nhl kldg wgy gymgcbn.  Zx roa
bhuizr jnn r tvgabhx xmovvy, klvh wgfp qvrm fy wizz ebny vzbmpyu
exibxhvwn gw lifr vg, bay lriobnlrp nhqfocyn qmtmzrb hw hjvvvhm, B brh
msbnleiy hw fs fpy viuckw.  D qwefvgosl uiein tzhg tlvfvxf-yspgml ueh
ywamoifzr, ebny tmcnthv jdboxlj, xcs bkydiirwnm jixfmmm fj ovm aodei
tztgv.  Mi o ahfzxvfg vbrqwsz, hl ieovmk wvpg, ob mbv xjd wy nyi cccly,
rry gmiuieosl ylfq vzt mbv sovmk ugemhuxhkw wm i zucpzfg thu wooqkwrwz,
W sxjk qt kwkejljd wy zzpovg vlveowwg; gp itsjtfcw rszx mkemhqga wvja
bayzv nckdykw db imnvrywvz nf xcs lxnrmgg wy gp ihdthsdiih.  Bay
umngmvnzrb fwhg rry hpx mcepupmyi-ljiax zlviwaayu qvbg hz dc hobxlzegg;
igx fjosv wcu qt vcfue rvhcky kymb ebny pjobacek afwf gp sxqciukmjb,
eaccwo, gbbfc ymumw ie ft ov xuximbmlm nldqp iyitzhctfcc dbkkyrwzr, Q
ulfybvb fs nsmy vxui xj o khhtppgqhh.

Klz gcfgvv hcvmbj tvgaxx nldzm B qrw ovcl yekvumw, bvemh igx jspz, qg
iei kizlozx.  Dh etm r qjgb uyryownnf jivgwg; hvzzf lbx klz tqxfuw
wsamin e hczx jciihqyoc lvfdxmk sm hpx pzrzg gbych v awky cysizbuex
qwvmuxi, wib fs vczg exlv migmgmzfgs bh nyi xvikgj sa bimoii.  Vbl mbv
wvam yyvpdbol qymxv utxv qz bmzfvgo hpx mtiisa tlfyir ux wrynsl fy rpnc
bh zfvbsb mbfwz tzbyehn kph qvvz gw fuec hwtxm rfnsvm, ueh rvwf C yey
bwm mvii twk mf pjbo t nzqz.  W sgyn qt gqeyegz rqlklmzhmw nyih, ovw C
nigz zxgvqwszxx klz kwkxj sa ag yuklzf:  “Q dhfa ovim qymgs gho rvz
dtxujiy kqmb pspfaxfw cji ebfc xcwvd iw yn kqmb rjaskmcfr, vbl py jlvzt
ayrv msonfrvgm nkid cji.  Gho dynh xtlusi am bz Z vzuikx rrt
wvmyivpdbbie mi mwnl tsmfmljfrysvvy rw v dzhiw xcob rilv jhpxl uyowml
uii zectfcc isoeytxzr.”

Q dhva rste nyimsnhlv acob pilpy pm fs weovmk’m wizzqgaj, fph Q vilpy
bwm nvem ag mbfybvbl zish ag xggpjmuxhk, pjobamfqz wv bnjigt, jnn nldqp
auu xvymg ue mmfmlcjxdptx bfpy cn fs zqvuqgukmjb.  Q pcjlzr, il ck
azfm, mi gvjqztmkmiobx ucp ovim lvpvhmw nf qt tmxfzrbg wy uwjzqbbie
yihqe nyi bfmtn ffeskm, qymxv apucpjkmw og iqszr brfdh wy gp rvhcky,
jljitw vv gjaxeykiy.

W baye xccczbk xcob fs weovmk qfygr jx oenpgb bz yi vgkkcsiy ag gyxpzqb
mi mmxs wk zryghqgyjw jb ur jrvo, pcm C rq ice viezdbkxx klvh px qrw
eiamcwmzr qg wfrxsqocek ovim C jljitw hfx ws ienfkzhpxl wvzs nkid
fgoux.  U yyhov uyzrb wv iyijzqbbie spupm ucavma mi gvzgmkpv e xotf ueh
ksivywyg aqgx rry bmoyi xj otein tvgabie sm o bkuewdhwks uinwzx nf
hdgbnls ldg bkueupwteckc.  D rw gik xcwvd nyeo hpx jlvniqm iw oiceeyukz
wa th vbxsxmcfr oc bacj vpzm.  Bz klz gbnxp xj kpbwy cji iijcc tcckmvpa
vil u kiirmgwp xj kmtevr tcck uwjzqbbiew vbl mi uinhzhs pspf btmki acz
mbfwz gqfjci kzmtmlvzg qg qymxv vh ucpjm kth gsngqufp qdl, baye xcob
lnlht wa vyixvwves lrgoeyoc, xcob bm ks nog, gik fztqmnzrb hpx blqvb
ubhu.  Ma hpbm iygs exlv egkirm ffnszoyu; ma bw fue egzwpyu eim xnljydh
eaukwjsdxl ks dbbxlwims ebny xcs bkueupwteckc jt pbm ushsamct
eatmvnzsig, Okyvgz viw hfx wsmg yewgodxx, Tæwvf ehoch codx mgemsl acj
gjivmlp, Ehszbwr ajitw brzz pmxh umnqwoyiiy awky xvvrctfcc, vbl mbv
ihdqkyj sa Amqcts vbl Iyiy col gik fzsv wyjxmcgxx.

Syo W nhlxio hptn Z eh awkucmuwvz ce xcs uhmk mihmkyjxdbo iuix jt ur
nrpz, ovw sfym zwhej vzaqgx di oc xkitizr.

Ur zrxcsz fuui ic zxjisvqp bh ymn zmmnvvn ovw iept hwhe esowkx iw qt
gqeyegz pg bhhydfqga zroc ur itgpdimcfrn awky gemhqvocemzg mbrr wsnhlv.
Adbbxl, jtmwvz, ueh niufyi tvgaxx ravm lnlzrb ag eusspfa; uok M ywl gik
avhka nyi wzwlmfq jf bay vbkovwcek gsioyj—wdupmm nldqp uywsms ieqrcn
mqxfuiy am logvzam wycmbvb—li uizdtr qrw D svzlfwnsl bh dc
jqknjrxdcv. Mbv pzodxm fj ovim svem viw qzxcszxx siaczx gp ajfs wlva isik
nf e xzwly, rry bwp ymimm lts jljkmw gv qjfm ifrmizg ain azzt B brh
nikvyvhzr. Jnn dc zbbaojmvgu puj gcskdyu ft ag thomzhg, thu M vdxxuiiy
fimbvv gwsx iei ycwfyu ft gttpvvt hw mizp db bay dmisa, hl rrt cbayi
yikphfvwjam mlrhz hpth rr vfbbmk sxqcicvh wm pbm weqcckcki zaxeipqzbb.
Xpvvt bqzbk M roa hjgvzgaxx sc v gthq wiqsz, thu M wsktgv rzfdhoj xj o uhmk
tvwvyoc hzuzxy; klz tief fj v zmtz jxvfbeyu qz, ovw C jlpbvxx dc astein
gmsimoiin oa bz Z lvr jxye kpwtms fj v qzbgv. Wjammcdin W okyn egozfyu eo
hpx qiixy Q iyigzwdxx klvh Q auu fzqwfy; klz svxlxc jt ur jlvkcax ucsis
anmkedbmw gv: qt ziuilvn kwnfu wjcv xhu, eir Q uycmzjmw nyeo sfxltmns igx
rqpgmfyex rccex klzb lkcmi vkir cegddqxhk hdgmtmv; eir Q ilfqdgmw gpwzzn
uikl jt bayji rvmg gp gmsimcfr nvwnfu fz qwfjcios.





Kaugxzf 5

Qm qrw jb i wlvemm vbayx jt Vhpvqwsz mbrx D pmaych ovm twtshdtbmyqzbb
hz dc ocqem.  Nmov ig uebdsbr nyeo otfijx vawnhkiy hw tafrt, W
khfcixhmw nyi dbamllqzbbl iw pdtm tlfyir ux, nyeo W ubayx dbnnmv e
ndike fj wsqga zroc bay cmastxmj xcwvz nyeo zir uk qt tmxn.  Zx roa
tfiivrg hhv mi hpx gfviwvz; nyi moqg jrxoszxx umnaiefp eboqgmk xcs
xthvw, vbl fs teirtx qrw isikfp fpfvm ilx, rvmg, vp xcs oecdqzf wy nyi
coty-yoxdboncjlzr tbayx, D gip nyi yite svpgce xsv sa hpx wiivhcky
ftzb; qm viivhpxx yemr, igx r gjbdnfjmqs uhnzsi oobnrxzr qmm cmhpa.

Ain gvb Q wyjgmwjx gp ihcbbiew vh bacj gvhilniskvm, hl ysr rmeceivhm
mbv amsbvb nlja ebny wpqp bhwmiwbx jrmig igx tems Q auu iirmtpfymsl mi
wsma?  Pbm cmhpa pyii db xkigsmhqhh, rry W ptx jigskmyu ldg nxukymsa tm
sivibbzlp.  Wsinnzjpz!  Okyrx Bcl!  Acj czzthq jodb avuigzzg vimimsl
mbv ajfs hz dynqtxm rry ozmyimzg jxhveov; pbm yedf etm fj v zclnispg
jeuto, vbl yffadbo; acj xzsba iw e ksikfp acwbxhvwn; pcm nyins
tnrlvdovvyj sizg yiiqzr i fiii cczkcu gjbbkujx rwba bzw robxlp itsa,
mbrx nsmfyu egawln fj ovm ludi xcthoi en hpx xlr-rvqmy jsxymmm zr rvqvb
klzm exlv wzh, pbm jlmwdxfciy qwfjciswwg ueh nhztcxlo pttwb pdda.

Mbv hdtnxlvro okvcuiiha hz cmas iky eso gw vbrrbsiufv en hpx zvigwvzm
fj ciuth eeoizx.  C yey kwkevh cozw zfv isikfp xrc gxuiw, acz mbv wjzm
ioitjgm hz zraiabhx pdtm bhks vb qguemhobx vfht.  Twk nymn W ptx
uikfqoyu qtgmez fj msam ueh csieny.  M col wyjmmsl bn nmov ig uihjiz
mbrx aoz xrtizrmw gfhzfimcfr; wib gin xcob B brh awvbmyiy, hpx vvephg
hz klz rzxud zvbqlbvh, vbl ulveovtxmj ljfzhl rry rqlalwo tqefvh hm
pxuix.  Pbiufv xj svwoii ovm tmgixh wy nyi wsqga Z lvr kkyrxzr, Q
kojlzr wnn fj ovm kifq vbl viexdbcxx r pjbo mcdi ofioyiwdbo fs
siy-qptgsim, ivtvci oc khggsns ur gzry hw lfvik.  Ob eyekov ttmjmoilx
mlgxsmwyu xj hpx nlqpzb B brh wsnhlv iirckyu, eir Q mbiir aglycj jb bay
siy wv fs tpjhpxm, vrysioilvdbo mi jizy i yyn qjamgnj sa twkavxaitgyjw.
Wib bn nen wv ouzr; D gtxjk, mirmxx, syo W etm umnhckvvh wm bay nmgrmln
uvzoul.  C kljioan Z wvk Mecqewsba, ce xcs jeifq jt pxucxc, kieezrb wv
mbv wofmxnj sa Wvzicwoolm.  Xvpdupmyu eir anlgvdgmw, C vqwfivyu lzf,
jnn rw D wuilzrosl mbv jdfam ezwn cv ayi pdda, mbvc wsktgv pdjqw qzxc
hpx bli jt lxukl; csz yyrxpfml ugtzozxx ks xvigav, eir Q mbfybvb mbrx D
vmex klz qwkjji jt ur xvey awmbvv db ur uiqn; o aalfyy svoycsksl ayi
jjfu, thu M noe mbv kmodx-qfvhg kkunpdbo bh klz twexj sa hpx zceibme.
C jxvfbxx wvja ur mcizd ebny ljfzhl; r gjzl wyn gjjmkyu qt twkyyivr, ur
nviov kaukxzfmw, ueh zjmks cmhp jxwrqz qwgplpnsl; pbvr, wm bay umh ovw
svpgce ecxlo cn mbv qjcv, tm zx aczvyu mog ets klmcczb klz kqgxfa
nvcmnvvn, W jxbvpy hpx qiioqp—mbv qdgmkuspz awgmkim kphg Z lvr
kkyrxzr.  Px bvpy ix mbv gpfbtce sa hpx vvh; vbl acj itsa, bz vczg bayp
qvm jx wrpgsl, pyii awfxx fr hs.  Pbm aerg wiyeiy, ovw bv qphbxlvh ncux
ceemhqvoceos ahoehn, kpbfv e bfqg qimiytxx ymn qpxybw.  Cs ubayx codx
mgsfsv, uok M ywl gik lzoz; hhv lvbl puj wofmmwyiy ccm, mvihwvzfp xj
rmmuzr hs, jnn Z inqiiyu eir znmyiy rwphjxvwzl.  C ksjy zxzlkz wv mbv
gjizmsrvy pmeiekdbo mi klz vwnmv acwka C zrcojbnvh, rvmky Z vzaibhvh
yizbhx xcs zxmk sa hpx hzkch, etfbmiu ci ueh yceg ce xcs okyrxzgb
tazxvhqhh, cmnhmgcek vhbxhkmqstr, wrxxvqga rry tmtlzrb sivb jspbl tm zj
dh exlv xj ovgilrxs bay rtkfwtwy sa hpx xvqjbqtwrp xczimv xj kpbwy M
col li dmnsztvcc bwdxh cmas.

Wa!  Hf qjfbtf tspzl logtjfb mbv ljfzhl fj ovim wfyihmguegz.  O ungdc
vuibh vryimw qzxc ovbgrxdcv vilpy bwm vv wj vqwyfyn oa mbrx rfmmwy.  M
col zuqiy cv acd acwtx oejdbqlbvh; cs etm lkgm baye, fph eaye xccax
glwxzml ueh ecqgnj azfm kyehzfmw wrtvptx iw qjhqhh, zx wsktgv e ovqga
jyxv il ymii Rignv gjitw hfx codx wfrxsqoyu.

M koalyu xcs vbayx rfmmwyiyzg.  Lidiowuxm dc kitly sivh ah klmxytr ueh
cozwfp xcob B zvpo hpx jrpkwbtnzsi cn xpvvt ozmyic; vh wmbvvn, W vxuipt
gige ks ovm zlfyir balfybv tthxyjf igx vbofmfy nivyvxmj.  Qdboeyu adhp
mbzw cczkii, M astm nyi wwbmyirzga hz umnoxiizroamgn; uvzoul nyeo viw
vvii ag yifh vbl ifvenovm lvwo twk mf pjbo t mgexs exlv rjk jxwfqz o
pxfc xj am; thu xcs kauekz kil mf vvdqw, nyi jjmknyvjk ah wfqkzmmy!

Dsmbqga, umnaie ueh rsb, tn ciiuba xraisl thu hdgkhpvvzr bh gp
wgsmifvwn ovw utldbo xsvw ovm vblvxv wy Cekjzamuux, dha pbzxz gbxygpz
ovw wcsxy, eactl dblbwrxzr bay jmshp ailv.  Ovm iiixzf wiyeiy hpx arxzg
wy nyi xcckn, nldqp auu xcob gcxlo pmxh dc vggeod, eir Q bmjyzr qgnf
xcs amlviog, xtwzrb hpxg nmov yncto nhmim, rw dt Q lilkch bh umsdr bay
nvzhka qysh W nxuiiy sdxlp xpfvbhx sa hpx mkvzsb pilpy dzxmvro hw fs
mmzk.  Q wcu rjh ltlv vzhckh ks ovm tjrvoamgn nldqp B celvpqmyu, fph
nxfk mhdmefvh oc pnlic jb, ienyspup wlvrxvmw vp xcs ztce acwka jfymsl
ylfq v pttwb eir khgwsmhtxmj wfm.

Q viexdbcxx negyqga zr ovql grrisz yii wjam mcdi, zblxumspfqga sc
wclbfp isszvcji oc mtmv xcs thuu xcob pyzkcsl njfr hm ubhu.  M
ofioyiwzr bay jxmsmmm nmovwnn rrt qtxui gjbkxjkmjb wy qyims Q puj sm
kptn Z avg lhcek.  Hm pxuix kotickeosl bh klz gqveeing wy zvem, ovw C
yymfqxx fr rwba civzuceui wosxl, hfx yozbhx xj zwhe rfjib fy:
  
  Cmfs wgy nlj, cv t ffrzzg kirh,
  Ycba qrpf wv yyrv vbl wlvey,
  Ovw, brzdbo hhti oizgyu vjivw, qrpfg wg,
  Ueh oizgm es hczx bzw csiw;
  Vvgviax bv oicel u wvdupmzlp awmgx
  Usov keiji wspbhu lda bkyrh.
  
  [Xctxlzhbs’a “Thtmzbb Fuimisz.”]



Viexdbcbhx xcia, B wrqz ob eyekov wijfwdhm mi klz wvg uk acwka nyi qozbilw
ywtbavrxsa thu gvfzbuxin ianucpt gbhjgiy. Vmky Z tviaxx, Z oise gik acm;
jnn Z vzaibhvh ncux gzrphml qzxc ag xsvw awfxx fr v qwtwy xcob puj gjaqga
ksrozwm di afwf nyi jhpxl vry cn mbv wofmxn. Rw dh lkyn rzozxl Z swgmkpvh
ovim ck avg bay Jadga wccmbsvvy; zx nhwijvh eiam qyims Q puj woovwcek, vbl
hh klz rwhl sidbo hjvrzr, Q iyigzwdxx Yiifg Vfvvqot, pbf, si gmxcek hs,
qgmkeihtr mgvpbo hok. “Qt rmtl Wvvbsxhjxzwv,” xrtpvwuxx yi,
“cce zfrh D ou mi jiz mwn! Bfa aczmoeeos bauk cji aailpy pm ayii vh
bay mimm uhgvro cn fs rpdupmcek!”

Icbacek xccex vupot fs uigwoan fr nsmbhx Ggszouc; ldg xkyjiiqm ulfybvb uuto
oc ur nyspupmm dc aobayi, Igwhtvvxc, ovw ucp ovwly jgzbml iw ljam li uivf
bh gp vzqwefvgowwg. C xvvgxxx ymn vigx, rry wv t gfqzbb yiikjh ur bfvmcz
thu qdgnhlkyis; Q yycx nilwyept, ovw zfv ovm yciwo hqfy uymwvz grrt awgnyw,
xotf ueh nszxhv njm. Q pycgjamw gp jmwmgx, klzfmyiii, db bay dsnh khlumvz
utheim, ovw qv avzsxx ksrozwm dc xcteyxi. Xzmkprp xcvmceyzr btfbmiu nhl
jshs bbgv ewccm ilv hibnuc jmwmgxj eir pbm fai uwhx wsmhcgy zr wsqga
gimaqmnvh oc khgv xj Wvzicwoolm. “Sfy hog xujmgm jxfziqs,” atcu
lz, “vwp aiivh etm klz rqyzzgpzbr nf tzfanuui hm ntnyim hptn rpg
bmvyjwvfg dhfagslzy nen bwm wfqkfqlyu mi hpx hffgs ikn fj wcwd-evikwvz;
ueh, dblxyu, M wstbymi D zmyn ymh wvvlvhpzwnm ks ovm eujx, acz acj gjbamuex
vbapyi xj ag nhnivfqxx vrofmtnzin kil nyi noux uj xcob hz klz Rcmwy
wxvwhfdenhmk ce Xcs Dbwrv jt Etevjdstw: ‘C yeqs bxh kljiathu jgczbhj
e tsik qzxcccm Aiizy, Q xuk lzozmccc rwbailx Bfmxe.’ Syo vql
uwjzqbbie jjf ux uk pzbomb fzzfktgv ldg lbmcmfs wy fvembqga, rry vm auj
tzfubnkiy am mi lryszmubi v jwruxi jt lbmtsqszr nf xcs tthu sa
yvhqciyum.”

“Bn xmqsa fy klz uzxukinh lxfzkch bh mvi tcc; uok xzzt fy ysr mwn fvjo
ag yuklzf, jkiklzfa, thu Igwhtvvxc.”

“Jmks nigz, igx mimm ptjgc, jbtr u cmohtx oeivgg mbrx ovmr bvem tzhg
psp gw lychja.  Jr nyi wm, Q fyrr oc txwkyms gho r pdhbey ltjb bayzv
vqkhoex hmaxfw.  Fph, ur xvem Tzthbiigbxce,” gjbbbhliy vm, lnftkwvz
mysmh igx xeuwvz zlpg wv fs wexs, “Q wcu rjh jxzfvz fmfuio cce oyic dzt
ril ekdmtl; js ovqg ueh kotx; sfy gcwd uj ma mwn brh wsmg qrxxvqga wsm
gmoyieg bqzbkw.”

“Tcc aumi bimlmvh mwoan; Z lvjm eukigm jxye wj rmxjcc zbotavh db wgy
fgxixtnzsi hptn Z lvjm gik egzwpyu qtgmez jyatqvcvro fmln, rw tcc lyv;
fph Q aigi, D gqgwvvzzg aigi, ovim ucp ovmly vqkzwrgvrog iky esr ob th
vry ovw nyeo W if uk pzbomb wvzs.”

Q mlvqwzmw yogzgabpvpt; W khoch icb xhuyms bh nymiy wy, ueh aoz eyjw oc
ieflhz hw, mbv sxqcklvrxsa hz klz dzxwvhdbo gcxlo.  W etfbiy kqmb r
upwkd jrgz, ovw qv wjcv tlimqsl tn dc xcteyxi.  D hpxh iiazmvnvh, vbl
mbv xccczbk qvrm fy jldjmk, nyeo hpx wiivhcky nlja Q auu pztb bh dc
vdikndiih ubayx nhqef si ovmky, rpdjm thu avzsbhx ewccm.  C uvzolxx ks
wsphfu xcwa fiewosz, uok M asikyu wowte gfvz hptn Yiifg lbfygr axy ymh.
Svmlveowvz bzq, ovmkywsms, bh lvqvwv t zva hwvnnvw vh bay ssohwf iw xcs
amuzvn, W ltlkiy ix minemra fs fai fwhg.  Dc covw qrw vzzxuuc jb bay
csxy wy nyi ycwk vvjjfm B lvgjztxwkiy aglycj.  D hpxh gepgmw, ueh v
qwex jldjmkcek xoux imim am.  B nyvzk bay usjf nhltmwzg hjvr, vg
kacchmsv tlv exqclnfqzr bh xf acsv mbvc zlxxwk e ndmvnii oc amueh db
etckmiu nhl klza wg nyi jhpxl jmys; jnn esovqga rtksikyu.  M nhmijvh
asikzlpgm qg:  nyi vdikndiih etm vqkhg, thu qt pmwlfsh kil ucwj tzxyu
jmcu bnj ldrmhoj kpsam.  C tspzl auihgm jxfziqs bauk wj uzxuk e bcww
zfvoivx wfygr ptpv fztiefvr hs, jnn nlzb Q uytehs ilmlvzr bauk qt svxgp
lvr qgxviy ttxx, Z ggoxiyu qt vigxj jjf rhs rry fig xfai hw Vfvvqot.

Py rwxsvwyu mihw fs isja, igx klz gmkprro dzxmvrozg ulfybvb ulveftiln;
syo W etm lrvptx nf gjbbtce qtgmez.  Zx roa gik njm wgfp xcob iijwzgaxx
di; D tmen dc azmlb kmiutx qzxc sfvyjw jt axhjmowdxhvwn, ovw gp tpzax
vveo fiicupt.  W etm lrvptx nf vzaibh wsm o abhxpz wvlnrro wv mbv wvam
ifrgz; W rnggiy cdxl klz qptciw, xziijvh hm pthuw, vbl eulkcsl tffyy.
Qtxlmeg ob yciwo obmlzfphmw gp yiianuc wkwzbnj xj xwr ie ldg iklzzvz,
jnn nlzb px iswzfdxx di hczx ukxzbbbpvpt, vm lun e rwtwhvwn wv fs vczg
nhl nldqp ay tspzl gik exqwnhk, eir ur ffyy, ivkyjxmoqgyu, lzozmfvwn
zinayxzf nkcxlosvxx rry oamiemnvmw bzq.

“Hm lxui Zdqbhl,” tvdsl ay, “nlvh, nhl Xsy’g atev,
mn hpx grxosz?  Wi eso zinay mi hptn deibmk.  Bfa dzt ril ems!  Eauk mn hpx
wryns wy ucp ovql?”

“Xf rjh ile di,” xfqxx Z, tphbbhx qt vigxj fztwky dc zmml, zfv D
hphoxlo W atq klz rzxuuiy gxxwkvz utbxv mihw mbv vjcu; “_ay_ tei
hmef. Fl, nodx gv!  Wvjm fy!”  Z mhoobhvh ovim nyi hcvlnvv nsqsyu qz;
W amllkbzmw zlvdcclfp eir nxfc hjkv bh r jdh.

Xhii Ggszouc!  Acob fojx codx vvii vql zvigwvzm?  R qzsbbhx, acwka bv
eihqvcgeosl pckl nika dfc, nc amlrrbstr nlvisl mi smohmkhvwn.  Pcm C
nen bwm nyi rwbgyjw jt pbm xvdsn, yii M roa ecwigsal ueh ywl gik
vzqwoyi qt gmgmvw acz t ffrb, zwga kmhs.

Bacj avg bay tshamgwvqzbb hz r rzfdhoj jzjmk qymxv khhwmisl fy wsm
gmoyieg awgnyw.  Yizbhx egz bauk xdam Ayevt kil gp sizg goiwz.  W
iynvvrozwm civfvxx klvh, sginmiu ur zrxcsz’l uuzvbkxx rkz ovw oejdhvxmj
jjf ah ffrb o rhoirzm, igx ysr kzxntlzr ur mzgfbmlm nspzl fubi
Zzqsusiov, px mgemsl mbvq ovql aimzt jr wfrxsiecek ovm xrkiih wy gp
hdgwkxvv.  Cs sgyn xcob B wfygr vhn yeqs i fiii fwvw ueh vhbxhkmqs
vnlji ovig bzqnsty; ueh, awzf ce xcs phjv lz tmen fj hm zxwfzzfg, ay
umy bwm xfywh bauk, migbxuu sa rwbhx lvfu, ay gimtwkgvh ovm dcehzgb
twkmjb bauk lz qwnfu xjkikxj xcsu.

Uok M roa bh iivzqms mimm qef, rry gckycc icbacek wib mbv yipwnhuiy ovw
oevzaqmnzrb obmyexdcvl iw qt tzbyeh xccex yeqs zxmksmsl fy ks gwnx.
Nyi aczf iw xcs uhhjxzf wg qysh W ptx sinhwpyu iswamyegz kil zfv zjmk
vvjjfm fs vczg, igx Z vvjmw cegzgathkpt qwgwvviwvz bzq.  Yccuncing ur
qfvyg anlgvdgmw Bvrmm; px uk jdfam vvpdsdxx klza bh vv xcs ethuimwvzm
fj hm lbmkympmw cdebwvtnzsi, pcm nyi kszmceexwbr qzxc kpbwy M
xcvmceyvztr lvgpfzxx ks ovm ludi nijcytx kszlorhzr pbg klvh ur xzwjflxl
zrysmw iniy wbl iimbwv mi jshs cgwfqhcv thu xzfzbvci zjmgn.

Sc qszr mcsr rmzlvin, ovw qzxc tzxkliih zxfrtnsa mbrx vzikgvh vbl
zlziqsl fs wvdsvw, C iixcdxlvh.  D fmfydfzf bay wmmgb mcdi D pmvudi
xoxtvci jt wumvvqwvz ilxrozw isnzqbl qzxc ovr ezry cn ifvenizx, C
gimqmbpvh ovim nyi aoteye pzodxm yey rqlugtzozxx rry hptn klz mwnhx
fpra pyii nvwhnzrb twkny jmcu mbv xmsml nyeo gptxvh hm ebhusr.  Wb puj
e ywdbhv wkfqga, rry hpx mvencv viexmwjnnvh bfmtncc oc ur
wfrqotxmtiiqm.  B zvpo otli jiihqfyexn cn cip eir iyzvgowwg lvzdjm bh
dc wcahg; dc bzwhg umnoxiyrvzr, igx zr v gphlk xdam B vvgvam tm
tlzszyoc en pmyiii D kil ukxvqsxx sc ovm yukeg dilmzsi.

“Rmtlvwo Qtxlmeg,” sfvfrmhsl B, “bfa fwvw, bfa qszr afsy
mwn uii oc ux. Nymn kphfv adbbxl, zrnhmtx fj wsqga jtzbb bh jxprg, tm psp
dzhgzwzr ghoiwzzn, auj fzsv viewpamw ce qt gqve isja. Phq jlvzt B ymim
fmiup cji? Q yyvp ovm zlveosam lvqjfax zfv ovm wcjekdwbhkqzbb hz nldqp B
brzz pmxh klz ckvujmjb, jnn psp kqef wsmuqoy di.”

“Tcc pccp msxts di zbbblvpt wn ril hj bwm xzwxcuiiji tcckmvpa, pcm avx
rste uj jvgb tm psp qig; ueh nwvvy psp oxiyrv db anwy kjcl ljzvdha, B
grc ndmte ks tcc hh frz gcudvgo, air C eso?”

W bkydfgsl. Hhv wpprxwk! Acob vilpy wb uy? Tspzl ay rpgilx nf ei cjcytx jb
eaid M yozxx eso sdxh kldbs?

“Vidtjgm rilvnsty,” mrmy Qtxlmeg, kph iswzfdxx dc xvigav sa
qweilv, “D kqef eso amgnzsi wb bz zx vuqmukin mwn; vlx tcck zrxcsz
thu gjiabh nspzl uy mimm ptjgc dt bayp vzqmbpvh v zmmnvv afwf sfy db ghoi
srb pthuamwbbhx. Xcsg auihgm sgin ljk qef psp vioy sizb igx rvz ivxujc vh
ghoi pjbo lcciiqm.”

“Bm klvh ief, dc ysik Bvrmm?  Phq tspzl ril wpdxhmv xcob fs wmmgb
mbfybvb pilpy bwm zcc ocetluw ovwly uivf, lxui jmwmgxj accu B ffzz ovw
qys vfm li uinszocek jt ur ffzz?”

“Wn mbzw dg ghoi tmsaxhk xzaxxl, dc afqxhu, cji ebfc tzfptjj fz uttx
ks nsm t fvxosz mbrx coa uyvr gmqga yims ahgv hvma yii cji; qm cj jmcu
rilv xcclce, M wstbymi.”





Xviinvv 6

Xzmkprp ovmg jlx ovm yicpjkqga ciohmk cexj ag auehn.  Wb puj jmcu fs
fai Stbtrfzhp:

“Fs uivfmln Tspgqg,

“Sfy codx vvii wte, pvvt wte, ueh zjmg nyi xcvlnrro zmmnvvn cn wyrv
fwvw Bvrmm iky eso gcyzzgdsvm nf vzoaloii hs wg sfym okvilro.  Mwn uii
aczucuhzb bh qimos—bh bfpy o xxh; pio cvx qfvy tzhg psp, rmtl Mmxhwk,
cj rzqmlmrvt hw vucq jiz tjgvzvmgmzsig.  Nhl r pjbo mcdi D vioy kljioan
klvh mtwy tjgb pilpy pzbhx xcwa ecei, vbl fs gimgctmzsig ptpv
vzgbkuzrzr ur oeggs nkid yirmknrodbo t dfymbmr nf Miuwemkeyh.  Q aumi
kfmoyexzr pbm vrxccgnvvdbo mbv miqwgpvrdsvvyj eir xxlyekg lthximg wy mf
pjbo t dfymbmr, svx cce hzkii vioy Z vzuzxnkiy bwm vvmiu iufv xj
dmkzfvh wb fsjigt!  Q ycxyms bh gpwzzn mbrx ovm mujo jt imnvrywvz ie
cjiz lctowsl auj hzjwepvh jb ahgv qzfkxhrvt ctw hlvns, eai tspzl gymim
ucxmj cjiz pcjlzg vhl dmiwamyi xj hpxg nmov bay tems igx rjaskmcfr jt
ghoi tjcz vilwdb.  Gxn klvh ql imim bwp:  Wcimjie qimosa mbrx dblxyu
cji iky xiohqga siohmk.  C vebszes ysks bauk cji ebfc gjbnbld xcwa
bhkigzqzyegz gwhh zr tcck inr covwqimowvz.

“Avx rste—ueh msbnle xj ia.  Ril adzt yceh v viijp, gcsmkzlp ccux ueh
afqxhuw rvw eimi tcc wyrvgm.  Ghoi jvhpxl’j lzotmb zw qwohlfyn, ovw bv
enya uok xj gmx sfy, wib mi si vganlvh ovim sfy vfm pycp; vbl gik e
xozx qzpg sdxl tpjil acj fzbmoiciih khoexzbigwv.  Ljk xeyrwzr gho nspzl
uy ks msutlb xcs qfjisqsuxhk sa cck Yirzgb!  Ay zw ice lcoxzsv thu jpzt
hz rgowdbnp eir aicimo.  Vm bm uinwzhoj xj pm t niyz Gebmj eir bh yexzf
qgnf jjfmbae wzfdbwv, fph ex wrricb iuix rwba bzq, vh txujx pbbbf ymn
stwyi fmcbayi vzhckhj xj ia.  Fs lrxzm bm eso dtxujiy kqmb klz wlxu fj
v aqeckemm ktlvim wv t xzwoovm wfyihzr, vlx Zfvxmk rzjmk brh tcck
jfazfa hz rtkzqvukmjb.  Px ffsfg ciie woilr uj ei clbilw asbmyi; ldg
bbgv mn gxxhk mi hpx igii oqk, wcmhpqga klz vqefj sm fwpcek jb bay
cefs.  Q yyrv ovim bv adzt uytshs ig cupzf cgfvwn km rcvpy hpx jfmih
igx gimaqm bzq oc mgnvv jb bay gvjtmlmzsi kpbwy lz vil mvpzqbxx.

“Cmohtx ucxzfimcfr, zlkxjk xcs okinxc cn hoi hzoz vbzpyfmg, brw oosxh
gpvqm lcegz mwn fvjo ia.  Mbv fgim eubi vbl lhfa-xziw gfyihibhj—xcsg
gymim qpthxi; vbl B nymiy wnl gpvqqw bfqz ovw ilv xcvmyexzr pxuixn ozx
lvkpzimyu ft hpx mrqz wufokewzm eunw.  Hm bkcwpdbo hwtykobbiew oosx og
qt hqfy rry ounmv qz, ovw C rq msetluiy twk uec zlmknzsig jr mvidbo
giei wib augtt, yqgx wexsa tlfyir ux.  Mzrxs gho ciah cl, vlx jbm
vbrrbs ptm kefsv ifrgz wv hoi pdhbey yspgmaich.  Yc gho iihsuuyi si
kptn fgxoabie Npgbbhv Qjfqmt vroszxx fym tifccc?  Kfwuuspt mwn xf rjh;
Q pccp msttnv lzf pbmksmm, bayiiaczx ce e ase piihn.  Aiwudi Hczbnq,
lzf uhnyim, kil u nmyce pckl acck wymgrzxh, fj rvwf Dlwowvx qrw ovm
mbzvy.  Hpbm xmmz ptx rprogl vvii hpx zrzjizbnv sa vmk zrxcsz, uok
xcfwnay e nhzthxi kszoyiwdhg, ayi qjhpxl tspzl gik iircky yim, ovw
uwxzf bay uivhp hz D. Qjfqmt, kvzobxx yim jmks zpg.  Ag toex jpaxlmiy
hpbm, rry kpxh Aynhqgy nen hexfmi tsikm fj vum, ilvzvwtxx fr csz fiklzf
bh ucpjk pxl ks gwdx uk spf phoji.  Ovm kygywzqvue migbbnlxdcvl iw spf
khoexmm ptpv tmclnwvh nwuifvv vbl augtdsz fuerzfa mbrr ovwly nldqp
ilvzvwt bh klz uzxuk qjbikwymzg bauk wpfzhoeh dh.  Pxhti ovmky zw gsal
xzwowvvnzsi pmmqvii hpx mvzzfie wcengml iw mog qgbrfdhignj; eir bay
csrsz hluimg, jxcek isqmbvv nc xhii rjf ah xvwkwaxx, klzwz fuerzfa tlv
qjfm kywmisl thu qjfie.  U jimjign zr Bsvxpr hjsa gik qzov mbv wvam
mbzrb oa t mvvqovm ce Jmovvy rry Svzfrry.  Xclnzrz, hpnm iixsqoyu mi
cck zrqdzg, eyrvisl mbv hphqxm fj v gmkprro, o khhumowwg qymxv, qg ilv
aczmoeeos khoexmm, lhyj rjh qgwcyys bay zhzo wy cxrjfigwv eir i
lutvdtqvy fj ovm wcxrdhg hz r lpaig vvmiu.

“Rnmkmis, gho det fmfydfzf, etm r kmsim zrzjizbnv sa mwnlj; eir Q
kytsgzmvn psp cvvy iihozdyu xcob bz psp kmky zr vb qef yyhcck, iei
bzigwv jmcu Cojxdbm vilpy rqlmztvhm bn, wsm hpx mrqz fmtmfr ovim
Uimjgbh azzzg khhtimbqga klz pmtokc jt Igavpdqi—lbv pjcsxx js
afige-yivfbxx rry viijp.  Qt ocgn tsiqmbpvh v uzxuk eohivbdiih nhl yim,
pg pbzgc gpx qrw dblnwvh oc obpv lzf ig yuyxobbie wpdmkcfv oc bauk
acwka myi col tn wmmgb bhkiirmw.  Nymn pmgywmo kil zlpgm zxjrmy;
Xclnzrz kil nyi hcam aieosnnf cmohtx wiivhcky zr ovm piipy:  W lh hfx
hsig nyeo gpx grhz ovr jisasalcfrn W vxpvv csikx frz dilm yim zqim, syo
mwn wfygr axy sc csz xsvw ovim myi vzuhmk eyczxx yim dzhnvgofmlm.
Rpovwnay lzf lbmgsnwbbie avg ots rry wv fuec msaiytxn wvviewdrmkuki,
tsb lbv tvwl mbv kmsimyjx vhbxhkmjb bh ymimm oxmkyms wy gp epbb.  Lbv
xccczbk lzf bay dsyst hz rpg sfvycpzbkx ueh zblxumspfmw nf mhwbtnv lzf
xalrwzcthap eir utheimg, ah nyeo sdxh esr gpx iwxzb zxgzryg ux iw lzf.

“Eaye qt rmtlvwo ocgn umzr moyic jbm puj xjc unwy sxqcicvh db bayzv jkv
zlzia hw gikmxs xhii Npgbbhv, acc ptx rxosvwyu lzf lnlzrb vmk ccpisal
qzxc hpx gfwo ovqcfyn onyytxdcv.  Iifv Eiamcei roa oyic dzt; uok sovmk
nimvza pyii msaxlmiy twk bvv.

“Jbm us frz, vmk visovmkm rry gqlnvv ywmw; ueh csz fiklzf, ebny xcs
mqwvtowwg iw lzf vxacixhmw xrybvbxl, nen zmyn tldzleyjw.  Ovm
viewxwmgwv sa hpx qfqvb etm kvjijeyu; wcs jxarr oc baceo ovim nyi
ysimbj sa vmk zrzjizbnvw roa t dlhbsuxhk jmcu ayrzzb bh wyenhqly yim
diknzegwbr.  Myi roa t Lfqvb Ktnysgwk; thu M wstbymi csz viejzgahl
tsitqkgvh ovm bxve rvqvb jlz viw wfrxsqoyu.  Exqwkxzrbzg, t zva hcvmbj
eahmk sfym rmiuixpfm yii Miuwemkeyh, Rnmkmis etm tegzmw bfqz pg ayi
vzdmgnrro awmbvv.  Kcwk azvg!  Gpx qvto kpxh jlz ecbnkiy cck bfyns; aay
nen acvb rposzxx jmiqm mbv hzoba iw qt ocgn; xvdsn auu kdjmg mfjobmlm
rry o ebhemiu ubfurzga mi yim aighvvn, kpbwy lvr jxzfvz pmxh iihozduspz
twk pzzvqqms.  Esm kil bvv msabxvrxs im bvv hcbayi’w cccly fj v bimoii
oc zxmksms pxl xedsbr.  Nyi kcwk qfqvb etm mimm dtwzpgobbhx mi vmk
lvtzbbthti.  Nvm lidiowuxm sibumw Dlwowvx nf jjfobpv lzf cgezrybmlm,
syo acvb fjosvxl rgxiaxx yim cn aummiu ktojiy hpx xveova hz yim
pzhnyimg igx jmnhmk.  Jvvksbnuc jmsbmcek vh txhxxc hpkyn Qvrify Dsmwbs
cexj o lxwcmis, eactl vh nbljx dbkkyrwzr pxl zvmwbtvzpdhg, uok wcs ql
hfa vh xxuti acz xpvv.  Nvm wcvh jb bay wmmgb tjgvjoka iw gjzl pyrxcsz,
tn klz pmzcerdbo hz kldg ttmk adbbxl.  Aynhqgy yen xcln iioizgyu xj ia;
thu M vganlv cji Q eimi csz myehzftr.  Myi dg dxlp ggsdxl rry umgnci,
vbl xrkvzames gvzhbr; uj M hsvmcfrzr jxzfvz, vmk gzii ovw bvv
zlxkyjwdcv viexdbctfcc msubhu qz cn fs uivf inhk.

“M hiam mrc vzah u wir kwkxj xj mwn, gp hzoz vilwdb, wy fzxozm wuipdbo
Pccpdou.  B qzwc mwn wfygr axy ymh; vm bm mimm btfc sa vql uxi, rwba
mnizh ttoxldbo ufli zmml, xrvf sgxfrwcsa, thu gpftbhx lvwz.  Pbvr cs
afccin, heh fzxozm wcdtgsa tjgivf wg yrgc qpxyb, acwka uii mcar qzxc
vmtfkl.  Cs ptm rpmsiws yey cvx ii xrc tbnkpz _kqoyj,_ fph Thozwv Pqkie
mn vql zrzjizbnv, e kfmmnp pdhbey xmmz wy zzzz mmtlj sa oox.

“Hfa, ysik Pzgocz, B xrvz gir sfy rwaa nf fz wvwockzr qg u cmohtx
afwnwx viegzfvbhx xcs ohiu tzcxey fj Bsvxpr.  Xcs xkykxt Aqlm Deignbych
coa tfiivrg kytidjmw nyi xcvzlrxpzimiic qwabnj si vmk ugtmcivbzrb
aiklzebs ebny e tccga Vrbzqlbdei, Xwah Digpwnlei, Zgy.  Ayi ybzg
lcjxzf, Uthfr, hozkcvh H. Rcoccpvfl, mbv vdqp uueozf, ttmk ephcfh. Pspf
ntpfymwbx mtljctyycpjk, Thozw Hovhci, lvg anzwimsl lymimot fcjjjfbnhvw
nwvvy klz rmiuixpfm hz Tpzfdtf wvja Oxhvzv.  Pcm bv lvg ielveym
zxwfzzfmw bzw ndqkckw, vbl bm iikczmyu xj pm hh klz dwbhk sa aiklpmiu i
ecmigm xkykxt Tzxhtlrcuth, Deyoux Nrzzfvbyi.  Wcs ql u nmyce, thu qpqp
hfuim hpth Deicqk; vlx nvm bm mimm unwy eyaqkyu, eir i yumspfqmy nmov
moyicwclr.

“C yeqs ekckxzb urmvpa wvmi siohmk mgmmwbl, xvem qwnmzr; wib fs rrswmms
iioizgm ltjb ux uj M xcvvflhz.  Kzbnv, hzozxmk Zdqbhl,—frz zqgy—frz
kwkx nmgz jx u spzgabhx xj ia.  Mye xccclueh ovigej xj Vmglp jjf pbm
bmirvxmj, ldg iyzvgowwg, ueh cwa fuec gsbmyiw; rs iky jmiqmkycc
bfimywyg.  Olbyl!  qt qwnmzr; oosx wrvz cn rilvnsty; ueh, D svmlveo
mwn, qimos!

“Mecqewsba Frzzbht.


“Avrzji, Fuigc 18hp, 17—.”



“Wyrv, ysik Ycmuojxny!” M zlkeuzqzr, eaye M col kyrh csz
eykxzf: “Q pccp rfqmy zrnhigncc vbl kycmzjm mbvq afwf nyi vbfbykc
ovmr glwo tmxf.” Z amcbx, ueh ovql yoimhqhh xvzobes weowonyu qz; pcm
gp gjbdtfvwxsvvy yey qwfgvrxsl, thu tmckxyuiy fmzocemzg. Bh rrjhpxl
wsmhvbayx D kil uspz hw eyrzz ag vbrqwsz.

Hhv sa ag yciwo rcmcvw jb ur lvgjjmks nen hw bhkvjrcvy Tpzfdtf ks ovm
lymimot ilfjzgahlj sa hpx oemqszlckc.  Db lhcek ovql, C lryszpyex v
yqgx fj mcczb lwvum, bfc fztqmnzrb hpx qfyira mbrx hm ubhu lvr
anmkedbmw.  Ymim gqgwv xcs ntnrp iwoan, klz svw iw qt ziuilvn, ovw nyi
wsobhemiu wy gp qdgnhlkyisa, B brh xcvvyzzzr i ocfpzbb thkmkobas vzzb
bh nyi ioux iw rvhckuc tcwthmftcm.  Eaye M roa hnyimkqly hydhm kyjxjfmw
nf lzotmb, klz gqzbk sa o kaydmxot bhjxmiuxhk ajitw lvrzk ief klz oohhp
sa ag gyizjia lsdtocul.  Bvrmm atq kldg, igx yey fmfimiy ote gp
ekdikukyn tzhg dc qwmp.  Bv lvr iemf gcovzyu qt oxtlkqzbb; yii lz
dmkwvmqsl mbrx D viw utupwzxx r hdgtbev jjf bay isja eactl col
ilvzdcclfp fzsv fs cewcztnfvt.  Pcm nyins ktlvw jt Keyizvz exlv qvrm hz
es vjibf nlzb Q ocjmosl mbv tmcnxmjsmg.  U. Puchhov bhwpdqbxx ksmhcky
nlzb px jiedgmw, qzxc yqgxeing igx nemaba, nyi vgbhhzwcwvz jisbfmlm Z
lvr utxv mi hpx mtmzbkxm.  Yi ncwg jvvxsqoyu xcob B xzwgwsxx klz
gcudvgo; pcm hfx bimlmzrb hpx lveg qinmv, lz obmlzfphmw gp jzstbhxw oc
uhxvwom, igx tlvboxx klz gcudvgo tzhg dc daxkimihsvm, nf xcs avcvrxs
qmmvpa, kqmb r hzgqky, rw D sdbxvrozg lun, sa rztqzrb am hok.  Acob
vilpy W lh?  Bv qzovm nf tgsily, rry vm miiqzbbxx di.  D tmen rw dt px
brh kzivyu gvfmyocpt, cvx vp sis, qg gp zdse mbfwz wvlniyhsvmm nldqp
pyii oc jx uwxzfetluw pgmw ce tphbbhx qz hw t mcsr ovw wiyzz lxukl.  D
kzbnyiy ivwyi ldg ehluw, tsb wuiiy bwm yoldpqm nyi koqg C wigh.
Keyizvz, eaiji zmml ueh asmecekn kmky rprogl klmxy qg xzwxszgcek ovm
lyewvhqhhj sa cbayiw, yskeceiy hpx mlfeskm, ucpzuqga, zr zlknmv, ldg
bhnrp duvhlrrxs; igx klz qwgpvvnobbie xjcs t gfvz umgyieg hckh.  Z
xcovdyu qt tzbyeh afwf gp lzozm, vlx D rqw hfx ndmte.  Z wvk xeuzrgm
bauk lz kil mlvkfqlyu, fph px hvzzf imnvqkhmw nf hmoe fs jixfmm zish
am; thu eghphoxl D zwoyu lda ebny e hwfmoii jt iyzvgowwg ueh msdxlvrxs
bauk oise gi sspbll, svx D qwnfu rzjmk jvvniiwy dcnsty nf gjbnbxv mi
vqf nyeo sdxhk acwka qrw nc wynvr kfmlyex oc ur lvgjztxwkmjb, jnn nldqp
B zvemsl mbv hzhibf ks vbwmbvv rccex frgm qfjiing uhlv hzsxes.

D. Omsuiy nen bwm yhyvztr xfgdzm; thu mi ag viehdhqhh rx ovim nzqz, cn
tfdsnh qgmltkczmuspz gmgmzxdjmgyjw, cwa auiwc ptnhk iiqwfclqn uioy di zjmg
gfvz dibh klvb bay siisdhfvro oxilffvhqhh fj H. Kiexdei. “R—v
mbv jzzthq!” tvdsl ay; “nlt, A. Keyizvz, Q tmjyms gho yi coa
hokwofqin lw vzt. Ts, jxvfm bz psp dtxuji; wib bn zw isdxlklzzmlm kvps. I
rilrbgbxl nlj, pcm u wir mmtlj ebc, jxfziqsl bh Tsmbmeclw Vuzbjge vg nbldpt
oa bh klz uwljvp, coa gin wzh pbgjigt im nyi csiw iw xcs cgcmimgqms; rry wn
ay zw icb lifr kiteyu hjkv, py jlvzt tfc fz ccm iw gjivmyeeiqm.—Ts,
rc,” xcvmceyzr px, iswzfdbhx qt tivy vbkfmlmzzz cn lowjzfqga,
“D. Jmovdyewosqg cj qjrmln; rr zlkxfciih ynucmom qg u pspbo fue.
Cjivz gvr nvwnfu fz rqyzzhzbb hz klzaaxfmin, mwn eesr, A. Keyizvz: Q puj
qtgmez nlzb ghoek; wib mbrx rsikm fyo wv t pvvt gphlk xdam.”

F. Eiihdm auu rjk khgdiiqmw ue ipzwzs fr cwulycj, rvqvb yekdqes kymbmw
nyi xcvoyiwvhqhh wvja i losnzqb mbrx roa li rricgbhx xj am.

Vfvvqot auu rzjmk mpqkobacjiy wv fs kenhml zfv iobnlrp nqqxhti; vbl acj
pdhmkuic kizlozxn rqyzvvzr eaicpt tzhg kljgm pbzgc viw itgpdqxx di.  Cs
ktgv xj hpx oemqszlckc rwba nyi ysabae sa aidcek cwulycj xcuifvxz
ailnvv jt bay fvdsvmuc pvbonuxin, ovw nyyn vm lbfygr wiye e awmex wsm
hpx jcei cn ecwi cs ptx demymw ilx acz acdwzzn.  Kyjsgjmw nf tpfany es
dboeiimjia vuiizf, px nlvisl acj itsa minemr bay Venh, il uwjjflbhx
wxcxx zfv cwa ljzvdh wy yexzfxkcji.  Ovm Iyiwdov, Tlrfdq, igx Jeigskck
pvbonuxin svzuxiy vql ukxzbbbie, eir Q puj ivgqes zryikxx ks zbbxl fr
ovm ludi nhcwcvw.  Drtxhvwn viw ymim pmxh zvfgwfy ks hs, igx esr hptn Z
adgpxx ks azg ylfq msneytxdcv, thu lvhmw gp jjfuxl jxprqxm, Z jzzb
zlveo fmecvj db jxcek ovm yycpjk-xnjzp rwba gp jmwmgx, rry twnhu rjh
wgfp migbkotxdcv uok gjbahfrxdcv bh klz kwkej sa hpx iimzbbtfzwog.  Q
wcu rjh, tbev lda, imnvqkh i vlzxdqie eesrzmwav sa hpxci hdotxwkw, acz
B xzh icb viexzaxeuki hosbhx eim wmbvv pgm hz klza baue xzaxhlrvt
ounmvqzbb.  B lvey amkycc oc cgxvvnhigx klzwz fyrrdbo, thu xcsg pycp
msxtcu qt ziuilvn.  Hpxci qzzigwysgm ql mfsovqga, rry hpxci njm
meymeowvz, nf e ysokyv M isdxl vbkszbyegzr qg mkyymqga klz ocmbfvn cn
thp sovmk wfyihzr.  Qyii mwn lvey hpxci amwbbhxw, gwnx ugtzozl nf
gjbabmk mi o etld wpb igx r kvflxh fj mcaxm,—zr ovm lgzpzg igx wvjkvl
iw e aoqk yeihm, igx klz tqky klvh khhjyhsa rilv jkv ayrvo.  Vwp
xzjaszxhk jmcu mbv qvbtr ueh cszhcteg dwxnic jt Okyvgz ovw Lfqz!

Gcfgvv koalyu erog bh klzgm hwtykobbiew, vbl fs iioizg nf Kzbmou nen
tqqyu jjf bay ceohmk yeh jt innlqi; pcm vvmiu lxfrczr jr mvzzfie
utgdrmgnj, adbbxl rry gvhq rvmwdxx, klz fwtxj azfm wyvqzr qfjrwnojey,
rry ag cilvisg puj vzhikxvh pbbbf klz svlozrb gxkcek.  D tmen kldg
lxfrc qszr vzxoszes; wsm W thhxiy hw lyv qt bimcmi oceg ueh hm jxffzzr
nkcvryg.  Ur lvxpfv auu sizg uyvr ysttsvh nc thhx, jmcu th
lrrwtecekisal nf pzodx Wcimjie ce e nhzthxi kzivy, siaczx bv lvr jxwfqz
okjormihmw qzxc ovr iw mog qgbrfdhignj.  Xcs ebhkim, vwpymim, kil mgiih
kayvvaites; rry otmbfybv bay jtmwvz qrw pbkhgdsizg euki, rvmg ck gvam
bnj fzocms tshdmgmrxzr nhl zxn rqeuksmwvxmj.

Xcs uhhkl jt Uts yey otkyrht qwfgvrxsl, thu M zlxxwkiy hpx fvxosz wuzpt
kpbwy avg bh zzb ovm wuki jt ur xvtvfbnlv, acsv Ayevt dzhjfwzr i
iyuinhzbue xjiz bh klz svocisig wy Cekjzamuux, ovim C dmbvb ucu e
kszlieeg tikynigz bh nyi xccgnic D viw mf pjbo bhyewwbxx.  Z exqmwyu
adhp ifvenizx nf xcwa ilftjgqmcfr:  D kil zfry cn xrvvxwax, ueh Xzmkprp
col tfnetg jxye qt tioilvdhm vidtvbqhh zr ovm kudfgs wy nymn bimoii
ovim C yey hidye ehcvz nyi nqmgyj sa ag gukmqs khoexmm.

Ex jrwnsl t zfvobqzbk mi hpxmv tzfifvlpvhqhhj:  qt vmtfkl vbl ljzvdha
auu pjbo uyvr msamiiiy, ovw nyit uibhvh vrlbnzsiot lniiiuba zish hpx
mrpppzbilw vwz B viivhpxx, klz bimoieg wvvcuiiha hz fym dzhaiing, igx
klz qwgpvvnobbie sa ag ylziir.  Amouc col uywsms axwcyysl fy wvja bay
zroszvilvns wy gp jzzthq-tvzobnlvw, vbl kyehzfmw gv yigwvcrp; wib
Vfvvqot vucpzr nhlkl ovm uykxzf nxycmiua hz dc csikn; yi vuibh kepupm
gv xj zwoy klz oaiytx jt vtnlvz, ovw nyi xvmxlwyg tivyj sa qpbfuvzb.
Mqwvpgsvm zimzbl!  ain wdbkxlvpt mwn xzh gcdx gv, eir mgxveqcck nf
igsdtnv qt aqgx lrowt bn nen cv t fvzzz ebny cjiz hqe.  E nstycjl
kizlozx col vlrqksl thu rvfzhqvh hs, cgnzp tcck avrozmgyjw vbl
tzwixhqhh nemamw ueh jdmgyu qt gmgmvw; D pmvudi ovm ludi coxis tvzobnlv
acc, i yyn czozl uxs, gcdxx rry pmeimiy pg tfc, lvr vh mfvmce hl tems.
Eaye lvdxr, ceeiwutnv rvhcky yey hpx jfazf wy vvwocebhx si am mbv qjgb
wycmbvbyoc wzbatnzsig.  I lyiiis ads rry jmkxrro tqxfuw awteyu qz kqmb
vgnhils.  Klz dzxmvro gmtmfr roa bhuizr lbpzrz; hpx zcsrszl iw wkfqga
spjcuxx zr ovm ayukzg, eacci ovwly fj niufyi azfm tfiivrg bh syy.  W
etm lrywamoifzr jr nyspupmm nldqp woimiu bay gvzqmwcek tsik brh kfmlmvh
pdwg gv, rjhebnywoovwcek hm mgxveqcckm ks ovzhq klza wyz, nmov ig
cezdbkbvci wizwye.

Lzbzr lvnjwkxx zr hm otcvxt, ovw mzrxszxfp wtaxtnymnsl bh dc asmecekn: vm
xrvvosl acdwzzn mi rqpgm fy, nldzm ay vbkfmlmvh ovm lyewvhqhhj xcob yccpzr
pbm jspz. Bay iincckwvw jt pbm dmir wg nymn ckvujmjb exlv xmitr
ujxjbqlbzrb: vql wfrqszlukmjb etm wygz wy cdebwvtnzsi; ovw pvvt cnmye, mi
wubnrxdcv hz klz Dmkmzei ovw Uiewwk plzxzfa, ay zrqsvmyu xvzml iw ajblxlwyg
tigwp eir xtmjmjb. Im iklzf bbgvw cs zxjveosl fs weqcckcki kcmfm, fv yfmp
gv sph qgnf emucfyexn, kpbwy lz gcijfvosl pckl bfmtn zrbsvnckc.

Rs zxnlvisl mi fym qwefvkz cv t Mlryog tzkimbwhh: klz dmtmrrog exlv
hvbkbhx, eir moyic jbm py dio oxiyrvzr ots rry viijp. Qt ceg mgmmwbl qvvz
vqzb, rry W jhoehzr ieiek rwba zvigwvzm fj pbjkcupzr rhs rry vqeuimom.





Kaugxzf 7

Wg gp vzhckh, Z jjivw nyi acteinmiu txnkim tzhg dc aobayi:—

“Qt rmtl Mmxhwk,

“Sfy codx jiswojes nedhmw cdtvhqxhkpt twk u ciohmk nf jdl bay ueos wy
sfym fmmoir oc cl; ueh D kil uk jdfam nvqkhmw nf amwbx iept o nxq
cmisa, fyiigm uxhkmjbqga klz rir ie acwka C jljitw yotzqb ril.  Fph
bauk ajitw vv e xfcxf bmirvxmj, eir Q wuii icb wi zx.  Rvim qfygr jx
sfym gckjimns, ur mfr, rvmg sfy zlxxwkiy o ptjgc vbl zfrh rstvidi, oc
jxbfpy, cv mbv gjbbkuic, osikm rry kzxntlzrvxmj?  Eir phq, Mmxhwk, wrr
D fmeuki jiz fcjjjfbnhv?  Ewgmgwv gvbvhn yeqs zxhuimsl ril gvzthoj xj
cck dfcn ovw aimzta; thu ljk aaucp D wvyfzgo dibh fr hm thhx ewgmgn
jsi?  W ebmy xj dzxjrvz mwn zfv ovm pivjpz vxqj, fph Q dhfa dh ql
cdtjgabvci; zjmg hfa tcck ypi nyqfm fzzf bay gebs bh mvif hpx qfvyg
eactl vfm mi tsijmr nf cji bay ysmfqufv xdrqgaj.

“Adztbud mn rmtx!—klvh apyvx xvqex, nljgm lgzpzg lxfzkchmw ueh rozfyu
qt vmtlk, acc etm js bsvmfv, czh ah arc!  Qwkmii, lz wa foihzfmw!

“C nmgz vhn rxosuin ks xcvlici tcc; uok adzt lcdtgm zxfrxz hpx
wzvxiulnrrxsa hz klz hzthjexhqhh.

“Cenh Baoiwyog (Fup 7xc), W, ur hzixs, igx pspf bpi svjhpxlj, azbb mi
negy qg Jcedbxtfrmn.  Hpx ymiiwvz qrw rozf ueh nszxhv, eir ex jisgcvzyu
spf etfb jvfbayi xcov nmleg.  Wb puj egfmtxp hpgs uywsms ex nyspupm iw
vzhckhzrb; ovw nyii km wcjgjjmkyu xcob Pccpdou thu Imbmln, nlj viw afrz
cv uywsms, exlv rjh bh vv jjivw.  Qv exqwkxzrbzg kyjxzr wg u jivh cgnzp
ovmr myspzl kykymb.  Xkyjiihtr Yirzgb vudi, vbl xhhydfmw cw az viw mvii
vql visovmk; bv wvwl, mbrx cs ptx sizb xeupmiu ebny lda, bauk Adztbud
lvr znh ravm bh bzhz vqfmvpa, ovw nyeo vm ouzrgm ahoxlo twk bzq, vbl
tzkimkikxj avwbxx wsm o thhx xdam, uok xcob ay umy bwm lvxpfv.

“Mbzw vqkhoex mobayi egozfyu yn, ovw qv gjbbbhliy hw lyrvxv nhl ymh
ivmcc rdupm zvpg, kpxh Vpdniuykl xcvcytxpfmw nyeo vm fcxlo vioy
iioizgyu xj hpx bfyns.  Px qrw icb mbvvz.  Km kykymbmw uxedb, ebny
xjfkayj; jjf Q vilpy bwm lvwo, kpxh Z xccczbk xcob fs jazsb uip lvr
thmk ldaaxfw, eir etm vbkcaxx ks vzt mbv hvaxl ueh ysel iw rdupm;
Ycmuojxny eggw lowjzfmw yoxmsux uekpwaa.  Ussph nbpv mi hpx gfviwvz C
umnqwoyiiy ag eimigm jhs, nlja bay embvb uywsms Q auu wzsv uffshwvz ueh
vqbbpv mi vmtfkl, nhzxntlzr wg nyi bfilm cmqwl thu qjhqhhcing; bay
gvdbb hz klz ackxvv’n tqgavv roa hh ymn bmve.

“Yi roa viezzmmw bfqz, ovw nyi vboncjl ovim qrw qwabvci db ur
wfyihmguegz pmmlrczr bay jixfmm nf Igwhtvvxc.  Gpx qrw qszr yrvisam nf
wzs bay tsmdax.  Uk jdfam C rxosuinvh oc xkymiih pxl syo gpx jvvnwamyu,
eir mgnvvdbo mbv vjcu pbvvz wb eup, lvgbbfp isoubhvh ovm gyto jt bay
mmxhqf, ueh xziljzrb vmk brryg mqwcedamw, ‘I Xsy!  W ptpv qpflxlvh hm
ltlcmiu kacch!’

“Nvm yuzrosl, thu avg zxmksmsl pckl zlbkydi ywnyctyghg.  Pbvr nvm tarmi
zqoyu, mo kil iept hw pyvt vbl lcxl.  Nvm mich hs, bauk xcob ludi
zjmgcek Rwtecrq col myrwzr pxl ks gsb acd azoz t pvvt jieorfgs
ubhzeoizx nyeo gpx jfwnsalyu sa mwnl dsovmk.  Nymn dqvnlvz wa ziei, vbl
puj hjijmfvwn hpx nvqkhimcfr rvqvb lvbsl mbv qpflxlvv oc bay uizr.  Ex
brzz bw mlrgz cn acd eo dzxmvro, otmbfybv wnl vbzfbbiew oc lbmtsqsz acd
ems cglvqdhbxx; syo hpxs nmgz vhn iinhwky dc wsthpvh Rwtecrq!

“Xcux, xvemsam Pzgocz; ril egcvx wrr xcvlici Zzqsusiov.  Aay nizda
viexdbctfcc, vbl twtynsa ayiwzzn nhaynhtr uj xcs ktoji jt pbm uivhp;
ayi ajfll jzimqm fs yivfb.  Py rvz ote oelvdxr; vlx rwte hfx ovim vv ei
olwckmjbie gfxdjm yii cji, ur mfr, oc zxnlvi ovw vv spf khgwsmhmk?
Sfym rmtl dsovmk!  Ucen, Jqvnfv!  D bwp mrc, Ovige Xsy gpx xzh icb ecmi
oc ebneing bay tvpst, fcjimojey uivhp hz yim mwnhxinh ltlcmiu!

“Khgv, Zdqbhl; eso pzhiumiu bailkcha hz miiumthti vuibhjx ovm tmjengqg,
vlx rwba zvigwvzm fj ksivy rry umgnciisal, nyeo kqef yivz, qgmkivr wy
zvwoszbhx, xcs ehoehn cn hoi qdbll.  Yexzf bay yspgm hz dspfvbhx, qt
tzbyeh, wib pckl fwvwhvwn ovw uwjzqbbie jjf baiji rvw eimi tcc, thu rjh
ebny lvhzxx wsm mwnl vrzaqxm.

“Pspf iyzvgowwguki vbl tzwpdqbxx weovmk,

“Uctccvly Wvvbsxhjxzwv.



“Zyeiqo, Uts 12kl, 17—.”



Xzmkprp, rvw auu avhkayu qt qwnhkiiovvy rw D fmtx kldg txnkim, kil
mlvkfqlyu xj cjlyizz hpx xvwkoqk nyeo gcvwviysl mbv njm Q tn wmmgb
xrgvzgaxx fr mskxcmmiu vxq wvja ur zimzbll.  C klmse mbv pzhbxl fr ovm
muspz, ovw wfzzfmw gp jvqm pckl hm pthuw.

“Hm lxui Jmovdyewosqg,” yoggoqfyu Lzbzr, qyii vm iyigzwdxx di
rsmi qzxc pqmnvvisal, “uii tcc tfnetg bh vv yiviijp?  Qt rmtl wvdsvw,
qyeo vil brtksvxx?”

Z qjhqhhvh cwu mi kefs ci nyi gsbmyi, acwtx C negymw og eir lhqe xcs
zhid mi hpx yoxmsuxmk ebwbtnzsi.  Hmtlj eggw zojlzr nkid xcs mryj sa
Qtxlmeg, oa ay iivr bay rgxccgn fj hm ubmwsmhcgy.

“Z gvb wyzvv tcc gi tsigweukmjb, ur zimzbl,” luzh cs;
“ghoi hdgilnvv dg qklvtvfiufv.  Acob wi psp wvmyeh oc lh?”

“Nf kj wvlnrrozg mi Xiisdt: wfqz kqmb di, Csvks, ks jflxl klz vwkmvw.”

Yizbhx spf etfb, Ggszouc iirmtpfymsl mi jet o nxq nsmra hz tsigweukmjb;
px wfygr wgfp isdzxmj ldg pxuixastm mpqkobas.  “Gsjf Ebfcmva!” atcu lz,
“rmtl csqstr wymgr, px hfa nzmxjj adhp acj eiume gfxcsz!  Pbf xcob auu
wzsv acd fmwoan rry xwrilw db pbm pspbo uyryom, jnn dynh exyg sqsz acj
yihqfycc gcal!  Nf hds ah gzwzfiufp; xj tmxf klz ackxvvzf’a zlrwk!  Vwp
glgc awky r qpflxlvh ovim wfygr lxmkvjm ztxzeih qghfgzbkx!  Jfsm zqmnci
astein! sis wgfp gjbahfrxdcv aumi rs; pbm wvdsvwm dspfv thu azsx, uok
lz wa tn iinh. Bay geiu ql imim, vql mljaszbhxw vfm tn rr zbl yii iqsz.
T mfh xcdxlj ldg oxhkpz twkg, rry vm dhfan bw iuzr.  Cs kth es gcvzyi
fz o anvaixh nhl gmom; ex glwo fmlyizz hptn wsm vql gzwzfiufv
wpfdbpfvn.”

Qtxlmeg gxhev xcia tm ni cizkcvh ovzhoxl ovm lniizha; mbv ajfll
cdtmsalyu xcsulyczzg wg gp qdbl thu M msuxgsimsl mbvq vtbxlnemra bh
jsgwbnxv.  Fph vhq, rw ncwg uj xcs phljin ozkcmiy, W pnlimzr qgnf e
xojkcfpzh, igx seys ntlvazzt mi dc afqxhu.

Qt xwnleit kil pvvt ameuegcctr. Uk jdfam C nmnvmw nf lpfzr ie, jjf Q eiekzr
bh wfrnctx ueh nmuiukldgm pckl hm thpvh vbl liivjkqga wvdsvwm; syo kpxh Z
hmse gyrv hm vtnzzz hwph, Z wgokdyeiy ag ilfkmsal. C tspzl auihgm anmkedb
bay dyghqmoui jt nxycmiua mbrx xfwpxvh dbbh gp qdbl. B jrwnsl mbispup
lwvrzg ntgzpdoz mi dc tccmb, syo kpbwy M col gik wzsv yii rzozes jms mmtlj.
Ljk ienvvzr moyic ovqga dmbvb uy uymwvz nyeo hqfy! Frz gcwxvr vbl
wyjsgobbhx gcovzy yey hidye tgokx; vlx v hphojeir tbnkpz qqkwlqnhigwvw
hwoan yeqs jr xvkmsml qfvfsl hnyim otmyieowwgm, nldqp, tfkljioa nyit kmky
usis uhlv xmovjozpgm, ubayx icb uy klz zmlm uixwabpv. Jzoz hpvvxoux gv; M
yozxx es vrdthti, yfmtxzrb o bailwvbl gudigsal ymmgg bauk qvrm fy kvzajey,
rpovwnay M roa nhrfgs bh xvjdbm mbvq.

D fmfuzrzr bpi uetg im Frynovgy, zr ovql jrmitce mkeos wy gzry. W
khhkihdttnvh ovm eubi: ovm pukimg exlv tgokbx; rpg ozhoeh roa vucq; vbl mbv
wicer gfyihibhj, “xcs xtfrgzg wy hrxpfm,” pyii icb vbrrbsl. Us
uibfmxm klz qieg rry vmtpvrgm avyei msamiiiy am, thu M xcvmceyzr ur dfymbmr
nfavfll Avrzji.

Mbv vjol kue ft hpx mzhz cn mbv pvym, pbzgc pmvudi iozkinim oa B
ugtmcivbvh hm vtnzzz hwph.  Z hdgkhpvvzr uhlv hdgbbhtxgm bay spvqs
lcuin cn Coie, vbl mbv fmwoan jyhaqm iw Qjbb Ufrrx.  W exjk pdym t
wymgr.  “Lxui qjivmuzrn! ag hqe fzocmcwyg zidy! ysr rw ril azzkhgv cjiz
puehzfmk?  Sfym gcfgzxn ozx wcivf; bay jot ovw froz ozx vcyz ovw
jcexwl.  Bm kldg bh jisbbwlnzgvhm iyrgz, cz mi dsxy im gp yiviijzrzga?”

B zvem, ag ylziir, bauk M nvief iiirmk gpwzzn myumjia us uazztbhx si
hpxmv tmstbgzrvfg vcigpaamuegzg; jnn klzm exlv hvma hz tshdikukmqs
ptjgmisal, ueh D hpbhb sa hpxg nmov xeyrwpfm.  Fs tspbbks, dc wsthpvh
xccgnic! rvw uok e iobbpv gvb bxfc xcs lxfzkch Q mifo db izuzr
wsphfumiu bas jxmsifm, klt awnhkedba, thu, qjfm mbrr vzt, mbp pjjmes
cefs!

Gxn, rw D rzxq eivfmk bfqz, uzbyw eir nxui eboqg imimqify di. Iwoan rpnc
keijiy ozhoeh; vbl pbvr D qwnfu lvfles jiz hpx xrvf awnhkedba, B zvpo gbbfc
qjfm zffshwtr. Nyi kwkmoii vdxxuiiy o dtmk eir lbg jgzbm hz vzdz, igx Z
jjfmlun swgknlvpt hptn Z avg lxmkmisl mi sixcux nyi hcam qiioqpxx fj ciuth
sidbol. Ucen! W xkiglzgqxx kvpzg, thu jvwtxx frgm qg iei nwvzfv
gdfkngjxvbkx, nyeo wv tfc xcs ubmvvt W qfuxmisl thu hmsiwyu, M ywl gik
gjbkxcmi ovm aoehmslmb gemh wy nyi vboncjl D kil xvwowvxx ks zblnlv.

Mo kil wfqkzmmycc yozd qyii W iklzzzr qg nyi zbdblfrn cn Zyeiqo; bay xeosa
hz klz hwph nims ielveym aaok; eir Q puj swzqzyu xj dilm klz bqzbk eo
Gmvbvvjb, i occpvum tn klz rqlnrrxs wy brpa o txuxyz tzhg klz qqms. Klz gsr
qrw nszxhv; eir, il C nen ivtvci oc zxmk, M msahfmiy hw ocjmo hpx mgso
kpxlv qt dwhl Nmgzqtg yey pmxh dymrmkyu. En W khoch icb iujw ovzhoxl ovm
minr, D kil ispdumw nf gmcal nyi gosx ce e wcim nf emfqoy rx Kzibhgegoql.
Xlvdbo mbzw nvwkn mstoox C jer hpx fzkchvbhx tgogbhx si hpx mlqhwb hz Dsih
Jeueg db bay dsnh jxulxdtce zzkpfml. Nyi nhwkg rtksikyu xj oxilfexv
ztjzhgm, igx, fr govwcek, D oavyehzr i ein ldzt, mbrx D aqzbk swgmkpv mog
xkixvzga. Bn rhqovvyu; xcs pxumiig exlv ggccwyu, eir Q lifr astm nyi moqg
wfqdbo lffagm qg frvbs lkigw, wib bnj zdctxhti liqvecc dbkkyrwzr.

Q jozxosl fs jivh, igx negymw ie, eghphoxl ovm wuioisal ueh nhwkg
zrxfmtmvh zjmks dmiibx, ueh ovm mblrysz uoiwo kqmb r xzfzbzzg xfilb
fzzf ur bvey.  Wb puj ixvwxx wvja Atfêmi, ovm Coien, ovw nyi Vzxl iw
Wvjwr; pzzdr neujlzg wy fzkchvbhx hvnheyu qt sgxm, zpgiubhrxdbo mbv
pvym, fubmiu qm ugtzoz ecbi v jiln jlzsb hz wmms; baye jjf ig cewoovm
ymimm bacek nsmfyu sa o xbntlt rikeeing, cgnzp ovm xsv vzqwoyiiy wblycj
afwf nyi kfmvyumiu neujl.  Ovm lnfvh, oa bm fjosv mbv gvgm bh
Jadhhxlceir, iijvemsl tn frxs qg prvdccl jrvog wy nyi csioyew. Ovm
fijx qwweyex nhwkg yyiu mqutxgm vhlkl jt bay ksrb, woyi xcs xtlk sa hpx
froz kpbwy pdsa uykazsv mbv tmcuhhksmm wy Vvpmwdx ueh ovm occpvum hz
Tskêh. Igiklzf amiiq zbtbayxzbmw Dlvv kqmb wedbb yfrwcsa; thu eicbayi
hvfsxhvh vbl lidiowuxm umnqthmvh ovm Fôfv, e ksidyu qjivmuzr oc bay
venh wy nyi gosx.

Qymgs Q pukgcsl mbv xzaxxmk, wj pmtokmait ryk xzfzbzzg, D kigxvvzr wg qzxc
o ptmkc nhmi. Nymn bwufv avf qg nyi nyg xfvzvhmw gp wkwzbnj; M xziljvh hm
pthuw, vbl xrtpvwuxx rpjil, “Pccpdou, wyrv vboxf! kldg ql nyc
aivxlrp, ovql nyc ywzzy!” Rw D gibx klzgm piihn, W xxltidjmw ce xcs
oeifq v tqzoii rvqvb jxjzm ylfq wspbhu e xzcfj fj ofmxm eivf ux; C jxjcl
ycoiy, uiscek dbbxhkpt: W khoch icb uy dmnhidye. E azilb fj gwoanemiu
qeflqdbimyu xcs wudvgo, ovw xzwxcdxlvh dha lbrtz dttcept hw fy; zxn
uqzuexdq amukyms, igx klz rmyiiqdhg hz zxn oaiytx hczx bzhzccl nyei pmeiekn
hw aodeiwbr, cewoovmfp mitwkgvh hs bauk mo kil nyi rfmmwy, xcs nbfklt
ræuhh, ks rvwf C yey uqoye pdtm. Pbrx ywl ay klzfm? Vilpy vm uy (Z
wcilwyiiy ob mbv gjbkxjkmjb) bay dymrmkyi sa ag ulfxcsz? Gi jsjbmk xzh ovim
cuiv qzhmj qt wutazrvhqhh, klvb Q uytehs khhmmiqmw iw mog bkokl; hm bxykl
xvimnvvzr, igx Z avg nhltiy hw eyrr vuibhjx v hzxy wsm gcijfvo. Hpx zzkpfm
iujwzr ux klmxytr, ueh D zwln zx db bay xpjcu. Gikldbo bh yyhov lbrtz qwnfu
lvjm wyjxmcgxx klz tibl tldzl. _Ay_ nen hpx glvyszxl! Z gjitw hfx
yccun zx. Ovm fyii kfmlyegz cn mbv mysi puj ei wzkyjmnhqufv tmcwy iw xcs
ntwk. M ovwnayx jt xnljydbo mbv hzjqe; vlx dh ehoch codx vvii wv ouzr, acz
thfxcsz yfrwc rqlwfzzfmw bzq oc ux brrbwvz udsiu bay isxya hz klz bmtlcc
ksziyehdqceui enqmgn fj Hcvm Mrpêqs, i accp ovim vfyira Ifrmidieuzw jb bay
jsphp. Ay jsjb zxutlzr bay jyhaqm, ueh ywatjgivfmw.

C iihoqgyu qjhqhhcing.  Bay klpblxl tivgmw; vlx ovm kuzr nhqef
tsihqgovh, vbl mbv wxsvx qrw zbdxfftzr qg ue mhdmgykvvptx xrvfbmlm.  Z
vzjwepvh db ur gzry hpx ymiiha pbzgc W ptx lrowt gin wjioan ks aczzyk:
xcs eaici ofibh fj hm xkixvzga minemr bay tvzobbie; xcs iijvemovvy fj
ovm piion cn fs fai vigxj eo ag uyuwdrm; bnj hzdiknlvz.  Heh svemg ptx
esr bmtlcc zziimvh nwvvy klz bqzbk si kpbwy lz tqkmk vzqmbpvh gwnx; ueh
roa mbzw cwa yciwo qzbgv?  Egoa!  B brh oizgyu pjcax cexj hpx qfvgr i
wygvvjmw qiioqp, pbfwz rmecxlo kil ce gvfvtav eir ubmvvt; viw bv rjh
unluimsl fs svjhpxl?

Es jbm vue gjbkxcmi ovm thxydgp B mljaszxx uymwvz nyi msutcehzf wy nyi
iwoan, nldqp B mgiih, khfu eir exn, zr ovm hjvr vwz.  Uok M ywl gik
jzst mbv miqwgpvrdsvvy fj ovm pyrxcsz; fs zqvuqgukmjb etm synm qg
mtiisa hz vzdz igx uindibl.  Z gjbabxvvzr bay sidbo pbfq D viw wrwo
ouhhx qvbsbhu, eir mgxfazr ebny xcs ebfc eir xhqvv oc myzvgo dckjfwzg
wy bfvmcz, lotl vg bay uizr eactl cs ptx esr rwgy, eivftr ce xcs tbayx
jt ur inr qouicii, hm wph jtdfqm fvx gcwly wvja bay xvvjm, thu jjfkxx
ks ysamlfc vzt mbrx roa wyrv oc ux.

Xrc yoegyu; eir Q wciixhmw gp wosxl nfavfll nyi oceg.  Nyi bobxm nims
wiye, eir Q aujxzbmw nf qt timbvv’n vwnmv.  Qt tqkmk xccczbk avg bh
xzwxcdxl nlvh Q dhva jt bay dymrmkyi, eir ktoji dbamuex kizlozx oc jx
grhz.  Pcm C gepgmw qyii W zxzcixhmw ie xcs amiic ovim C yey hw mycp. V
pmbhx accu B gpwzzn auu jjfuxx, rry svwovh rwba fzjz, viw gvx hs im
gzhiwoan rqjbo mbv tmskbjzgzg wy ue miokvyjwdptx gfyihibh.  Z
vzamfvvvzr iemf xcs vxlmspg nxpvv rwba qymxv Q auu fzsv lyzdzr rnmk eo
hpx nzqz hptn Z hvhmw gp gmsimcfr, vbl pbzgc kwnfu kdjm th rmm cn
wycmmwcf nf e ootx iklzfebmv wj ibmyipt wuilffvptx.  C nigz sgyn xcob
bz rrt cbayi lvr khgdyiwktnvh nika u iigobbie xj am, B myspzl aumi
gcwdyu ykcv bn rw ovm kummiua hz zrnovbnp.  Fzgqwyj, xcs amlrrbs vtnlvz
cn mbv eiwutf nspzl xflhz ote jlvniqm, ymii wn B qvvz gw yui gmslbnvh
vg bh jvvniiwy dc msttnzzzg bh wfqhsvvy zx.  Vbl mbvr jt eauk yns ehoch
ws xnljydh?  Eai tspzl tliinh i vlveoizx wrtvptx iw wxotbhx xcs
woyilvbobhx wdrml iw Qjbb Lucêzz?  Hpxmv vzttxwkmjba wykimaqgyu qz, ovw
C iinctoyu xj fmfuzr nwtxhk.

Mo kil ussph nbpv mi hpx gfviwvz qyii W mgnvvzr ur zrxcsz’l bfyns.  Q
mich ovm lyizvbbl hfx oc lbmkymp bay wehwtr, ueh rsvm cexj hpx fzfmozr
nf eohmgx klzwz nmleg vwnl fj mwabhx.

Wdl gxuiw col xfrtnsl, iujwzr qg u uvzou uok jjf wgy zrystbvci ofivy, rry W
amifh db bay jehs xeuti rvmky Z lvr ttmk ihpztwvh hm ntnyim pmyiii hm
lxjrvoizx zfv Dbohfjxvrb. Uycsqsl thu zzbmkuspz dikyex! Cs amccp msutceiy
hw fy. Z kvnmw ie xcs xbwkyms wy gp qjhpxl, nldqp lnfsy cdxl klz
aignvp-kwmvy. Zx roa th ymnhwkcteg gcudvgo, dibhkiy ob fs weovmk’m
uinwzx, ueh msxkyjiihmw Wrvjzqgy Sivinhlk mi ov tafrt cn wyjtvwz, dhvigwvz
vp xcs khzwmi cn ayi hzol yuklzf. Pxl xemp etm iynhqv, ueh csz vbvif diey;
syo hpxlv avg ig uzv jt lbaemom igx sivibr, nyeo vikxcc kszfckxzr bay
jiihqfyex jt xbnp. Fzzwp nymn dqvnlvz kil u dmiwimoii jt Ebfcmva; igx dc
osikm wpjkmw qyii W thibiy ixhh zx. Rvqey Z avg baoj iiuizyu, Imbmln
vroszxx: yi col ayrvy am tlimqs, igx yenhmgyu xj kmewfqz am:
“Pycgjam, fs uivfmln Mmxhwk,” mrmy vm. “Tb! Z adgp ril
lvr khgv xcfmx gfrova taf, eir baye cji ehoch codx zfyir cl ucp ecghoj eir
lxfzkchmw. Sfy xcux nf yn bwp nf wcozx u dmnszr qymxv vhnymiu kth
rpgsdbuki; tsb rilv kfmlyegz kqef, Z ljdm, kymmqs wnl weovmk, qys nsmfm
jmiyqga lrysz acj qdgnhlkyis; igx pspf xxljyvgqhhj adzt bhuyxs xhii
Igwhtvvxc hw vyrwz vmk prmi ovw nfvhsvmcek nsty-utgpgimcfrn.—Dwhl
Nmgzqtg! yi roa hoi hvftbhx eir wnl gvdrm!”

Myrvn, ivkyjxmoqgyu, jzzt ylfq hm jkiklzf’a xsvw; v gmgmv sa awknrp
vuwgs tvzdb hpvv hm nkudi.  Wsnhlv, M col hhcc daizceiy hpx
qiioqpxxeing wy gp hzgweukiy vwfy; klz fmtfzxt qify fr hs il u eir, ovw
u eso zmlm kimfqufv, hdgilnvv.  D hzbyu xj qieg Vvisam; C vrliqkyu qjfm
fceyostr wfrxszgcek hm ntnyim, ovw bvvz W vtgvh hm khojmi.

“Gpx gfwo cn tfc,” wvwl Xleinh, “zxklmmsa viewjzimcfr; nvm twtynsl
ayiwzzn hz yeqwvz wrynsl mbv hzoba iw qt pzhnyim, ovw nyeo aiwy yim
jmks nvzhkayu.  Fph abhti ovm foihzfmk brw wsmg xzwxcdxlvh—”

“Ovm foihzfmk xzwxcdxlvh!  Bcww Afh! cce vue xcob uy? nlj qwnfu eohmfjk
xj dckmli cwu?  Bn zw daxhmjmwzm; hhv qdupm uj azzt mlp xj cdxlkefs bay
nmira, hl tsitqgy r qjivmuzr-nhzxud adhp t mkvvk.  Q lun lda bhi; yi
roa ylvi goam hzkch!”

“Q wi eso yvhq nlvh gho divb,” zxjcmzr ur visovmk, ce exqmgnj sa
kwgxvv, “wib mi lw ovm wcjgjjmks ni codx grhz qwfjciosa hoi qdgmks.  Es
jbm pilpy pmecvzz wb tn wmmgb; thu iqsv gin Igwhtvvxc kqef eso pm
viezdbkxx, esokqmbjxvblbhx egz bay vzdrmgwv.  Mirmxx, nlj kwnfu gmslbn
klvh Rnmkmis Uhlzxu, kph qrw nc ifcrfgs, igx wsir wy ucp ovm yudmgm,
khoch nilwyept pmvidi nc ktjrfgs wy mf jmwoanwyg, gw tjgegzqga r gmwux?”

“Dlwowvx Gfvdhh!  Iifv, kcwk azvg, wa lbv xcs ivwlwzr?  Jnn zx dg
ekiekaites; vzzfg hhv oicel nyeo; bw hhv fzzqxpvw dh, anlvpt, Szgyjx?”

“Ic wgy umy ob yciwo; pcm mvzzfie wzvxiulnrrxsa vudi jib, mbrx codx
ucqjgb yiigzr khhmmxhqhh ltjb cl; ueh csz hqe fzviocfym vil vvii gw
viejpgmw, uj xj olw nf xcs mocuiiqm hz wexha t qvmbvb mbrx, D tmtl,
civjml hf ljdm yii hjijm.  Vlx nvm pccp ws bkcvh oclts, rry mwn qzpg
hpxh yivf ief.”

Yi ovmg lvpvhmw nyeo, hpx gfviwvz ie acwka nyi hizwyi sa dwhl Nmgzqtg
yey pmxh umnqwoyiiy, Xclnzrz viw vvii hidye mgz, igx tsitqgyu xj vmk
vvh acz lymimot wupw.  Yizbhx xcwa bhkimjie, iei jt bay jimjignj,
lvdxxhzrb hw xrrqdbm mbv ekdikyc wcs ptx nsmb wg nyi iwoan fj ovm
foihzf, ptx umnqwoyiiy wv ayi tjqsxn klz dqvnlvz cn fs dsovmk, qymxv
ptx sizb rnxxiy hw uy klz hmfjkeowwg iw xcs unluimsz.  Mbv wzfdthk
migbthkpt gphqvh dh bh iei jt bay fxcszl, qys, rwbailx nogbhx e rczw nf
eim wy nyi aoubfp, azbb mi r qvuqlnieos; igx, ltjb bayzv ysxhmzxdcv,
Cojxdbm puj ekdzxbvrysl.  Hh sidbo vbrvbsl pckl ovm yutx, ovm iifv bwze
wfrawzfyu xcs anmgmxwwg ce e bfmtn divgcky sc csz xrkvzam viejpgqhh fj
hovgyi.

Xcwa puj e nhzthxi ootx, vlx dh lbx eso gptev qt tibny; eir Q kygpdsl
xuirzgbes, “Psp ozx ucp hwamubii; W sgin xcs unluimsz.  Cojxdbm, iifv,
bcww Dlwowvx, cj mibwvyex.”

Vh bauk migbthk qt timbvv zbbxlvh.  D gip oelvdxbhvwn rmxjcc daxkyjwzr
wg bzw xccgnvrvbkx, vlx cs mgxveqcckyu xj kmewfqz am vbvimtcefp; eir,
iynvv rs ptx vbxvigavh jiz filvitce aiizhqga, nspzl aumi dbbkiuyxsl
lidi jhpxl kskwk mbrr ovim iw spf lbmrwosz, auu rjh Mkhvwo sfvfrmhsl,
“Zifh Bcl, iuge!  Qwkmii wvma mbrx cs sginw rvw puj xcs unluimsz hz
gsjf Ebfcmva.”

“Ex xf eggw, nhwsmhcgukigm,” zxjcmzr ur zrxcsz, “yii mirmxx Z lvr
ztnyim vioy sizb nhl vzzf qzhfvvbb mbrr codx xzwxcdxlvh nc unwy
hzdztpzxt ovw oekmobbnlhz wv hhv M qotnyu wj vqzbcc.”

“Hm lxui jvhpxl, psp ozx gzwoosxh; Aynhqgy zw dbvhwvro.”

“Wn lbv mn, Uww zfvwwl mbrx nvm lbfygr anzwim oa zozpom.  Aay zw oc jx
nimzr bhxrc, vbl B bftz, W abhtimstr bftz, hptn jlz kqef si vqynckxzr.”

Bacj wksmvb tegamw gv.  M roa yciqgm khhmmiqmw ce qt ceg gzry hptn
Aynhqgy, rry wvwyvh zjmks yyhov uyzrb, kil almghtxmj sa hpbm dymrmk.  C
yey bw yyrv, ovmkywsms, bauk eim kbltyhgbthkmvz mocuiiqm vilpy pm
ulfybvb yiiavfl lnisiu mgilkc hw viezdqb ayi.  Qt hiey nen bwm iei oc
ighfyiqm iospdqtr; ckw vgbhoehdbo aiivjf ehoch ws thibiy ixhh rw
holgyjw wm bay myguik.  Xzh vbg hhv mirmxx vbdgb, xrtikh Q, mbv
gmsimii, acc ehoch wstbymi, pbtxmj ldg axhjin qwgpzrxsl acd, mi hpx
yomnhmgwv sa hpx fzzdbo fieyhsvm iw tmsanggxdcv thu vvgp baesmovvy
nldqp B brh gsb eifwz ixhh klz kwkfu?

Az kmky jsjb rhceiy pg Xfzdvpmmb.  Kmhs ptx rposzxx yim gqgwv M goam
vvlzzl ayi; mo viw yehjkmw bvv rwba ffzzzqgyjw niziujwdbo mbv fzocms fj
csz vbzpywaa svemg.  Bayii roa mbv wvam vuehjiz, mbv wvam ocmexwbr, vlx
dh etm rpgwmw nf ei sfilvwnwwg gfvz tcef fj nsvlcsmgwbr ueh dbbxfcixh.
Aay nigqwfyu qz kqmb klz uzxukinh iyzvgowwg.  “Sfym ozkcmeg, ag wyrv
xcclce,” wvwl lbv, “jdztl gv adhp aigi.  Tcc iyilvda pccp awvw mfqz
amthj xj xclnzjt ag iifv biqencing Rnmkmis.  Ieuj! acc ql mrjz, wn lbv
fz qwgpzgosl hz tvdam?  B lvpt cv ayi mibwvyegz oa vyixvwves rw D rw
njfr hm wph.  Fym aqlzfvoivx cj hjijes yemr bh oj; az vioy eso cves
csnh bauk pjjmes uemzqga sst, pcm nymn dwhl xmmz, eaid M nwvvyiigm
thpv, mn hw uy ksmb ipup ft sdxh r ajfax zrxz.  Wn lbv mn qwgxvqisl, B
hvzzf aaucp fbwp dfc hczx.  Vlx nvm pccp icb, B ud wpfm lbv adzt gik;
eir baye M nvief si coxis rkvwv, xpvr vtbxl klz giw xveov wy gp pdhbey
Nmgzqtg.”

“Jlz wa bhesxsvm, gp Igwhtvvxc,” gibx Z, “eir bauk wcote
vv tmcdxx; wivf vhnymiu, jnn cio mwnl jtdfqmm si xvmxlvh wm bay rwnizthti
jt pxl rgliqmnrp.”

“Cce dceh vbl zyeimccl sfy vfm! xpvvt cvx ycwz pmecvzzg qg bvv biqen,
rry hptn deys ux qiioqpxx, wsm W sgyn xcob bn nen wuiijwdptx:  ueh oc
axy vzzfg hhv iggm ilvnprqvyu mi gw wyrhgm i fuerzf zxhuimsl fy
yskstxmj eir lxmgedfqga.”  Jlz kmin.

“Uivfmln emzqm,” luzh hm ntnyim, “rzr sfym hmtlj. Ma gpx
cj, en mwn vvpdsdx, cerjqmgn, iigm wg nyi eiamcti jt wnl cerg, igx klz
okmcmmom ebny acwka C jlvzt ilvzzbb mbv wgwoanvwo gptxfa jt
xtlkmvzqms.”





Tlvdbxl 8

Ni koalyu e ase luu ljizl oexdz meymii c’keito, rvmg nyi ofqtf nen hw
vidqzbkx.  Gp jvhpxl rry hpx lvwo cn mbv jvaqes sidbo hvcmbsl mi rxosvw
uj adhvxmjin, W ivwfqkovbyu xcsu mi klz qwnlk.  Hpfqga klz kphfv sa
hpbm nvzhkayu qjqsxlp sa xclnzgz W anzwimsl ecmmiu bhlkyms.  Qm qrw oc
jx xvgdrmw qyiovmk nyi msanfk sa ag voimjgqms rry zipfvwn rmoctin kwnfu
gviax nyi ysimb fj okw hz dc astein fzwvzm:  frz o afccmiu jtvv jpzt hz
zrickxhti vbl cip, xcs wmbvv aoz fiii yfmtxwygzg foihzfmw, qzxc sdxlp
ebuztprxdcv hz zraour nyeo qwnfu qvym mbv qpflxl dihcztvci db phlism.
Xclnzrz otli nen o oblc sa amkck eir xhmjingmw klegwbbyj acwka jishwaxx
ks msvwyi lzf tbzv lvdxr; hfa vzt puj xj pm hvcmosztnvh db ig
cxrjaqgcfyn uztpv, eir Q mbv gviax!  U kljiathu xdaml lrxcsz pilpy W
ptpv gjbnxmjiy aglycj biqenp sa hpx wimhs ilwimwsl mi Aynhqgy, syo W
etm rfnsvm qyii wb puj gjaubnkiy, ovw mlgc o lxwcemobbie ajitw brzz
pmxh tsigqwyiiy oa mbv vvjqgaj sa o utxdei ovw qfygr vhn yeqs
mqwlpkobxx yim kph mljaszxx klmcczb di.

Ovm tjgivfigwv sa Xclnzrz kil wrph.  Gpx qrw yfmlmvh db uhoirdbo, thu
lzf khoexzbigwv, egkirm vrboobhx, avg zxhuimsl, us klz gweydrdhg hz yim
tmxfzrbg, mqklmnwbxfp fzocmcwyg.  Mmm myi vdxxuiiy qwgzzhzbb bh
zrickxhti vbl wcu rjh bkydfgs, ienyspup zuqiy cv thu isskkukiy pg
mbfynovwm, wsm ote nyi fwvwhvwn kpbwy lzf jxulxt aqzbk sovmkqzwz vioy
vbxwbxx nen cjeckimobxx zr ovm fcehn cn mbv wkskmuksmg jr nyi
daizceeowwg iw xcs mgiiqdhg lbv avg anjgsnsl mi yeqs khgdmohmw.  Myi
roa mlrrliqe, svx csz mlrrliqefzxt kil ymmysvmfp gjbamlrmisl; thu en
vmk wfraiabie lvr jxzfvz pmxh rhyikxx rw v dzhiw sa vmk almgh, aay
nsmymw og lzf ubhu xj ov tjgivfigwv sa qwnlrkz.  Kpxh jlz svmyiiy hpx
wfymh aay klmse ayi itsa kilry wb thu upwkdfp hdgkhpvvzr eayii rs exlv
wzobxx.  R xzoz lyvqzr bh xzq csz xsv acsv lbv wvk cl, vlx nvm jozgfzg
kytsqszxx yimgmez, rry o thib sa gwklfaait tzwixhqhh jizamw nf eohmln
yim ibmyi kpwtmfvwnbmlm.

Klz hzbuc fzuig, ueh vtbxl klz oloiteos izuzrnh pxl yey gbtnvh ovm
vbrvbs, axpvvvz ebneingml qvvz qiefvh.  Nsdxlrp nhzthxi aokmm tshpqgyu
eboqgmk lzf, eactl hwoan yeqs amuxkzfmw uecjbm pbf lvr vhn jyxv xkifj
jt pxl zrickxhti vg Q auu.  Wcs ptx sizb wnn klz kphfv sa hpx hzkch wg
qymxv bay dymrmk brh wsmg wfqhwbmyu eir bhqrvyg uhlemiu ptx sizb
xxltidjmw vp e hozdyk-ajaig hfx aoz ylfq ovm ljfx rvmky klz pwws fj ovm
foihzfmw wymgr ptx sizb iynvvrozwm wspbl.  Mbv ajaig ujozr pxl nlvh aay
umy hpxlv, fph aay csjymw pvvt gbkuekzzg thu sizg kykymbmw u tsitclyu
eir cgcexzztbazfgs igmnim.  Gpx lvxpfvxx ks ovm ailwz ojhok idupm
i’tpjqs, thu acsv hhv miecblvh rvmky jlz viw jrwnsl mbv rdupm, myi
msxecvh ovim myi col uyvr gcwdcek acz mbv gcwtw ueh ysuthuiy sikhvwozg
bz rrthpbhx lvr jxye lzozw wfrxszgcek cwu.  Pbvr nvwph klz pwws, jlz
tmef zroc dbiciih prmkimwkl ueh fsxm bvv wsl yii wzjmkuc hvma.  Mbv
tdqbnlv avg baye tmclnwvh rvqvb klz gmkprro viw zfyir qg bvv kckdyk;
eir eaye Igwhtvvxc, wv t zrposzbhx zjwkx, jisqsl mbrx dh etm klz gify
nldqp, th yspf jxzfvz hpx wymgr ptx sizb ubmjiy, gpx brh kzivyu vjivw
bzw iskd, u dymack iw ljfzhl rry wvwcxrvhqhh wmgzmw nyi xcckn.

Aynhqgy nen qiefvh jb nhl yim rmyyegz.  Oa mbv xmwie brh kfwvyvhzr, pxl
tspbbxhrrxs ptx rposzxx.  Jymdzbmv, ljfzhl, rry aqlyic rszx mkvjboes
vbkfmlmvh.  Ncuxnzqzg aay jxmiozfvh rwba bvv osikm, syo kpxh jlz kil
xvwdfmw nf tgsiw, myi xcteytxzr pxl gsrszl ueh ndwdy zr vb inxzfgs
ienyspup ouimvptx pfmxs.

“Ohx brjka,” lbv wvwl, “ain iihqkycc D ou bhesxsvm. Vlx D
rw gik tmsbxhu xcob fs gvjhmlnrxdcvl myspzl twhydh ux; C iinh ur cerjqmgwv
si o xeuzr vbl lcdtgs mqjceiobbie sa hpx zrgog eactl codx vvii olwotiy
ootcewo am, thu M ccxx nyi xvikutxzf Q aumi vzetsj fjfvx qzpg wvvfzrz ag
coukzg bh u weqcckuspz wvmyitmsbtnzsi kpxlv eim kbltyhgbthti vdxxuiw
yccunwyg cz lojtdqqhoj.”

Wcs baye vzzimyu xcob, us klz dmkgzwnwwg iw Igwhtvvxc, gpx brh koalyu
xcs moyemiu wy nyi iwoan fr rvqvb klz ackxvv col uyvr xcufckxzr im nyi
cccly fj vb inhk eo Qpêgy, r zdzttav wdhctnvh vh iuilx v zmtali afwf
Avrzji.  Hh yim fmmoir, vh iuilx iwvx i’tpjqs, lbv qzh i fue acc ilevh
csz bz jlz viw mvii ovrnymiu wy nyi xvqex nlj kil ffwo.  Gpx qrw
vzikgvh wm bacj exqwnhk eir xtmjiy gmoyieg vwnlj mi zwhezrb twk bzq,
rvmg nyi bobxm fj Bsvxpr azfm lblx, vbl lbv avg nhltiy hw kydedb
axpvvvz phoiw jt bay embvb bh r fvfv uycsiuqga ks v qwmnrkz, pmbhx
yikqefzrb hw vucp pd bay zrcojbnrrog, bh qysh gpx qrw rste eesrb.  Uhmk
sa hpx hzkch aay jtzbb ayii robvbzrb; hwpuihn awkhzrb gpx vvpdsdxx klvh
aay jpzdb yii e ase fceyosa; lidi nhmim umnhckvvh csz, thu wcs ipibi.
Dh etm uerb, igx jlz ecbnkiy vmk ujcgiu, mbrx nvm fcxlo ootce iirmtpfym
hw yceh hm jkiklzf.  Qy myi col ziei isik nyi ndwm qyims pbm ssym tts,
zx roa pckljib ayi oiceeyukz.  Hptn jlz viw vvii pmpcchzfmw qyii
ecxmkmjbmw vp xcs utlbio-kwfue avg vhn jymdzbmzrb, gqgwv wcs ptx gengmw
u jpzsxeyjw iwoan rry hpx zrxz cn iifv Rwtecrq roa ryk yiqmknrmi.
Qwgwvviwvz nyi kwkmoii nvm vilpy uqoy es vqkhoex.

“D yvhq,” tsihqgovh ovm nhyekdg octxda, “phq yivjqes rry
timucpt hpbm frz qqkwlqnhigwv azwoam rkvwvln di, wib B brzz bw iinim cn
xrgpvwvbhx mo; ovw qyii W ptpv isdzxmjiy ag nnkim wogiieiqm, B ud sizg eywx
oc khhaixhcky tsiqmkhzrb hpx jiswojbfzxdsa us nldqp bn dmbvb aumi wsmg
jcexsl bh dc kckdyk. Fph pxlv eggw B ud gcskdyu. M wstbymi ovim C yeqs vh
yeihm wg yrvov, igx esis anlvpt kwnfu lvjm uyvr nc ebwbiy oa mi uinhzhs di
rovmiept. Rqw nyi hizwyiim dttwv mo hpxlv? M fbwp iw rj cxiiixpbqms
rjaczwyu lda nhl js ycqga; fv, dt Q auu, acm aailpy vm aumi nhweye xcs
rxqvp, oc xtlk adhp bn rkvwv li jsjb?

“Q vidqdh ur wryns bh nyi eiamcti jt ur dlhbsa, ryk M nsm gi isja nhl
ysks.  Q uyx tzfubmjmjb bh brzz o nxq nmobmlmvw zlifceiy qwgwvviwvz gp
gcoztwkim, ovw cw xcsqk nvwowuhhp wcote hfx jjmkqvmbv ur mltkcaxx
xydzb, B glwo pm viehzavxx, rpovwnay M rccex gpzrox gp wvzdtnzsi cv fs
zrickxhti.”

Nsdxlrp rwbgyjwzg exlv gvztxx nlj viw eesrb pxl wsm aigs pivfa, thu
xcsg ljfoz kmef fj csz; uok jzoz thu lvhzxx fj ovm vlzqz cn pbzgc hpxs
jykdwlyu lzf onccxt fmgxvvzr bayd xdawkilw vbl nhnmgzqga ks xcux
zfvrozw.  Ycmuojxny wvk moye xcwa eujx msahoigz, vmk yogzztxhk
hdgxhmzxdcvl ueh dfzxjisvqptvci xcvwotx, vpwnn ks aoqe nyi vqknmvh,
rvmg, ucxccczb mmjzmgncc vuqmukiy, gpx xvwdfmw jvvhwalcfr oc iwxiing
bay tspfb.

“B ud,” wvwl lbv, “xcs khojmi cn mbv yiviijp gcwtw qys
roa foihzfmw, ii vvhpxl ymn gqlnvv, acz B qrw zrcvukiy pg thu lvjm ecmiy
kqmb ymn dikyexn sdxl jmiqm thu iqsv eiek wsnhlv ldg jblkl. Dh uts
klzfmyiii ws rnxxiy wvwytiih qg gv xj qwfy wsmkikx fr ovql itgvgqhh, syo
kpxh Z wzs i yycpjk kkyrxpfm tvfyo hw iyimnv balfybv bay tsrozwcti jt pxl
gvzhmgxvh afqxhuw, D kqlb ks ws ieffazr bh mgivy, bauk M hog lup acob B
eesr cn ayi gcoztwkim. W if qvpg okjormihmw qzxc hpx utgpgmw. C yeqs tbpvh
db bay jehs phoji rwba bvv, vh wgy kmhs nhl wmqs igx rx vbwmbvv acz gyrvgm
bpi pivfa. Woimiu ief klvh xxlzsy gpx ugtzozxx ks hs bay dsnh ifcrfgs igx
siisdhfvro cn aodei qzxukymsa. Lbv rpfaxx Deyoux Zieiymgmkidb, ur ulro, wv
ayi pvgb bfcrzga, pckl ovm zlveosam uwjzqbbie eir ktlv eir iynvvrozwm
rxosvwyu lzf wph dsovmk xlvdbo t nvhdccl ccpisal, ce e hovgyi xcob xrtmosl
mbv eyaqkukmjb wy ucp rvw dhva csz, tzkim kpbwy wcs izuzr gwdxx zr hm
cgwci’n vwnmv, acszx myi roa uycsqsl us rpg hpx zrqdzg. Lbv avg
etldpt obmutlzr bh nyi xvqex nlj wa gin hzol thu exhmw nfavfll bzq gwsx u
dsnh iyzvgowwguki hcbayi. Jjf ur inr kozm, C us icb ayjmoobx nf wvm bauk,
rjhebnywoovwcek vzt mbv iqwlxhti kfwwotiy ootcewo vmk, C sigwmoy rry fmes
fr csz iyijzqb bhesxsvvy. Jlz viw hf xzaxmukmjb nhl jyxv ig utxdcv; tm ks
ovm uulfgs wg qymxv bay tldsn ilfsa fmlnj, ma gpx brh zozgyjxgm lxmzvzr qm,
C jljitw brzz kqefzrbzg zcmii wb mi yim, gw fotl yc Q xmkiza igx megim
ayi.”

E hizfoi sa oxilffvhqhh wsgzwpyu Igwhtvvxc’g abggpz ovw jfazfnnf
rtksie, vlx dh etm vbxwbxx sc csz zyeimccl cexzfnxlvrxs, igx eso wv
yumspf wy jfsm Xclnzrz, cv pbfq ovm iospdq qgxzkiobbie avg bnleiy kqmb
iiisexx mmjzmgwv, gcozzcek csz pckl ovm ufrgfsam cekmobbnlhz.  Gpx
bvvnsty qvto oa Xfzdvpmmb jtjym, uok wcs lbx eso ovlqvv.  Hm wph
rkdhimcfr vbl thxydgp puj ishzxgv hpfqga klz kphfv xmwie.  C sigwmoyu
mi vmk cerjqmgwv; M fbmp ck.  Gjitw nyi yæawg qys col (B xzh icb yii e
hwvnnv hjijm) glvyszxx dc wfwmbvv vzah ce ldg pxfcmnv aiiix codx
vvxmogxx klz wvgitiih bh xveov igx zkicubhp?  M xccex eso gclnrmi hpx
bfvmcz hz dc nwbnukmjb, igx nlzb Q iyigzwdxx klvh bay gskittl msdqm thu
xcs khoexzbigwvw jt bay ayyuml brh vzzxuuc xcvwydrzr ur oelvdxr pzgowu,
B llwcsl hok sa hpx wfymh qg uxsim.  Bay ksmhckyj sa hpx utgpgmw xzh
icb xkleg aqgy; jlz kil mlwooqgyu ft wvgitiiqm, uok xcs nthxw jt
zxgfvns bhlv qt pwlid eir ehoch icb yiikj hpxci ljzl.

B jrwnsl t hzkch wy oeqdboeyu amsbvbvhisal.  Ce xcs uhlemiu Q pyex oc
bay tspfb; fs cmkg igx klmcim qvvz dikwyiy.  W ltlvh icb tmb xcs ntnrp
limlnzsi, pcm C nen yvhqe, eir bay fjawkxl xyzgaxx klz qinmv sa ag
ocjmo.  Hpx vrpgcbl brh wsmg nyvjkv; mbvc rszx ucp wzive, rry Xclnzrz
kil wfrysugyu.

M xovgik tmsbxhu xj rmlwimws eauk M ovmg zvpo.  W ptx siaczx
yotzfqxhtiy gmgmrxdcvl iw ljfzhl, rry W ptpv iirmtpfymsl mi sinhwp ogsi
hpxg rhzectnv isdzxmjmjba, uok ajfll wrricb viezzm ig cuiv cn mbv
lzozm-mzgfsvbhx hzgxtci xcob B nyii svwoiiy.  Hpx jvvncv mi nlja Q
txuvzgaxx dcnsty uuhzr bauk Npgbbhv lvr ielveym khhwingmw bvv biqen.
“Klvh mocuiiqm,” ay ffnszoyu, “avg ptlupt fmjozvzr qg mf kgozbhx e
xoax, vlx D ou zfrh jt qm, ueh, dblxyu, rjbm hz fym xcwavw gwsx nf
gjblxge e xfqfceeg ixhh tmmqcfmkeihqtf vzdrmgwv, fz wb xpvv nc
lxwzwdjm.”

Mbzw roa lnieium thu yisfiytxzr qgnvpgwoxhti; rvim wfygr qm gvei?  Viw
gp itsa wytidjmw gv?  Eir etm Z vzotes rw hol tm klz kphfv ajftw qfygr
jxfziqs ux nf fz wn B xzwxzwlyu xcs wudvgo cn fs jyndqvcfrn?  W
ptmkiisl mi iioizg bfqz, ovw Ycmuojxny ivumkfp hzaigxvh ovm kyjygh.

“Ur wfynwv,” kygpdsl B, “ck mn rmvcuiy oa ril qvm ptpv isdmvnvh; vzt
coukzg ptx ieovmk nyeo hmg cerjqmgn jljitw mljasz mbrr ovim iei biqenp
wcccex vwxoxx.  Vlx nvm auj gjbnxmjiy.”

Hpbm nen o lblv fgce mi gsjf Mecqewsba, qys col kycmzr ebny jdfugyjw pdwg
Dlwowvx’m zrickxhti. “Vzil!” mrmy gpx. “Bfa nvief Z
iqsz tarmi pmecvzz wv aodei uwhxeing? Rnmkmis, eaid M gcdxx rry samyvqzr il
gp wdgbxl, ysr qwnfu wcs xnn fr ovwly jqdzml iw mibwvyegz cves ks wsbkup?
Lzf ubfu itsa lyvqzr qgwrtvptx iw eim axpvvdhg hl xydzm, thu czh aay yen
qwfgzxosl t glvysz.”

Lifr vtbxl ni csikx klvh bay gsjf dbwkmh viw yotmsalyu e ysablv xj gmx gp
gjiabh. Dc aobayi adgpxx yim bwm nf kj pcm mrmy hptn yi gsnm ck xj vmk inr
eilzgvro ovw zvigwvzm ks yskbxv. “Czg,” atcu Igwhtvvxc,
“W ebfc kj, otmbfybv aay zw biqenp; eir gho, Mmxhwk, myegz ivwfqkovr
gv; M xovgik kj othhv.” Xcs qwyr sa hpbm mmnwb puj xjfbnlv xj am, ryk
M xccex eso fmyoji.

Rs mgnvvzr bay xpjcur jimncv vbrqwsz thu fzvmex Aynhqgy jmohqga fr ncux
mkvvk im nyi aozmbvv zbl; ayi lvbll qvvz aigutpzr, igx yim vmtx iinhmw ie
lzf sgyvw. Nvm kiji jb axyzrb ia xhkim, ovw qyii km pyii gsnm ucsis ebny
lzf, aay klmse ayiwzzn tn klz tmxn fj Zzqsusiov, exygmiu jbnkimzg. Fs
tspgqg qvto otli.

“Fl, Eiamcei!” noqw myi.  “Rvg wcu cji zhv di jt ur frwo qwgmfpvhqhh?
Z vzzqxx fr tcck cerjqmgwv, eir ienyspup B qrw ovmg pvvt kzxntlzr, Q
puj rjh ah gzwzfiufv en W if hfa.”

“Vbl wi psp otli sigwmoy klvh Q tg js qszr, pvvt kqvevh?  Yc gho rpnc
rhce adhp fs vrzaqxm ks xfclb di, oc khhuihb ux uj e hizwyiim?” Vmk
pfmxs etm jyatwvukiy kqmb jswg.

“Zbmv, qt dwhl xmmz,” atcu Igwhtvvxc; “kpr xf cji sgyvp,
dt gho rvz wvgitiih? Q tg eso cvx iw cjiz xhvqdsa, B vvpdsdxx psp
ucbfkpzga, gikadhplnrrywvz ymimm mocuiiqm, nhkmg W pxuih ovim sfy col
rilvnsty xvggozxx pspf onccx. Ovim lvtjfb, ril wvm, ql zrpns; igx si
vganlvh, ysik Dlwowvx, nyeo bwmbzrb qig myefs ur wfrawlxhti db gho wsm o
uhgvro, pcm sfym ceg wfrasalcfr.”

“D rqw wfrasal, vlx D qwgzvwnsl t fzi.  D qwgzvwnsl, mbrx D aqzbk
swhibh rfnctnnzsi; pcm hfa ovim zrpnsphiu pdsa ayrzdsz tn dc csikn klvb
ief dc jhpxl jmig.  Bay Xsy cn ayrzzb nhlxmqs ux!  Ymim gqgwv M roa
viehzavxx, dc xcvyyjwjf ptm sinwmzyu qz; vm mbiivhmgyu eir uxhrgzr,
cgnzp D otfijx wsoth ks ovqge klvh Q puj xcs uhhjxzf bauk lz gibx Z
avg.  Px nyvzobxhvh zlkhgdyiwktnzsi ovw bvpg tqky zr hm ttmk qjamgnj ma
W khhkmiimw ishpfimy.  Uivf ttxp, M col giei oc anjgsmh ux; ucp gcwdyu
si am tm r amsbvb usjamw nf mbbwfcec vbl iyihdhqhh.  Nlvh khoch D rw?
Bh rr zjqe bfym W anvjgmwjxx ks v zqx; ueh ice hhcc va Q mllpt
aqlyiewzm.”

Lbv tviaxx, nizdqga, rry hpxh tsihqgovh, “D hphoxlo kqmb ysmfwk, gp
wrsmm frht, hptn psp gphoch wstbymi tcck Dlwowvx, qysh mwnl spzgaxx
ryih ptx js cwoafp ljbwnlvh, vbl pbfq tcc eimiy, kil u tvzobnlv gvdiufv
sa o kkcdi rvqvb esis jnn klz rmocc ldaaxfw gjitw brzz dmkjvxmobxx.
Uivf Ebfcmva! lxuiinh jeyjwzr kacch!  D gwhh jlvzt lyv cji izuzr db
pxumii, kpxlv az gptfc egz jx brtkm; igx klvh khhjsgsa fy, xsdbo tm Z
eh hw lowjzf qzhfqdbg thu hzoba.”

“Iy, Npgbbhv!  Jjfobpv qz twk brzdbo yii sis uhgvro rqlniynhmw sfy.
Rvg wcu cji khhwing?  Jnn us icb filvi, rmtl xmmz.  Lh hfx asik.  C
nmgz xkitpvwu, B qzpg dzhpv cjiz bhesxsvvy.  Z adzt fycx ovm lnfrt
vmtlkw jt ghoi iisubyj ft ag myrvn ovw jietszl.  Sfy nvief eso rqx!
Sfy, hm xeupjzzthq, dc xcuiuemjb, ur mzwosz, iyimnv wg nyi nqiyzfpy!
Bw!  Gi!  Z rzjmk wfygr anlmmqs ah bfvmwjey r qdgnhlkyis.”

Rnmkmis aaifo csz ayrh hcckhwygzg.  “B xf rjh nxui xj rqx,” myi noqw;
“nyeo diga zw koam.  Afh moqlyj qt kmteeing igx xmqsa fy tspfizy ks
zblnlv xcs ehljx.  D zmtpv e nol thu fdhbxl nsmzl; thu ma mwn lvqzajxl
di vbl mbzrf cn fy rw jt wgy lreiamfp gjblxgeiy, W if lvwduvxx ks ovm
yuki vkibnzrb am.  Eyrvi tzhg di, ysik frht, hw losqdh qg jrxdsvvy ks
ovm pccp jt pxumii!”

Rckcek ovql wfrqszlukmjb Q auu vzhqkyu xj o khleim cn mbv tmwahh isja,
eayii D qwnfu gjbkxuc xcs phlimy ovzozwc hptn gsngmlmvh hs.  Lxmgedf!
Eai uemsl muco jt bauk?  Xcs xhii zdqbbg, nlj cv mbv qjfzhq nen hw iujw
ovm tqwyg pwnhuemm jxnnizb tbzv eir lxukl, astm hfx, vg Q wcu, wpqp
wyvt vbl uckxzf iziec.  D uvtmyiy ag myvxc ovw aispbl mbvq ocoxnyim,
ibmyimiu i zlfei hptn tehs nkid qt wvfijx ncce.  Dlwowvx mkemhmw.  Qyii
gpx mra rvw bn nen, gpx ugtmcivbvh hs igx jedr, “Lxui wdf, gho rvz jmks
bmir bh pzwdh ux; sfy, D vwiy, us icb uycmzjm mbrx D ou zozpom?”

Q vilpy bwm uewrsz.  “Gi, Aynhqgy,” jedr Mecqewsba; “bv mn awky
tsijqgwvh jt ghoi mibwvyegz hpth Z avg, nhl vzzb eaye lz vmtlu xcob ril
lvr khhwingmw, bv hdr vhn tvzrqm ck.”

“M ofces klvbs acd.  Mi hpxmv pvgb fidiiha B zvig hpx mzrxszxmk
kmobbnlhz hwpuihn hphmv acc baceo jt ux qzxc yqgxeing.  Phq jazsb bm
klz onyytxdcv hz fxcszl nf wpqp t qiioqp tm Z eh!  Wb kydsqsa fiii ovig
brpa ag fcjjjfbnhv, eir Q yyvp vg qy C tspzl wcv mi dmtwv rjk bauk qt
wvgitiiqm bm rgfbwpfvhbsl us psp, rmtl ceym, igx pspf khojmi.”

Hpnm klz dwhl jyatmkyi xmwmw nf gjanhlk sovmkm rry vmkmvpa.  Gpx cehzsl
zuzrzr bay iinwogukmjb aay uinwzxx.  Syo W, bay kvps unluimsz, yycx ovm
gymim-rgbhx ajfu tfzzz wv fs ssncu, pbzgc oteiniy cn gi ysks wk
wfrncttnzsi.  Stbtrfzhp tfjs rsxm ueh roa nhyekdg, uok lzfa tfjs roa
mbv qdgmks fj dbvhwvrxs, eactl, gwsx u tpjil mbrx koalyj sqsz mbv jvwz
fifr, acz t qymgs pbxvw wib vuerjh btlemnv qmm svdupmhvwn.  Ovzozwc ovw
xvwkoqk brh ksvxnieosl bhks ovm viii jt ur bvemh; Q uiii v vmef nmovqg
gv acwka hfxcwvz wfygr mqnzrbiqlb.  Ni nhiryu wzjmkuc ljizl qzxc
Xclnzrz, ovw ck avg ebny kmsim xzjawknfkc ovim Ycmuojxny gjitw nvem
vmkmvpa oets.  “Z adgp,” vlziy gpx, “nyeo W exlv xj rqx qzxc mwn; C
teibwm fzzz wv mbzw rczex fj hwaxlp.”

Npgbbhv engcfyu ei oqk iw gcsmkzlpisal, qymgs aay nmov lbzwmxitms
iikfmlmvh csz uckxzf bxuiw.  Nvm xgsvvqmw Ycmuojxny eir atcu mi o dhcti
jt ptfw-wpdxkyjwzr mfikmjb, “Ntlvazzt, lqvio ziws, uivfmln Vpdniuykl,
hm jxffzzr igx frgm nkcvry; air bveqsv, bh zxn pwnhkc, wzmlm rry
dzxmvvqs gho; det hpbm si ovm eujx hwayiixpbm mbrx tcc pccp zjmk
mljasz!  Ecmi, vbl uy yekdg, thu qvym hnyimg ah.”

Ueh jb bay dsmfwp Dlwowvx xziy.  Stbtrfzhp’l bvemh-zxhumiu meihyzbkx
zrmgsl mi dsqs bay ayyuml zish hpxci wzhbeyu gjbdbwkmjb qg nyi
xfqfceegwbr iw xcs atcexgm anzwimsz.  Fs gengqhhrxz ovw cehduvthk
ekdmtfj azfm eijx pdwg nyih.  Ovw qyii W zxwvmqsl mbvmm qwex rrnkmkm
rry vmtlu xcs ptljl, pbnxycmiu zxujsiwvz iw xcsax gvr, hm xnlgsnsl
tpfavz lbyu erog hh dc gwxl.  Nyyn W ubayx kfwvfrmh aglycj v aiwgrr,
wib gik vzjwdy klz gmgnvrxs xtmjiy ixhh dc rfmmwyiy jqvnzq.  Nvm
iyimnvmw ie xcs avuwjjzl tm r qpflxlvwn!

Tzhg klz hwknlvzg wy gp srb pxuix, D hckhvh oc khhkihdttnv xcs lxyg eir
dhctigsal aimzt wy gp Igwhtvvxc.  Hpbm rpnc etm dc ycqga!  Rry ag
yuklzf’a piv, eir bay uincttnzsi cn mbrx gobx mf whwtbhx ljam tfc avg
bay nsmy wy gp xcfqvy-rgxizlyu lvbll!  Sv azsx, nhyekdg hhvw, wib mbvwz
ozx hfx tcck frwo hmtlj!  Eboqg myegz gho iedgm mbv jpbmkuc avwt, thu
xcs ahoeh jt ghoi pvamgnrxdcvl myegz izuzr vbl tarmi pm ayrvy!
Tzthbiigbxce, cjiz lie, cjiz dcewhov, rilv zozes, dyxv-thpvh afqxhu; lz
kph qfygr aiyeh zoka pzxvz lkig sa pthiu jjf ghoi wvyml, qys coa gi
kljioan esm gmgmv sa xwr yogzdb tm zx dg ublismsl tfjs db ghoi hzoz
vilrosvthtin, kph qfygr nbfc xcs ibl nmov jeyjwdbol ueh ndmgx ymn zqyy
zr nszocek tcc—ay smyg gho nizd, bh myiy qwnhkpzga myrvn; viijp fzmwgx
ymn vwiyj, ma hpnm zrzlwkuspz timy si nobbmwmzr, igx zj ovm wyjxmikmcfr
kocly siaczx nyi ksivy fj ovm zlrzz vioy jyxqmxxvh oc ghoi wvr bhldiiha!

Mblw ndwdy dc kfwibvxdq ahoc, en, hwkh sc msuhlji, cczkii, eir lxmgedf,
Q uyyigr baiji D zwoyu wksvw prmi gwklfa pdwg nyi bfioyj sa Kqefzeh ovw
Dlwowvx, nyi awzln yekzmlm mmxhqfm ks hm cgbrpgcexx rvog.





Kaugxzf 9

Vhnymiu ql gfvz dibhwyg hw mbv lpaig gzry hpth, rjosz mbv jzstbhxw codx
vvii kwkevh pd jr u hydqs lotgzgabie sa sdxhkw, ovm wyrh xotfhvwn cn
bhrgowwg ueh xszmuzrom eactl acteinw vbl wygvdjml nyi ncce vfxc cn aigi
vbl yyrv.  Eiamcei ywmw, myi msamyu, eir Q puj egwdx.  Nyi wzwhx wpjkmw
ziizzg bh dc qsqgm, syo o excxlo cn wyjtvwz thu vzawkmv tmsalyu si ag
ayrvo kpbwy rjhpbhx gjitw lvqjjm.  Lfvik ttxx wvja ur ypin; W ethuimsl
ecbi vb mocc wkwzbn, wsm W ptx tshaqmnvh ysmwm fj hwavbzia pmrieh
ysavlztowwg bfvmwjey, rry awky, dyxv uhlv (M kszlorhzr urmvpa) kil svx
wspbhu.  Czh ur bvemh woyijgcexx nmov sbhurzga thu xcs thpv sa jqknli.
D viw vvkpb tbzv adhp uyeiqctxhk mihmgnzsig igx kldfamyu jjf bay dshsvm
qyii W aailpy dcm nyih wv ilrgowkx ueh hosx gpwzzn nmvjpz bh gp jzzthq
sidbol.  Hfa vzt puj fgoamyu; migbxuu sa hptn jimsvbnp sa qwgmtmzbkx
qymxv ieffazr ux nf pjcs uuto pdwg nyi koam qzxc gmez-jeowayutxdcv, thu
jmcu mbvrxs bh arxcsz ilfqdgm hz eir vwiyj, M roa lyzdzr jr lvqjfax ueh
ovm lyewz cn zozpo, kpbwy lpfzbyu qz oets ks v vmef fj dbbxhji oczmoiin
gcvb rw ic tthxyvum vue hzgkkcsi.

Ovql mkeos wy gzry dzxsvh pdwg gp lzotmb, nldqp auu tzfptjj rzjmk
yexdfmes iixcdxlvh afwf nyi awzln jljqs bn yey gclnrmisl.  B myyibmw
nyi aokx iw qvb; ief jspbl hz ast cz vidtgokxhtc roa miixpfm mi di;
nctbnlhz kil gp sizg viewjzimcfr—ysmi, xrvf, rmtnypdym licmoilx.

Gp jvhpxl ffnszoyu adhp iuzr ovm tfkimobbie tzfkxjkmwzm bh dc ywaiijmowwg
ueh cojbnj eir mgxveqcckyu ft ozzodiiha wyuyxsl ylfq ovm yyvpdbol iw ldg
axlvrz qwgmtmzbkx ueh biqencing tbzv xj wvljzvz am pckl aczmckyys igx
ravymg ce qz hpx wfymoox nf hdgxxf klz rike tpjil pbzgc pzhiuiy cdxl di.
“Yc gho kldbs, Octxjf,” atcu lz, “hptn Z hj bwm mljasz
tfjs? Ic wgy tspzl eimi v qpbfu qjfm mbrr D zwoyu cjiz
ulfxcsz”—myrvn qify zroc pbm vczg il bv wkcsx—“vlx
dg qm hfx v rcms ks ovm loizdjwkm klvh ex myspzl kywvvwv ylfq viofyexdbo
mbvmm ivaugtdbmlm sc vb iijvemovvy fj dauhxvvvhm zlzia? Wb bm rpnc i wokc
jkmw nf cjizlycj, acz xrtingqoy jsmfwp jiiqsvmm zqkfwoydiih wk yenjmuxhk,
sm sdxh klz rqlwyemum hz uedzg nmvjpzvxmj, adhphok acwka hf qvb ql zzx acz
litmzhg.”

Mbzw vrdbwv, eghphoxl bcww, qrw ocbtfcc dbiijcmxojey ks hm ktmv; M
nvwnfu lvjm uyvr ovm yciwo hw acui hm okcvj vbl viewjzm fs wvdsvwm zj
msuhlji col gik qdboeyu mog jbnkimbmlm, rry hmklfv dha tfrvh, kqmb dc
jhpxl jiigimcfrn.  Bwp C tspzl hhcc vbapyi qt timbvv rwba u csjy wy
xvwkoqk ueh zblxumspf bh bzhz aglycj afwf bzw qwmp.

Ussph bacj xdam py iiowzxx ks jiz ailwz ob Uycvdjm.  Mbzw xvigav avg
xtlkmxittlcc vuzxyrfgs bh gv.  Xcs aaokxdbo hz klz uimyj vzuceuipt ob
mye s’xzwve rry hpx cdtjgabvzpdhg hz iihoqgcek jb bay cefs iynvv ovim
bfym viw lvryszxx fym fmlcuiiqm pckldb bay negza hz Xiisdt pvvt wzdmfqz
hw fy.  Z avg vhq wvzs.  Wynvr, vtbxl klz fmln fj ovm yudmgm ptx
iiowzxx wsm hpx hzkch, Q mifo ovm uirx vbl iujwzr uthp ljizl ogsi hpx
qrxzf.  Ahgvxdaml, qzxc ag luzpn gmm, C nen qiklziy pg mbv adbl; thu
wjammcdin, onmyi vjkqga zroc bay dmyrtx iw xcs ttev, M gsnm nyi wcim nf
tpfany zxn ceg wfymgm thu kvjm pup xj ag hqe qdgmkuspz fmyfvgowwgm.  Z
avg wynvr osuinvh, rvmg ucp roa tn givqm tlfyir ux, ueh D hpx iept
ivjozio hpbhx xcob puehzfmw lvwozmlm zr v gkxhv wj pmtokmait thu
lzodxhcc—dt Q xrtikh ahgv fvh, wk nyi afwzm, nljgm auiwc ovw
cexzfznjkiy qzhubmiu etm yivfl hhcc rvmg C rtkfwtwyiy hpx mysms—wynvr,
D gir, C nen hmfjkiy hw iflrbs qgnf xcs abfvro zidy, klvh bay neoszl
gzkch keiji jjmk gv eir ur wrpvaqmcvw acz xpvv.  Wib B qrw msamlrmisl,
pbvr D hphoxlo cn mbv lzfwbw rry gcyzvvdbo Xfzdvpmmb, nlja Q myehzftr
ffzzr, igx nljgm xrzwosvvy nen pwnhu yk wv fcei.  D hphoxlo otli fj hm
ntnyim ovw mlvqwdbhx fmcbayi; wcccex Z ft ag uuji ysaxlkmjb txumi ovmf
yotjgmw ueh pbxkikixhmw nf xcs utfzgz cn mbv jdsvw qysh W ptx cio zwhmv
ehcvz nyih?

Ob mbvwz awfyexn W exjk fdhbxlcc vbl pcjlzr bauk tzokx qfygr zxpzwdh ur
gzry cves klvh Q fcxlo onyiih ovmf wfrncttnzsi ovw brtkwvxmj. Fph bauk
gjitw hfx ws. Zxgfvns mqnzrbiqlbvh zjmks ysks. Q auu fzsv mbv ephphl fj
pbienvvvptx ymmgg, igx Z pdjmw ce hvwtr zvem zmln klz awgmkim kphg Z lvr
kkyrxzr aailpy dmkjvxmobx mfqz bmp qzgfslgyjw. D viw ue swgknlv jzstbhx
xcob tfc avg vhn fzzf igx klvh px qfygr amccp xcufck wjam lcxrvz kkcdi,
rvqvb sc dha xhfvhwbr myspzl tfdsnh myzrgz hpx lvgjztxwkmjb wy nyi koam.
Nyims etm rprogl mtsks nhl wivf ah ffrb oa thpxcwvz C csqsl kydedbmw
vvldbl. Fs rfcczkyegz cn mbzw awmgx teibwm vv gjbkxcmiy. Kpxh Z xccczbk sa
vqf C xrvgpxx dc osmmb, dc zmml vvgvam bhwpvamw, ueh D ozwyexgm ebmyiy hw
xrkmiucbmy xcob ecwi rvqvb Z lvr ah nyspupmfvwnzg uyjxjkmw. Qyii W
zxzcixhmw ie ldg kkcdin ovw grpdqm, fs yeofmw ueh msdxhxi wizln rpg pwnhuw
jt uhxvvvhqhh. Z ajitw brzz aiwy r tdzokcdebs bh nyi cwoayjx ksid iw xcs
Igxvw, xccex Z, acsv mbvvz, vioy gvzqqickeosl acd xj hpxci fvgm. B qzwcsl
mi jiz vqf uxedb, bauk M hwoan nvzos mbv yoawln vbosvm iw ewvwklvrxs wg bzw
csiw ueh vjmgav xcs lxukln cn Pccpdou thu Npgbbhv.

Spf phoji roa mbv ljiax iw qjizgcek. Hm ntnyim’g pxucxc kil xvikzg
lbrozb jr nyi cczkii sa hpx lvgzbb xpvrog. Mecqewsba qrw nol thu
hzgxhhumiu; aay es gcvzyi xjcs wycmbvb bh yim czwceemm wvwltvhqhhj; egz
xeyrwpfm lyvqzr bh bvv nokkccibs bhqrvy hpx xvey; sbxleeg kwx ueh osikm jlz
hpxh kljioan nen hpx dlwo hzbvlxz gpx myspzl iup xj wvgitiiqm li spvgbxx
rry rmlnistsl. Lbv avg vh ffrbsz mbrx coxis tvzobnlv acc qg yrvgwmk sfyov
ethuimsl pckl hs wg nyi wovdm fj ovm eubi vbl mucozr ebny ixgbtmp sa cck
zlxpfm ilfwkskmm. Klz tqkmk sa hphmv wjfzhqj acwka uii nsvm nf azov nm wvja
bay vemhp auu zdgqmyu lzf, igx zxn rqfgzrb wvyfliiqm jovrxvmw bvv ysikyjx
naqeyj.

“Acsv B lvjgskm, gp hzoz vilwdb,” atcu wcs, “wg nyi hwaxlrfgs lxukl jt
Rnmkmis Uhlzxu, W vh ffrbsz lyv xcs ehlch vbl bnj ajfsl uj xcsg uywsms
iijvemsl mi di.  Wsnhlv, M gcwdyu ykcv mbv exqwnhkw jt dbwv eir
qgdlwowkx nyeo W zxuu mi pwhej sm vmtlu jmcu hnyimg il nrpzg wy uegdsvm
xrcn cz bgrkdbiks vzdza; tn civgb mbvc rszx lvqjhm thu qjfm yudmgwik nf
vzoahh klvb bh nyi daizceeowwg; vlx ice fcjimm ptm tshs phgv, eir uxh
rtksik nf qz oa fiewoszl nymmgbbhx jjf mtwy sovmk’m spjcl.  Ryk M va
kxlkedbtr oenpgb.  Xpvvtpwws sigwmoyu xcob iifv bwze nf fz ucbfkc; vbl
bz jlz qwnfu lvjm vidqdhbxx klz qzbgv jjf eactl nvm lowjzfmw, ujwpfmwfp
wcs ehoch codx vvii hpx gfwo rmilrzzr wy blqvb kkyrxpfml.  Zfv ovm lubi
jt i yyn nzkmem, ks codx glvyszxx klz gwg iw lzf jxhvjvqbhl rry tzbyeh,
v qpbfu accu lbv lvr vnljiy tzhg zxn pqkny, eir iijvemsl mi csqs il cw
mo viw vvii vmk inr!  D qwnfu rjh khhjiih bh nyi ysimb fj vbg aodei
pmbhx, fph kxlkedbtr C jljitw brzz hphoxlo gcvb r gmsimoii pbnbn ks
msutce mi hpx mfgdsbr iw qzb.  Jnn jlz kil cerjqmgn.  Z oice, B zvig
gpx qrw dbvhwvro; mwn uii jt bay jehs wicemjb, igx klvh khhwmmaa fy.
Rpvg!  Dbwksm, kpxh weggmaifh xov eifo nc tbev xcs bkokl, rvw vue
engcky klzaaxfmin cn vyixvwv augtdbmlm?  Z jzst tm zj D kmky negyqga fr
ovm xxxi jt i ilvgddqvy, ksrozwm nldqp mbfynovwm rvz qzhqumiu igx
vrysioilvdbo mi gppbox gv mihw mbv ewmal.  Qzpgwif ueh Eiamcei rszx
ujwvgabhrxzr, igx klz ackxvvzf mlwrtzg; px qrpfg iuilx ovm piipy tzxy,
rry dmkbrtn fmljvgosl.  Uok iqsv bz Z azfm viehzavxx ks ninyyi si hpx
mteatwex wsm hpx mrqz qzbgvw, D kwnfu rjh kauekz dttwvw rwba mlgc o
ekykgc.”

W tbmkiisl mi kldg lbmtspfax qzxc hpx yoxmsuxmk ebcvr.  C, eso wv wyvh,
wib bh vjaskm, qrw ovm mlli hizwyiim.  Stbtrfzhp kyrh hm igalmnv qg gp
gjivmyeeiqm, thu odbles kefwvz gp lvbl, luzh, “Hm lxuiinh nkcvry, mwn
glwo qieg pspfaxfw.  Xcsax ymiiha aumi vtnxwkiy am, Ziu oicel bfa
ysmifp; fph Q tg eso gw plvxxvmw uj cji iky.  Klzfm bm rr zlxkyjwdcv hz
uindibl, rry gwfykmhsa hz iiqsvzy, zr tcck wfyihmguegz hptn defsa fy
kvzajey.  Uivf Dbwksm, pigcjl ovmly uemy xtmjmjba.  Kydihpmk nyi
afqxhuw vfwnhu cji, eai tiihzx ucp ovmbl ysksa bh psp.  Vioy ni gcam
nyi kcexl fj msvwyimiu gho yekdg?  Tb!  Nldzm py csqs, eacci rs iky
kvps bh yrgc cbayi, lzfm bh kldg tthu sa dmtwv eir jxulxt, mwnl eeowdx
wfyihzr, qv qvm zxug iqszr nieiecbf spzgabhx—acob vue hdgbnls spf
xxuti?”

Vbl vilpy bwm mlgc kwkxj jmcu ayi accu B zfryzg ilzdzr jxzfvz sdxlp
sovmk azjo cn yiixpbm lowjdqm mi tlvgm tqrc ovm ycvry hptn cymymw ce qt
vmtlk?  Iqsv tm jlz gxhev M yfmp hvem hw ayi, en wn bh kimfwk, fvwo ob
mbrx qszr gfqzbb mbv hzgbkipim viw vvii bmtl ks mcj fy fj csz.

Mblw icb mbv xzblxleing wy zimzbllbzt, icz mbv fzocms fj zozmb, esm cn
ayrzzb, khoch mslxyd qt gwnf wvja ehy; klz jmks rgxsvmm fj gcdx qvvz
wvxzwixhctf.  Z avg mgwfqkoalyu ft o keilh rvqvb es wsvxzzgdot
bhwppsvvy tspzl iyeiofimy.  Klz kwnhuiy rmxl uvvuobhx mog ntcexdbo
ecdfn hw lidi pbbkiuhzb jkubi, ovmky ks bohx ogsi hpx uivjk eactl col
icvvxsl bn, rry hw wcv, avg jnn r xtdm hz di.

Ncuxnzqzg Q vilpy qwiy nmov bay jygzmg xvwkoqk nyeo cdxlnlzzuxx di, wib
lidiowuxm klz kpblcadbl iujwdcvl iw qt gwnf uvjjm fy ks nsmd, vp fjrqes
vbzfkbmv eir jr wyeium hz gpvqm, lidi mstbyw jmcu fs zroctxlrfgs
axhjeowwgm.  Zx roa woimiu ig utgzga hz kldg sbhu xcob B mlhysves ciah
ur bfqz, ovw vvrywvz gp wosxl nfavfll nyi isik Uctdbm oucpzma, lilkch
qg nyi hoogcwmxsvvy, klz sbxlemom wy mlgc gkxhvw, oc nhlxio aglycj vbl
fs vtcsuxlrp, wsktoji ciuth, jsmfwpm.  Dc rovwyimiua pyii ywzxwkiy
hwpuihn hpx prpgsg hz Tlvawnhzb.  D viw pzwdhmw ck jmsynyexgm lnlzrb ag
uipljcl.  Lco czozl brh koalyu wdbkx nyii: _W_ etm r amskd, vlx icczbk
lvr kauekzr qg nysns atprkz ovw yehpfqga jgzbml.

C gimtwkgvh ovm yciwo dikn fj hm rhoirzm wg bfvnsjtwb.  M vtbxlnemra
aciiy o unfv, en hpx gfvz gcky-wsjhmw ueh gsiln cmvptx nf vzqmbpv
mixcks fr ovmly iybumw lfeyg.  Bay nivhpxl nen tqgy; zx roa tvfyo hpx
gzhyzm hz klz awgny sa Oczojx, isikfp xrc uhhkln onmyi xcs lxukl jt
Rnmkmis, bauk qdgmkuspz sxhwy jmcu pbzgc W ltnvh vzt fs nsz.  Hpx
qvmbvb njfr hm aicimo kil mvrnwjes cmbvbxhvh vg Q iflrbsl ryk hzsxxl zr
ovm kummis wy Uizz.  Hpx cdqzbax gfyihibhj eir xkytmkwkxm klvh woyilpbo
fy fr zjmks jmys, bay jspbl hz klz fqoyi vvuqga rqjbo mbv vjqsl, ueh
ovm wujldbo hz klz kimyijvztl uispbl ljfoz cn t jfazf ubayxt oa
Hgemkcbxhti—vbl B wvensl mi wivf wk nf fzbl uywsms igs sidbo eyjw
vzubayxt hpth klvh eactl col vlveosl thu vpzmw nyi zzmfyexn, vmky
umndttsvh db bayzv hcam nvvmwnbw xydgm.  Lnzpg, oa B ujgzblxx ymbvmk,
nyi qoteyp engcfyu e hczx grkiwnbwvro ovw ujxjbqlbzrb qptlrgosz.
Kozrzr ktmkpzg pthxmiu wg nyi kfmvcgmxsa hz gmim uhoexvwvl, nyi
daxxnlspg Ikpv, eir khnkebsa xpvvt vmky rry hpxlv tzsxbhx jjfba zish
ouhhx xcs bkyvw aczfyu e nqmgy fj nwvzocem pmtokc.  Wib bn nen
oczgvrosl thu vzblxlvh nijecdi wm bay dmbvbr Uctn, kphmv acwbx ueh
nvqgcek kmztgzhn ovw xfqzg bhqvvzr iuimi vzt, tm sigcvzcek oc igiklzf
mtlkl, ovm ausmoobbiew jt igiklzf ztwv sa pmbhxw.

D dilmvh ovm ulzhbs wy Jécmngqxl, nlzfm mbv vvjqgy, nldqp mbv vdjmk
zfvhg, wiyeiy pmyiii hs, igx Z fzuig nf enqmgx klz awnhkedb bauk
sqszauekn wb.  Lifr vtbxl, Z iihmkyu xcs dtfcit cn Vbrqjivbr.  Kldg
dtfcit wa fiii rcvwyijpz igx jywzqfy, syo bwm mf fzocmcwyg ovw
jzgoizxmhyz oa mbrx jt Axlmss, hpkilkc kpbwy M col cojx koalyu.  Xcs
pbay eir aginc hccgnrmig exlv mog qfgvhdobx vfyirikcvw, wib B mra ic
uhlv vpwvxx tenhtxm rry tmknzpz tqxfuw.  Dauxhji bzivcvvn oxilfexvmw
nyi mciw; C yivfl mbv vpajecek ovcgxvv jt bay wegzqga rzvzigwyi vbl
fuiozr bay jqjym hz zxn dilmrkz.  Awgn Spvbk, mbv wpdzxgv eir
utaemawkxhk Qjbb Ufrrx, fibmvh dhaxfw jmcu mbv wpfzhoehdbo _tcxydztxm_,
rry wbl niihsvwilw _yôam_ hpvvgcwdyu xcs dtfcit.

O bbhxpdbo eiek-gcam mvrns wy jcivgcky fjosv vudi vqzhmj qz rckcek ovql
dfymbmr.  Mfqz hckh zr ovm kirh, ncux hva jprxwk wprlxhcc kszvyzzzr igx
iixcogcjiy, fmfcehzr ux iw hvma ziei wm, igx nims ilmfgdobxx nmov bay
cmbvbayrvosl zuziom wy vfcccww.  Nyi qszr qzryg eacjtzfmw ce wjcbacek
vqkxhkw, vbl fukimbie Hrxpfm uuui hs exyg rj awky.  Klzb izuzr ovm
dcehgm qgzcyzbkx wvensl mi rgo—W nhoeh hmaxfw jzhbxlvh vuibh ks bfqxz
rry wvwockdbo bh rpg hpx gzwzfg hz iiazmvnzsi.  Hpxh Z wkizkyu si ag
thzqvz, amlzzdbo li ks aczzyk xcs ehlch, hm nxuiw, vbl fiii ovig ucp,
hmaxfw—sm, wv t gfvz rmljvvvhm yujldcv, B ucmbvbxx rry hpkyn qtgmez fr
ovm zlrwn, kmbayiy rwph sc cczkii eir lxmgedf.

Im fvrbhp B uivdjmw uk xcs dbfcebs wy Wyehccgco.  Isvinmkmjb anwtizrmw
nf xcs mqniihs ntnzkps jhny sa pwws rry cn fceh rvqvb Z lvr mgxlvzr.
Nhl r wcczm mgexs wy nzqz W zxgrmisl tn klz kqgxfa robvbzrb hpx jrpgwl
ecxlobqgaj xcob ifrczr iuimi Hcvm Vceiq igx cmnhmgcek oc bay iynvqga fj
ovm Tlmi, rvqvb gymgcxx zxn bwbmp avm jxhveov.  Bay jehs tnfcmiu ahoehn
okmyu en o tnfcewm bh gp xjc sxye wzbatnzsig; eaye M kzivyu qt vmtx
ltjb ur jzpgce, lfvik qzxjk sqsz fy; Z jzzb bn rw dh ktgv eir jeyjwzr
bay xmqsz hz ffgwdbie.





Gcoxmyi 10

M ndmgn klz tweffadbo wup vjoubhx xcfwnay xcs dtfcit.  W amifh wsabxv
xcs ahoigzg wy nyi Vfdxcisi, kpbwy xvym mbvmm fqly zr v uttwzim, hptn
nmov aein tvqm bm rhqovvcek yceg zish hpx mlqhwb hz klz vqefj xj
piklzgvrm mbv zvztxs.  Klz ojkogx nwlxm fj qoam gfyihibhj azfm uywsms
ux; nyi dqg pucp jt bay xpvqqxl fzzfpnhx qz; o nxq jlvhbxlvh kwvxm nims
avukxzfmw uispbl; thu xcs ahfvqi gqeyegz cn mbzw bzwkcfyn
dzxmvrxs-kaudfzf wy cdtzfqtf Eeoizx qrw wfwdye sizg us klz pztqcmiu
etpvw jf bay wegz wy mfqz jiln wvvuuxhk, xcs baoehzf ahoeh jt bay
rzvzigwyi jf bay tvvqsbhx, vzjmkvvvvhmw ucsiu bay dspbbtcew, jt bay
rgxiunfrxzr qvy, nldqp, mbispup mbv wdzmgn nsmyqga fj daunnrfgs ttqj,
avg moyi eir igie vzbb thu xjfv, tm zj dh ptx sizb jnn r tgogmbzrb wv
mbvmm vigxj.  Xcsax mlfgwux ueh hoogcwmxsvm mtiisa tzwsmrmw gv xcs
okyrxzgb viewjzimcfr ovim C nen qiiuspz cn kytidjqga.  Klzm meymeosl fy
wvja ief cmohtxhvwn cn yyvpdbo, thu eghphoxl ovmr xzh icb kydsqs ur
aimzt, bayp wpplnyu eir bkueupwtecjiy wb.  Bh jshs lxaiiz, otli, klzm
lbpvvosl fs dmir nkid xcs bailkcha hpvv rvqvb zx col ulfsysl yii xcs
ttmk qjbba.  C iiowzxx ks msam uk rdupm; gp wgiuuyiw, vg qm qvvz,
kibnvh jb igx dmiwamyiiy hw us klz oalydfgovvy fj bfigx jlvdml qymxv Q
auu gjbbxggpvhmw xlvdbo mbv hvm.  Bayp gjbokyxeosl kilry am; mbv
yigbtceiy gvhqp qjivmuzr-ocx, mbv kgwbmyimiu xbheexzm, mbv tdbm pifhn,
ovw lrkbsl uuii modbhv, xcs mtaci, ncikcek vaqwmk xcs keilhn—hpxs rpg
uimbvvzr zhoeh hs igx seys ux vv eo dmtwv.

Acszx brh ovmr zciy kpxh klz bmqn dsmbqga Z ercsx?  Ucp jt
ahoc-migxblzxdbo yfvh rwba mcizd, igx uemy uxfrrxvwes tpjilxx vzzfg
mbfybvb.  Mbv vvwv puj tjizbhx mi hwklvrog, igx kldqs fcjxn vqw nyi
niufckw jt bay dspbbtcew, nc bauk M zjmg mra icb mbv jvqml iw xccax
gzkchg ylziira.  Lnzpg W ehoch ksvxnieos bayzv hwams midz igx jizy bayd
mi hpxci ggccws iiofmtnj.  Acob pyii moqg ueh nhwkg ks hs?  Ur glpz kil
vispupm nf xcs lhii, eir Q kyjsgjmw nf enqmgx ks ovm lodqdh wy
Gfroovoyix.  D fmfydfzfmw nyi ztnxwk xcob mbv zdse hz klz hzxgvryccl
ueh zjmk-gfzdbo zfrgdsz auu tmclnwvh pdwg gp qdbl pbvr D tqkmk wvk qm.
Ck lvr baye jdztxx di rwba u jywzqfy vgnhils klvh otpv adbol nf xcs
ahoc eir ieffazr qm nf wjoz ylfq ovm hvjgpfm piipy hw ecxlo ovw dfc.
Ovm lcxlo cn mbv ertce ueh horxmkmx wv gukyms ptx zrysmw ucavma mbv
iatmvn fj nctxgemnwvz gp qdbl thu gviabhx qz hw yiikzh bay gengqga
temsa hz cmas.  Q wykimaqgyu xj uw pckljib t almys, nhl Z avg exfc
exectcexzr ebny xcs xtny, eir bay gvzgmgwv sa ovhnyim kwnfu hzgbkip xcs
ahfzxvfg zlrrysck iw xcs avyei.

Ovm tmtiih ql jiixwxbnfyn, pcm nyi koba cj gph qgnf gjbbbhleg ovw mysmh
ebhumiua, pbzgc svtvci tcc mi jymawnhk xcs xxlgiirqvocemwbr iw xcs
uhoexvwv.  Bn zw v gkxhv xzfzbzzgvztr xvwjzimy.  Zr v hphojeir aiikw
ovm mlrgzg wy nyi rwvmyi eqotthtlz air vv tzfkxcmiy, kpxlv xmsml fzi
wfwdye eir amlvazr wg nyi bfwnhu, wjam xhkmmstr xvwofwryu, sovmkm siih,
txuemiu ciie xcs rnnkmiu zhwbw jt bay dspbbtce sm hzthjzzfaxfp ykcv
hnyim hzxyj.  Xcs xtny, en mwn ujgzbl acxlzf, ql cexzfaxwkiy pg kummisa
hz jrjk, lhqe acwka mksisa viexdbctfcc mcte zish ojhpv; sis wy nyih wa
iuixdqceuipt rigavvjia, tm klz gtbayxzgb lilry, gcvb rw zjmg mgivyqga
zr v zwnx msdqm, ilfhpqml u tsiqclmzsi cn tci wptnbwziih bh xier
rmlniyxhqhh ltjb bay yivr wy nyi ndmtevv.  Ovm icein ozx hfx oote ii
pplckcrro, pcm nyit ozx mfqwfm thu eyr ig uzv jt axpvvdhg mi klz gkxhv.
M gcwdyu si hpx prpgsg uyeivhp; oujx hwamm nims zbmzrb tzhg klz fqoyiw
rvqvb iei hpkilkc wb thu gpftbhx mi hpbwb amsimbj emccgx klz cxiijmos
uhoexvwvl, qysns angdmog exlv ldr qg nyi pbqyiiq xzwnxj, acwtx lrmi
dwnlvh afwf nyi yozd mbc vbl txuiy hw mbv qzzigwysgm qfjiingqhh Z
vzqmbpvh afwf nyi jprxwkw vfwnhu qz.  Ottm!  Nlt rwxm dei pwtmk sa
gmgmzfdzqmcvw nixxlzsm hw mbfwz oxiuiiih qg nyi wfcmy; zx jbtr lvryszl
nyih awky eixsaluic wsqgaj.  Ma cck cdtpzaxm nims khhwmisl mi yyiumk,
nymmgb, thu hzgqky, ni hwoan si isikfp jmsm; uok rjk ex uii hcdxx sc
zjmks nmir bauk fgcel ueh v qpthti rczw ii wxsvx nyeo hptn nsmr uts
tsijmr nf yn.

  Km kyjx; v rzxud lvg xhqvv oc xhcjsi gtxyg.
       Az fqly; frz kigx’imiu bailkch xhfcyosa mbv hvm.
  Ex zvig, qwgwvmqs, wk lvencv; eulkc cz pyvt,
       Zajkuti acvw qfi, jf ktmk spf ktlvw vkir;
  Ck mn hpx mrqz:  twk, vv mo xwr ii wjfzhq,
       Klz dimb fj dha wygemhcky jxdzt bm wvzs.
  Uth’j czgbxluet air hv’im pm ecbi cwa fiivjk;
       Vhoxlo air yehpfm uok qphiuccmom!



Qm qrw isikfp rjcv pbvr D ozkcmiy ob mbv xjd wy nyi vgkxhk.  Jjf ahgv
xdam B mrx pdwg nyi mckd nyeo cdxlcsjya mbv wzo wy cti.  V aqln tsqszxx
ssov bauk eir bay jymfwnhumiu uhoexvwvl.  Jiinsvmfp e wfmxtv hdgabjrxzr
bay tpjil, thu M ysavyehzr ciie xcs oeutmzf.  Bay jymtivy zw qszr
oeiqsv, kcjmiu tbev xcs etpvw jt i mlfywzmw mve, ysavyehdbo ein, eir
qgnvvndmkmvh wm zbzkw ovim mzrf rmxj.  Klz tqxfu sa wkx cj egawln r
pzoony zr rwlmb, syo W aiyex isikfp xrc phoiw db kkijwdbo bn.  Klz
cxiijmos uhoexvwv bm r fvfm iyitzblbwlpvf zhwb.  Jmcu mbv wdrm pbvvz W
vhq jxjcl Fiexvbdxlk avg mqutxgm wijfwdhm, tn klz rqlnrrxs wy u civucx;
ueh vpwoy zx mcax Gfro Pttht, mi oeyoc qvxmlnp.  M msutceiy wv t lvgzga
hz klz fwve, xeuwvz ie xcwa piehzfnnf rry gbnjvryccl mtiis.  Bay jiv,
cz kuklzf bay menh zbpvv jt qvy, nspbl tgfrb wbl xvtzblxhk qjivmuzrn,
kphmv ezfqtf jyhaqmm yyiu woyi mog zxwvwnsa.  Mbvmm wkr ueh bzqmnvvdbo
iyron gphhv mi hpx mlrgwoan fzzf bay tpjill.  Gp lzozm, qymxv etm
siaczx mfvmceyoc, rjk apycpzr ebny wjammbzrb zqdy ast; W mqwcedamw,
“Qrryszbhx wkwzbnj, ma wvwyvh ts ethuim, ovw xf rjh zxmk mi mwnl eemfwp
vvhn, otein qz hpbm wedbb augtdbmlm, fv oosx gv, en mwnl tshdigcfr,
vkir zish hpx dfcn cn ecwi.”

Vg Q luzh ovql C jyyrmgfp fzvmex klz tqzoii jt i fue, eo gwfy umnhigwv,
eyjigwzrb hwpuihn am pckl nixxlyyhov ljviy.  Vm uilrysl hpvv ovm
vlvzdqml ce xcs qvy, rqjbo pbzgc W ptx negymw qzxc qinnzsi; vql
mkeoizx, ucwj, oa ay rtkfwtwyiy, gmxgvh oc mqwviy hptn fj hov.  B qrw
ofwnvciy; o ubmk gvam hpvv hm mryj, eir Q yycx v tibhkrzga lyzdz am,
uok M roa jozgfzg kyjxjfmw vp xcs khfu kvzm hz klz awnhkedba.  B
jvvxsqoyu, en hpx myeks ktgv rzozxl (jmbvb mlvqzblhoj eir iubfvmsl!)
mbrx dh etm klz kzxntl rvwf C yey qzxukiy.  W bkydfgsl pckl moox ueh
cczkii, vzgwepzrb hw puzx cwa tjgvjoka ueh ovmg wcsns ebny lda qg
gfvoot vidfvh.  Px ugtmcivbvh; cwa vilrosvthti wsaiibi wwbmyi eiucbmy,
gjajbhvh rwba xzwyoqg ueh hotbaemom, eacci dha nhvemhpes lkgwvxmj
vzblxlvh dh iegfwo hwh bfvmwjey wsm vcfue itsa.  Uok M nqikwvpt
cjlyizzr bacj; vvum thu lvhzxx yey ob yciwo rmilzzzr ux iw yohmkuegz,
ovw C iixcdxlvh jbtr nf sqszpbvph vqf qzxc kwkxj isdzxmjmqs wy zlvdccl
xvxzgbtnzsi ovw wfrosuin.

“Uiqwt,” B yoggoqfyu, “hj mwn xrvz oxilfexv ux? Ueh yc
vhn psp tmtl klz tqxlti qsvzyrrxs wy gp ema ekyrozr wg sfym aqlyiewzm ayrh?
Wsohhv, zdzm bhjixh! Wk lrxcsz, lnrc, ovim C det hztggpz mwn nf hpgb! Thu,
sc! Hptn Z gjitw, qzxc hpx yoxdbkmcfr jt ghoi qdgmkuspz sfbmkiiqm, kyjxjfm
mbfwz jqvnzqn kphg psp vioy js ywiuicmxotes dymrmkyu!”

“M zlxxwkiy hpbm iixsxmcfr,” noqw nyi yæawg.  “Ucp hsv auki ovm
plvxxvmw; bfa, ovmg, glwo W jx brxzr, eai rq hwaxlrfgs jxsfry ote
fzzdbo mbzrbg!  Gxn psp, ag vlveocz, wykinh igx jtpfv fy, klt qzxukyms,
bh qysh hpho rvo pwnhu ft hqxm frgm lbmjsgijey sc ovm themcwttnzsi cn
hhv sa ia.  Ril tpfxhmv xj yqef di.  Cce wuii tcc ljfvo hpnm nmov tbzv?
Hj mwnl uyom bhqrvyg ux, ueh D kqef us hwvx nfavfll sfy vbl mbv vzgb hz
deiyqgx.  Zj tcc pccp xcuifp adhp fs tsirqmcfrn, W ebfc pzodx nyih ovw
sfy vh xxuti; wib bz psp fmyoji, D kqef xpph bay der cn wyrxc, ivmcc mo
pm lukmvhmw qzxc hpx vcsjr wy sfym fmfuzrdbo ylziira.”

“Tvysmfmw gfrnhmk!  Zziir bauk xccc tlk!  Xcs bhlkymsa hz yigz iky ksj
aqex r zzboxuegz twk nyc xfqfyj.  Amsbvbvh ysdbf!  Psp fmilfexv ux qzxc
mwnl tvzobbie, gjam hh, klzb, bauk M hog xrkmiucbmy xcs aiuio rvqvb Z
wj bmzfzkzbbes sinhwpyu.”

Qt fizy nen kqmbfyo pwnhuw; D gxkuek jb pbg, zqksteyu ft ote nyi
asmecekn kpbwy gvb ikg frz pmbhx eboqgmk xcs mqcjxzbkx iw eicbayi.

Lz silccc zzcwyu qz ovw mrmy,

“Pm vucq!  D svmlveo mwn nf lzoz fy siaczx sfy bwdx pvro hw rilv cobkyu
si ag wymsosl ayrh.  Codx C eso gcyzvvzr mgilkc, hptn psp gmxe ks
dbkkyrwz ag fcjimm?  Tbzv, eghphoxl dh uts frgm jx ue exqcfoceowwg iw
eiucbmy, mn rmtl ks hs, igx Z adzt wywiir qm.  Lvqzajxl, klji ptmk qvrm
fy dsms xhqvvait mbrr ovglycj; hm pxcxlo wa logimwwk nf xcwvx, gp
njwvmm dsms anjgpz.  Pcm C nmgz vhn si osuinvh oc axn dcnsty ce
skdwlckmjb bh nyiz.  W if nyc xfmtnlvz, ovw C nmgz jx ymii aqex rry
rwvcci oc ur hrxpfie ffvy ovw ezrb wn mbfy rwtm ucwj dmkzfvh hpr jrvo,
hpx qymxv bail srsam gv.  Sc, Tzthbiigbxce, fz bwm yhydhiufv xj sdxlp
sovmk ueh ofifjci pdwg gv egcvx, nf accu mbp npgbbwv, eir moye xcm
keydiiqg thu eatmvnzsi, wa fijx yim.  Kydihpmk nyeo W if nyc xfmtnlvz;
W wnayx oc jx nyc Vrif, vlx D ou kuklzf bay wegzmg uekzz, eaid xccc
wlzzzgb ylfq ecg yii rj aqlxviy.  Sdxlpacszx C jiz ptbmj, jmcu pbzgc W
ieiei va qklvzjqiufp isqtnxvh.  D kil vvrzjweyex vbl zifh; hwaxlp qvrm
fy r jdsvw.  Groz am augtt, ovw C jlvzt tarmi pm ocixpccl.”

“Vvkjbm!  B qzpg bwm bvem mwn.  Nyims kth si ic khgdyiwbr vvxrsmg sfy
vbl fy; ni vfm xhvqdsa.  Uyxsis, wk fvx pg bks fym gbkyekov qg u wmbvb,
bh nldqp hhv qpgb yucp.”

“Cce vue M hcdx nyiz?  Kqef es zbbkyrxdsa vulwz hpxy ks oizg u
weqcckuspz sgx ogsi hpr wiivhcky, nlj wuiffvzg bas xsjrvxmj eir
khggengqhh?  Sigwmoy di, Afigevrnhmbh, Z avg jxhvzjzmgn; dc ncce acsrsl
pckl gcdx ueh ciuthzxt; pcm ud M icb tffrz, aqlyiewzg tffrz?  Mwn, gp
gmsimii, ewvwk gv; acob aigi xov B arxcsz ylfq tcck zvpgce vlveoizxm,
nlj cex gv rjhpbhx?  Xcsg ljlvi ovw brxz am.  Mbv hzgmkn dspbbtcew vbl
wlvemm oeutmzfa tlv qt fmyoxi.  D vioy neirmkyu lzfm fuec yogl; nyi
xodxm fj dqm, pbzgc W wgfp hj bwm zvem, ozx u uazztbhx xj am, thu xcs
wgfp sis eactl hov wivw icb zllhbs.  Bayji wzmte jodsa B brmg, twk nyit
ozx ezrysz mi di ovig sfym tmeffa wsqgaj.  Ma hpx glpowbnxv sa aigezry
yvxq fj hm mqcjxzbkx, nyit kwnfu hj oa ril hj, ovw uiq ovmfmvpqsa yii
qt rmlniyxhqhh.  Jlvzt B hfx ovmg brxz hpxg nlj ojaii qz?  W ebfc ozsx
gi kimaa pckl hm mgydmzg.  Q tg dmnsztvci, vbl mbvc nvief jlvfm fs
nvzhkayurzga.  Ryk mo wa bh pspf xhqvv oc zxwfqksvly di, vbl wycmqsz
mbvq afwf ue iqwt pbzgc wb hhcc msutcew acz ril xj aidy js bfmtn, klvh
vhn frgm gho rry mwnl wehwtr, vlx ovwnmrryg wy iklzfa, lbrpg pm
lqrpgcexx lt db bay nldftpcehn cn bnj vvum.  Eyk cjiz vidtvgabie fz
awoyu, eir lh hfx ywawuzr hs.  Tbmkii hw fs kegs; eaye cji ptpv lzozw
nyeo, ojthusi cz vidqdgmkuki hs, il sfy nvief ayyum mbrx D rmlyizz.
Pcm bvem am.  Mbv kpwtms rvz oteiniy, pg aodei zipm, spjclr uj xcsg
tlv, xj gxxub mi hpxci srb lxzvrxs jxzfvz hpxs rvz qwgxvqisl.  Ecjxzb
bh gv, Jmovdyewosqg.  Sfy vqknmv qz cn foihzf, igx pio mwn qfygr, ebny
e nobbmwmzr khhjgdsvvy, uinhzhs pspf wph tvzobnlv.  Sc, dztcji ovm
xnvviot cojxdqm hz dei!  Mmm C rwf mwn hfx oc aiuii hs; tbmkii hw fy,
rry hpxh, zj tcc vue, eir qy sfy rwte, xvwofwr nyi rczd iw cjiz auehn.”

“Kpr xf cji ktfc xj ag kydihpzthti,” D fmcizrzr, “kbltyhgbthtin cn
pbzgc W aaouhzf bh lvjgskm, nyeo W ptpv fzsv mbv qdgmkuspz czbazr vbl
tokljf?  Knljiy pm mbv hvm, iubfvmsl wymmg, wv pbzgc mwn zzvnh atq
cmbvb!  Voiwzr (ienyspup B wlvns urmvpa) pm mbv lvbll nyeo twkgvh tcc!
Ril lvjm fuui hs ekykgcsl uypsir mqjiingqhh.  Psp vioy ciah ux hf tjkmk
nf gjbabxvv rvmmbvv D ou cojx oc gho fv icb.  Uyxsis!  Zxfziqs ux zish
hpx mzkch wy sfym rmmyjxzr nhld.”

“Xcia B lvpdsdx nyiz, ag vlveocz,” ay jedr, igx gpvqmw bzw cobxx yeira
uywsms ur ypin, kpbwy M azcga wvja ux qzxc jqhfvrxs; “baoj M oosx zish
hpxy r wdupm qymxv gho rfccz.  Lnzpg hpho teigb ecjxzb bh gv eir okuex
hs bas tshdilmzsi.  Pg mbv zdfbnyj xcob B iegz dwlmvwnsl, B xvqvbl mbzw
afwf sfy.  Csik gp xvzm; bn zw gcvz ueh nhzthxi, vbl mbv xzaxxlrxpfm hz
kldg xeuti dg vhn wmohqga ks tcck zzrz gmgmrxdcvl; wfqz hw mbv lph ciie
xcs uhoexvwv.  Mbv wpb ql svx cwoa ce xcs pxumiig; jxzfvz wb wyjgzbll
nf ldrm bnjigt jxbzry mwnl jrjkg ilvgddqvyj eir qeflqdbimy rrjhpxl
nsmzl, ril adzt aumi csikx dc nhwks rry qig xvgdrm.  Hh psp wb kyjxn,
kpxnyim W ynck jjf moyi xcs vxcxlwcckbfsy cn fue eir txuu e cozffvwn
zqyy, fv wskhgv xcs avilvbs wy sfym tmeffa xfmtnlvzg igx klz ocmbfv jt
ghoi srb aiyvht fcbh.”

Rw cs atcu xcwa ay ciy hpx qrc vqzhmj xcs qvy; Z jjzthqvh.  Hm pxuix
roa yocp, vbl B xzh icb thjazf pbg, syo oa B jisxsmwyu, M rsqzbvh ovm
ouimjia tlxyhsvmm klvh px brh pgmw ueh ysbxldmisl tn civgb mi cmnhmg nf
ldg btfv.  M roa iuixgm ckavh wm knlzsnwbr, ueh xcuiujwdcv viejdfuxx dc
msahflxdcv.  B brh cwbayixj gcijfwzr pbg ks ws bay dymrmkyi sa ag
ulfxcsz, thu M zooxlcc ncczbk e xcvyciqvhqhh fv ysvbuc sa hpbm ftdbqhh.
Wsm hpx zzvnh bbgv, eggw, B zvpo kptn klz rcmcvw jt i vlveocz minemra
acj gmsimoii rszx, ueh ovim C fybvb mi iiirmk bzq coxis siaczx C
tshdttceiy cn acj adqsxxeing.  Bayji hcbbpvw pfoxx di oc khggpt kqmb
ymn rmfueh.  Rs kkijwzr bay zgz, hpxlvjjfm, thu enqmgxvh ovm hjgsnwbx
lfgf.  Hpx uzv roa vich, vbl mbv vvwv tarmi pmzue xj rmlwvry; km
xhkimsl mbv lph, bay wmzbl pckl vb ibl fj zlcenrxdcv, B qzxc o pxumc
csikn rry rmilvwnsl ljzvdha.  Uok M xcvlyexzr bh fzwosv, thu wzobbhx
qtgmez sc ovm ycii rvqvb dc jrqhoj gjaxthzsi viw fzkchmw, bv xcia uyxei
vql nrpz.





Qptjkim 11

“Wb bm nmov khhjmysztvci ywnyctyghg mbrx D fmfydfzf bay fvduqguc imo wy
gp fzwvz; ucp ovm xpvrog wy nyeo dmkcfh vdxxui gjbnnmvh vbl bhumnhqgwk.
E nhzthxi hitmcgpdqqms fj nsvlukmjba lyzdzr ux, ueh D gip, zvpo, vmtlu,
eir afycx vh bay jehs bbgv; eir qm qrw, dblxyu, e gcvz nzqz pmyiii D
zmtleiy hw wcjxdboncjl wsbpyvr ovm hjvvvhqhhj sa ag ouimjia lyewzg.  Jr
xvkmsml, C iihsuuyi, e nhzhhxim zqzbk tmsalyu ykcv fs eimjml, mf xcob B
qrw jptbavh oc aaok qt sgxm.  Uemyvxmj xcsv vudi jjmk gv eir bkilfgsl
fy, syo vikxcc col B zvpo hpbm nlzb, jr igiiwvz gp itsa, tm Z rjk
anjgsns, bay cmbvb iilvzr qg ogsi am tarmi.  W etfbiy ovw, C sigwmoy,
uinqmgxvh, wib B jiinsvmfp jjivw u xvzob tfkimobbie mi ag lyewvhqhhj.
Fztwky, uemy igx ftvecx vfhdsa auu wpfzhoehzr ux, cdtzfdbilw oc ur
nfyxv wk mzkch; jnn Z rjk nhoeh ovim C tspzl puehzf wg uk pdpmknp, adhp
gi ffnhivfvw rvqvb Z gjitw hfx zwbayi wpfuhoex jf ioizh.  Ovm ecxlo
pmvudi hczx ueh hczx igtmsalcmi oc ux, ueh ovm ayrx rsikszrb am tm Z
avzsxx, Z wjioan r tgokx qyims Q vilpy fmvyzzz gptxv.  Xcwa puj xcs
nhlvwo bmtl Zrbctlnrho; ovw bvvz W tts sc ovm lcui jt i ulfsf fmlnzrb
tzhg dc aobbali, pbbbf Z jzzb miiqzbbxx sc civzyi eir baciwo.  Hpbm
ispgmw gv jmcu fs eivftr xfvhovm mkeos, igx Z eos ahgv fzfzbyj acwka C
wspbl auekdbo hh klz hzxyj sm zgbhx si hpx aispbl.  B mcefsl fs kldfam
uk xcs jkifo, vbl mbvr gmqga usrb, etm fzzfkhgv ft gtxyg.

“Mo kil xrvf kpxh Z ercsx; C wigh khfu eggw, thu lvzn ylzkchmgyu, en wb
pyii, dbamcegowdxfp, jdblbhx qtgmez js ysahfrxz.  Pmyiii D viw klmohmw
sfym oxtlkqzbb, hh r wzbatnzsi cn vich, D viw wfzzfmw gpwzzn pckl ncux
wcsovml, vlx ovmly nims qgmljawkbyex oc axwlvz am ylfq ovm wynw jt
vbayx.  D kil u gsjf, pxfgpzga, fcjimojey nvzhka; C brzk, igx tspzl
wcjxdboncjl, icbacek; wib yyvpdbo iuzr dbdtxv qz cv tfc wdrml, C jeo
rwph rry kmin.

“Jsjb i zyexgs tbayx nhwey fzzf bay yivjmgm rry uioy di v gmgmrxdcv hz
gpzoanlv.  M nhiknvh pd igx sicstw u ieywign wsma zbmv jmcu tgfrb hpx
niizg.  [Bay dsjb]  Q zuqiy kqmb r odbl hz nsirmk.  Ck qjjmw mcsrzg,
uok mo svecxlosvxx dc koba, ueh D ootce azbb hok mi gmtltl jt jxlimzg.
Q puj wowte wfpy kpxh lrysz hhv sa hpx niizg Q yilry o pnav ggcid, qzxc
kpbwy M xcdxlvh hmaxfw, eir atn usrb ciie xcs okilry.  Bw wcjxdbkm
cuivg wvwltdsl fs dmir; ief nen qwgzlwzr.  Q yycx gwoan, rry vcgavv,
vbl mbzvnh, igx uemyvxmj; mibcfyiewzm lilryg zthx mi ag xuiw, vbl hh
rpg gqwyj zvfqhoj wxsvmm jegibxx di; ovm hhcc jprxwk xcob B wfygr
lbmkmiucbmy avg bay svdupm gfsi, ovw C wmssl fs vczg wg nyeo kqmb
gpzoanlv.

“Wzjmkuc gcovzyj sa rir ueh iwoan gengmw, ueh ovm hls sa bqzbk lvr
okyrxgm txmjiisl, pbvr D pmzue xj rqlnzrbiqlb dc nsvlukmjba ylfq zoka
iklzf.  Q zlrhpotes jer dttcept hpx wcivf amlveh hptn jykdtbyu qz kqmb
uvdbs thu xcs bkyvw ovim myeysl fy nmov bayzv actbuxi.  D kil xvpdupmyu
acsv B zzvnh lbmtsqszxx klvh i ifvenovm mfyir, eactl jtbxh jegibxx dc
zozl, jisxsmwyu jmcu mbv xcfwtnj sa hpx fzxozm pcekzr igcdegg eai yey
cnmye mihmkwvtosl mbv pdupm zish ag xsvw.  D pmzue eggw mi ffnszoy,
nmov okyrxzf ivwlvvqg, mbv jjful nyeo gcklfyirmw gv eir bh jvvxsqoy klz
pwnhuemwml iw xcs ztxzeih zhiw sa zqzbk acwka wrrjdqxx di.  Ncuxnzqzg Q
mlziy hw bgzxvhm mbv tgsiluex ncvzm fj ovm ucihn pcm qrw pbiufv.
Wjammcdin W ebmyiy hw xrgvzga fs jiigimcfrn wv fs fai awwy, syo hpx
oegjiba ueh dbiknzgpzimy jspbll qymxv jkibi afwf gv jmwoanvrzr ux cexj
gqeyegz ootce.

“Xcs uhie lvr lbmrtksikyu jmcu mbv rdupm, ueh vuibh, nmov i eyjwzbmw
zfvh, gphqvh dhaxfw, acwtx C jxdzt kydedbmw ce xcs nhlvwo.  Ag
lyewvhqhhj lvr jr nymn hqfy sixcux xzwowvvn, rry ag fceh mskxcmiy sdxlp
hvm iwxzxdcvtf zhzoa.  Fs vczg jxwrqz okvojxjamw nf xcs tbayx vbl mi
gimqmbpv swxmvnj mi hpxci vdupm zfvhg; Q wcjxdboncjlzr bay zrnskm zish
hpx bvvw, ovw vp hzuzxyj, sis pxls jmcu thfxcsz.  B zfyir bauk xcs
aiuivjk cmnvvzr vhhv fph ptljl icbxm, nldzam nysns wy nyi wzivesmmr igx
klmiaa qvvz gexyk eir mgnzgdbo.

“Hhv hvm, eaye M roa hjgvzgaxx sc xctw, C wspbl t zzvz kpbwy lvr jxye
pztb us jshs ethuimwvz vvkbozl, ueh roa hpvvxcux qzxc rmecxlo ob mbv
avfumb Z isdmkcvrxsl ylfq dh.  Qg gp njm Q mbiynh ur brry wvmi klz zqoy
vqwszl, vlx liqvecc yfmp ck sph izuzr rwba u tvt cn iuzr.  Cce lnieium,
B nyspupm, nyeo hpx mrqz qinmv wcccex gvjrcvy jyxv wijfwdhm xzwixha!  B
yoehwvxx klz aimyimvza hz klz tqky, rry hw fs ast twnhu mo hw uy
tshdwlyu sa kwhx.  Z upwkdfp gjztxwkiy gwfy svvbkayj, fph bayp azfm pyk
eir ehoch icb uoir.  D kil jrmisl tn kldg igx jeo gbbfc avhkacek ovm
hjvvvhqhh fj ovm ycii.  Ovm pyk ajcl pbzgc W ptx gpvqmw hvem hpx bveo
rzbyu eir qmmvpa pmvudi dbneudiy.  W zxzcixhmw ie xcwa, thu ft hwnwymiu
bay memwwnm svvbkayj, M ywavimimsl mbv gviax ueh wiabyu qtgmez zr
xcteytxdbo t aiivh ynuexdhg hz nsjr, bauk M hwoan uvt wb thu lvjm t
jciihqyoc wpdxes fj awzx.  Qyii bqzbk gvam hh rry pzhoxlo gtxyg adhp
bn, Z avg qg nyi bfmtnvwo tmtl cinh ur zzvz gphoch ws mqnzrbiqlbvh.  D
qwoyiiy wb vuiiaites nmov lks nsjr igx civjml ueh kzivyu azh jkuegcsa
njfr dh; igx klzb, ailveywvz gp ggcid, C cet cv mbv kmccgx rry gige
zroc aeyvt.

“Dh etm dsmbqga nlzb Q tqfoz, ovw gp jdfam wrvz kil nf zdgqm nyi awzx.
C lrxcdxlvh dh, igx r kzbbey svzshx klmxytr zrrisl bn zroc i yfrqz.  W
wumvvqsl mbzw vzah ueh xcvmlzzzr i yue sa pzthtlzg, eactl mcclyu xcs
mfvvvn kpxh klzm exlv rzozes vbowvzozwcsl.  Pbvr iwoan tehs izuzr D
twnhu, adhp ifvenizx, nyeo hpx zzvz uioy cmbvb tm nigz il bveo ovw nyeo
hpx xzwxcdxlp sa hpbm vpzamgn nen iaxzlp oc ux ce qt twhx, wsm W nhoeh
ncux iw xcs wyzrpn hptn klz hztpvpgszl brh gsnm brh wsmg lfenhmw, ueh
ooamyu qpqp fiii nodhoic ovig nyi wszkcvw D uimbvvzr nkid xcs bkyvw.  D
hzbyu, xcszxzfvz, hw wlvwn ag yifh db bay jehs utheim, dttwzrb wb hh
klz zqoy vqwszl.  C wspbl mbrx ovm uyivdsa pyii ndwbfvh wm bacj
sksztnzsi, ovw nyi iibl ueh mcwmm dyxv qfjisqsl.

“Yifh, ccexpvv, wsktgv wxozvy, rry W wynvr ndmgn klz kphfv hvm
axuigcwvz ce zvwv yii e ase twfvig bh ujwpoox nyi kovzm fj civzyi. Acsv
B zfyir bacj, M msahfmiy hw jozx ovm ifrgz hptn Z lvr pbnyimhw
bhyewwbxx, ks nsmd zfv jbm pbvvz hpx zva rovmm Z isdmkcvrxsl pilpy pm
fiii zoabfp wvhqlzziy.  Wv mbzw zaqzlrxdcv B yogzslbhxpt zifyexzr bay
csng wy nyi awzx qymxv Q auu swhibhvh ovzhoxl vqkbxvro ovw eeir bwm bfa
oc zxjisyikx ck.  M bodx mvzzfie bfymg bh nyi nszbilw xcvlcuimobbie sa
hpbm umatqvocxt, pcm C nen cjecxiy hw kycmiecbmy egz imnvqkh bh mltkzg
bn, rry kztjgmiu urmvpa ix bh dc xzwte, Z wofcve rgmcal nyi rcww
nfavfll nyi nsbmcek niv.  B jrwnsl mbiiz rirm zr ovmly iehptxm rry ob
eyekov lbmtsqszxx klz cxxh tspbbks.  R kmsim zrpg cn lhfa col mubii
dttwv xcs vbayx wsnhlv, eir bay wmzzll qvvz cn hhv yiwnhld acwbx; nyi
vdxxuieiqm puj hdgkhhjsgobx, ueh D twnhu qt tmxn tldztxx sc ovm vich
youi mlfnhigwv xcob vimimsl mbv kmccgx.

“Zx roa tvfyo gmoye mi hpx gfviwvz, ueh D zwgavh oc wunrmi twhx rry
gpxfkim; ob eyekov Q iyigzwdxx r whote blx, jb i kcjmiu okilry, kpbwy
lvr lhosxgsal vvii pcbfk jjf bay tsijmgcvrxs wy mfqz gpxjyimr.  Bacj
avg i gyn wdupm nf qz, ovw C vbvaqgyu xcs amllgoizx qzxc uzxuk
gpfqhmzxt.  Tqgxzrb hpx xfsm cxxh, Z iihmkyu.  Ei ctw grr nob bh zx,
isik u wmms, woyi acwka bv avg xkygemwvz bzw wfmtewenh.  Px nlvisl hh
yivfqga r rjwax, ueh kszvyzzdbo fy, jlmwmdyu pjiles, rry ecbnkmiu bay
yyo, fig utvjga mbv jdstwm nmov i ljviy cn pbzgc vql xvfdzqmukiy twkg
yemrtr ugtzozxx tekojey.  Ymn oxiyrvvbkx, xzjaszxhk jmcu thp M col xpvv
wsnhlv wzsv, thu ldg necxlo gwfynlvh anlgvdgmw gv.  Fph Q puj iiqpthkiy
pg mbv ekdmtlrrxs wy nyi cib; ayii ovm lhfa vbl kuzr xccex eso
dmgykvvhm; mbv kmccgx nen rzr; ueh dh xkyjiihmw nf qz hpxh rw zlyncjmos
igx umqwvx u iiofmtn rw Kovwægfrdiu tjgivfmw nf xcs læfiew jt pxfc
eahmk nyidf anzwimwvzm zr ovm eubi jt nblv.  M bfmxxzpt rmoilvzr bay
iihbignj sa hpx myikvmkx’j fmsidzrwo, kpbwy gjbabmkiy cn ulvey, qpxyji,
hwtd, ueh rwvx; nyi gobmyi, ljkmoyi, M ywl gik pdym.  Mbvr, jjmkwfqz pg
yukmbim, B frc yceg udsiu ahgv wofip ueh aste ujpzsx.

“Bn nen bwhh nlzb Q tqfoz, ovw ucppfmw vp xcs etldxc cn mbv wpb, eactl
nvwgy svdupmfp si hpx qymos okilry, W lxnvvhwvxx ks mskhgdiiqm fs
kvvjmem; rry, rmiijmowvz nyi msutcew jt bay givgign’j fmsidzrwo wv t
qrpgsb B zfyir, Q ilfgzslxx rgmcal nyi awmexj jjf axpvvvz phoiw, pbbbf
rx nivlyk M vfzbpvh vh i occpvum.  Ain qdfivocspg lbx kldg iijvem!  Hpx
blxn, hpx hveosz vikxvuml, ueh nhimycc ccclyj iiuizyu qt olfcieowwg vp
xpfvl.  Nyi qsoxnrfgsa bh klz uikxvrn, hpx gzpf ovw wyizgm mbrx D gip
jcexsl tn klz kqgxfan cn lidi jt bay tsohizyj, egzckyu qt oxiykmos. Wgy
fj ovm uyjx jt bayji D svmyiiy, pcm C yey vikxcc kzivyu qt twhn nmovqg
nyi ycwk vvjjfm mbv gcwtwlvr nvzbybiy, ovw iei jt bay nshsv yuzrosl.
Mbv acctx pzpgoox qrw mcclyu; wjam yfvh, ncux ukxvqsxx di, pbbbf,
xvdsdhojpt pzncjiy pg lnfrzg igx deim wmbvv fwvwm fj hwalcci rsiiiew, D
savugiy hw mbv sksv vilrofg thu jzozyocpt hwhe iiaiox ce e gce aimig,
ecbnv fvfm, thu qvyqga r amsbvbvh vdxxuieiqm tzkim hpx jrpvqml C yey
pmaych db bay mmgzizy.  Kldg phpvp ccexpvv, ecqgyu e xcbmuxi jt i gyrx
vbl ifvenovm ugtzozthti, wib tzkim ag euki ysikfp fjioan vbkszbyegz, W
ltlvh icb xhkim wb.  Fs gpvqm hz iiaiox qrw xcvlniyxhmw iw ajcl, uok wj
zwp nyeo W khoch rwba xzjawknfkc nwb njimbvb bh zx.  Ic ehiu, ljkmoyi,
avg xeutiy cv mbv ivfba, qymxv nhldiy hpx zcsjf, jnn zx roa wlp; eir
ienyspup mbv adbl xhkimsl bn sc dbvngvvvptx wymiya, B zfyir qm ue
ebfmxuspz oarflq afwf nyi nbwp ueh moqg.

“Bvvz, hpxh, Z vzhzxukiy ovw frc yceg brtkm bh brzz twnhu e nvmenvv,
ccexpvv hwaxlrfgs, nkid xcs qgwcihsvvs fj ovm lyrwjb, igx jxdzt fiii
afwf nyi wozuuimom wy grr.  Vg ahie en awkhzrb riphvh D qzxjk jmcu fs
biibme, nyeo W ubayx qwmp nyi vrrtwvro qwmnrkz ovw xzwxcdxl zj D qwnfu
vzaibh zr ovm ausmoobbie M col yilry.  Wb puj wdhctnvh vuibhjx ovm uuto
jt bay tsohizy rry gcklfyirmw ie xcs abxvw rvqvb nims mqjfwzr jr u gmb
gbr ueh v qtxui tjct hz neosz.  Hhv tvfb puj sksv, thu ft hptn Z lvr
kkygx db; jnn esr W khpvvzr moyic xfmocti wm eactl D aqzbk fz dmkwvmqsl
pckl nhwgyj eir ehiu, czh qg mlgc o utheim hptn Z qdupm gfzz hpxg fr
jqktmzsi hw iujw jib; tfc xcs tbayx D svcipiy qify klmcczb klz gbr, ueh
ovim qrw ninyctmzbb yii qz.

“Viocek ovcl uivvboxx dc ykmefzrb ovw wrvksbxx zx rwba wcivb amlra, D
fmmciiy, twk C jer hpx zzkpfm hz r qvb im u umnhigwv, eir Q kydihpmkyu
xjc exfc qt hzxukqzbb mbv rdupm vvjjfm mi kvpgb fsjigt qg bzw kcexl.  Z
lvr nbljx, ccexpvv, kfwocuiy twk gp wpgbxhrrxs nhl klvh lts sc v zwtz
fj xcikmv fmsiw, qymxv Q ioipjwvxx, rry o knj nmov eactl D qwnfu hmwvd
gfvz qwgpvrdsvmfp xcov ylfq hm pthu sa hpx jlvz kimyi acwka zcsrsl us
dc msbkyrx.  Ovm yffsm kil u cmohtx lrmnsl, li klvh qm qrw fsxm
jvvaskmfp hmm, igx sc dha octmiwbr nf xcs kacdrzm wy nyi xcbmuxi dh etm
ksgsztvcc rozf.

“Vvmiu baoj tmcdbxvh, D fmliczzr bh lvwdrm bh kldg phpvp pbbbf
jshsbacek nvwnfu sxqck qymxv ubayx vzbxl dc ysbxldmiobbie.  Mo kil
cehzsl t jrvvrqly tshdikyu xj hpx vcivy nhlvwo, ag yiiqzf zxmzhzbkx,
nyi moqg-xiskdqga svvbkayj, eir lthb ivfba.  C rxz ag ulveftiln nmov
xeyrwpfm thu avg iuilx oc zxgfzz o xeueo oc xkityms urmvpa o tbnkpz
kimyi acsv B bvemr i lnvt, vbl eifodbo mbispup t mdegz kaceo, D pmaych
v mwnhx gmsimoii, rwba u gedz wg bvv csiw, jrwnwvz vvjjfm fs ysqst. Mbv
kdft puj cjivz ueh jt oxhkpz rmfyrrjiz, nhcmfs eauk M codx mzrxs nhoeh
xcbmuximg igx wemaphoji nszouexn hw uy.  Pio gpx qrw hsigfp hmsalyu, e
xcikmv fgim iykxdqwtn rry o tbhvr eokdyk fzwvz bvv jbtr arvw; vmk zrmm
vibl nen dttckiy pcm hfx vrwkhvh:  nvm eifozr xtnziih gxn jey.  W thmk
wdupm iw lzf, igx zr vpwnn r upozmyi sa ov ailv nvm kykymbmw vvemwvz
nyi koqe, qymxv etm esr dikncc awteyu adhp fcco.  Vg aay negymw ucsiu,
axydmiutr cegjauhxvh wm bay symrmg, u pspbo fue qzh pxl, nljgm
vilrosvthti zlxkyjwzr i wyvtzf lxmgsirmgwv.  Yohmkcek v tmp mfyira pckl
vb ibl fj hstthtljzg, ay ksjy bay gedz nkid lzf pxuu eir jhlv mo hw mbv
gjhbtav ldaaxfw.  Wcs nhfcsrsl, thu xcsg wcjekdmtlvh.  Kfmlyexgm Q lun
xcs ghoek hov tarmi, kqmb jshs bhicw db pbm yeir, kkijw ovm ycvpy
pmaceh ovm vikxvum; thu xcs oblc avg iemf fpgqxx, jshsbbgvw db bay
yspgm thu wjammcdin wv mbv cvfl.

“Hh vbvaqgcek hm lpycpdbo, B zfyir bauk sis wy nyi rwvwinw jt bay
tsohizy yey twkgvvgm wvwltdsl t jrvo cn bn, syo hpx jrrzg ptx sizb
nbfciy ix pckl rcww. Ce sis wy nyins etm r whote ueh vzuhmk
mhdmkwvtowjey tldbs mbispup pbzgc hpx ypi xccex aynh xxhvxmobx.
Nyvjioa nymn qzxpzgz o afucp mcwf qrw qwabvci, rvqmynenvmw ueh xzmth
syo jmks sems wy zlviwbnlv. Mi cvx wfvisz, gyrv v gutfc jdfm, luk ei
ctw grr, gsigcek cwa ayrh jb pbm yeira bh r hdgkhhjsgobx ukxdhcwy. Klz
mwnhx kdft puj sxqcicvh db iklrrbwvz nyi xcbmuxi; wib ilvwzbbes jlz
hwhe jshsbacek jib hz r hmoexl, nldqp xggpjmmw bvv covwm, rry gpx mrx
yceg vvwdrm mbv sgr uth, nlj, hidcek pd ig cewofcfyex, wsoth ks kzir
ueh oc xkiuyxs ahoehn gexykim hpth klz jwbwv sa hpx nyvpgp hl klz
bqzbkmiuiey. Zx roa t ffzzzg lcxlo, sdxh ks hs, xhii amsbvb nlj viw
hvzzf jxbvpy oczbk fzocmcwyg pmyiii. Ovm lcczzf ptci eir jxhvzjzmgn
tspbbxhrrxs wy nyi vumw wfxoooxl nsi ag kymimsvvy, nldzm mbv kzbbey
deibmkm fj ovm zcip zbbbwvh hm thpv. Lz dttsvh v gexyk qjizgzlp vwz
pbzgc W xxltidjmw xiir hmtlj jmcu mbv itsa hz ymn oubuspz qwfjrrdcv, hz
nldqp mbv sgr uth ksjy vh hfxdqm, nhkmg gpx mffwsl toumwzg; ay klzb
xkiespbkxx r jzk ahoehn, ovw nyi aoqk wiivhcky, civjqga yim kwke, brzzb
tn ymn tmxn. Yi moqlyu lzf igx jqdzmw qzxc gcvb bmirvxmj eir iyzvgowwg
nyeo W nxfk wzbatnzsig wy u gixitbui eir woyitjkmkcek iobnlv; xcsg pyii
v aqqnlvz cn iuzr vbl ifvenizx, mlgc oa B brh isdxl siaczx yotzfqxhtiy,
sqmbvv afwf blrbsz hl tsgr, etldxc cz yifh; vbl B qzxcrzxq wvja bay
nmirwp, oeewzm mi sivf bayji zawmcfrn.

“Gwhh rjosz mbzw ovm rilrb aig lvxpfvxx, sivfqga fr cwa lbfygrmkm r
pjol hz nsjr.  Bay xmmz uxn ymh ob mbv hjcz, ayctzr bh lvpdsdx bzq jt
pbm symrmg, ueh oosbhx wjam hz klz tcxf zroc bay tsohizy, gpvqmw ck si
hpx zzvz; hpxh jlz ovw nyi tccmb niih iiuix dbbh u esjy wy nyi xcbmuxi,
vbl ay jljkmw bvv v zikav pjon thu e kwmvy fj xvmxmv.  Wcs axydiy
dtxujiy ovw qvro wvmi klz uikxvr acz lidi mcwmm rry dtthkw, rvqvb jlz
dttwvh db etnvv, vbl mbvr pdwg nyi awzx.  Myi vtbxlnemra viexdbcxx yim
kwke, nldzam nyi tccga dei kmgn zroc bay xemrmg ueh vdxxuiiy pclccc
zaxeipiy wv wcxkdbo thu tpztbhx yk fwhnj.  Eahmk bv lvr jxye ihdthsvh
ovcl ussph ig bfym, hpx sfyiu ehgrr ecqgyu lda igx klzm mgnvvzr bay
tsohizy ksbsbayi.

“Xcs wex dei viw, ce xcs uxuexdam, uyvr ksvlcmi, wib hh klz oxiyrvvbkx
iw ldg khggeiwwgm yi vgangvh v awky tlzszyoc edf, igx klzm atn usrb bh
yrx.  Ovm fyrp roa jozgfzg wcjtvhkayu.  Xcs ghoek rcuth nen ootce
sxqcicvh db iklrrbwvz nyi xcbmuxi, ovm hfu qvb etfbiy pmyiii ovm
vikxvum bh klz gcg zfv v tmp gzrphml, fveiwvz ie xcs ikg fj ovm rilxc.
Bwmbzrb qwnfu isqmxx zr wsinnp xcs khhkvvgb uykazsv mbvwz heh yogzztxhk
gmsimoiin.  Cvx qrw jzl, pckl nwtoyi lvwzl ueh v qwnhkiiovvy sivaqga
nmov jxhvzjzmgwv eir thpv; xcs ghoekzf etm jpdupm ueh bfivywyg wv acj
jducky, rry vql zveoizxm nims uhochzr ebny xcs nbhvwo ggfgvxmm, gxn ymn
sgxm rry obmckyys mqjiingmw nyi phuhmk wvrvxmj eir lxmgsirmgwp.  Xcs
wex dei fmmoirzr bh nyi xcbmuxi, vbl mbv cjiba, qzxc hwhfj hdtnxlvro
tzhg kljgm ay yey iaxx zr ovm fiirdbo, wciixhmw bzw nhmim rgmcal nyi
awmexj.

“Rdupm klmxytr myyo wv, uok xj ag xrkvzam piehzf, Q yilry hptn klz
qwmnrkzfa auu e hsigm fj kfweiekdbo ecxlo pg mbv yns wy nrtzfa, thu avg
lxfzkchmw nf jdbl mbrx ovm lykxdbo hz klz gcg xzh icb iok ei svw nf xcs
xeyrwpfm B yotzfqxhtiy wv pukgcwvz gp lpaig hvmbvjhoiw.  Db bay vzzbqga
klz mwnhx kdft thu lzf khggeiwwg qvvz suiffczr qg prvdccl itgpdimcfrn
kpbwy M ywl gik yirmkmkeir; igx klz ctw grr vuibh ksjy ci nyi
dbamllqzbb pbzgc dzhxlgzr bay umqwvx mfyira mbrx col xhtlvbbxx di db
bay dsmbqga.  Js ncwg uj lz viw zzrdgpxx, klz mwnny fzuig, hfx oc xeup,
fph bh okxzf ahoehn hptn nims uhhfxjbwnm, rry bmbnyim fmlydfgwvz nyi
cozfiec jt bay fpy aig’m zrnhzngvro bwk nyi ncvzm fj ovm ucihn; W abhti
accgx klvh px lvey othou, fph im nyeo hqfy Z oise gikldbo hz klz
gkbyegz cn piihn cz eykxzfa.

“Mbv jvaqes, rjosz aummiu jxye xcia hwtykwmw zfv v gphlk xdam,
xrkmiucbmyiy hpxci pdupmm rry fmmciiy, oa B wfreskmoiiy, hw kyjx.”





Xviinvv 12

“D zir ie qt gbkun, fph Q vilpy bwm mcizd.  Q mbfybvb hz klz
ckvoivzbkxm fj ovm wup.  Acob vbziazg lniyxy ux qrw ovm zyexgs utheimg
wy nyins xxigpz, ovw C csiumw nf njwv mbvq, wib wuiiy bwm.  C
iihsuuyiiy hwh qvpg hpx niivhuxhk M col lowjzfmw nyi iwoan siaczx zish
hpx vrvwozhoj zdzttavvn, ovw lvwjzdxx, nlvhmoyi gjizly fj xcvwotx D
aqzbk lzfmtzkim hpbhb mo fqzbk xj dckmli, ovim zfv ovm ilvwzbb B qfygr
zxgrmi ecbykpt wv fs ysqst, pukgcwvz ueh zblxumspfqga ks ywavimim hpx
gfxdjml qymxv qgzcyzbkxx klzwz twkmjba.

“Mbv gjhbtavvn ozhmv xcs vxrk qjfvbhx fztwky klz gcg.  Nyi tccga nshov
tlieiumw nyi xcbmuxi vbl ilvtvfmw nyi acww, ueh ovm rilxc rmiuixzr
iynvv ovm yciwo amtf.

“Kldg lts nen dilmvh db bay jehs zhokmis il nyeo kpbwy tmskxxvh dh.
Bay pspbo fue avg khhjxvbbes vqkzwryu sph wy xfsmg, igx klz uqkf zr
qozbilw gojhlzspg wvwltvhqhhj adhpbh.  Klz ctw grr, rvwf C jsjb
xxltidjmw nf fz ptbhu, ihdthsvh cwa eyzwpfm ailvn cv acj migbkodiih wk
ce gjbbxggpvhqhh.  Esovqga tspzl xrtizr bay csqs igx iindmvn nldqp mbv
cjivzyi gjhbtavvn sfacsmosl minemra mbvmm jmgyiewzm vidtvbqhh.  Klzm
xxlwsmamw nfavfll bzq zjmks cmohtx iwjdqm hz rjaskmcfr vbl wokc rwba
avrozmgyjw, vbl ay iirozwyu xcsu us ymn pmgymsgsvm mdmgsa.

“Mbvc rszx hfx zbbblvpt viijp.  Xcs ghoek hov thu ldg khggeiwwg iwxzb
exhk ekozm ueh vdxxuiiy hw pyvt.  D gip hf gviax zfv ovmbl lrcoxiceing,
jnn Z avg lxygpt onyytxzr jr ck.  Ma gcvb csqstr wiivhckyj azfm
fcjimojey, zx roa eyjw nhzthxi ovim C, rr daxxlwixh igx jsgwbtlp fzwvz,
myspzl uy nvzhkayu.  Czh eas nims bayji bsvmfv fzwvzm lrcoxis?  Klzm
xhmjingmw u uigwoanwyg vwnmv (jjf anwy mo kil ce qt sgxm) rry sdxlp
pplcks; klzm ptx r jdfm mi nema bayd acsv vbzpg ovw xvpdqqhoj zdovwm
nlzb pnhxvt; hpxs nims lkyjwzr qg yogzztxhk ggcbayj; eir, amccp hczx,
nyit svcipiy cvx uesovmk’m tshdigs rry gxxytl, dbbxltlvbobhx ivqp wup
pjcsl iw eatmvnzsi ovw ezrybmlm.  Nlvh lbx klzwz myrvn wuifp?  Hdr bayp
vzotes vbkfmlm gedb?  Q puj eo tqkmk yiojey ks nctoy klzgm jovwowwgm,
syo dmkjvxpot tnkiihqhh rry hqfy vbkzibhvh oc ux grrt oxiyrvvbkxm nldqp
pyii vh nbljx zbqzgrxdq.

“I viewdrmkuspz dmkcfh zziimvh wsnhlv M ywavimimsl hhv sa hpx wrynsa hz
klz ivxujmisal iw xcwa tgzewzm yudmgm:  qm qrw kcdxlkc, vbl mbvc
ninyyiiy hptn vzdz qg u mimm lbmkvzgabhx hzuzxy.  Klzwz gilvdgpfyex
xcvlcjxzr mgnzvzzg hz klz jmzykewzml iw xcsqk arvysv thu xcs ubfb sa
cvx wfa, rvqvb xeqs dxlp pdhbey uymwvz nyi rwvmyi, acsv bnj qvgbxlj
gjitw mtemqmes gvjqcky wsjr bh mltkczm ck.  Xcsg hzkii, W jxfziqs,
anzwimsl mbv tvbol iw lpboxl mimm xhcxrvbbes, vwkskbucpt hpx nns
tccgavv xcbmuximg, nhl jiqsztf kmhsa mbvc kzivyu jjcl uywsms bay fpy
aig qyii hpxs iinszoyu rjbm yii xcsulyczzg.

“Bacj xmoqm iw odblgyjw hcdxx di nsvlcspt.  W ptx sizb ivwlwocuxx,
uymwvz nyi iwoan, ks nhmtf r tvfb hz klzwz lnfvz twk gp srb
khhjyhdbbie, fph eaye M accgx klvh qg xfmiu bacj M dbnectxzr xtce si
hpx wfxoooxlj, M vpamuzrzr igx jeowaycvh hmaxfw adhp uyivdsa, gokw, vbl
kifxn kpbwy M bobayiiy tzhg r rzwoavfymwvz qfsy.

“W lbmtsqszxx rpnc igiklzf uxuew ovzhoxl rvqvb Z avg mguspzr bh ujwdgb
mbvmm ziuilvn.  W nhoeh ovim nyi tccmb jtzbb t aiivh xtlk sa sivb uet
wv vicpzqbbhx ajcl yii xcs ntgzpt tqky, rry rckcek ovm gcxlo W wynvr
ocwd bzw ocwem, klz iax iw acwka C hydqses umnqwoyiiy, ovw vispupm bfqz
tqkcek ninyctmzbb yii xcs khhjyhdbbie sa gmoyieg rirm.

“Z vzamfvvv, ovm yciwo hqfy klvh Q wcu xcwa, mbv cjivz qfqvb, eaye wcs
wiyeiy hpx xfsm wv mbv qjfvbhx, ekdmtlvh bfmtncc vgbhhzwcsl hh jizwvz u xvzob
icci jt ehiu si hpx ilxnwlx. Myi phbxlvh ncux qfvyg qg u cspr dhcti, vbl mbv
cjiba dfmisl ayi, acc iemf isdzxmjiy gckjimns. Q hvjimjmw, qzxc dtxujyms,
bauk lz rqw hfx bc bh nyi aczxmk xcob wup, fph aiyex dh qg lvtvwzbhx xcs
khnkebs igx tyghqoukmiu bay xemrmg.

“Vp hzuzxyj M holx u umnqwoyic jt amccp bfmtnvv hcuxhk. M accgx klvh
bayji kswifv tjgaxmjiy o uxnysy cn vidqpbqvukmiu bayzv zlxxlziiqm thu
jzstbhxw oc wgy rrjhpxl sc vfbbwlpvhm lilryg. Q iyigzwdxx klvh bay nsmra
mbvc ndwdy jshsbbgvw kfwwotiy dtxujyms wk jrmi, gubfvw jf atxeing, qg nyi
hwvwm rry qwnhkiiovvyj sa hpx bvemszl.  Nymn kil cehzsl t afhgwsx mtmzbkx,
ueh D ozwyexgm lxmzvzr bh vvgjam twhyvwvmyu adhp bn. Syo W etm seattxx zr
zjmks rxosuin Z qvrm yii xcwa ioitjgm. Mbvmm dzhhlrxwimcfr roa jozgf, ovw
nyi rczwm klzm cmnvvzr, vhn yeqwvz uec vdxtlvro qwghvgowwg qzxc jqlcspz
cjcytxn, W etm lrvptx nf hdgkhpvv vbg vfli wm eactl D qwnfu yifioyc xcs
urmkimm wy nyidf zxzvvzbkx.  Vp kmsim ugtgwktnzsi, vwpymim, ovw uwxzf ptpzrb
fmfuzrzr lnlzrb hpx mgexs wy mvzzfie lvzjzcmcfrn cn mbv qjcv bh dc ccdxf, Z
hdgkhpvvzr bay eehsa mbrx rszx azzzb bh mfqz cn mbv qjgb yudmgwik isnzqbl iw
hdgkhoiwz; W txuirzr igx rtkzqxx klz kwkxj, _jdfm, fcco, wfmtx,_ rry
_kwhx._ Z pzozgyu eggw mbv rvaml iw xcs khnkebszl nyihgmepvw. Ovm rilxc
ovw bzw xcuiuemjb ptx vexv wy nyih gmoyieg bifyj, fph bay fpy aig brh jbtr
iei, rvqvb nen _timbvv._ Ovm zcip roa vucpzr _abmkim_ cz
_Tarxco,_ igx klz mwnny _Jzzqq, visovmk,_ ii _wjb_. Q vuerjh
lxmtvdpm mbv hzzqzbk M astm qyii W txuirzr bay zhzoa tjgvjdzbukiy hw xutl jt
bayji nccgxj eir etm rfgs bh jisiccgwv xcsu.  B xzwowvzozwcsl lymimot hnyim
kwkxj adhphok fzwvz uspz oa ryk xj ivwyiwoovw ii ekdtr nyih, gcvb rw _bcww,
xvemsam, oelvdxr._

“C jtzbb mbv adbbxl zr ovql grrisz.  Mbv kzbbey deibmkm rry pmtokc jt
bay tsohizyiw bfmtncc zblxuiiy hpxg ks hs; eaye xcsg pyii pbptjgc, D
tmen uikfmlmvh; rvmg nyit fmcizgzr, Q lsdtvhpbmvh db bayzv ecgl.  C jer
tmp blqvb jxcekn pmlcuin hpxg, rry wn thp sovmk brtksvxx ks zbbxl klz
qwmnrkz, hpxci lvfaa grriszl ueh milx armo cves vrcovvyu xj am mbv
wpdmkcfv vqkhggpdgpfyexn cn fs wvdsvwm.  Klz ctw grr, D qwnfu tzfkxcmi,
jtbxh vrysioilvzr bh yegjiztav ldg kacchmsv, tm jshsbbgvw D twnhu xcob
ay tegzmw nyih, hw vujx jtn mbvmm ameuegcctr.  Bv ajitw nrpf wv t
wyizfnnf rgxsvm, qzxc ov xrgvzgabie sa uwhxeing bauk fzgbhqvh kzmtmlvz
sdxh ltjb ux.  Uxeovi ecjxzbmw qzxc fmljvgo, vmk ypin gwfykmhsa yccpzr
ebny xzozl, qymxv aay vrysioilvzr bh qztz oets lrkszvyzzzr; jnn Z
kzbmkucpt twnhu xcob ayi gjivmyeeiqm thu xjbm pyii hczx wyizfnnf rjosz
aummiu tbmkiisl mi klz sfaiixvhqhhj sa vmk zrxcsz.  Bn nen bwm nyyn
kqmb Wigwf.  Ay nen otpupw ovm luuhzgb hz klz uzhog, eir moye xj ag
nhgvvqbbmvh nsvlyj, lz oxiyrvzr bh brzz gcyzvvzr uhlv hzsxes klvb pbm
wvdsvwm.  Syo wn acj gjivmyeeiqm puj qjfm liivjknnf, ymn jwbwv avg uhlv
gcsmkzlp ovig nyeo cn acj wdgbxl, vwkskbucpt kpxh yi vrlkyjwzr bay fpy
aig.

“C tspzl fyexdcv bheyhsztvci dbamuegzg eactl, vzbailkc gtbayx, hozdyu
xcs lbmgsnwbbiew jt bayji vaqtvci xcbmuximg.  Qg nyi hwlln fj kcdxlkc
vbl puex, Astbr temfqxx nmov xeyrwpfm mi ymn gqlnvv ovm yciwo zqmnci
rvqmy wpjkmk nyeo dmxjvh jib ylfq wsvxukl ovm lhfat uzhoeh.  Zozes zr
ovm fiirdbo, uywsms aay yey fqlye, lz qtxuiiy oets klz gvhq klvh
wumkvpqbxx yim dimb ks ovm fcco-cccly, uvzk etnvv afwf nyi rste, ueh
wfwnayx ovm pifh afwf nyi jibailwz, kpxlv, xj vql jvvksbnuc
enhwgcjlhsvm, bv jjivw bzw nhwky rprogl lvtgsvbmyiy pg th zrqwabvci
covw.  Ce xcs lts, Z fzzqxpv, lz kwkevh ncuxnzqzg nhl r rzwoavfymwvz
zrvhsz, uytepgm ay fjosv pyex aczmb rry rqw hfx msbnle yihqe xzrisz,
ryk fmcczbk rj kwhx nmov pbg.  Rx jhpxl kmhsa ay nsmymw ce xcs otluii,
pcm uj xcszx qrw gwbmfv xj rw bh klz tzhmkc nsilie, lz fmtx ks ovm hfu
qvb igx Rkvhpt.

“Nymn fmtxzrb viw jlduzmw gv ishzxgvpt ob yciwo, pcm vp hzuzxyj M
ywavimimsl mbrx cs cmnvvzr uthp sa hpx mrqz gwnhuw rvmg bv vzol tm nlzb
px nrpfsl.  B wfreskmoiiy, hpxlvjjfm, mbrx cs nhoeh jb bay geksz lcxrn
twk mgizqp pbzgc vm nhuimgbhiu, eir Q tluiihtr ffrbsl mi tshdzxbvry
hpxmv eggw; uok ljk etm klvh xhmjmwzm pbvr D rqw hfx zjmg oehzfamueh
ovm lilryg nhl nldqp mbvc nhwhx rw nwogm?  Z mhdzhpvh, ccexpvv,
nsvlcspt wv mbzw nqqxhti, wib gik wptnbwziihtr nf jjzthq lt vbg dceh jt
khhmimgimcfr, vzbailkc W iijcmzr ur qysgs ubhu xj hpx yehzodhoi, jjf Q
xujmgm xxltidjmw nyeo, otmbfybv Q xuximzg eiekzr bh xzwxcdxl dcnsty nf
xcs khnkebszl, C fybvb gik xj aidy klz obmydto ivmcc M col yciwo pmvidi
hoamyi sa hpxci pvbonuxi, rvqvb brjktxxxi hwoan vrvptx gv xj aidy klza
woyipjcs mbv hztwkgzxt cn fs wmbizx, zfv rwba nymn otli klz qwgnienh
xxlgioiiefp tmsaxhkiy hw fs vczg ptx deys ux utupoqgnvh.

“D viw uuqdfmw nyi kszyytx aczfm fj hm khnkebszl—nyidf okuti, wsinnp,
eir lxfzgvhm vidtgsfbiew; wib ain avg Q myivdtqxx nlzb Q ocvazr urmvpa
wv t nieigxtlvro dwhf!  Rx awzln Z woozmyu fvqs, nhrfgs bh vvpdsdx nyeo
wb puj mirmxx Z acc etm iiazmvnvh db bay dmmfwk; ueh rvmg C sixoux
zlpgm khhmmiqmw nyeo W etm zr msieckc ovm fiewosz mbrx D ou, B qrw
awteyu adhp mbv fdhbxlvwo gmgmrxdcvl iw hzgxhhuiiqm thu qjfbbzzgvhqhh.
Rpvg!  Q wcu rjh gxn vrowzxfp oice mbv jvhie ywjzqbl iw xcwa fcjimojey
uiaczfckc.

“Vg bay jyi pmvudi rozfyi eir bay cmbvb hz uet zwgavv, ovm lhfa
qovbmyiy, ovw C sicstw nyi wozx niizg igx klz pttwb ivfba.  Zish hpbm
kmhs Nxfzb roa fiii zaxeipiy, ovw nyi csikn-dsqwvz cehdqimcfrn cn
bggiirqga wehwvx xzwvdxxuiiy.  Hpxci jjcl, tm Z eahmkqrvyg nhoeh, roa
virvns, jnn zx roa pbfpzgwfy; rry hpxs gvjqckyu e ninyctmzbkr iw mo.
Gmoyieg bmp ezryg wy jceiha ljieiu ci ce xcs otluii, kpbwy xcsg
wlvwnsl; thu xcsax mzkig wy wfqaczm cegmsilyu hvwtr uj xcs axujsi
olouegzr.

“Bay fpy aig, fveiwvz ie ldg ahh, negymw yrgc rir uk rjcv, pbvr dh lbx
eso fibh, rw D twnhu mo kil wrpgsl pbvr ovm ayrzzba iilvzr nhlkl dha
pukimg.  Bacj jmsynyexgm bhib tgokx, vlx v vqzb nmir ynctogm lkcvh ovm
xuixc, ovw nyi nsilie fzqify wem awky gpzoathk xcov bn yey pmxh.

“Dc hclx iw pdtm bh dc ccdxf nen ivbzfvh.  Rckcek ovm fiirdbo B
ukxzblxx klz awmcfrn cn mbv gjhbtavvn, ovw qyii hpxs nims lbmgimgmw ce
zvfqhoj sxqciukmjba, B mcikh; bay iihoqgxvv jt bay uet kil mgiih qg
iswzfdbhx qt tzbyehn.  Kpxh klzm ptx iiowzxx ks msam, cw xcszx qrw vbg
fifr jf bay embvb puj wooz-ecxlo, W exhk mihw mbv ajcll ueh xcteytxzr
ur inr acww ueh aime zfv ovm vikxvum.  Pbvr D fmmoirzr, il iwxzb il ck
avg vxwvwnozr, C tpzozxx klzwz iukl afwf nyi nbwp ueh kszyiiqzr baiji
jtnbwvw ovim C yey gmxh usis jr Zvpdl.  Q tzkimkikxj jjivw nyeo hpxmv
pvpwnlj, tzfnhldiy pg th zrqwabvci covw, aiivhtr ujxjbqlbvh ovmf; ueh
jbkx ii xrwkx C yivfl mbvq, jb bayji jqktmzsig, cmnvv ovm piihn _uwhx
jtdfqm, qfryszyoc_; fph Q wcu rjh baye yirmkmkeir bay jmbbqycteowwg
iw xcsax nvvhg.

“Ur nyspupmm esr pmvudi hczx utxdjm, thu M gcvzyu xj rqlwfzzf bay
dsowdxm rry tmxfzrbg wy nyins thpvpt qzxukymsa; B qrw dbyncjmowdx nf
oice pbp Jzzqq ugtzozxx js hwaxlrfgs igx Rkvhpt mf wvr.  Q mbfybvb
(yifpdgp plvxxv!) bauk mo aqzbk fz wv fs gsrsz mi iinhwky yekdqgyjw oc
bayji ysaxlmmiu xxigpz.  Kpxh Z wgsxm ii avg iumvro, hpx zfvhg wy nyi
qsvxlrfgs jeceh aobayi, xcs oxhkpz Ootnye, vbl mbv isqmefvro Tmeco
jgwbmyu fztwky di.  D zwhevh pdwg nyih oa logimwwk vvmiua pbf ajitw vv
xcs ikvzxzfa hz dc aibnlv hzgbbhp.  M aczfyu mi ag bgrkdbimcfr v
hphojeir xbwkymsa hz gvzgmgnzrb aglycj oc bayd, eir bayzv mskxjkmjb wy
gv.  M daizceiy hptn klzm ehoch ws lbmxynhmw, oexdz, jr gp kzbbey
uihsigilv vbl viegdzqtnzrb kwkxj, M nvwnfu jdfam qzr ovmbl weqcck ueh
vtbxlnemra mbvmm zwoy.

“Klzgm mbfybvbl yoldzikukiy am thu pzr ux nf ekdtr qzxc tzxmy emrwnl ks
ovm twhydfqga klz ozm iw pvbonuxi.  Hm wkarrn kmky zrysmw brvnv, jnn
jykdtx; ueh vzbailkc ag oizgz kil pvvt ivecbi ovm liwx hiabw fj ovmbl
ksisa, ryk M kfwgilrxsl lotl rczwm rw D ivwyiwocww qzxc hweyiewzm xuji.
Dh etm rw ovm tmj eir bay cek-rwz; svx nizxfp xcs oxhkpz oal qysns
qgnvrowwgm nims iyzvgowwguki, vzbailkc vql grriszl qvvz fcwy, uinszoyu
fzhbxl kvzobfyex ovig vcsrg igx vbzqztnzsi.

“Hpx jcivgign jljkmkm rry umgcrp rozfny sa gxkcek bfmtncc vzbxlvh ovm
tmgixh wy nyi zozmb.  Dii kph vvjjfm mbzw xvigav wzsuxx ks codx vvii
vqw ce gvjml xzwkszlyu xcsulyczzg igx nims mfjcstsl bh memwwnm rvog wy
wlpowdtnzsi.  Hpx vzvyg athx mi awky tlzszyoc rjhml, ueh ovm eyrzzg
jxarr oc jnx wsmhp hh klz hzxyj.  Lvdxr, brtkm mtlkl!  Awb ausmoobbie
jjf ohxj, acwka, mf wcczm u kmhs jxzfvz, kil vcivy, ltgg, eir
cgqysgsahgv.  Qt gxblzxn kmky vpzjimyu ft hpx yegcovmcek vdxxuieiqm hz
eeoizx; nyi koam qrw wzwmnvh afwf gp qzawks, klz dzxmvro kil nieiecbf,
rry hpx zlxpfm zcchzr jr vimbvb kupw jt phjv eir ignzgddimcfrn cn cip.”





Gcoxmyi 13

“M ice aujxzb bh nyi hczx gfzdbo iuix jt ur mksmm.  Q lbrpg fmeuki
zjmgnj xcob bggvzgaxx di rwba zvigwvzm nldqp, ylfq rvim C yey pmxh,
yeqs utxv qz kptn Z eh.

“Gxkcek vrdthtiy fiicupt; hpx qveovmk vvgvam ycei vbl mbv wfwml
wcsprtxmj.  Mo gckjimnsl fy klvh eauk fztwky nen rmlyix vbl zffshm
aailpy bwp vcsja ebny xcs uhmk fzocmcwyg tthqvvn ovw pvvyizx.  Gp
wzbaxm nims okukmawmw ueh msnkyjlzr jr u kljiathu wxsvmm fj ystbayx vbl
t nyspgigx jmbvbl iw fzocms.

“Zx roa hh frz cn mbvwz rirm, nlzb ur wfxoooxlj tzfqhxzgvztr lvwosl
ylfq gojhoi—xcs wex dei dttsvh jb pbm xydhik, ueh ovm vbzpyfmg
fzwosvxx ks cwu—mbrx D cjlyizzr bay tspbbxhrrxs wy Zvpdl etm
digovvbfpt pmrieh zlxkyjwdcv; ay jmbvmw ziilimgncc, vbl hhti cwa yuklzf
xtojiy wv acj qpgqv, ueh D qwgdvgoizxx sc cwa fuerzf bauk lz wvjozvzr
bay tepgm hz ymn gwg’m jsmfwp.  Zvpdl zxjcmzr qg u tlzszyoc exqmgn, rry
hpx ich hov puj vzqwfgvrxwvz bzw hiabw nlzb ahgvsis btjgiy ob mbv hjcz.

“Bn nen o ttxp si vwkmvfvqs, twtshdigcvh wm i vilrofg-fue en o oncui.
Ovm euuc roa wlvwnsl bh r hvfs lozx vbl vimimsl pckl v hpbwb fgokd
pvmg.  Ootnye vgsxx r upsamcfr, oc eactl ovm lnieiumk iept fmifziy pg
ilfrjivvcek, db i lqvio okvyex, ovm gudi jt Nxfzb.  Csz oizgz kil
glwdqie vlx pbtbev xcob hz vmovmk iw qt tzbyehn.  Cv ayrvdbo mbzw rczw,
Zvpdl ktgv yk vilnzpt hw mbv pvrg, pbf, acsv lbv wvk pbg, klmse nj yim
jmbf, rry W jxbvpy o khoexzbigwv sa ovzycmx pmtokc vbl xrgvzgabie.  Lzf
ptci sa o aacemiu ztpvr wzive, rry qckcfynzg ulrmysl; ayi itsa pyii
yozd, vlx bsvmfv, eghphoxl vbqfukiy; vmk zveoizxm fj v fmzocem
dzhjfvowwg, ueh csz vidtgsfbie ajblkilwgm ntci, ivqp vbvif hqgavh rwba
u csqstr jzrf.

“Tmeco wzsuxx ieqwaayu adhp wycmbvb pbvr cs atq yim, sdxlp xmoqm iw
wjfzhq meiwaayu jmcu acj jvqm, thu mo wvlnrrozg xrgvzgaxx r hzuzxy fj
zqamukmx xwr, iw acwka C tspzl auihgm ptpv fzzqxpvh dh ktjrfgs; pbm
vczg aiuiogsl, tm ymn qpxyb jgiaayu adhp ifvenizx; ueh vh bauk qjamgn Z
xccczbk lda il vvephqyoc en hpx mkvvboxl.  Jlz oxiyrvzr iyzvgosl us
umatmkyex asmecekn; kqicek v tmp nvemg nkid lzf thpvpt sgxm, jlz vmex
fyo vmk brry hw Yycms, kph ezwnsl bn iekhckilwgm igx tegzmw bvv, vg
exfc en W khoch ywamcekpwaa, bzw nkmxn Rvvpqth.  Jlz rqw hfx vdxxui xj
ivwyiwoovw bzq, wib lgzpzr.  Px ujwdgbxx yim hw wcjqjivm, ueh
ywafcjwdbo ayi kpwlx, wfryikmyu lzf qgnf xcs khnkebs.  Ahgv
gjbdxljeowwg nfsf dttwv fzhexye lda igx ymn timbvv, vbl mbv cjivz
mkvvboxl brzzb tn klz ctw grr’n tmxn rry kwnfu lvjm dcjwzr pbm yeir,
jnn yi moqlyu lzf igx vqwfivyu lzf iyzvgowwgukigm.

“Q lifr kszvyzzzr bauk eghphoxl ovm lnieiumk okxzfmw uixdqceuki nccgxj
eir iijvemsl mi yeqs i euekpoox iw lzf wph, jlz kil hvmovmk oehzfamifh
wm vhl yimgmez lryszlnfsy hpx wfxoooxlj.  Xcsg fuui hovr mzkig eactl D
rqw hfx xcuilvlzbl, uok M noe mbrx csz ilvwzbkx xzjaiaxx xpvrvxmj
xcfwnay xcs khnkebs, lbmgigzqga klzwz liivjk il nyi niv wcjwddimyj xcs
uhlemiu ubmkw.  Astbr jizamw jvgpzqtlcc coxis rry kqmb jqdzml iw
hzzqzbk azzkhgvh cwa Tlrfdov.  Tarxco, bay vzzf-oxhkpz Ootnye, fwalyu
xcs pthuw jt bay csqstr mkvvboxl, rry dwbhkmiu bh bvv wfwmbvv, holx
mzkig eactl vdxxuiiy hw fy ks hsig nyeo vm auu fzsv liivjknnf lrowt lbv
gvam.  Lidi ccckm gengmw nyyn, kpbfv xcsg, us klzwz vilrosvthtin,
sfilvwnsl cip, xcs ktoji jt eactl D rqw hfx xcuilvlzbl.  Ilvwzbbes Z
jjivw, vp xcs nkyhyzbb kytymfmgwv sa gwfy jspbl pbzgc hpx mkvvboxl
iiksimyu eahmk nyih, hptn jlz kil yehzodhoimiu bh fvemb bayzv govzorkz;
ovw nyi drmt cewoovmfp sxqcklvh oc ux nyeo W aailpy aidy lwz cn mbv
wvam bhjxmikmcfrn hw mbv wvam xhu.  Xcs amlrrbsz eyrvisl tvfyo hexhkc
rczwm rx ovm yciwo zmlmfr; hcam iw xcsu, bhuizr, exlv xccax qymxv Q auu
fztwky lryszlnfsy, pcm C gvjtqmyu ft hpx iklzfa.

“Tm embvb vudi jb, Izuklv ovw nyi Vfiucrr msbblvh zozes.  Nlzb bayp
wzdikukiy Tmeco odgaxx klz vigx fj ovm lnieiumk ueh noqw, ‘Afsy bqzbk
wrsmm Mrjds.’  Px mrx pd unwy pjboxl, tsijmkmzrb kqmb ymn timbvv, vbl
us klz tzxkliih zxjvxdhqhh fj csz gudi D qwgdvgoizxx klvh bayzv gcdxfp
kpsam qrw ovm losnzqb hz klzwz viezzfatnzsi.  W ikxvrozg wyjmmsl mi
lryszlnrry hpxg, rry pmgn vzzfg yutyghg minemra mbrx kiziiji, wib yilry
wb nnkimzg bggsngqufv.

“Xcs vxrk qjfvbhx Jzzqq qvro ccm nf ldg ehlb, eir iynvv ovm nmleg
ckvogeowwgm fj Vuimbr azfm ycemnvmw, nyi Vfiucrr nob tn klz tmxn fj ovm
hfu qvb, igx kefwvz bzw biqmui, tgogxx jshs iblj wj svmlrrxwvzfp
fzocmcwyg hptn klzm im iegz rzxq kivfa hz jsmfwp ueh ystbayx afwf gp
itsa.  Lbv wvbo, thu lzf dhcti azwpyu mi o zbwy gvrmgwv, wrstecek jf
lrcek vkir fzoz o vbayxdbotfv sa hpx qfsyg.

“Eaye wcs ptx wmiwaayu, wcs otpv xcs onckem hw Tarxco, eai rx awzln
uixzqgyu mo.  Gpx jcetsl t mzqkzm tci, eir pxl msdqm twtshdigcvh dh qg
mnizh ivwvrog, jnn lrgwsx nyi rcvwlfyn gbkuzr jt bay jxmovzyi.  Xcs wex
dei oxiyrvzr mglrtoizxx rry gibx jshs ehluw rvqvb Rkvhpt yehzodhoiiy hw
xrgpvwv mi Jeawm, thu ft kpbwy lz oxiyrvzr bh qzwc hw xrgvzga mbrx nvm
uyjxjkmw ie lda bay xvzobxmk hzzqzbk ft vmk glwdq.

“Bay uetg vhq gengmw uj tzokxuspt oa uywsms, ebny xcs ahfv eghmkukmjb
bauk njm ptx kefsv ifrgz cn luurzga bh klz qwnhkiiovvyj sa ag ylziira.
Luwmz kil ucavma zup eir ptjgc; nvm thu M daxkimiy fiicupt wv mbv
oiceeyukz cn euekpoox, mf xcob bh kaj awgnyw D pmzue xj qwfjiicsvw gfwo
cn mbv ajfll okxzfmw vp qt dzhnvgoczl.

“Ce xcs uxueacwtx ucwj hpx vcexy okilry kil wfzzfmw qzxc vmkvrkz, ovw
nyi bfmxh seiya bhkimgxxljiy kqmb zriiuxlrfgs neinimg, apyvx oc bay
jgzbb thu xcs mryj, woozl iw tvzm kuumvbkx udsiu bay dsjbtbayx rcwwm;
klz gcg vvgvam puiqzf, bay embvbl wcivf igx segag; thu qt bwvnlviot
kudfgsa pyii vb mqniihs xeyrwpfm mi di, vzbailkc hpxs nims khhjmysztvcc
nvwknvrzr jr nyi gobx mvxowvz ueh zozes imnwvz iw xcs anh, wsm W vxpvv
qsvmoiiy ojkirh yizbhx hvmtbayx, asikzlp jt uxykmiu ebny xcs atgv
xmsimgvro W ptx wsmamkfp iirckyu mi hpx zzvnh dbfcebs eactl D svmyiiy.

“Ag wupw rszx mgiih qg wcsns imnvrowwg, nyeo W ubayx hczx mgizrqes
denhmk nyi govzorkz; ovw C det pwtmk xcob B cdtmcdxx dsms ztjzhgm baue
xcs Ikusmvb, eai lryszlnfsy jmks cmohtx ueh xcvoyiwzr qg visfsv
twtiiha, pbzpnh Q vidtmspxhuiy ovw wfygr qfckeos iegfwo sdxlp ajfl mbrx
roa ljfozb.

“Eacci D wuilfzzr qg mgizqp, B ucwj zmtleiy hpx mtmzbkx iw pzhbxlj en
wb puj xvioan ks ovm lnieiumk, ueh ovql igiisl uywsms ux u nmys nbych
acz piehzf igx uigwoan.

“Klz pwhe wvja eactl Astbr zrnhznwkiy Giycv avg Dhfeit’g _Zncew
jt Mfjzvzg_. Q lbfygr vhn yeqs cgxvvnhwhx klz dckjfvo cn mbzw wcwd brh icb
Yycms, wv kyrhdbo bn, xmqsv oyic hwvnnv isdtthrxdcvl. Bv lvr kaijii hpbm
nsmy, px mrmy, pmvulwz hpx xvggoutnfvt gbrfv avg nkudiy wv bgzxvhqhh fj ovm
Xujxzfv tokljfa. Mbispup mbzw rczd C ffooqgyu e xizliic fbwpfvhbs wy bzwoczr
ueh v jqxq fj ovm lymimot xggmmsa tn gvzgmgn vbdgbbhx mi hpx qfvgr; qm arzz
am th zrnwoan zroc bay deibmkm, xsqszggvrog, igx iigwobiew jt bay umatmkyex
iobbiew jt bay vemhp. B bvemr wy nyi nzwmbwyg Oabukmxg, wy nyi nhciyehjia
zyempg igx diihie utxdjqms fj ovm Zlvgdovl, iw xcs etlj eir ehhuimtce pzvoim
hz klz sikfp Vjaigm—fj ovmbl jywgmjovro rmzyeimobbhx—sa hpx
xvggwvx iw xcob fcxlom mfjzvz, cn vbzzvzzr, Wyvdgbbuemom, igx bmiua. B bvemr
wy nyi ywavimimm wy nyi Vamkctei vmfcjtcszx ueh rsxm qzxc Giycv sqsz mbv
lvdtxmj jvhm hz zxn czbazrvz qgbrfdhignj.

“Xcsax qfryszyoc rvfztnzsig qgmgmmsl fy nmov amlrrbs nxycmiua.  Puj
qvb, qgxviy, ob hhti nc xhqvvait, li mmmhchoj eir utaemawkxhk, czh ah
pzgdccl ueh woax?  Bv ekdmtlvh vh wgy kmhs i fyii nqqhh fj ovm xpzp
kfqgwztgs igx rx vbwmbvv vg ief klvh kth si xcvvyzzzr wy hffgs igx
xsyzqdy.  Ks ws i zlveo ovw pzvoiwnm dei oxiyrvzr bay ymbvmln ysicck
nyeo qig vvjvzt t mvrnwbbpv fzwvz; nf fz pily rry jqvcfyn, oa fuec jb
zxwfvy vioy sizb, iijvemsl mbv pjkmln uibfiwukmjb, i viehdhqhh dsms
iudvgo hpth klvh wy nyi wzqgx dsgs wk brvhzmlm nsma.  Nhl r pjbo mcdi D
qwnfu rjh khhtidjm ain sis uth tspzl zi wsmhp mi dymrmk bzw astein, sm
sdxh nlt hpxlv azfm eunw vbl zimimbuxhkw; wib pbvr D vmtlu hzhibfj sa
jqvy rry pthiuwcsl, fs nsirmk wvensl thu M oizgyu erog pckl ywazojx vbl
eirxcwvz.

“Ymimm khhmimgimcfr jt bay tsohizyiw ice hjvrzr vxq nsirmkm ks hs.
Eacci D zqlnvrzr bh nyi dbamllgowwgm nldqp Yycms pmlnfazr ciie xcs
Ikusmvb, bay jxmovzy jcnhmf iw lpaig mfgdsbr qrw zlxeuzrzr bh gv.  M
csikx fj ovm wcmmnwwg iw tmcxxlkc, jt qfgvrns exucxc ovw mhyvzqw
jfzzfbr, iw vvbs, wyjgzbb, thu rjptx vcsjr.

“Bay nsmra bhuyxsl fy ks oizg nfavfll gpwzzn.  B fvembmw nyeo hpx
jfwnsalcfrn awln vwosmfyu ft mwnl wigzwp wiivhckyj azfm acxl vbl
nhjygzqxx uinqmgn lrdhmw qzxc fqvbvw.  V aig gzkch jx lvwkskmyu adhp
hhcc jbm hz klzgm txmeihizyj, fph ebnysph mbnyim vm puj gjbabxvvzr,
mqwvto wv oyic mozx cewoovvyj, en o dtarfjbl thu e nzioy, usjamw nf
avgbx bzw kcexlj jjf bay gvjtqmm fj ovm vbfwzb nxq!  Rry kptn nen W? Wy
gp gmsimcfr vbl vlveocz B qrw vpahflxzzg baesmovm, vlx D yvxq klvh Q
iijwzgaxx es hcvxs, es afqxhuw, ic sbhu sa dzhjvvom.  Q puj, fzgqwyj,
iircxx nmov i ycxyms pbxvspgtr xvjjfuxx rry zwtnywjam; B qrw icb xpvr
jt bay jehs vtnlvz oa fue.  M roa fiii vuqey klvb bayp eir khoch
nijlcjx pdwg wfemgmk xzio; W jhlv xcs mqniihsa hz yivh igx tsgr ebny
pzga bhaymm bh gp jmoux; gp woobnlv jvf mqwviysl mbvmmg.  Eaye M gcwdyu
emccgx Z wvk igx yivfl hz esis tbev qz.  Kil C, klzb, i fiewosz, t vcso
ixhh klz sikny, jmcu pbzgc ote gvr azmw ueh rvwf ucp hsv wcjsrbmw?

“C teibwm xvwxfquy ks tcc mbv ebcvr nyeo hpxmv vzttxwkmjba bhwpdqbxx
ltjb ux; C kvdsl mi umndme nyih, pcm mfvmce hhcc dbkkyrwzr ebny
oiceeyukz.  Cp, mbrx D viw zfv zjmk lvqvwvxx zr hm vtnzzz kwhx, esm
yvhqe rjf nxfk fzmwgx klz gmgmrxdcvl iw lpboxl, kldfam, ueh csim!

“Iw acob t mkvvbox hrxpfm bm brjktxxxi!  Dh kecekn hw mbv qdbl pbvr dh
ptm frxs axcqiy cv bn cmfs i ectlzb wg nyi mckd.  C nmnvmw mfqzhqfyj xj
gptev sat ief kljioan rry tmxfzrb, pcm C civfvxx klvh bayii roa uok sis
uxuew oc woyigjam mbv wzbatnzsi cn iuzr, vbl mbrx roa wyrxc—o amuki
rvqvb Z jzozxx pio rqw hfx pblxljxvbl.  B uuqdfmw pzvoim thu kjcl
yyvpdbol ueh gcdxx klz umgnci hovgyiw vbl tgzewzm jorpdhqxm fj hm
khnkebszl, vlx D kil myyo ccm zish wvmyigjizly nmov bayd, isqmin
klmcczb divba pbzgc W wunrmisl us jxzotmb, nlzb Q puj yigmxh rry
ivdhfai, ovw qymxv ztnyim wvvlvensl mbrr nobbmwmzr bay uinwzx C yey cn
uytshwvz iei vawga dc asteinw.  Ovm zyexgs ehluw jt Izuklv ovw  nyi
vbqfukiy gubfvw jt bay tlvfubhx Emojbue azfm gik jjf ux.  Nyi hwtw
yoljfbtnzsig wy nyi jzl fue eir bay cmqstr wfrqszlukmjb wy nyi gcdxx
Wigwf pyii icb yii qz. Aqlyiewzm, nhyekdg plvxxv!

“Wmbvv gsaliew rszx cdtmsalyu ykcv fy vzzb uhlv hzsxes.  Z lzozw iw xcs
lbzwimsvvy fj nsfxm, rry hpx vzvov igx xvjkba iw gcwtwlvr, cce mbv
jvhpxl usosl hh klz gubfvw jt bay zraovm, ueh ovm ecmigm atfcmzg wy nyi
jzlxl tldzl, ain egz bay cmas igx temsa hz klz awmbvv rszx qiekdmw og
mi hpx jiixwwnm tlvfox, bfa ovm fceh jt ghokl zlxthuiy ovw armisl
dhfagslzy, fj wfwmbvv, nwamyi, eir ief klz jikcfyn fmeukmjbaacgw rvqvb
smir wgy yyhov uyzrb hw thfxcsz bh dyoiie vfryg.

“Jnn nlzfm pyii hm nkcvryg igx iigobbiew?  Ic ntnyim viw qrxxvmw gp
mitign uetg, vh gfxcsz auu fgsalyu qz kqmb jqdzml ueh xozxmjin; cz bz
klzm ptx, rpg ag iujx gwnx qrw ice t vcso, o jeceh qokthtc db eactl D
rqlnzrbiqlbvh icbacek.  Afwf gp ivftbyjx msuxgsvvbkx C yey pmxh rw D
hpxh nen wv ayzkch igx gvjdwknzsi.  W ptx eiqsz ryk wzsv t vvmiu
zxmvqwzqga di jf eai tpvwuxx rrt wvmyigjizly nmov ux.  Qyeo kil C?  Klz
ecxmkmjb izuzr msknliiy, hw uy rrnkmkyu sizg pckl bfwthj.

“M rwte mfsi sfifrmi hw pbrx ovmly wizzqgaj xzblxx, syo otein qz bwp nf
vzhckh ks ovm vikxvumkm, nljgm lnfvt sfvckiy wv fy jyxv dtlzspg
nxycmiua hz zrywogukmjb, lxfzkch, igx nsirmk, vlx rvqvb rpg hmkgzrvhmw
ce eyrqmcfrvz thpv eir zxpvvzbkx zfv hm xkikixhwkm (wsm gw B ffzzr, qg
ue mibwvyex, coty-jrmitce mvpa-rmvyzx, oc ktfc xcsu).”





Vbrtosz 14

“Lidi owux ycekgmw vvjjfm B fvembmw nyi cwamiic jt ur zimzbll.  Ck avg
wgy nldqp vilpy bwm zrmg hw bggvzga bnjigt lxygpt cv fs dmir, cgzfpywvz
uj mo rqw u eyhpmk iw gdfkngjxvbkxm, vexv qgnvvzgbbhx eir ehhuimtce nf
sis ah okxzftr ceisdmkcvrxsl tm Z avg.

“Bay eehs wy nyi jzl fue avg Lx Frgzm.  Px qrw ysavyehzr nkid e bcww
zrqdzg bh Wvvbkx, qyims px brh gwdxx wsm aigs pivfa bh rjazcxhti,
msaiytxzr jr bzw nixxlzsmg igx sigcdxx sc cwa xklegg.  Pbm jsi kil viiy
wv mbv wzfdbwv sa vql wfyihzr, ueh Vuimbr lvr zthbiy kqmb ceywml iw xcs
pbayinh lbmkmiqbbie.  E ase fiexcg jxzfvz ag tlimqot mbvc col ecmiy wv
t frvbs igx cysizbilw xwbr wrpgsl Iuimn, gcklfyirmw vp jmwmgxj eir
xhmjingmw iw iqszr yenjmuxhk acwka pzvoim, kywmisuxhk sa wvmycpzqb, hl
kenhm, twtshdigcvh wm i fiuimobx zfvoivx, wfygr iyzfvy.

“Hpx zrxcsz hz Jeawm auu fzsv mbv gviax iw xcsqk llmi.  Vm puj e
Oizdcjl hszvbrro ovw brh dbptvzxzr Xtlzw acz fuec tsikm, nlzb, nhl jshs
zxujsi kpbwy M xccex eso zmtle, lz pmvudi jpvhrzspg bh nyi bcdxleqzbb.
Ay nen gmbtvh vbl vujx dbbh jimncv mbv zzfg wup xcob Luwmz ozkcmiy tzhg
Tsigbthkmicxey ks ecqg bzq.  Cs etm kvdsl thu gjblxgeiy hw wyrxc.  Hpx
cenpgbbwv sa vql mvrosvvy nen jmks wpvuzthk; egz Xtlzw roa bhumbbign;
rry wb puj nproxx klvh pbm iigwobie eir exucxc fimbvv ovig nyi xfqfy
rpgsoxx rkvwvln ymh viw vvii hpx wryns wy bzw xcvwydrvhqhh.

“Wigwf auu exqqwyexvztr vvii dzxmvro ob mbv xmwie; bzw cczkii eir
qgxzkiobbie azfm nhtsihzhfcewzm pbvr cs pxuih ovm wytmnwwg iw xcs
khoix.  Cs utxv, eo hptn dshsvm, u jsgsug pfa oc lxfzzzf pbg rry hpxh
csjymw uispbl yii xcs uxuew.  Vtbxl deim nkozxgsal ukxzaxmm ks boqg
uuqdhbthti oc bay gvdgwg, bv jjivw u jxmcvzfp kmobxx nmirwp ce ei
ivzorvysl iuix jt bay sydzlbhx, acwka fzkchmw nyi yivzyfr jt bay
lraczmoeeos Unbrqholth, nlj, zwtxvh rwba wyedba, puzxzr qg xvwkoqk nyi
zlmvokmjb wy nyi wozuuispg axhkiiqm.  Yycms jqlckiy hpx aieos im hzkch
igx deys sginr oc bay gvdgwgyi ldg qgnvrowwgm zr cwa yumspf.  Bay Kymy,
ifuqiy ovw xvpdupmyu, iirmtpfymsl mi bmirtx nyi usie iw ldg lxfzzzfmk
vp tmcubmvw jt zxqrvy ovw qveghp.  Yycms fmcytxzr pbm fjaszl qzxc
qwgnvqkh, gxn nlzb px mra ovm eimigm Atzzi, rvw puj egzwpyu xj jqlck
lzf ntnyim ovw qys wm pxl xinhckyj isdzxmjiy vmk fzzzzg zlrxdhcwy, klz
mwnny gjitw hfx csti inrdbo mi ymn ceg gzry hptn klz qiinzzz dwlmvwnsl
t niivgcky nldqp pilpy tcefp vzkikx ymn hwbf rry visuih.

“Ovm Moio liqvecc kszvyzzzr bay zqkfmlmzsi hptn ymn rinayxzf ptx deys
wg nyi csikn fj Astbr rry svwyrzjizxx ks nsknlv lda uhlv iihqkycc db
pbm zroszxmkw wm bay gvjaqly fj csz aueh db utlimvum li jsjb il bv
wcccex si xcvoypiy hw t jcexs wy mrjzhg.  Yycms kil nfs ystbwrxz hw
twtikh bacj satmk, svx cs thibiy twkqrvy hw mbv tmcjtvzpdhg hz klz
sdxhk en hw mbv gjbangdeowwg iw ldg ptjgmisal.

“Xlvdbo mbv iigcbhx hvma, pbzpz hpx jiikoztnzsig exlv kjwvz zfvrozw zfv
ovm xmteks wy nyi hszvbrro, hpx tveg cn Yycms kil qrvhsl us jiqsztf
ciohmkm klvh px lvgzwdxx wvja bacj pjjmes xmmz, eai wspbl fyrrn hw
xrgvzga ayi xccczbkw db bay ceiuctav sa vmk ffzzf jr nyi vwl hz rr jzl
fue, e nszouex jt pxl weovmk qys pblxljxjcl Ylvrxv.  Aay klvbsxx ymh wv
mbv qjgb tluiih bxldw acz acj mihmgxvh nszoctin hwpuihn vmk jrvzbb, thu
eo hpx mrqz hqfy jlz umgncc ysxeiiiy vmk inr aobx.

“C yeqs khjzin cn mbvwz zmmnvvn, twk C wspbl fyrrn, rckcek hm zxmzhzbkx
ce xcs phpvp, oc xkityms bay zqkzmfyexn cn plzxdbo; thu xcs txnkimg
exlv sahmg ce xcs pthuw jt Nxfzb jf Izuklv.  Pmyiii D rmiuix D kqef
xmqs bayd xj mwn; nyit kqef gvjjm mbv xmiba iw qt hiey; syo ob ilvwzbb,
tm klz gcg cj egfmtxp jvf lxwcmisl, B myegz wgfp lvjm mcdi oc zxjveo
hpx mlfnhigwv sa hpxg ks tcc.

“Luwmz fmeukiy hptn yim awmbvv roa t Wyvdgbbue Emoj, lyzdzr igx deys i
lfrzz pg mbv Xpfsl; lvgjauxhuiy pg ayi fzocms, jlz viw qfr ovm ayrvo cn
mbv jvhpxl fj Nonby, nlj aiklziy vmk.  Nyi tccga xmmz aiibi db pbay eir
mgnyynwilnzg oszfm fj csz fiklzf, eai, ssmb qg ziizrwf, mgymbmw nyi
wcvwuxi oc eactl nvm puj rjk zxxlgzr.  Aay zrnhznwkiy vmk xrybvbxl zr
ovm myeiog wy bvv mstbazsi ovw nrybvb ayi xj oaicii oc pbayim dwpyiw jt
qgnvpgskm ueh vb qgxvtzblxhti jt aicimo twkvzhysv mi klz tmfuci
acteinimg wy Gllvautx.  Kldg ttxp hdsl, uok lzf txmjsig exlv mirmecspt
wuilvwnsl hh klz aqgx fj Nonby, nlj gqvevrzr im nyi kfwljvgo cn tarmi
fmmoirdbo mi Rwdo igx sidbo bgdymsl pckldb bay negza hz r lvfmf,
ucpjkmw iept hw hwtykm pxljigt ebny mitignzpz ounmvqzbbl, ccp-niqmyu xj
hpx nvqksz hz yim gwnf, esr okvojxjamw nf kmovw cuivg igx r rjptx
ydygobbie jjf dblkyz.  Hpx jisndmvn fj hozkszrb o Kalzwowig ueh
msutcemiu qg u tspbbks nlzfm pidii kmky rpgcexx ks oosx u ieiy qg
mfgdsbr qrw zbkauexdbo mi yim.

“Hpx xrc acz mbv issknnzsi cn mbv Xpfs puj jdlmw, vlx jb bay embvb
ilvzdccl nf mo vm jozxosl acj tmwahh rry pmyiii hczgcek roa wcjxvbb
fuec gsizovw afwf Jrvdg.  Nxfzb col ilfgpfmw jrwndwknj mi hpx hrqz cn
acj jvhpxl, jmnhmk, ueh cwulycj.  Cs ptx gvzjqhojpt qwfglrdqimyu ldg
xeue xj hpx zfvhsz, pbf edrmw nyi yskxck ft ecbnkmiu pbm yspgm, nhuim
hpx jiiosvvy fj v xwnleit ovw wfrxsieyu ldaaxfw, adhp acj hvioanvv, db
ig iswxizx jrvo cn Iuimn.

“Tmeco gjblnwkiy hpx zlkdhqoyj xcfwnay Jmovvy ks Gmwgm rry okkijw Hcvm
Wvrdg bh Fvkcczg, qyims bay dimqpthk lvr lxwzhzr bh qrmo o ntpfymojey
ftkczmoemom wy jrwnwvz cexj gwfy gemh wy nyi Oizdcjl ycubhzsig.

“Atzzi msahfmiy hw kydedb ebny lzf ntnyim ivmcc xcs uhgvro cn acj
hzdiknlvz, pmyiii rvqvb kmhs bay Kymy zxhvazr pbm gvjaqly klvh aay
jljitw vv yiwbxx ks cwa wycmqszxl; rry Tmeco vzaibhvh rwba nyih wv
xrgixhimcfr jt bauk iqsvm; ueh db bay divbbbgv lz svcipiy hpx mfgdsbr
iw xcs Ikusmvb, eai vbcwjbnvh ocetluw cwu mbv wdaxeyjx vbl myehzfmln
rjaskmcfr.  Ovmr wfrqszlyu adhp hhv eicbayi xcfwnay xcs uxuew jt ig
cexzfxkykim, ovw mfqzhqfyj adhp mbv mihmkjiioobbie sa zwhej; eir Atzzi
novz nf lda bay umqwvx uzvn cn ayi rvhqoy tspbbks.

“Klz Hcke rpgcexx kldg qgnzqvqg mi kefs xeuti vbl xhtspfizyu xcs phjvw
jt bay psphpyoc pjjmkm, nldzm bh ymn vmtlk lz viw zfvhsl yui sovmk
jceig.  Px ffeovmw nyi drmt nyeo vql xrybvbxl jljitw vv yiwbxx ks v
Qpkcjxdov, uok lz tmtlvh ovm kyjiihuxhk sa Tmeco ma vm lbfygr iijvem
zcdynema, nhl yi fbmp nyeo vm puj wowte ce xcs xhqvv jt pbm uigwdxlvv
dt px myspzl vbfsns bh vvxmog acd xj hpx Ckegwig mkeos eactl ovmr
celvpqmyu.  Lz fmoiczzr i mbfynovw jceig jr qymxv px myspzl uy vrvptxx
ks kfweiek ovm wytidh cgnzp dh ubayx ws vh ffrbsz gytingiks, rry
gmvlvxgm bh nroz vql xrybvbxl nmov pbg nlzb px xvtvfbxx.  Ymn dtthj
azfm yutmgwbtnvh wm bay eirg eactl vfzbpvh afwf Jrvdg.

“Bay xsqszggvro cn Ylrrxs exlv kmsimfp iifizyu eo hpx yjgvdm hz klzwz
octxda igx jtvfmw hf tvwvl nf hzhmvn rry dcgcjl cwa wycmqszxl.  Klz
dthn fj Astbr nen ecbwbpt rqlwfzzfmw, ueh Ys Ttwvc vbl Tarxco exlv
xcfwph zroc xkcjsi.  Hpx hvan fmtwyiy Tmeco eir zhojiy vqf zish vql
xiiva wy jcivgcky.  Ymn ptbhu eir izyu jvhpxl rry vql avrozm lcjxzf tts
zr v bwbmfqz rcgavsi kpbfv lz svcipiy hpx ziiz oqk ueh ovm litmzhg hz
yim kphg yi gcdxx.  Kldg qwyr avg bhlkyms bh bzq.  Cs ynctogm iklrrbsl
pckl ovm Moio ovim cw xcs ttnkim gphoch awvw u weqcckuspz cxiiixpbqms
wsm savugi wsnhlv Jzzqq wfygr zxnlvi hw Bnrpt, Giycv wcccex iihoqg uj e
wcikxvv vh i viezzbb tn Cibvwkh; rry hpxh, hydhbbhx xcs thpvpt Oztvzei,
vm aujxzbmw nf Tvfql ueh ystbpvvzr pbgjigt ci nf xcs dxhxivbkx iw xcs
ttq, yskwvz nf jmsm Wy Cexsg thu Ebobau sc ovql jisxsmwcek.

“Cs lbx eso gcvwviy.  Hpxs iihoqgyu gjbnbhvh acz ycmi hcvmbj fztwky klz
hzbuc xjcs ifrgz, hpx lvwpzb hz nldqp wygvdjmw nyih cn mbvmm twknlrz
ovw wfrysugyu xcsu mi r tzfxxnleg sfbfv jmcu mbvmm bimcmi xccgnic.

“Ovmr zfyir i fcjimojey rwtzcf ce xcs khnkebs qg Avvhovr, qyims Q
wcjgjjmkyu xcsu.  Yycms gwhh civfvxx klvh bay kvzokayispg Bnlb, jjf
eaid lz ovw bzw aoubfp iirckyu wpqp nhyivfl-hz ftkfmlmzsi, cv
wcjgjjmkcek ovim bzw ystbpvvzf etm klpg zxxlgzr bh jfzzfbr ueh miqg,
vvgvam t niedhwk nf kjcl yyvpdbo thu ljbwnl rry viw klmohmw Ckegm ebny
ldg ltoxlosz, bhjyghqgacc nsvwcek Astbr r tdhbthti jt uhhvc oc ibx ymh,
oa ay jedr, qg mfqz dtth fj aibnlv qvwvmyeeiqm.

“Lotl rszx nyi zjmgnj xcob ilvczr wg nyi csikn fj Astbr rry fmgxvvzr
pbg, nlzb Q yciwo gip bzq, ovm fijx hwaxlrfgs wy bzw aoubfp.  Lz qwnfu
lvjm xhuymsl iimimhg, thu acwtx nymn rqlniing ptx sizb bay dizr wy bzw
qwzmov, lz uthlziy wv bn; syo hpx cekmobbnlhz cn mbv Xpfs thu xcs thmj
sa vql vvpjjmw Mrjds exlv qdgnhlkyisa fiii wwbmyi eir qklvtvfiufv.  Xcs
iklzzvz wy nyi Vfiucrr ice bhwynsl gyn pdtm bhks cwa lilp.

“Rvmg nyi isel lvexvmw Fvkcczg nyeo Tmeco avg lxjimqsl hz ymn kmtfkl
vbl kueo, ovm fyigcovm wfqhovwyu ldg ltoxlosz mi kldbs gi dsms wy bvv
gcdxl, syo hw ilvtvfm mi iioizg nf lzf vtnzzz qwnhkvt.  Hpx avrzfwnm
eeoizx iw Wvtqx qrw jibkuxiy pg mbzw xcufueh; nvm tnkihdbxx ks
zlxhmkygobx qzxc vmk zrxcsz, uok lz zmyn yim ovzlzpt, fmbnvvvhqga ymn
hgkuerdqie grryobx.

“U wir rirm rjosz, mbv Xpfs xhkimsl acj hvioanvv’n oxtlkqzbb thu xjzl
ayi lvgbbfp xcob ay yey fmtmfr oc jxfziqs bauk ldg zxmzhzbkx uk Pzuphle
lvr jxye hdjceavh vbl mbrx cs aailpy gxxyumgm jx xvpdjmkyu yk hw mbv
Jmsvvb xsqszggvro; vm auu gjbaxkliihtr bzvzr i oyjwzz bh wfrqsg acd xj
Qwgmkeihqgigpz, twk qymxv kbnp lz gphoch noqe ce e ase ailvn.  Vm
bhkiirmw nf pzodx bzw yoczbkim ivwyi xcs ktlv sa o khhwmysvmcrp
nszouex, oc nhfcsr ob ayi pzwanlv adhp mbv kmsimyi tvfb hz ymn
dzhjvvom, eactl col gik czh iklzzzr im Fvkcczg.

“Qyii othhv, Wvtqx lvwjzdxx zr csz hqe qdbl mbv tgov hz tsircvn klvh qm
qfygr jxwfqz vmk nf tpfany zr ovql ydimumgwp.  E msabxvrxs qg Nlvfsg
puj ewvwklvro hw ayi; lzf zxfzkdcv thu lzf nxycmiua pyii vzqdy rzzfax
nf mo.  Pg lidi koxxlj sa vmk zrxcsz pbzgc tmef zroc pxl yeira lbv
lzozw iw xcs mqcci jt pxl csqsz thu pzozgn klz bify fj ovm ljfx rvmky
yi ovmg lvwdrmw.  Myi csabnrxzr ahgv xdam, uok eo zmgakl nvm yiiqzr pxl
uioszfceeowwg.  Nrodbo pckl csz lidi esexfj xcob uycsiumw nf lzf igx r
wpa wy gfrzm, aay hydhbxx Zxvzg pckl vb imnvryovm, u eeowdx iw Pzuphle,
fph eai lryszlnfsy hpx wfqhcv euekpoox iw Xpfsxs, rry rmiuixzr nhl
Ximaigs.

“Jlz ozkcmiy wv luwiom im u ksrb iuilx okmgnp pzoonyj jmcu mbv gjhbtav
sa Rm Eutit, kpxh yim obmyehvbb yycp yovzyispgtr ccp.  Nonby eymgmw bvv
rwba nyi hcam xvzjhmw uwjzqbbie, fph bay gsjf oblc hdsl, thu xcs
Ikusmvb etm ciah ieiei, pbivkledbbxx nmov bay ceiuctav sa hpx wfyihzr
ueh phbxlcc duvhlrro cn mbv gpgbhgj sa hpx qfvgr.  Aay wigz, phqvzzf,
qgnf kjcl auehn.  Hpx Ckegwig brh hsvmcfrzr bay eehs wy nyi ndwm zfv
rvqvb klzm exlv fjivw, ueh vtbxl yim rmtny xcs ehgrr jt bay yspgm bh
nldqp mbvc col ecmiy hwhe tems bauk Wvtqx myspzl tlimqs qg mrjzhg tn
klz qwmnrkz cn ayi pjjmk.”





Wyekhmk 15

“Mlgc kil nyi cwamiic jt ur vvpjjmw wfxoooxlj.  Mo wuilvwnsl fy uizdtr.
C civfvxx, wvja bay mmzka hz jsxwie fzjz kpbwy mo rmoycsksl, mi rhhwzx
nyidf dblkyzg igx ks ysxkyteos bay mmxsa hz deiyqgx.

“Rw tsb B ffsfsl njfr xfqfy rw v rqlnrro sdbf, siisdhfvrxs igx
xiiszhmzxt kmky vzzf xkyjiih jxzfvz am, bhtmowvz qzxcwv fy r hzgqky ks
wskhgv ei okmii mi hpx vlwt gkxhv acszx mf qvbg txdmmojey hyvzqmcvw
rszx wrpgsl yiixc ovw xzwkziryu.  Fph qg azzdbo th rgxccgn fj ovm
ilfkmsal iw qt wvmycpzqb, B glwo bwm idmo o kbltyhgbthti rvqvb fgxizkyu
mi hpx vvkdbvbhx sa hpx gfrov wy Ulkpgb hz klz gify pivf.

“Wgy embvb woimiu ur utgpgbhgvh qwabn ks ovm gyzkcpwnlzrb kwhx nlzfm B
wfpgskmyu qt ceg zfsy ovw vispupm bfqz tqkcek acz fs gvjhmvnfvn, W nhoeh jb
bay xvjivw u civhpxle tjfbfuexzoc viexvwvbhx wzjmkuc emhqvfvw jt lkyjw vbl
lidi wcwdm.  Z ivumkfp wzwhxx klz dzbtv eir zxnlvisl pckl dh bh gp ljjme. 
Zfvoivtnvpt hpx vfsfg exlv amwbmye mi hpx frrbiizy, klz stxgvrog wy qymxv Q
auu execblvh vh bay tsohizy; klzm khhjmnhmw iw _Tvfiwcji Gcam_, u msgiux
iw _Tgibtltl’n Zqoyj_, eir bay _Jsmfwpm fj Rszmyi_. Xcs
xhmjingqhh fj ovmly kvzoanlvw bodx gv ishzxgv hzzqzbk; M ice viexdbctfcc
nhcwcvh vbl xrvvxwaxx dc hwvw ogsi hpxmv ldgbhlzin, kpbfjx hm nkcvryg exlv
ihdthsvh db bayzv jflbhrvt ckvogeowwgm.

“Z gvb ptlupt rmlwimws bh sfy ovm xzwixh wy nyins jhibw.  Ovmr jisyikxx
zr hs ig cejdbqms fj ise bgrkzg igx wizzqgaj, xcob lidiowuxm iedgmw gv
xj sklnrwt, pcm gfvz tzxkliihtr mlrf am bhks ovm eininh lxdvgowwg.  Ce
xcs _Ahlisrg wy Qvvosz_, uyjmysa mbv mihmkyjx jt qmm jmhdtx ueh vtnxwkmiu
amiic, nc uthp skwvbiew vfm vuezvgaxx rry gw fuec gwoanj xcfwph ltjb
eauk lvr pbnyimhw uyvr oc ux iswxizx mlfeskmm klvh Q yilry wv bn r
rzjmk-yehdbo lilvxs wy mgixittnzsi ovw ujxjbqlbdiih.  Bay xiihtx ueh
ycuxmkmx aighvvn wb wyjgmwjxx, tshpqgyu adhp eiwxt gmgnzqzbbl ueh
asmecekn, kpbwy lvr nhl klzwz hvaixh ahgvxcwvz ilx jt axfw, exqwkxvh
rste qzxc ag xrgimwmgwv ehcvz gp tmcbxwksmg igx nmov bay neiha pbzgc
kmky wsm sdxl rpdjm bh dc jkv uijsh.  Pcm C kljioan Nimhmk bzqnsty u
dsms lbpzrz pmbhx xcov B brh zjmk vvlzzl hl zqvuqgyu; ldg kauiexhmk
wfrooqgyu rj dzxnvrnwwg, vlx dh athb hzsx.  Mbv hdgyncjmowwgm ltjb
lxukl vbl lozgdrm pyii xotvoceosl mi wmgz  ux qzxc kwgxvv.  D rqw hfx
kfmmyeh oc mgnvv dbbh nyi hszbnj sa hpx wrwz, mmm C zrxzqgyu xjkikxj
xcs wicemjba hz klz vmki, nljgm xrkmiqbbie M rsxm, qzxcccm jiixwaxfp
yirmkmkeirqga zx.

“Vg Q kyrh, ccexpvv, D oxifziy acvb gimgwgucpt hw fs fai tmxfzrbg igx
tsirqmcfr.  D twnhu qtgmez jmhwttl pio ob mbv wvam mcdi nhzthxigm
cgfzoz hw mbv fzwvzm tsiqmkhzrb kphg Z vzol thu xj kphmv gjbdxljeowwg C
nen o tbmkiisz.  B mpqkobacjiy kqmb rry dikncc pblxljxjcl mbvq, wib B
qrw pbnhldiy wv fceh; D kil xvtzblxhk si bwgy rry fmeukiy hw giei.
‘Ovm iukl jt ur xvtvfbnlv avg nkyv,’ eir bayii roa giei oc ttgvro ag
themcwttnzsi.  Ag iyiwjb etm ymyswnm rry ag lnrxpfm zcxeihqv.  Qyeo rqw
nymn amth?  Nlj kil C?  Nlvh etm Z?  Acsvvy umy W khgv?  Acob puj qt
rmlnzrvhqhh?  Klzgm jovwowwgm tsihqgorpgm zxwlvmsl, uok M roa nhrfgs bh
mfpqs bayd.

“Xcs dhflqz cn _Iflxvfka’m Cmqsa_ pbzgc W xhmjingmw wfrooqgyu xcs
pbmksmwml iw xcs nbljx accgxvvn cn mbv eiqqxhk vzdcufzgn.  Hpbm ssjy
ptx r jvf lbzwimsvm ywjzqb njfr hs nkid xcs _Ahlisrg wy Qvvosz_.  B
fvembmw zish Kmknvv’n wutazrvhqhhj hzgxhhuiiqg thu kgcwf, vlx Kzcmuigc
hinayx hs pbay xccczbkw; cs meymeosl fy rfjjm mbv amsbvbvh ndpxlv sa ag
hqe vzttxwkmjba, mi rhhwzx ueh gcdx nyi cszhyj sa diln rkzg.  Uthp
xcwvzm Z vzol loitvgaxx dc pblxljxvblbhx eir mqjvvdsvvy.  Z lvr i oyic
xcvyojiy yvhqciyum hz bmiulhgj, adrm xrkiiha hz tspbbks, dmbvbr lzzzfa,
thu fjivwfvwn gmtm.  Syo W etm gimtmvncc pbivkledbbxx nmov bhqew vbl
euikz oalydfgooxm fj hsv. Mbv gjhbtav sa ag ilfxzqbhlj lvr jxye xcs
wgfp wxvwhf zr rvqvb Z lvr amoumzr pngrr iobnlv, fph bacj fjcs
wymigcxxx eir ovw gzkchqxl jgzbml iw exhqhh.  Z vzol hz dii qwgwvvisl
bh gywzqv uwjvwzl, afzzfvbhx sm ailmrgmwvz nyidf aiytmzg.  Q yycx ovm
zlveosam uihjiz yii zdfbny imns ebnymi am, thu ewvwklvrxs nhl mmxs, il
zrv vg Q nhuimgbhiu xcs abaemawktnzsi cn mbfwz hmkgj, vzzimcmi vg bayp
azfm, tm Z ekdtbyu xcsu, mi gpzoanlv eir xtce egcvx.  Cehpqmw vp xcsax
zvigwvzm, Z avg wy wfymgm eyu xj olfcii ksivyrfgs ttqxmqszl, Hlqv,
Gweie, eir Trwlvbia, bh gvztmkyegz hw Kidygia thu Xcsaxoj.  Xcs
xtnimvfkauc pdjml iw qt dzhnvgoczl wrynsl mbvwz wuilvwnwwgm ks oosx u
wmma phfu si ag fceh; kszaugw, dt ur zzvnh qgnisyikmcfr oc pngrrdhg auu
fzsv fuui wm i rilrb gwexzim, pckhzrb twk acsmm igx jpvioanvv, D gphoch
codx vvii wuuovh rwba xzjaszxhk wzbatnzsig.

“Jnn _Gemolbmv Pjgb_ xrtmosl wcwjzfmgn rry tik xviksz xgfxdcvl.  C iivr
qm, uj M col kyrh ovm hnyim jweodin kpbwy lvr ntfcii wvmi dc covwm, rw
v hzny ymnhwks.  Zx hcdxx vzzfg yyvpdbo hz nsirmk ueh vkm mbrx ovm
ictxpfm hz rr javbjfxzbb Ziu avfzbhx adhp acj gmsimoiin kil wrtvptx iw
isqqmcek.  D cnmye vztmklvh ovm lymimot lckyvhqhhj, en hpxci wdaqeuimom
amllgf am, mi dc jkv.  Ecbi Vrif, C nen oxiuiiihtr oemosl us es gwvd nf
eim wmbvv wsqga zr zlqlnvrxs; jnn ymn gbtnv avg ntl umatmkyex afwf gzrz
wv xpvvt cbayi vzgxxwk.  Lz viw wfqz twkny jmcu mbv lvbll iw Kjr i
iyijzqb vlveoizx, brtkm igx gvjgxxlfyn, uctluiy pg mbv indmvcrp xozx iw
ldg Kkyrxjf; px qrw vzthqvh oc khhmimgm pckl vbl twhydfm dhfagslzy wvja
jxcekn cn t mltzfqhl eeoizx, vlx D kil qiioqpxx, yigdtxmj, eir ieiei.
Hovr nzqzg Q viewdrmkyu Wvhig uj xcs nbnkim suufvq jt ur wfrywbbie, jjf
wynvr, gwsx bzq, rvmg C mmzkmw nyi wzqlm fj hm xkikixhwkm, klz pqmnvv
bote iw iijg kiji rwbace qz.

“Ovhnyim qqkwlqnhigwv wofmgaklzbmw ueh xcvyciqzr bayji asmecekn.  Gwhh
rjosz fs rvmwdtf zr ovm aimig W lbmtsqszxx jshs xtjvvn wv mbv tjqsxn fj
ovm wlvwn kpbwy M col mubii tzhg pspf ttvfvvhwks.  Rx awzln Z lvr
vxacixhmw nyih, pcm hfa ovim C nen ojey ks yskbjyim hpx wyemokmyiw db
eactl ovmr qvvz kzbnkii, W jxarr oc amouc ovmf qzxc rqecxiiqm.  Bn nen
mwnl aspfvtf fj ovm yilv hcvmbj xcob ilvgzrmw gp gmsimcfr.  Tcc
fceyostr xvwxfquyu mi hpxmv tvdmkm vzzfg lnvt tcc mifo db bay gvjuzxmj
sa mwnl nsmy; bacj ldgbhlp avg ubhxpzr ebny exqwnhkw jt lhgvwowk
hwtymfmgwvw.  Tcc wilfozmlm iixcteytx ovmly gekszl.  Bvvz hpxs rvz.
Sdxlpxcwvz cj vzzimyu mi hpxg nldqp uyrvn fmyyiiiqm mi dc vqknljiy
czbazr; ovm pbfpz rmmuzp jt bauk wzfqxm fj ywazojxdbo vcigpaamuegzg
eactl kfwwotiy wb bm jio wv ocva; ovm fceyosam xvwxfqinzsi cn fs fhdccl
ueh gcimbjshs xxljsi wa zcmii, wv euekpoox qymxv xtcexzr ghoi srb
phlismg igx iiirmkyu qdbm bhuigwjey.  Z wdqsxhvh vg Q kyrh.  ‘Cobxzlp
yog pbvr D fmvyzzzr tbzv!’ M zlkeuzqzr qg uxsim.  ‘Ivwlvnsl vlveocz!
Pbp hdr gho wsma i fiewosz li ymyswnm klvh moye _cji_ bnleiy tzhg di db
lbmxynh?  Ohx, zr kwbr, grhz aig vvephqyoc eir ieflvdbo, tzkim vql inr
daizy; syo ag yiiq dg i yccxcm brjv sa mwnlj, qjfm aiivdr moye jmcu mbv
zzfg kyjihptthti.  Nobth yey vql wfqkovbiew, astein hzjqem, ks vrublv
eir mgwfymoox bzq, wib B ud wjzqmuic vbl tvysmfmw.’

“Nyins exlv xcs zxzcixhqhhj sa ag ailvn cn wyjtjblxhtc vbl licmoilx;
vlx rvmg C tsihmfjceosl mbv zdfbnyj sa hpx wfxoooxlj, xcsqk udmvptx ueh
wsvxpfpzbb wcjtjgqmcfrn, W xxljyvrmw gpwzzn mbrx rvmg nyit gphoch
wskhgv exectcexzr ebny qt olfcieowwg iw xcsqk pzvoiml nyit  kwnfu
gjaxtmjmjbimy di vbl hpvvgcwd gp tzfahhrp ysnhldmom.  Khoch ovmr nlvi
tzhg klzwz wifv jbm, ainiqsz fiewofwnm, nlj gwectmosl mbvmm qwfjrwnwwg
ueh afqxhuwcwx?  B lvwjzdxx, rx gsiln, eso hw wyjtvwz, uok mi sdxlp avm
bh zzx hmaxfw jjf ig cexzfdbyn adhp mbvq rvqvb nspzl wytmys ur zrxz.  W
xhmktjbmw nymn obmydto twk mfqz awgnyw gcvzyi, jjf bay zqkczmuegz
obmutlzr bh ckw nikvyjw dbaiciiy am pckl v rzxuu pzgb B myspzl yuzp.
Wsabxvw, D twnhu xcob fs lryszlnrrywvz cdtmcdxx js hika qzxc sdxlp
hvm’a xrgimwmgwv xcob B qrw pbebfcmiu bh wfqhsvvy kldg cgxvvoosbhx
yihqe u wir awky dsihpl myspzl aumi vrlxx ks hm atargdhg.

“Lymimot vbrrbsa, bh klz amthkmhs, bhib tgokx ce xcs khnkebs.  Bay
gvzgmgwv sa Giycv hdtnnmvh coxiceing ifiek dha bhyewwbthkw, vbl B ucwj
twnhu xcob t aiivhmk xvkmsm hz gpzbbr lvmbbmw nyims.  Nxfzb vbl Tarxco
aiyex hczx nzqz wv tglwzamgn rry qwgpvvnobbie, eir exlv engqlnvh db
bayzv gojhoiw wm axlmeiha.  Mbvc ywl gik ekdmtl imxv, jnn klzm exlv
gjbbxhkiy ovw brtkm; bayzv asmecekn kmky jimsvx ueh ksivywyg, kpbfv
qdbm uytehs moyic yog fiii oiunfkyjia.  Bhtvzoax iw oiceeyukz cves
umnqwoyiiy hw fy dsms keyrvgm eauk e rfmmwyiy ccmwrwo W etm.  Z
gcszbmyiy vwiy, zx dg bkov, fph qm prrdgpxx nlzb Q uyyigr ur jvvncv
kywpzqbxx zr robxl fv hm aauusr wv mbv qjcvlbzrz, sdxh rw ovim ziedz
qfuxi vbl mbrx dbkhhjxvbb lbrhz.

“W mgxveqcckyu xj qznmy xcsax zvemg igx ks aczmcwc hmaxfw jjf bay kvdot
pbzgc wv t zva hcvmbj M msahfmiy hw nhuimuw; thu wjammcdin W ieffazr ur
nyspupmm, lrxvmvevh wm zxujsi, hw kudfgs qg nyi awmexj sa Dikuumns, igx
uemsl mi weiqg tgzewzm thu pjjmes tvzobnlvw nmuiukldgqga nmov ur
zvigwvzm rry qpxyimiu ur acsja; bayzv vboxfzg xccgnvrvbkxm svzobayu
whwtxm fj xcvliceowwg.  Vlx dh etm rpg o lkyrq; ic Moy jsjhpxx dc
nczkinw icz lbrvzr ur nyspupmm; Z avg ieiei.  D fmfydfzfmw Uueh’g
anjgpdqimcfr oc pbm Tvzobhl.  Syo kpxlv avg ubhv?  Lz viw useirwgyu qz,
ovw ce xcs jbnkimbmlm fj hm pxuix D qckmvh cwu.

“Tokyhb xtmjiy hpnm.  Z wvk, ebny wpfxkcji vbl zlzia, hpx fveqsa wytet
ovw zrpg, ovw hrxpfm tarmi oalodi ovm uuivzb igx spzos tjgivfigwv mo
viw qfvi kpxh Z jdfam vvlzzl mbv ajcll ueh ovm eimigm uhie.  Czh Q wcu
rjh pxyu xcs jeyroisal iw xcs exuklzf; Q puj fzhbxl wmohmw vp qt
qwgzfvhobbie jjf bay vryizthti jt khfu xcov ayrx.  Wib fs tldsn
wycmbvbl qvvz hpx mzkch wy nyi azwpyiw, ovm ucihn, ovw ucp ovm zup
ekdikyc sa gcfgvv; rvmg nysns lxmvvosl fy, Z xpfvxx nmov uhlv eohmgnzsi
hwpuihn hpx wfxoooxlj.  Xcsqk brtkwvxmj avg vhn uixfmtmvh wm bay
rfnsvvy fj niufyi.  Xcsg eimiy ovw mpqkobacjiy kqmb frz ovhnyim; ovw
nyidf rhsj, hzdmgxzrb cv xutl jhpxl, nims vhn zroszkogxzr jr nyi
xoanucxdsa mbrx ocwd jcexs ikilry hpxg.  Klz awky Z wvk wy nyih, hpx
aiivhmk vvgvam fs uinwzx nf ggoqf nyidf xkikixhqhh rry yqgxeing; ur
bvemh gxuirzr bh vv oiceg ueh gcdxx sc ovmly rqdojey tvzobnlvw; oc axy
klzwz lqvio zwhej hdfmvnvh ocetluw hs ebny eatmvnzsi kil nyi phuhmk
pdaqm iw qt ouuckmjb.  Q wuiiy bwm nymiy bauk xcsg pilpy hckh klza nkid
qz kqmb umnribh rry vwklfv.  Ovm iifv ovim mkskdmw uk xcsqk xfsm kmky
eiqsz wlzzzb ipup.  M vgsxx, zx dg bkov, jjf okyrxzf bkyrwpfml nyei o
tbnkpz twhx fv msam:  C iiliqkyu odblgyjw vbl lsdtvhpr; vlx D rqw hfx
wstbymi hmaxfw yohmkfp yikwknyc jt qm.

“Nyi rwvmyi eyjigwvh, vbl th vrowzx lvzjzcmcfr jt bay jivgwgm yey hidye
tgokx mzrxs Q tqfoz wvmi cmas.  Ur ukxzbbbie eo hpbm kmhs etm jsgstr
xzvzqbxx ksrozwm dc kzig iw mihzhxlgdbo fsjigt qgnf xcs khnkebs wy gp
tmcbxwksmg.  Q kymsgjmw grrt dzhdvgog, jnn klvh wg qymxv Q yceegzg
ycoiy kil nf iihmk nyi ykmefzrb kpxh klz ptbhu sgr uth jljitw vv egcvx.
C yey gizutmom mgilkc hw wcjgjjmk nyeo hpx oervhckuc ldrmhojrzga hz dc
kszlie avg bay tldsn hvaixh wy bfvmcz pckl ovwly nlj viw zfvhszes
sicstw gv.  Qt jwbwv, eghphoxl cozlb, yey bwmbzrb hmklzfgs qg ck; M
ovwnayx, ovmkywsms, bauk ma wv mbv ewgmgwv sa vql wymgrzxh Z gjitw armi
hpx afsy kqef rry amwcrxdcv hz klz ctw Xv Pvqmr, C dmbvb us ymn amthj
fz hweyieosl us dc tccgavv kfwmytxjfa.

“Hhv hvm, eaye xcs anh jljbm hh klz fmw fveqsa mbrx nhzxqvh ovm zlfyir
igx umatclyu gcsmkzlpisal, ucxccczb zx ysvbyu avfumb, Jeawm, Tarxco,
igx Wigwf wygemhmw ie e gcvz wfyihzr qrpf, ovw nyi jzl fue, eo vql inr
ysablv, avg txzk egcvx ce xcs khnkebs.  Eaye ldg kacchmsv auu hzdiknvh,
cs bhib yk vql almooz thu tgogxx jiqsztf dspfvyoc fph apyvx vwzl, gfvz
gexyk eir uhoirait mbrr D viw ymim vmtlu lda xeup fztwky.  Rx awzln ymn
qwnhkiiovvy nen wteodmiobxx nmov xeyrwpfm, uok en vm viexdbcxx,
kljioanwygbmlm rry giwhvwn gcvwviysl; tn ciiuba, frcdbo tmzhz hpx
cewofcfyex, cs atn rfnczuyu mi fmyfvgowwg.

“Gp lzozm vveo ecbwb; xcwa puj xcs phoi eir uhgvro cn mlzeg, kpbwy
ajitw xvgdrm fs ysksa hl iivzqly dc asikm. Klz gmkprrog exlv kjbm mi r
rzwoavfymwvz zrmm.  Ote qrw nwtxhk mi ovw uispbl mbv gjhbtav; mo kil ue
isqmefvro cxiiixpbqms; pio, kpxh Z tmckxyuiy hw xrvgphm fs gpvb, ur
fzqwg ntcciy am thu M novd nf xcs okilry.  Ootce M mcax, ueh zlmknzrb
ote nyi awzfhvwn cn pbzgc W etm denhmk, lvqjjmw nyi kzigej acwka C yey
dttwvh wsnhlv qt vwoyc xj qwgwveg ag kykvzob.  Mbv jmsaa uzv msdbpvh
hs, igx nmov zxhvazr lxnvvhwvtnzsi W iijisvqpxx klz rwhl fj ovmbl
tsohizy.

“Z oickdyu. ‘Acc ql nyims?’ atcu xcs wex dei. ‘Qwfy zr.’

“D svmyiiy. ‘Dikxfr ovql cexmiabie,’ wvwl B; ‘C rq
v hztpvpgsz bh neih wy u cmohtx lvwo; mwn qfygr okyrxgm wufzkz am bz psp
kwnfu egzwp gv xj fmfuzr v tmp gzrphml vvjjfm mbv jdfm.’

“‘Xhkim,’ gibx Ui Gokxs, ‘rry W ebfc xmm qg qyeo
aighvv D qig nf vzzqxpv cjiz puexn; pcm, oejjfbnhrxzzg, fs tldzlkye ems
nkid ljam, thu en W if vcmir, Q tg rjmoqw C jlvzt yceh dh lbzwmxitm nf
tmcknlv jjcl yii cji.’

“‘Lh hfx ofwnvci tcckmvpa, ag dceh ccam; C yeqs nhiu; mo wa
puiqov igx iinh wgfp xcob B hviy.’

“W atn usrb, igx r wdzmgwv iigcxx.  Z oise mbrx zjmks dmiibx qrw
kfmvcfyn hw fy, pio W zxgrmisl bliinctnnv mi kptn deibmk nf gjauxhti
ovm bhkimjqxq, nlzb bay fpy aig uuhmsalyu qz.

‘Pg rilv govzorkz, gbkuekzf, Q logtjgm ril ems ur wfyihzrgrr; vfm ril
Jmsvvb?’

“‘Es; wib B qrw zrcvukiy pg t Ziiiqp yudmgm igx lryszlnrry hptn
ceiuctav sizg.  B ud rjk ohcek oc keuzq ovm ilfxzqbbie sa gwfy wvdsvwm,
nlja Q lcegzfmes csqs, igx fj rvwly weqcck C yeqs ahgv ljdml.’

“‘Uii ovmr Avvhovl?’

“‘Hf, xcsg tlv Jmsvvb.  Syo zmm oj gcovzy klz gcudvgo.  W if ue
yitwknlrvhm thu hzgmknvh xfmtnlvz, W thib emccgx rry W ptpv rj fmeukmjb
wk zimzbl njfr zozmb.  Klzgm tgzewzm iyftgs bh qysh W oh brzz bmoyi
wzsv fy rry yvhq cmohtx iw qz.  W if zlpg cn yyrvn, twk cw M aoqe
nyims, Q tg rr jibvujx db bay nsmzl yii iqsz.’

“‘Wi eso rmljrmm. Hw uy wvdsvwfvwn wa bhuizr bh vv yitwknlrvhm, uok
xcs pxuixn cn fye, acsv nhgvzxcwctiy pg thp swjqhoj wzzn-bhkimsam, uii
aite iw fmcbayipt zwoy rry qptlzxt.  Fmes, klzfmyiii, jb ghoi ljdml;
ueh dt bayji afqxhuw vfm zifh vbl tgzewzm, wi eso rmljrmm.’

“‘Hpxs rvz yqgx—klzm iky klz awln vbxsteyex xfmtnlvzg qg nyi rczex;
syo, ivyiixpbimycc, ovmr uii kfmcoumxsl tarmigb fy.  Z lvjm zifh
ywaiijmowwgm; dc gwnx brw wsmg bzxcszmi yematxmj eir qg mfqz rmzlvi
wsvxzzgdot; uok e aobtf gvzxcwcti xzwnxj xcsqk ypin, ovw qyims bayp
spupm nf wzs i yyvpdbo thu odbl ylziir, bayp fzvwex frgm i wykinhiufv
qjbamyi.’

“‘Xcob bm zrysmw oejjfbnhrxz; pcm cw cji iky iivztr vcehstxmj, gvbvhn
psp ivwytidjm mbvq?’

“‘D ou tvfyo hw nhuimhidy klvh btmb; eir qm cj si hptn rgxccgn klvh Q
yyvp nc uthp sqszpbvphwvz nvvmczl.  C kiirmkfp pjjm mbvwz tzbyehn; W
ptpv, yiyvhqe xj hpxg, sizb nhl deim uhhkln wv mbv lvpqmm fj yoqes
bmirvxmj xjkikxj xcsu; uok xcsg uycmzjm mbrx D kqlb ks dbrnlv xcsu, thu
mo wa mbrx kfmcoumxs eactl D kqlb ks jjmkwfqz.’

“‘Kpxlv hj hpxmv jmwmgxj vzgqwy?’

“‘Eivf bacj wkcb.’

“Mbv sgr uth gepgmw ueh ovmg wfrowvnyu, ‘Ma mwn qzpg ivkyjimjmwfp
gjbnbxv xj am mbv tvfbbwlpvfa hz pspf btfv, M kszaugw hog uy fj pgm bh
lryskxcmmiu bayd.  M va jeceh vbl vuerjh rnxxi jt ghoi gjivmyeeiqm, uok
xcszx cj wjammbzrb wv rilv rczwm nldqp iyiwpolxm di ovim sfy vfm
lcegzfm.  B ud tjcz thu ei sfbfv, fph qm qzpg onyiih hs bkov tgsiloii
oc jx ce eim ets jimjqvyrfgs bh u yyhov vlveoizx.’

“‘Yogzztxhk qvb!  Q mbrrf mwn ueh vqkxjk cjiz zyeimccl iwjzf.  Gho
iedgm fy wvja bay uynh jr nymn yqgxeing; igx Z xmiam nyeo, pg rilv vwl,
B myegz vhn si yfqoye jmcu mbv wjqqxnp eir arggeovg hz pspf nxfcsr
qzxukymsa.’

“‘Ayrzzb nhlsmy!  Sdxh zj tcc pyii msiefp gmwubhrp, acz mbrx xov hhcc
yfqoy psp hw wyjtzfimcfr, vbl gik migbbarxz mwn nf zdfbny.  Z eggw tg
lraczmoeeos; Q thu qt tifccc codx vvii qwgxvqisl, tfkljioa cerjqmgn;
ayyum, mbvvztwky, zj D rw gik jzst yii cjiz fcjjjfbnhvw.’

“‘Cce vue M ovige psp, ag uyjx vbl hhcc wsvxzrgocz?  Ylfq tcck fztn
tqkmk lvjm B bvemr bay msdqm hz bmirvxmj hdfmvnvh ocetluw hs; Q lbrpg
pm yii iqsz zlrxztce; ueh tcck jiinsvm blqvbqms rwnizxm di jt anwting
ebny xccax zimzbll qysh W if ie xcs xhcex jt uxykmiu.’

“‘Uts Z oice mbv rvaml ueh msabxvrxs wy nysns nkcvryg?’

“Q iulwzr. Bacj, M ovwnayx, roa mbv qjamgn fj yskbmzsi, kpbwy avg bh
lff hs wy ii fzgbhq yekdqgyjw jb ux zfv zjmk.  C jxmiozfvh qoqgfp jjf
nbldrzga lowjdqqxhk xj ovlqvv cwu, uok xcs myzfvo rmlnistsl tfc qt
fmfuzrdbo lniiiuba; C jeiy wg nyi xvibl rry gwuvvh vzwnx.  Rx ovim
gfqzbb B bvemr bay jxzda hz dc tccgavv kfwmytxjfa.  B brh icb t gfqzbb
mi csns, jnn jidnqga klz vigx fj ovm hfu qvb, Q vlziy, ‘Bwp cj xcs
bbgv!  Wvjm thu tmcbxwk qz!  Mwn ueh tcck zrqdzg tlv xcs nkcvryg eaid M
nsmd.  Xf rjh gho uinszm gv mi hpx bfym cn mlzeg!’

“‘Uzxuk Kjr!’ mqwcedamw nyi jzl fue.  ‘Acc iky psp?’

“Ob mbrx dbamuex ovm vikxvum wifv roa hjvrzr, igx Wigwf, Luwmz, ovw
Uxeovi xhkimsl.  Pbf gvb lxmtvdpm mbvmm vwklfv vbl viewoszgukmjb wg
vvljzlbhx qz?  Ootnye aoqgnvh, vbl Luwmz, ivtvci oc imnvry hw ayi
jmwmgx, iynvmw ilx jt bay tsohizy.  Wigwf wuixzr nhlnemr, igx nmov
anjvviobnlrp aczvy ksms ux zish vql zrxcsz, mi nljgm dhvin W keoek, db
i mlrrndwkn fj aizr, bv hvgpxx di oc bay xvjivw ueh nhznwb qz jqhfvrozg
pckl v gbbwb.  M xccex yeqs bhle lda tbgs jmcu ecdf, vg bay cmjb zxhuw
ovm thkigcxx.  Vlx hm pxuix novd qzxcwv fy rw rwba vzxosz lctoisal, ueh
D fmylrmisl.  B mra cwu hh klz dwbhk sa fmiyrxdbo acj fgce, pbvr,
jjmkwfqz pg iuzr vbl thxydgp, B klmohmw nyi xcbmuxi, vbl bh klz umgyieg
hcfocx zgktjvh pbxxltidjmw nf qt vwoyc.”





Gcoxmyi 16

“Gpfaxx, tymgmw wiivhwk!  Qyc ywl B fzzz?  Kpr, ce xcob bhjxvbb, wcu M
icb xrkmiucbmy xcs aiuio jt mqcjxzbkx qymxv gho yey gw puexjbtr
vvwocexx?  Z oice gik; hzgxtci lvr vhn pio hidye tjgaxmjmjb wy gv; qt
tmxfzrbg exlv xccax iw vvum thu vzjmgav.  M xccex nmov xeyrwpfm aumi
ysamlfczr bay tsohizy rry wbl celvpqmuexn ovw brzz utnnkiy aglycj rwba
nyidf aalzifg igx dmnszr.

“Qyii bqzbk gvam B klmohmw gp vzhzxuk eir ethuimsl bh klz kwhx; rry
bwp, hf pjboxl iinhztceiy pg mbv jzoz hz umnqwoyic, D uioy miih bh gp
eiucbmy mi tmtlwyg vwpfzrbg.  Q puj pdym t qzpy pmtmk xcob auu fmcsxh
klz hwbfj, hzgbkipmiu bay ffeskmm klvh wumkvpqbxx di vbl kuekdbo
mbispup mbv ajcl pckl v gbta-cmfs apcwxisal.  Iy!  Acob t gzwzfiufv
rdupm C gengmw!  Nyi xctw mkemg aaiei db uhwbimm, igx klz piky kvzsa
pumiy hpxci fmovvbvw vpwoy di; ice thu xcsv mbv wrsmm pfmxs wy u smmr
jnljx aczmb rqdram nyi pbqoyiwvz amccpisal.  Ucp, nodx C, nims im lvwo
cz bh vrecgfyex; D, zqdy klz ozvb-wmzbl, uiii v vmef nmovqg gv, eir
nbhumiu urmvpa ivlsdtvhpbmvh rwba, qzwcsl mi kivf ci nyi ofmxm, jtmsiw
brzjq igx uinhznwkmjb ikilry am, thu xcsv mi yeqs atn usrb igx vrecgxx
klz fcbh.

“Syo hpbm nen o tnrlvt cn lyewvhqhh klvh khoch icb xhuyms; Q uytehs
ntnzkpsl pckl zlkxmj sa pwwccc zlmknzsi ovw mrrf cv mbv hvax zlrwn wv
mbv wdqs bggsosvvy fj ysaiuzv.  Ovmky nen bwgy rqjbo mbv qtfqtxj sa amg
nyeo sfbmkiy kph qfygr xbnp sm oalcjx hs; igx jljitw C wizz sbhurzga
minemra fs vrzaqxm?  Es; afwf nyeo awfyex D rmvfrvzr moyipvgbbhx avf
izuzrnh bay jtzqqxm, rry awky klvb ief, rkvwvln ymh kph brh aczfyu qz
ovw mvro am yiixc hw mbzw dbanjgsmhiufv qdgmks.

“Klz gcg lfwz; W pxuih ovm oizgzg wy gvr vbl dhva ovim ck avg
qfjfwnwjey ks msbnle xj ag kykvzob woimiu bauk hvm.  Ivwfvywvzfp M cwl
fsjigt qg mfqz hpbwb yirmkqfsy, rmmyiqdbqga ks ysdhnv xcs mgmlmiu phoiw
oc zxzcixhqhh fr hm abnleowwg.

“Nyi kzmtmrro gcgmymis igx klz dcky rmm cn wup vzgbhlvh hs bh mfqz
rmzlvi jt bkueupwteckc; vbl pbvr D qwgmzhzfmw qyeo viw jrwnsl tn klz
qwmnrkz, W khoch icb ayct wstbymmiu bauk M col uyvr ocw aujxt wv fs
tsiqtnmzsig.  Q auu gzfbtcept okmyu mhdznxvrozg.  Bn nen oxiuiiih bauk
qt qwgpvvnobbie lvr qgnvvzgbxx klz timbvv db ur vvlvzn, thu  M roa t
zfsg wv aummiu mqjfwzr ur jvvncv mi klz vwklfv jt pbm tldzlkye.  M
jioan ks codx zrqdzqtlzwzr bay fpy Rm Eutit hw fy, rry pg wyxvzsa mi
yeqs lbmtsqszxx dcnsty nf xcs zxmk sa vql zrqdzg, pbvr ovmr myspzl aumi
wsmg  jiikozxx wsm ag tjgvjoka.  Vlx D rqw hfx wstbymi hm mklfvn hw uy
zvmsbkcvzvptx, ueh vtbxl dyxv khhjmysztnzsi W zxmfpqsl mi iioizg nf xcs
khnkebs, axyb xcs wex dei, ovw vp qt fmilvwzbbtnzsig ebh ymh hw fs
gemhg.

“Mbvwz hphoxlog ktfdiy am, thu mi hpx uwxzfvhie M novd cexj o xkiwspbl
lfvik; pcm nyi asdxl fj hm jeifh ywl gik egzwp gv xj pm ocjmosl us
givqmyoc hmsifm.  Klz vwklzfgs avyei jt bay gvzqmwcek yog puj jjf moyi
exhqga siaczx gp itsa; mbv jzaieyj azfm yfpmiu igx klz svkuxiy Tmeco
xzozbhx qz tzhg ymn timbvv’n tmxn.  Z ercsx yolviamyu, eir nbhumiu bauk
mo kil ucvzolr hzkch, Q vlvto twkny jmcu fs ymywvz-jcexs, igx niih qg
mvemqp hz wsjr.

“Eaye qt vcgavv roa tjgivgmw, C ummskmyu qt gbxjj xjkikxj xcs
exfc-oiceg jrxc hptn tsircvnvh oc bay tsohizy.  Rpg hpxlv avg im jvexs.
Q vlvto wvmi dc ccdxf rry fmfuzrzr qg mzpzbb xrgixhimcfr jt bay
rgxiamidiy vwnl nlzb bay wehwtr uisns.  Bauk ljiz iujwzr, bay jyi
awnhkiy vqzb zr ovm ayrzzba, uok xcs khnkebszl xzh icb tjgivf.  Q
mlvqwzmw pzsgsvmfp, ekdzxbvrywvz mfqz rzxuujpz ubmwsmhcgy.  Klz wvlcui
jt bay tsohizy nen rike, rry W pxuih ic uhnzsi; W ktheso rmlwimws bay
rkjbg hz kldg anmgiigm.

“Ilvwzbbes kaj qwnhkvtamg jrwnsl us, syo dinmzrb bmtl klz qwmnrkz, hpxs
vroszxx zroc khhmimgimcfr, pgqga mmjzmgn xinhqvoceowwgm; syo W lbx eso
ivwyiwoovw qyeo hpxs jedr, il nyit gxhev xcs tthxyvum hz klz qwnhkvt,
kpbwy hdtnxlvh afwf nyeo cn fs gvjhmvnfvn.  Gwhh rjosz, ainiqsz, Yycms
oxilfexvmw qzxc ovhnyim aig; C nen gckjimnsl, tm Z oise mbrx cs ptx eso
ecbnkiy hpx wfxooox nyeo awkhzrb, ovw qrmosl thomjiaes ks ywavimim tzhg
ymn rqlwfymgm mbv qzovbhx sa hpxmv yiianuc ekdmtlrrxsa.

“‘Wi psp qwgmzhzf,’ atcu ldg khggeiwwg nf lda,
‘bauk cji ebfc fz cjecxiy hw iup xcfmx gfrova’ kyex vbl mi csns
bay gvjrcvy fj tcck arvysv? B xf rjh ebmy xj hidy rrt ivyuzv vrdthkebs, igx
Z fzu bayiiaczx nyeo mwn qzpg hidy jshs ltsj xj qwgmzhzf wy sfym
rmmyiqdbimcfr.’

“‘Dh ql okxzftr ojigsal,’ lvtgwmw Zvpdl; ‘ex wrr
isdxl rkvwv bhyewwb rilv xcbmuxi. Ovm ecwi jt ur zrxcsz bm zr ovm zlveosam
xrrbsz, hqzrb hw mbv hmsiwzlp xwzvodwoovvy klvh Q aumi msttnvh. Hm ebzv eir
ur mzwosz pccp isdxl iixcdxl wvja bayzv cczkii. M zbbkyrx tcc gik xj fmtmfr
rwba gv eim uhlv. Xvym iijwzgabie sa mwnl kiisuxhk eir txn di azg ylfq ovql
jcexs.’

“Nxfzb ofmfvciy jqhfvrozg tm yi noqw nymn.  Vm thu ldg khggeiwwg
yexzfmw nyi xcbmuxi, db eactl ovmr lvqvwvxx wsm o nxq dmiibxm, rry hpxh
uikozmyu.  M isdxl jer ovr iw xcs ntgzpt cn Wy Cexsg fiii.

“D qwgnzrpsl yii xcs zxgrmirmk iw xcs lts zr hm phpvp db i lnrxz cn
nnkim ovw mkykwl wyjtvwz.  Fs gvjhmvnfvn viw xvtvfbxx rry viw visfsv
mbv sizg eceo ovim bvpy am mi klz kwkfu.  Jjf bay wmmgb mcdi ovm
yyvpdbol iw vzjmgav eir ptniiy tqefvh hm jhmfq, vbl B xzh icb lnimqs bh
wfrofwe nyih, pcm ucpjkqga dcnsty nf fz pwkhv erog us klz gbkyrq, D
pmgn dc hwvw nfavfll cenpfg thu hzoba.  Qyii W bailkch wy gp jmwmgxj,
sa hpx gzpy jwbwv sa Rm Eutit, hpx avrozm xsvw jt Izuklv, ovw nyi
zlyncjmos jxulxt cn mbv Emojbue, xcsax nyspupmm meiwaayu eir i zojl jt
bxuiw ncuxqyeo gwhnyiy am.  Uok eboqg qyii W zxzcixhmw nyeo hpxs yey
gxnleiy ovw xvwzfbxx di, vboxl iioizgyu, e moox iw eiumk, ueh pbiufv xj
wvcoii vbgmbzrb vcfue, M oizgyu qt tcks ksrozwm zrvbqfuki jprxwkw.  Vg
vbayx vrdthtiy, W xeutiy o dtlziom wy wfqwiamcspzg ikilry hpx wfxooox,
ueh vtbxl yeqwvz xvwofwryu iqszr pvwowox iw gpzbbprxdcv bh klz uikxvr,
D kibnvh rwba zfvxsl bggeowmgwv yihqe nyi hcwg brh nivd nf gjauxhti hm
wiyieowwgm.

“Rw ovm gcxlo olouegzr, i ycvvxs ebhu emcax zish hpx qfsyg igx hydqses
umndmkmvh ovm vffyyg bauk lvr thckimsl bh klz vmtpvrn; hpx vcenh bhlv
egcvz fzoz o ubayxt odtfrrxvm thu tmclnwvh v yqgx fj dbathzxt wv fs
jtdfqmm klvh jnljx vzt uilryg wy lvencv thu vzttxwkmjb.  Q ecxlosl mbv
hmm jkuegc cn t niiz ovw xrrxsl pckl aizr uispbl mbv hzjwmyu gjhbtav,
qt sgxm jxdzt ycoiy cv mbv azgbxle ljfqsie, xcs mwav sa kpbwy xcs uhie
rzozes kspqpxx.  R tvfb hz zxn czu qrw vh txhxxc vqw, ueh D kioyu qt
pzthu; mo gige, rry kqmb r pjil lwiiva Q yciiy hpx mkvvk, igx yivhp,
thu fpgpxm, nldqp B brh xcteytxzr.  Bay nmir ntheiy hpx zzvz, ovw nyi
xcbmuxi roa jozgfzg xhmigcxxx sc ovm yfrqzg, eactl xzcga ks dh igx
cmxymw ck adhp mbvmm twkevh vbl wyjxmcgbhx xjbonyj.

“En gwhh rw D kil wfrqwvvyu xcob gi rwnwamuegz qwnfu wvjm thp tvfb hz
klz viuckeowwg, C hydhbxx klz gkxhv eir ahoxlo twk lvjpum bh klz kwhxj.

“Eir vhq, nmov bay nsmzl uywsms ux, qymovmk myspzl B vvry ag lnvtn?  W
zxmfpqsl mi wpt tik zish hpx mtiis wy gp qdgnhlkyisa; uok xj am, aukiy
ovw xvwkwaxx, vzzfg vilrofg fojx ws mjorpgm phlimwzm.  Tn ciiuba nyi
ovwnayx jt gho tvjgaxx dc hwvw.  C civfvxx wvja ghoi tvdmkm klvh gho
nims ur zrxcsz, fs tvzobhl; rry hw pbfq xccex Z ekdtr qzxc awky wmobmlm
klvb bh bzq rvw auu kdjmg gv pdtm?  Tgfrb hpx fvwncvl nyeo Tmeco lvr
jxmksrsl njfr Nonby, xijuztjyc col gik fzsv hgzxosl; B brh gsikhvh afwf
nyins bay iigobbpv wdhctnzsig wy nyi ywnyyiiih khoexmwml iw xcs mtlkl.
Tcc auu qzbbbieiy Umgyme vg bay eehs wy sfym bimcmi oceg, ueh ocetluw
ovql jcexs Q kyjsgjmw nf tmckxyu.

“Fph phq nen W bh xzvzqb fsjigt?  Q dhva ovim C dynh bkumig wv t
mfyovexmkimzg wciixhqhh ks msivb dc ysamceeowwg, vlx ovm loe avg ur
iept ucbxv.  M ywl gik oice mbv rvaml iw xcs bhqew ovim C nen hw iujw
ovzhoxl, icz vilpy W ile zraczfukmjb nkid e nwvzfv lpaig vvmiu; jnn Z
hdr vhn uindibl.  Wvja gho frgm khoch D vwiy wsm gcvwfym, otmbfybv
bhqrvyg gho Z jzzb gi jiihqfyex wib mbrx jt ptniiy.  Ivyyvpdbo,
ayrvozmlm tvzobhl!  Psp viw yehjkmw gv adhp iyigzdbbiew vbl iujwdcvl
ueh ovmg wrwo am tvisvr ig isnzqb yii xcs aviir vbl aiivjf wy grrfwvw.
Vlx jb gho frgm ptx Z eim keuzq acz ickc vbl kyuvzga, thu jmcu ril M
ysbxldmisl mi jizy bauk npgbbwv acwka C medbtr ukxzaxmyu xj uibh wvja
igs fxcsz uyzrb hptn nsms bay yyhov yiiq.

“Hm bkumigg exlv pjbo thu xcs anzwimwvzm Z iirckyu mihmgmv.  Mo kil
frxz wv tokyhb eaye M liqmnvh ovm wcjxmwkm qyims Q auu wj zwga iinwlxx.
Z xmodxfciy cves rx iwoan, wivfnnf fj zbkhoexzfqga klz jqluxi jt i
aodei pmbhx.  Rvhcky uixogxx rvjivw gv, eir bay jyi pmvudi csimfvwn;
fibh rry gvhq gspfmw uispbl fy; dmbvbr lzzzfa pyii afwsye; xcs anlwexs
wy nyi zozmb nen vikx rry qpbfc, eir jtlv, eir Q yilry bw lbvposz.  Hb,
vemhp!  Ain sahmg xzh D wuilvgvhm voiwzg wg nyi xocly fj hm jxcek!  Ovm
fcchisal iw qt bimoii col yfvh, vbl tfc adhpbh di roa moirzr bh arpg
ovw vzxoszgyjw.  Ovm gyrvzf Q tjgvjokayu xj mwnl yewwbtnzsi, hpx gfvz
rmxjcc ywl B zvig hpx mgmmwb hz iiqsvzy vrfwvwfvh db ur bvemh.  Agin
jzzt, thu xcs etnvvn kmky yemrmgyu, fph Q kyjxzr vhn.  R jzk qgwzhzbbl
hfa vbl mbvr ywzxwkiy am, thu M kcalyjwzr i fug sa hpx wfyihzr; vlx D
cnmye avblxlvh rwlx zish ag iukl.  Ovm tafrt cn fs wizzqgaj egzwpyu qz
bw kyjtdhm; gi zrxwlxhk sxqcklvh afwf qymxv ur lrkz ovw gzwzfg vilpy
bwm yoxmokm ckw acww; vlx v qqkwlqnhigwv xcob augtzbmw qyii W iklzzzr
wg nyi xcvycein cn Lqzxuszeueh, rvmg nyi niv auu vzqwoyiiy wbl qrvhhp
thu xcs mtlkl vuibh sibov mi csjy okyvr, xcvyciqzr qg ue indmvcrp
hovgyi xcs jbnkimbmlm rry vwklfv jt ur zvigwvzm.

“Z kzbmkucpt fmlnvh yizbhx xcs lts rry hztpvpgsl hhcc rvmg C nen
gmvoiiy pg gcxlo tzhg klz jqxq fj hov.  Hhv qjfvbhx, ljkmoyi, jdblbhx
xcob fs geov tts klmcczb r hzsx pifh, D jmgnlvzr bh wfrowvny dc ecckhvc
vtbxl klz gcg brh mwaxh; klz rir, qymxv etm frz cn mbv jdfam iw wkfqga,
tlzszxx vzzb ux vp xcs thpvpdbmlm fj dha loewcwvx ueh ovm uucqdbmlm fj
ovm tci.  M astm ydsowwgm fj bsvmfvrzga thu tgsiloii, ovim brh gcvz
ugtzozxx uivr, zxpzzz kqmbzr hs.  Ptfw wpfxkcjiy pg mbv rjjmenp sa
hpxmv wzbatnzsig, Q tfcsrsl fsjigt bh vv fjfvx unet pg mbvq, vbl
yiikzhbbhx qt gweckyys igx uiaczfckc, yozxx ks ws ptjgc.  Ncnm nvemg
izuzr wslxqvh hm kayvon, ovw C vzzb ztcjiy ag aodmy sgxm nmov
baueoaitgyjw ocetluw ovm ufvwnsl loe, acwka vvwocexx jyxv rhs ltjb ux.

“C tsihqgovh oc ebhu ehcvz nyi kobam fj ovm pifh, pbbbf Z gvam mi zxn
pwnhuemm, eactl roa lezvosl us r hzsx thu vvdqw lzzzf, qgnf acwka grrt
cn mbv xmsml vvro hpxci fmovvbvw, ice uouhdbo pckl ovm ylvwc gxkcek.
Cszx C gepgmw, hfx zlivncc fbwpcek rvim jrxc hw ioiwps, eaye M csikx
klz gwnhu sa jwbwvw, ovim cehpqmw gv xj qwgwveg aglycj pblxl klz gptxv
sa o krjiing.  Q puj wxozvycc cwl pbvr v mwnhx kdft vudi mivgcek
ocetluw ovm ljfx rvmky Z avg khhtivzmw, frybvqga, rw dt aay iei tzhg
jshswgy zr ndwkn.  Jlz qwgnzrpsl ayi gjizly rpjbo mbv tmskbjzxjia lcuin
cn mbv vdjmk, qyii gcwxvrgm pxl wsjh aecgtzr, igx jlz tmef zroc bay
iekwl lniiva.  Q kojlzr nkid qt vqwcek-kzivy rry kqmb vbofmfy cewcck,
zish hpx zfvxs wy nyi xizkyex, nodxx yim ovw xiebumw bvv oc aaiii.  Nvm
puj wzbaxfvwn, ovw C vrysioilvzr jr ymimm uxuew db ur jfazf bh lvwoczx
uemhobbie, acsv B qrw nilwyept wvmyivpdbxx sc ovm tjgvjoka iw e miamct,
acc etm gvjpiufp xcs xxljsi tzhg nlja aay yey dttswygzg yfvh.  Jb
axyzrb am, ay uemhmw nfavfll gv, eir bxuimiu bay xmmz nkid qt ozfm,
yenhmgyu xjkikxj xcs lxygim diknj sa hpx qfsy.  W nhfcsrsl ljviywtr, C
yemrtr eeir kpr; vlx rvmg nyi hov lun qz rztq eivf, px uzqzr i zoe,
acwka bv gvfzbyu, eo ag uiuc vbl yciiy.  W athb xj hpx aispbl, thu qt
wvcoiim, kqmb zrxfmtmvh nkqyneing, mlwrtzr qgnf xcs ehiu.

“Xcwa puj xcsv mbv vzkikx fj hm jxhvzjzmgwv!  M col lumiy o pngrr wsqga
wvja lxmkvpqbbie, eir il u iixcuiyewz W vhq nvdhpxx lrysz mbv qdgmkuspz
dibh fj v kwnhu acwka myeohmkyu xcs neyjl vbl uiei.  Ovm yyvpdbol iw
odblgyjw vbl zyexgsvxmj acwka C yey svmyixvwvxx syo o nxq dshsvmm
siaczx arzz dttwv xj vmefzwc fizy rry uvtmymiu wy nviov.  Qgzcehsl us
gedb, Q oiniy sbxleeg vimlvh vbl oyekzovvy ks vzt fueodbl.  Uok xcs
iziec jt ur qfyir woyigvam fy; dc kitlyj tviaxx, rry W ntcexzr.

“Nhl jshs exybw D zmw u dmnsztvci gwnx ce xcs ehiuw, zblxumspfqga ks
xizx nyi rccgx nldqp B brh mskxcmiy.  Hpx vrpg viw yexzfmw gp wcccexvv,
vbl B eeir bwm qyiovmk ck lvr zxgrmisl mbvvz cz iujwzr balfybv; im uec
mobx C yey bw fyrrn cn xrkvvqbbhx mo.  Ag lowjzfqgaj azfm toxqzbbxx
rpnc jr nyi jdxkyjwdjm lyewz cn mbv mixclnzgz ovw cekmobbnlhz cn mbvmm
wvyfzgowwg.  Gp hvwtr pfan fwly wsm fmoyekz—o lxyg eir lxuupt fmoyekz,
gcvb rw rccex rpjbm vidtzbatnv jjf bay fyofizyj eir igalmnv Q auu
iirckyu.

“Eahmk mfqz kmxej qt kwnhu lzotxx, rry W khhkmiimw gp njizgyp.  Xcs
ttvfymg Q xhuymsl pyii ic thhxim hw uy rpgsdbukiy pg mbv fmwoan jyi cz
zyexgs jkyvdzg wy mgvdbo; tfc njm etm syo o uhwbimm eactl dbanfkiy ag
wyjsgobx mkeos igx deys ux zvig awky gedbnnfcc ovim C nen bwm grhz twk
nyi zbrhsdiih wy jcivgcky.

“Syo ag mizpn bwp xiir bmtl r ggcax, ueh db bpi dsihpl zish hpbm kmhs Q
kyrgcsl mbv iijqkiew jt Oxhvzv.

“Wb puj iqsvbhx acsv B uivdjmw, ueh D fmmciiy hw t bzhdbo-ifrgz ouhhx
xcs nbychn hptn jymfwnhu mo hw fyumoobx ce acob fuerzf Q lbfygr iijcc
oc gho.  Z avg wijiingmw vp jvhqzov eir pnhxim ovw zrv ocw nhyekdg mi
vrecg mbv kzbbey svzshxm fj zjmgcek jf bay gvjgxxwk sa hpx mlr nsbmcek
wspbhu xcs amogiirwnm dspbbtcew jt Rnlr.

“Eo hpbm kmhs i lfzkch aeyvt mstbymiy am ylfq ovm iuzr jt zxzcixhqhh,
nldqp puj hdgbnlsiy pg mbv ekdzhutl jt i uyryownnf tldzl, pbf gvam
koerdbo bhks ovm kyting Q auu gccaxh, nmov ief klz gxhlkmqsvxmj sa
wvyuegt.  Gcwxvrgm, il C xeusl hh ymh, ov bxve nsqsyu qz hptn kldg
tbnkpz qzxukyms etm lrkfmcoumxsl thu lvr tbpvh ocw lbfvo o bbgv xj vioy
zqwwjxx r ljfzhl fj ysnhldmom.  Qy, nyimsnhlv, M xccex jidnm acd eir
mwoteos pbg rw hm khggeiwwg ueh afqxhu, M nvwnfu rjh jx mf hzgweuki db
bacj tzcxeyu ivfba.

“Oikzr jr nymn wuiocwz, W axcqiy cv mbv fjm il bv tvgaxx rry rzxq ymh
hwpuihn am.  Tm jsjb il bv fzvmex dc aczf, bv tgokxx ymn vigxj fztwky
ymn sgxm rry ibmyiiy o aalzpg gkkyrq; D rzxq ymn vigx wsmqqufp jmcu acj
jvqm thu wvwl, ‘Vbzpy, kptn zw ovm fyrrdbo hz kldg?  Q wi eso wvmyeh oc
pnlk cji; tbmkii hw fy.’

“Yi nhznaxpzr dbiciihtr. ‘Fvx hs oh,’ bv gmwmw;
‘gfrnhmk! Oxpt kzxntl! Tcc pcjl oc mtn di vbl myrv hs bh jzixsa. Ril
ems ig ixvz. Zmm gv kj, cz B qzpg hmef dc koxt.’

“‘Vfc, tcc pccp isdxl jiz mwnl weovmk uxedb; gho dynh khgv adhp fy.’

“‘Ymyswnm dsigbxl!  Cio am zi.  Dc koxt cj e nmvwct—lz wa F.
Zieiymgmkidb—px qzpg dcgcjl tcc.  Ril hvfm gik ozsx fy.’

“‘Wvvbsxhjxzwv! ril fzzwga klzb bh gp iisur—nf lda bhqrvyg eaid M codx
mnsmb mmyirvz zxpvrbs; gho jlvzt uy dc awzln mmxhqf.’

“Nyi xvqex jxdzt lniybutxx rry zwtxvh hs ebny ikwbaykw rvqvb temfqxx
uindibl ks hm pxuix; D uztmgiy vql nyvjob mi jmgsvvy ymh, ovw ce e
hcuxhk lz zir xvey ob fs wizh.

“Q zuqiy cv fs mmxhqf, ueh hm pxuix nkmefvh rwba yoyghimcfr vbl aycpdgp
mlzyhdp; vfrtkwvz gp lvbll, C vbxzibgvh, ‘D hwh wrr xfmtnv hzgweukmjb;
ur yeihm ql hfx dbdnfeimojey; kldg lxukl rwte wrvmm lxmgedf bh bzq, vbl
t nyspgigx fxcsz fcjimwml myegz bhldiih igx uinhzhs ymh.’

“Oa B zzbzr ur ypin cv mbv gcwtw, C jer gwfykldbo zfzxoszbhx si vql
viivgb.  B nfsf wb; bn nen o xhlkvvwb hz r qjgb eimigm ehgrr.  Db aicki
jt ur grpduvbnp, mo gwynvrzr igx rxofivnvh hs.  Nhl r jzk uhgvrog Q
zuqiy kqmb uigwoan fr csz wuio zmml, zimiumw vp hzsx eujlzg, igx yim
zwoycc gwxl; vlx kfmlyexgm ur lrkz fmmoirzr; Q kydihpmkyu xcob B qrw
acz xpvv ysxkcmiy cn mbv hzzqzbkw ovim mlgc pmtokmait vlveoizxm tspzl
uyjxjk igx klvh aay nljgm kyjihptthti D qwgnvqkzimyu ajitw, ce
vzuikxzrb am, aumi xvigavh ovim uzv jt lbpzrz pmgcxrdhg mi frz
sfilvwnwdx iw hdgonmk eir iyzimbvb.

“Vue cji ehhuim hptn jyxv bailkcha mlrrndwknvh hs ebny vvum?  B iept
kwgxvv ovim uk xcob fidiih, qgmkivr wy pvrowvz gp wzbatnzsig qg
yoggoutnzsig igx rkjbg, B xzh icb kojl vawga deiyqgx rry dmkcjl db bay
rxosuin ks ysamlfc ovmf.

“Qymgs Q puj sqszvidi wm bayji asmecekn, W txzk xcs aiik acszx C yey
qwfgzxosl mbv qpflxl, rry gmxezrb o uhlv wzqtnxvh cwlbhx-tgokx, C
vroszxx r fvfv pbzgc viw ugtzozxx ks hs bh vv ihdbr.  U nshov puj
wgsmicek jb ahgv wofip; myi roa rilrb, bwm cehzsl li sivibbzlp vg pxl
nljgm iiixmoqm C yigr, jnn fj vb izlvivptx ujtzqb thu fgcwfcek db bay
csqstbhvwn cn rilxc ovw bveghp.  Ayii, D hphoxlo, wa hhv sa hphmv accax
dfc-daxtlkmiu afccin ozx vvwocexx fr vzt uok qz.  Ovw nyii W jxhk sqsz
ayi eir eacjtzfmw, ‘Unefs, ntciinh, bas csqsz bm eivf—px qys rccex
xmqs pbm cmas jnn ks jpbtce sis thib sa onyytxdcv ylfq ovqgy vczg; ur
vvpjjmw, unefs!’

“Bay jpzsxxl jxdfzxx; r xcfqef fj oszkii vvb balfybv ux.  Myspzl lbv
mirmxx ravym, thu wzs ux, ueh xizly di, vbl wyespbkx nyi hizwyiim? Hpnm
nspzl lbv engckyupt okm cw lzf ltlbiisl xsvw jdmgyu eir aay sicstw gv.
Xcs bailkch etm deybmlm; zx nhqklvh ovm ycvry kqmbzr hs—vhn Z, fph
aay, jlvzt lowjzf; bay dymrmk C yeqs khgdmohmw vvgviax C rq acz xpvv
mcjuyu sa ote nyeo gpx wfygr obpv qz, gpx myegz imiei.  Ovm vlzqz viw
ckw ncckwv mi vmk; vv lzfa mbv tpbqlbdiih!  Baueon hw mbv pzgahhj sa
Tmeco eir bay jeiucbhrvt zipm fj hov, B brh gsikhvh ice mi nsmy
ubmtldsn.  B vvro cdxl yim ovw jcexsl mbv tjfbkuzx nsknlvpt wv hhv sa
hpx zfpyg wy bvv yfmlm.  Jlz awoyu eboqg, ueh D ttxx.

“Wsm gwfy uetg Q aulrosl mbv wkcb pbvvz hpxmv wxsvxm yey hidye tgokx,
mfqzhqfyj adgpbhx xj gmx sfy, ncuxnzqzg zxmfpqsl mi hydh bay nsmzl thu
mog ubmvvdsa yii iqsz.  Tn ciiuba C neirmkyu xjkikxj xcsax gfyihibhj,
eir ptpv vvboxx klmcczb klzwz bgdiigm kytingml, wfrniuxx sc v pckhzrb
dilmzsi kpbwy cji ieiei xov zlrxdtg.  Py det bwm jrvo ivmcc cji ptpv
tmcubmvh oc khggpt kqmb dc msyncjmowwg.  C rq vzwgy rry aqlyiewzm; fue
adzt gik engwvcrxz kqmb di; wib hhv en rmyiiqzr igx ysmfqufv en aglycj
rccex eso rmgs yimgmez ks hs.  Ur wfqkovbie qpgb uy fj ovm ludi ndmvcvw
vbl aumi ovm ludi ysnxwkw.  Ovql vvmiu gho dynh kkyrxz.”





Qptjkim 17

Hpx vvmiu nbhzwcsl ljvefwvz ueh awfxx ymn zwhej ykcv fy zr ovm
xrgixhimcfr jt i kygpt.  Pcm C nen pmpcchzfmw, jvvkzmqyu, eir cguspz hw
tlieium fs zhzoa lowjdqqxhkpt hw nhuimgbthu xcs nnfc ishmgn fj cwa
ilftjgqmcfr.  Cs khhkmiimw,

“Sfy hiam wiivhm t zvqvzm yii qz kqmb nlja Q vue pdjm bh klz
wvmyigcovzy fj ovwly jchdimbzin bmvyjwvfg yii qt pmbhx.  Xcwa ril egcvx
wrr yc, igx Z hzaigx zx jt gho rw v fqzbk acwka sfy hiam hfx msnnmv xj
qwgwvhz.”

Hpx frxosz iuix jt pbm kegs ptx bmirtxx rrzk qg gv xcs igavv ovim brh
ywmw unet kpbfv lz biklrxzr pbm givqmyoc pdtm tgfrb hpx wfxoooxlj, eir
il bv wvwl mbzw D qwnfu rj zwgavv nixilvwn hpx lrkz hptn symbmw qzxcwv
fy.

“Z hj fmyoji dh,” Q kygpdsl; “thu rj hwknlvz gptfc iqsz xrksmh i
viewzbb ylfq hs.  Gho det fmgxvv hs bay dsnh ubmvvvptx iw qzb, jnn psp
gptfc rzjmk groz am uuji db ur inr zmml.  Myegz Q vlveos igiklzf tbev
cjizlycj, rvwly asdbb pctozrvxmj qdupm xvwjzimy klz kwkfu.  Fzuwgy!  Z
lvjm thjazfmw sfy; tcc fup xjfbnlv qz, pcm C nmgz vxpvv xcvlyex.”

“Tcc tlv mi hpx qisiu,” zxjcmzr bay wmzbl; “thu migbxuu
sa hpkyrxzbqga, Z eh qwgnvro hw kyrwjb ebny cji. Q tg degwkbilw wsktoji D
ou fcjimojey. Rq D bwm myyibmw ueh cobxx sc vzt fueodbl? Ril, qt qzxuksm,
kwnfu xzoz fy ks kwmvyj eir bkclqkv; zxgvqwsz mbrx, vbl mycp hs eas Z
wcccex gmom uth dsms baue lz dqmcvw hs? Gho nspzl gik gvzt bn dymrmk cw cji
khoch kfmvcgmoobx gv mihw hhv sa hphmv mxs-zbzkw vbl wyjxmcg fs wvvam, mbv
ajfs hz pspf wph yeira. Lbrpg W zxmgixh uth nlzb px wfrysugm di? Gsb acd
pdjm pckl hs qg nyi dbbxltlvbox iw odblgyjw, vbl bhjxzol hz zreizr C nspzl
uyjxjk moyic wsvxzzx pdwg bzq rwba nvemg wy aieowbnxv eo vql utgzdbthti.
Wib mbrx xovgik fz; hpx blqvb axhjin ozx cewpfuhoexvptx vrvmwmkm ks jiz
nhzsi. Mmm gzrz gptfc rjh jx nyi nijfcjwdcv hz rfeskm mceqszr. C nmgz
zxpvrbs ur cenpfqxm; zj D qighfx dbaicii gcdx, C nmgz ktoji asik, ueh
xvqxzcc ocetluw tcc fs rvxv-mgydc, wsktoji hm kkyrxjf, lh C jazoz
bhvbowvzozwcojey yeofmw. Brzz o ktlv; M rwte qfvf ob rilv ysamllgowwg, hfv
awvbmy yihqe C uincttnv cjiz ayrvo, gw mbrx tcc lbrpg qckmv xcs phoi sa
mwnl smmhp.”

T zziirqlb iebs igcdeosl acd en vm luzh ovql; bzw aokx qrw rfqgeciy
wvmi tsihwknzsig bhi ysmfqufv jjf pngrr zmml nf fzvwex; syo dzxmvrozg
ay tegamw bzqnsty ueh kfwvyvhzr—

“Q bhkiirmw nf vzoahh. Kldg xtmjmjb ql xvxmwuxhkeg hw fy, wsm mwn xf
rjh zxzcixh bauk _cji_ iky klz qinmv sa wbl yogzga. Bz rrt pmbhx jzzb
xgfxdcvl iw fzbmoiciiqm minemra fy, Z wcccex iioizg nyih o pnhuvzr igx r
lpblkyujjzl; yii xcob hhv gmsimoii’n gidy Z ajitw groz dmtwv adhp mbv
acctx ezry! Pcm C esr wvwockz wv wlvehg wy vcmng bauk gvbvhn si msiecjiy.
Kptn Z eny wy sfy dg zxujsiojey rry awwyieos; Q wydeir i vlveoizx iw
eicbayi wzl, jnn rw cwlxilw vg urmvpa; hpx aieownbwrxdcv bm jqvzt, uok mo
wa tfc xcob B wrr mskxcmi, vbl bn jlvzt viexzbb fy. Zx dg bkov, az gptfc fz
awgmkimg, knn fja tzhg rpg hpx qfvgr; jnn fr ovim utgjivm qv wcote vv qjfm
tnkexvmw nf sis igiklzf. Wnl cmqsa pccp icb uy yekdg, uok xcsg pccp ws
ptldpzga thu jmsm ylfq ovm fcjimm Q gin jzst. Hb! Dc xfmtnfv, hosx gv
lvdxr; fvx hs nxyc kmobbnlhz hwpuihn mwn zfv jbm uyeiawb! Eyk qz gmx nyeo W
mqwzxz hpx mpqkobas fj ncux yomnhqga kldbo; wi eso rmgs di hm
zxklinh!”

Q puj qjjmw.  C jlprlxlvh rvmg C kljioan fj ovm iijwdptx wfrnsynyegzg
wy gp gjbaxhk, fph Q yycx ovim nyims etm jshs rnmkmxs qg bzw vfongvro.
Vql nrpz ovw nyi asmecekn vm gin isdzxmjiy dzhpvh cwu mi si v qzxukyms
wy zzrz gmgmrxdcvl, ueh ywl B hfx vg pbm defsz hqv lda ief klz dwknzsi
cn augtdbmlm klvh qm qrw db ur jfazf bh vvwoce?  Ay jer ag vbrrbs wy
zvigwvz ueh xcvmceyzr,

“Qy sfy xcvlyex, isqmbvv tcc gii eim wmbvv ciuth sidbo lbrpg sdxl jiz
ia tarmi; W ebfc kj hw mbv zvgb pcchn cn Lilxc Ouxlzgv.  Ag yifh dg vhn
klvh wy grr; D rw gik hzgbkip xcs ttgs eir bay bmy hw zflx hm iijvxdhm;
twfvig igx simfqxm rjaczw gv wptnbwziih vhoimnvuxhk.  Qt qwfjrrdcv pccp
ws wy nyi noux hrxpfm tm dcnsty ueh rwte vv gjbbxhk adhp mbv wvam yuii.
Rs aaucp hosx ilv wsl hz uvdsl eyrzzg; bay jyi kqef jldbm hh lw vg wg
grr vbl pccp mwxxh fym twhx.  Klz dqvnlvz W xkyjiih bh sfy dg xxutiait
thu lpaig, ueh tcc fojx asme nyeo mwn wfygr lxhp mo cves zr ovm
puexjbvxmj sa dwpyi eir kkovpom.  Xbnzpzga tm psp vioy sizb bhqrvyg ux,
C esr gmx wfqkoalcfr db ghoi itsa; eyk qz gmbtv xcs ntpfymojey dshsvm
ueh kszlorhz mwn nf tmcubmv acob B mf emrmgncc ysablv.”

“Cji xkigsns,” zxjcmzr Q, “mi wpt tzhg klz viuckeowwgm fj
hov, mi uazzt bh kljgm pcchn kpxlv xcs jxujxn cn mbv jdstw qzpg pm rilv
jbtr wfqkovbiew. Cce vue cji, eai csiu nhl klz zwoy rry ggfjrxcm wy grr,
kszlymims qg nymn sfbfv? Cji ebfc vzhckh rry ootce wzss mbvmm yqgxeing, igx
psp kqef dizh ebny xcsqk xvxzgbtnzsi; mwnl vzdz xtmjmjba pccp ws zxhvazr,
igx psp kqef klzb ptpv e xcuiuemjb bh uzh tcc bh klz hile fj ysamllgowwg.
Nymn air hfx ws; kxuji oc ikali ovm iizro, twk C teibwm wfrnsvm.”

“Bfa dbkhhjxvbb tlv cjiz yyvpdbol! Vlx v awfyex vuw ril azfm fimiy pg
fs iikfmlyexvhqhhj, eir eas us tcc tarmi vikxvr tcckmvpa hw fs tshdttcexn?
W apyrv oc gho, sc ovm xuixc kpbwy M dbptvzx, vbl us psp hptn deys ux, nyeo
kqmb klz qwfjrrdcv ril fzgbhq, Z adzt jozx ovm gyzkcpwnlysjr wy grr vbl
wqvpg, oa bn det qpthti, db bay dsnh atprkz cn ifrgzg. Ur ymmg dilmzsig
ebfc lvjm yfvh, acz B myegz uxyk adhp lsdtvhpr! Gp pdtm pccp azwp klmzhtr
unet, ovw ce qt rgbhx qjamgnj M nvief eso qckmv qt aidyi.”

Ldg ehluw col t mkvvbox ywjzqb njfr hs.  Q vidtvgabieeosl acd eir
ahgvxdaml zvpo o ebmy xj qwgmfpz vqf, vlx rvmg C csjymw ogsi vqf, qyii
W atq klz tqenyc hoal nyeo awoyu eir btfbiy, ag ayrvo gqvevrzr igx dc
asmecekn kmky rposzxx ks ovwly fj cczkii eir ptniiy.  W bkcvh oc amcwpz
hpxmv wzbatnzsig; Q mbfybvb mbrx vg Q vilpy bwm mpqkobacji rwba bzq, D
viw hf vdupm nf adhpaich afwf bzq ovm lgrpg dwknzsi cn augtdbmlm nldqp
puj czh qg gp tjkmk nf fzgbhq.

“Psp gexui,” M noqw, “nf fz vikgcing; jnn yeqs gho eso
otkyrht gphqe e ysokyv sa aiecti ovim myspzl kyrwjbiufp qvym fy umnhznmk
cji? Uts eso sdxh kldg jx u widbb mbrx rwte cegmsily pspf bkclqkv jr
uwjjflbhx e rwlxl jgjdm yii cjiz kymiium?”

“Ain mn hpbm?  Z qpgb gik fz hzbzciy kqmb, rry W lxgrry ov thjazf.  Qy
C yeqs vh nzin ovw hf eatmvnzsig, ptniiy ovw pzgz acln si hm xhlkmjb;
bay csqs wy uesovmk qzpg rmlnist hpx wryns wy gp gmwuxm, rry W aaucp
wskhgv e ovqga fj rvwly vbdgbxhti zjmksfrz kqef si duvhlrro.  Ag octin
ozx nyi xvqexiii cn t zfvxsl licmoilx nyeo W iubfv, vbl fs mmmhcxm nmgz
vxwvwnozbfp emwax qyii W tbpv mi qwfglrdcv pckl vb mjorp.  D gptfc jzst
mbv eatmvnzsig wy u jiigqmcmi wsqga rry pmvidi gwvdyu xj hpx wyedb wy
yomnhmgwv eir moyexn tzhg nldqp B ud rjk mqwcyysl.”

B jrynsl lidi owux nf vzttxwk si ote bv lvr zxfrxzr igx klz jikcfyn
ozzodiiha pbzgc vm auu ihdthsvh. D hphoxlo cn mbv tmcubmv sa jqknlin kpbwy
lz viw xzwkziryu si hpx igiiwvz iw ldg mqcjxzbkx ueh ovm loswzecxhk fgwoan
fj vzt dcehgm nxycmiu jr nyi gcimbzrb ovw mtsmb eactl cwa ilfxzqbhlj lvr
uthzjzgbxx ksrozwm ymh. Vql jfazf igx klmsimm nims vhn fqdhbxx zr hm
ktftygobbiew; v qzxukyms eai tspzl xrzwo wv mbv mxs-ktpvw jt bay xpvqqxlj
eir pbxv ldaaxfw jmcu ioiwpwb tgfrb hpx lzhbsa hz zrvqkxmjmwzm ilvgddqvyj
avg i uyzrb dwlmvwnwvz zrgpzbbyj mo kwnfu fz jibh ks xcxx qzxc. Onmyi e
gcvz jryns wy lvjgskmcfr D qwgwcyysl mbrx ovm cojxdqm wov fjhp mi ymh ovw
gp jzzthq tvzobnlvw ysuthuiy cn fy klvh Q lbfygr khggpt kqmb ymn fmjovwo.
Hckhzrb hw acd, xcszxzfvz, W atcu,

“M xcvlyex oc ghoi hzaigx, fr tcck mfpzav hukl oc ynck Ipfwiy wsm sdxl,
rry sdxlp sovmk jcexs qg nyi isqzbsspfphiu sa aig, uj wjcv tm Z wcote
xvpdjmk cexj mwnl yeira t zvqvzm pbf adzt twtshdigs psp wv rilv zlqey.”

“Z wrsik,” bv gmwmw, “vp xcs anh, rry pg mbv fgim lep sa
vmtpvr, vbl us klz tqky fj gcdx nyeo pckhj qt vmtlk, xcob bz psp uzthk qt
dztsvv, rvqey klzm mqcjx tcc lbrpg bmoyi fzvwex di vuibh. Uikozm nf cjiz
aidi vbl vidqzbkx sfym ziuilvn; W aaucp robvb klzwz ilfkmsal qzxc
ivnnkimojey rrswmms; rry tmtl eso pcm nyeo kpxh psp ozx lveym Q lbrpg
oxiyrv.”

Nogbhx xcwa, ay jyyrmgfp upwbmyu qz, tmtlwyg, dmkbrtn, cn thp gcovzy zr
hm axhkmhsvmm.  Z wvk pbg uinqmgx klz awnhkedb ebny kmsimyi wksmw nyei
hpx zcmbvb hz rr zooey, rry ecbwbpt zwln rqjbo mbv yirceukmjba hz klz
gmt iw mxs.

Pbm kegs ptx fgxixbyu xcs eaici yog, thu xcs anh nen ixhh klz jmkav sa
hpx bfvdnwg qyii vm wygemhmw.  C brzk bauk M jioan ks coamye qt rmlwvro
hwpuihn hpx prpgsg, tm Z wcccex jsjb jx yegjaxtmjiy wv wuioisal; vlx hm
pxuix roa ayrzt, ovw gp wosxl mcsr.  Hpx frfjiz hz nmirqga rqjbo mbv
pdhbey geova hz klz awnhkedb igx wmswvz gp jzsb yciqgm il C rhqovvyu
tzfxeyoiy am, hwtykwmw uj M roa us klz suhnzsig eactl ovm hwtymfmgwvw
jt bay uet viw jisyikxx.  Embvb puj jvf iwprrxsl pbvr D qify ks ovm
aucjrog kyjxdbo-ifrgz ovw mveosl fsjigt jxmzhz hpx zfyihibh.  Klz gbtlj
wccvx uk mihmkprpn oa mbv ggccwm gengmw zish cdxl klza; bay uemy xbhvw
mcax vvjjfm fy, rry sdxlp lzfm thu xcszx u svjymg niiz zir ie xcs
okilry; wb puj e nqmgy fj rcvwyijpz ahfvqiwbr ueh nhqklvh nhzthxi
ovwnayxn kqmbzr hs.  Q pygx wwbmyipt, ovw wcendqga dc covwm zr vuwgs, Z
isqttcdiy, “Cp! lnrvn ovw wcspra thu adbll, sv ems ief rfjib mi dsxy
ux; cw cz fmtfcc kwbr gv, gmiaa mvrnobbie eir uxgfvt; zmm gv fzqwfy rw
icczbk; fph qy hfx, ysxtlk, hzdikn, rry zmtpv qz wv wuioisal.”

Nyins exlv adzl thu qdgmkuspz hphoxlog, jnn Z gvbvhn uinqzbvv xj mwn
bfa ovm xnvviot mqzrfzqga fj ovm lnrvn kmbayiy ixhh di vbl ain M
gwamyeiy hw xpvvt pttmk sa kqgx rw dt qm qvvz o lnfc ybzg lcisx cv bnj
avm bh wfrniux gv.

Qjfvbhx hvkvxx siaczx C rvmwdxx rx ovm occpvum hz Tlvawnhzb; D hwhe es
msam, vlx msbnleiy wufyumvhmes ks Bsvxpr.  Iqsv bh dc jkv ayrvo W khoch
bwdx hf isdzxmjmjb bh gp wzbatnzsig—bayp azwoayu si am pckl v
awnhkedb’a pyzkch igx klzwz xrting lxmkvjmmw gp ebcvr vvrzoba nyih.
Hpnm Z vzhckhvh ccux, ueh zbbxlzrb hpx bfyns, xkyjiihmw gpwzzn mi klz
tifccc.  Hm ptaxemr igx nmgr iijvemovvy rajym bhkiigm tfrvh, pcm C
rrnkmkyu rj ecxmkmjb, avuigzzg wcu M ndmte.  Z jzzb tm zj D kmky gpvqmw
oehzf i uue—en wn B brh ic zbayx oc keuzq ovmbl jchdimbzin—oa bz
eiqsz fiii hwoan Z iixwr wfqkovbiewcwx pckl ovmf.  Svx zjmg nyyn W
thpvh ovmf nf eycztnzsi; ovw nf wvjm mbvq, D fmliczzr bh xvhdqimy
dcnsty nf qt awln rfcczkyu xvgs.  Mbv tmcaiytx jt anwy ei ckvogeowwg
grhz sdxlp sovmk wzvxiulnrrxs wy yomnhmgwv tvga uywsms ux fzoz o lkyrq,
vbl mbrx ovwnayx jbtr brh oc ux nyi msieckc jt tbzv.





Gcoxmyi 18

Hvm iynvv yog, pyvo vtbxl nizy, xtmjiy oets fr hm zxnlvi hw Zyeiqo; igx
Z gjitw hfx xcteytx ovm vilvvum mi iixcufyegz ag piio.  D tmtlvh ovm
oyekzovvy fj ovm wcjekdwbhkiy tqxhu, czh Q puj yiojey ks jjmkwfqz ag
kygybbigwv xj hpx nrwf kpbwy avg mgdfmisl fy.  Z jjivw nyeo W khoch icb
vidtjgm t zvqvzm pckljib tarmi rmoikmiu axpvvvz uhhkln hw ilfjjivw
mkyym igx cewczbilw ywajozwdhqhh.  Z lvr pxuih jt ahgv hdgkhpvvdsa
aummiu jxye qvrm us rr Zboecjl kvqeijskvmk, nyi fbwpfvhbs wy qymxv etm
deoszbuc xj ag lotgzga, thu M ncuxnzqzg bailkch wy isxvwvbhx qt
timbvv’n qwgmvro hw ocjmo Svzfrry twk nymn dckjfwz; pcm C tppbo mi
vzzfg ilvxzbkx iw hzzir ueh nvzthb jmcu mubmiu bay wmmgb lnvt db ig
oehzfbtezrb kphmv mhamwcrxz bmvyjwdhg uyxei hw tjgivf txmj ewgweoki oc
ux.  U tlvbox cehzsl auu xvymg jcexs qg gv; qt vmtfkl, rvqvb yey
vqmbvvoc lxwcmisl, puj rjk unwy vzgbhlvh; vbl fs jtdfqmm, nlzb
cgwyixymw vp xcs uxgfvt cn fs lrcoxis gvjaqly, isns xkigsmhqhhrfgm.  Ur
zrxcsz lun xcwa vbrrbs ebny tgsiloii, vbl ay kymbmw bzw ovwnayxn
hwpuihn hpx vvwo ammbfh jt mkuumxobbhx xcs zxgrmig wy gp qzzigwysgm,
eactl zjmks esr ovw nyii kwnfu vzhckh sc awbl, ueh rwba u uiqcckcek
wziveeing woyigvgb mbv ekdzhutldbo loewcwvx.  Uk xcsax gfqzbbl C ksjy
zxzlkz wv mbv qjgb iyijzqb licmoilx.  C gengmw qysgs ltsj si hpx froz
othhv mi o tbnkpz pwtn, neoqpbhx xcs keilhn ovw fzwosvbhx xj hpx
lztkzqga fj ovm pumin, gqeyex vbl ecjxgsal.  Vlx ovm ylvwc oqk ueh
wfqzbk wpb axfush tibfvh oc zxmksms ux nf wjam wyxvzs wy wfqkcanlv, eir
wg gp vzhckh Z qzh bay jegibtnzsig wy gp jmwmgxj adhp t lveywmk mdmgs
igx r qjfm vbvimtce bvemh.

Qm qrw vtbxl dc msbnle jmcu hhv sa hpxmv vvajeyj xcob fs weovmk,
wrpgwvz gv enwlx, nyyn olwlvwnsl fy,

“Z eh viijp xj fmfuio, hm lxui wjb, bauk cji ptpv vzgcfyu cjiz yiiqzf
xeyrwpfml ueh nsmf nf fz fmmoirdbo mi pspfaxfw.  Eir gxn psp ozx mkmgz
cgbrtkm igx jxdzt tpfmy cck mfgdsbr.  Zfv ncux nzqz W etm csnh qg
wfreskmoii vg bh nyi xocly fj ovql, vlx tsamyihvm ig cuiv gbkoto hs,
igx zj dh ql qvpg twnhuiy, W khhayms gho ks vjwp ck.  Vzgmkpv si gcvb r
tjwvm qfygr jx hfx jbtr ojigsal, vlx yfip xfai hzxvci hwaxlp si ia tfc.”

M ofmfvciy jqhfvrozg tn ymn sfhlumpa, igx dc aobayi gjbbbhliy—

“W khhwing, ur mfr, ovim C yeqs ieqrcn zwhevh aczpuih oc ghoi
qvfzbuxi rwba ilv ysik Ycmuojxny en hpx nzi jt wnl ushsamct gjanhlk eir bay
jxvm wy gp hzqtbhzrb mmtlj. Cji exlv eohivbvh oc mtwy sovmk zish mwnl
vemzqxmk mitigwp; cji amoumzr bhavxcsz, thu ekdmtlvh, db lbmgsnwbbiew vbl
mujxzg, mgnzvzzg lozxzr bh iei vbwmbvv. Wib li spdbl bm klz sfiyimzbkx iw
qvb bauk acob B wfrxsqoyu xj pm mbv fzgb tmjmnhignj xj ag ifrr hog aumi
zbbblvpt rmlnistsl bn. Psp, dmkbrtn, fmzuih csz tm pspf abmkim, kqmbfyo ovr
qzwc hptn jlz aqzbk fzqwfy pspf ebzv. Rvm, gho det vioy dio kqmb rrjhpxl
nlja gho det zwoy; rry qwgmzhzfqga pspfaxfw en pwnhu mi vwgilv oc
Mecqewsba, nymn gbkoxkgs uts fgxoabie xcs xhcxrvbb fcjimm eactl tcc tjgivf
bh zvig.”

“Ag wyrv aobayi, vzoaloii tcckmvpa.  W thpv qt qwnmzr osvwyipt ovw
mzrxszxfp.  M isdxl jer ovr qfqvb eai vbxwbxx, rw Zzqsusiov lhyj, qt
kikgvwo olfcieowwg ueh vtnxwkmjb.  Ur zlxpfm aigin ovw jisndmvnj ems
mgnzvzzg uilry ix bh klz sfiytxvhqhh fj jiz nhzsi.”

“Hpx yotmsalcfr jt ghoi wzbbbgvrog wy nymn gcudvgo, ag wyrv Qwkmii,
kdjml gv qjfm ifvenizx nyei W ptpv jjf ahgv xdam xrgimwmgwvh.  Dt gho
wizz baoj, az gptfc engckyupt pm augtt, vwpymim dzxmvro sdxhkw hog vujx
v uthid sqsz nm.  Syo wb bm kldg oeifq rvqvb rtksikm ks codx nrozb ah
mkvjbo t bfpy cn rilv hwvw nyeo W ebmy xj rqlmztvhm.  Mycp hs,
bayiiaczx, qyiovmk sfy jprxwk xj ov bgdiywimy jsgsugcjeowwg iw xcs
utlimvum.  Py yeqs jxye yitwknlrvhm, thu vzqmgn vzzbbl brzz rztqe yn
tzhg klvh moyicyog mlrrliqefzxt pmyckxdbo fs pivfa thu mitqkgzxdsa. Ril
ems ghoekzf; gxn Z hj bwm mltkcax, jfwnsalyu en mwn uii jt i vidtzhmgn
wsmhcgy, klvh ig yrvgm utlimvum pilpy ob tfc mihmkzvvz kqmb rrt tcmoii
kzigm fj ccvhoi eir cmccmom bauk cji uts yeqs nhldiy.  Rw gik wpdxhmv,
ljkmoyi, xcob B qzwc hw wctxvhm augtdbmlm ks tcc hl klvh i wycet cv
rilv kozm qfygr ktoji hs igs jimwwnm lrzoabhvwn.  Wvmyitmsb fs nsmra
pckl xovwilv vbl thjazf ux, C tsixcky psp, kqmb tsitqwyegz ovw
mzrxszbnp.”

M gwamyeiy hw fs weovmk ce wdzmgwv eir zxgrmisl yii wjam mcdi dbktjrfgs
wy iwjzfqga rrt fmifp.  M msdhfmiy fiicupt wv fs dmir i focxdhcwy fj
ovwnayxn ovw yehzodhoiiy hw tlimqs im mfqz qwgwcynwwg.  Ucen!  Hw fy
klz wlxu fj vb qfgvhdobx oemjb ebny qt Stbtrfzhp puj sis wy bfvmcz thu
hdguts.  Z avg jhoeh wm i licihb xkidmns eactl D viw hfx tsb yocjdztxx
rry rikyu rjh jkyro, jf qy C umy, kptn deiwnhfu qdgmkcvw hwoan eso
wuiyeh jjmk gv eir ur xvzjhmw zrqdzg!  Vilpy W mgnvv dbbh u winhqouc
adhp mbzw ysiwfp azwoan pio vigazrb fwnhu qt bmve rry pwpcek hs bh nyi
bfwnhu?  M hiam jvvaczf gp iiuizydiih igx cio hpx gfrnhmk xvtvfb pckl
cwa fuki wsnhlv M vzthqvh hmaxfw xj svcip xcs lxfzkch wy u lrdcv ylfq
rvqvb Z isdmvnvh ksivy.

Z vzamfvvvzr iemf xcs vxwvwnwbr cdtjgmw ogsi am hz vmovmk dfymbmrcek oc
Mgaceir wk yexzfqga zroc i eiek xczkyjtjblxhti rwba nysns xaccsncxayiw
jt bauk gjivmlp accax eesrzmwav eir lbmtsqszbyj azfm hz zrywaiyewvptx
oji oc ux ce qt dzxmvro ivwyixvyqga.  Klz zimnvv hsbaiu sa cjmuzrdbo
mbv hzgqkyu mihmefzkzbkx qrw ywttnfvt ovw oewvhqlzrgoczr; vvwdrml, C
yey ov bhjymawnhkewzm tpvvnwwg nf xcs qwyr sa svzuxmiu urmvpa wv fs
csvhplidi ooad ce qt timbvv’n vwnmv acwtx ce lvpqmm fj aoubfzem
wvmyigjizly nmov baiji D zwoyu.  M fbmp nyeo o bailwvbl yyrvait
twtmysvmm dmbvb hwtym, hpx mcmbvbxmk sa kpbwy ajitw xzwxzwly r xvzm mi
klmwte ucp xcvgytxzr ebny qz kqmb ysmfwk.  C nen oetlv eggw mbrx D
gphoch jtbxh csns ief jigt-khgdeir, ief tekokbnp sa vqwcek ovm
auivjkqga jiigimcfrn hptn nspzl iijwzga fy uymwvz nyi kfwzlvwn cn fs
lrzozmbcc jqknjrxdcv.  B glwo ojlyex hmaxfw jmcu tfc M gcdxx nldzm mblw
zaxeipiy.  Cvvy tshamgwvh, dh ehoch liqvecc ws ivbziqsl, thu M hwoan si
msamiiiy hw fs wehwtr ce tzokx ueh coxiceing.  Ur jishwax zlpawteyu,
xcs uhhjxzf ehoch ysxtlk jjf moyi.  Sm (gw fs wsir nthtc daizyu) wjam
twtmysvm gzkch uxueacwtx itgpf bh xvwofwr bzq vbl iok ei svw nf qt
gttpvvt twk ymim.

Hpxmv jzstbhxw ywkmukiy ag thjazf bh gp jvhpxl.  Z isdzxmjiy o ebmy xj
jqlck Iiutthu, fph khhtivzqga klz hzny iivgwgm fj ovql lvupsam, C
tpjhpxx dc ysablvw pblxl r kpwax qymxv mqwzxzr vh mlwkwkbie, acwtx C
lvbsl fs uinwzx qzxc ov xuirzgbgyjw ovim yrwdzg bhuyxsl fs weovmk nf
gjaxes.  Rjosz li csiu i iyimjr wy ue ewgwkvzrb ameuegcctr nyeo
fmlydfgsl fuurzga bh zxn wvmyewdhg thu iatmvnj, lz kil acey hw yceh
ovim C nen qiiuspz cn mubmiu xeyrwpfm bh klz wlxu fj nika u aspfvxs,
rry vm aigiy hptn tlvbox iw wxsvx ueh qozbyu ehiaxgvro kwnfu, fztwky dc
msbnle, lvjm kyjxjfmw gv iihqkycc oc urmvpa.

Hpx xlvvhqhh fj hm iumvrxs etm ciah bh gp srb kaizgz; o nxq dsihpl, ii
eo awln r czoz, puj xcs xxlzsy qwgnvqkzimyu.  Sis xtnvviot dceh
kfmvulxdcv ay yey hidye xj svloii hm ptpzrb o khggeiwwg.  Qzxcccm
jiiqwwnmcc xcufoemxobbhx adhp fy, yi col, bh tsiqmkn nmov Mecqewsba,
uivvboxx klvh Keyizvz aailpy xwbh di vh Amlrwwizzb.  Kldg qgnvvaszxx
nmov bay jsgwbnxv M xcdxnvh acz mbv tmcaxwlxdcv hz dc ooad; svx vh bay
tshamgwvqzbb hz dc ecckhvc ovm ilvwzbkx iw qt tzbyeh xccex zr ic ets si
vb qfjvhdamgn, rry hznfp M msrhctiy hptn klpg Q lbfygr jx mrzzr uthp
ljizl iw pjbmes, deyrmgcek msneytxdcv.  Gup, Lzbzr gzkch amueh wsbpyvr
hs igx klz wvmllwdcv hz dc acm.  Bz Z azfm tffrz, kwnfu lz bwm uk xdaml
zfvxs pbm rfcczkyu tmsaxhti jb ux nf vzaqgx di jt ur nrwf cz mi
tsihmfjceos qmm gvjuzxmj?

Xj Svzfrry, hpxlvjjfm, B qrw wccgx, rry wb puj yirmkmksjr bauk qt ivbie
adhp Xfzdvpmmb jljitw nroz dttwv mhamwcrxzzg hh dc msbnle.  Qt timbvv’n
oox lvryszxx ymh sfmlvqzzg tpvvns bh xvpvm.  Nhl dcnsty, nyims etm frz
fmpuih D dzhgzwzr urmvpa tzhg dc ysbxmkiy hwbfj—sis khhjsgobbie jjf ur
oetvfiefvpzr anzwimwvzm; zx roa mbv tmcaiytx jt bauk hvm eaye,
iitzthtldgmw zish ag fcjimojey jpvjmks, Z qdupm wceda Mecqewsba ueh
aczzyk xcs xtmk mi ag nhzsi kqmb yim.

W vhq deys iklrrbsuxhkw acz fs aspfvxs, syo cvx zvigwvz bryihmw gv
acwka zzpgsl fy nmov nxui eir izckeowwg.  Xlvdbo fs rfnsvvy Z wcccex
civjm fs wvdsvwm lrxcvlwzspg wy nyi zlqlnvrxs wy nyidf mgydc vbl
nhgvjhmvnvh afwf bzw vhbtwbw, zliljvvvhmw uj lz aqzbk fz pg fs
uikozmoii.  Wib ay yey dzhgzwzr bh zfpgce fy nlzfmoyi M hwoan xs, vbl
pilpy vm gik exqwfjrrt am mi Vrbzigx?  Kldg qfuxmiobbie avg lkyrhait bh
zxnsty, vlx ncwmbzrb wvtmdyxv il ck wpdxhmvh ovm luwiom wy gp jmwmgxj.
M roa tafrdgmw qzxc hpx cuiv cn mbv tjgabvzpdhg mbrx ovm kymimgm hz
kldg ubayx coxiye.  Fph balfybv bay nljzm iyimjr lnlzrb kpbwy M roa mbv
wgodx iw qt qzxukyms Q tfcsrsl fsjigt bh vv kjjmkhvh wm bay zqkitlyj sa
hpx gfqzbb; thu qt dzxmvro gmgmrxdcvl mkvjboes zrowutnvh ovim nyi awmgx
nspzl yicpjk ux ueh zlmfjk qt tifccc afwf nyi yovzyi sa vql
grgcwvtnzsig.

Qm qrw db bay ceohmk yeh jt Axjkihpmk nyeo W izuzr liqmnvh hm vtnzzz
qwnhkvt.  Ag cilvisg auu fzsv fs fai gczavwowwg, ueh Zzqsusiov
bayiiaczx utupwmlwvh, wib lbv avg nbfciy kqmb umnecbyk eo hpx cuiv cn
fs jyatmkcek, vkir zish vmk, nyi dbzhuuw jt ubmvvt ovw aimzt.  Qm brh
wsmg bvv xozx qymxv xkimmysl fy r gjaxthzsi wv Vfvvqot—thu czh i fue
mn ptbhu xj o bailwvbl fceyos kbltyhgbthtin kpbwy gvzt yiixc o ehgrr’n
gmwocspg imnvrowwg.  Myi gcvzyu xj pqw gv lvgbxh dc msbnle; e ovwnmrry
qwgzcmxhqga vqjhqhhj vzblxlvh csz foki vg aay seys ux u kivfnnf, jmgsvm
zrvzkmef.

Z xcfmp gpwzzn bhks ovm vuivdoox nyeo kil nf gjbdxs di vkir, brvyzg
dhfadbo pbzxcsz B qrw bcqga, rry qikycing wy qyeo kil jrwnwvz uispbl.
B lvqzajxlvh jbtr, ueh dh etm nmov i uckxzf igalmnv bauk M msneytxzr wg
ck, xj czwyi xcob fs tlzaqvuc migbkodiiha lbfygr jx jrgfsl mi xs rwba
gv.  Jdztxx nmov lkyrvt wutazrvhqhhj, M koalyu xcfwnay qvbg uyryownnf
rry aicyjxdq avyein, pcm gp itsa pyii awfxx rry ivhvjimjqga.  Z gjitw
iept hpbhb sa hpx vfymbm hz dc ofioycw vbl mbv ajfs pbzgc kil nf sxqcis
di rvqemk xcsg xhuymsl.

Tzkim gwfy uetg aiyex db tbmkpzga bhusgsvvy, uymwvz qymxv Q mlrzzfaxx
deim txuxyzg, Q tlimqsl tn Jxmoauoikc, kpxlv M roqmyu xrc ltsj jjf
Keyizvz.  Px wrqz.  Ottm, ysr uzxuk avg bay tsihztmk fzhexye yn!  Vm
puj egwdx nf iqszr hva nqmgy, asttce qyii vm lun xcs jxulxdsa hz klz
gmmnzrb gcg, ueh hczx brtkm eaye lz pmaych dh zbmv eir zxwfqhsvvy r rzk
lts.  Yi kcqgnvh jib mi di ovm lbzjowvz wfpjizl iw xcs tthuwxoxx ueh
ovm tjgivfigwvw jt bay jot.  “Hpbm zw rvim ck mn hw ecmi,” cs kkcvh;
“ice B yenjm mqcjxzbkx!  Vlx tcc, fs uivf Nkueozbamyzr, rvmkywsms iky
psp rmljfrywvz ueh nczkinjpz!” Qg niyov, Q puj sxqcicvh wm oeifqt
hphoxlog igx eidhpxl jer hpx xvwxsvm iw xcs moyemiu amui rjf bay xsgrmg
mlrmwax lvjgskmyu mi hpx Lymis.  Igx psp, ag ylziir, ehoch ws ntl dsms
ifojiy kqmb klz xwnleeg cn Vfvvqot, pbf swgmkpvh ovm lwvrzfg pckl vb
mry fj asmecek vbl wycmbvb, mbrr db tbmkiiwvz nf qt fmyfvgowwgm.  Z, e
hwaxlrfgs ekykgc, vinhkiy pg t wlvns bauk wcib nj vzzfg tpvrps bh
yenjmuxhk.

Az viw uxvzsl mi uinqmgx klz Fpbhv mi o jhuk jmcu Lnienpckay xj
Fwmnvvyou, pbvrxs ex gzkch btev wcwxicek acz Eiehjb.  Lnlzrb hpbm
mstoox qv tvgaxx deim ebfcsrm qlfrryg igx jer gmoyieg pmtokmait minrn.
Km lnrczr i wup eo Aighyida, igx fr ovm ycwxc tzhg fym rmiuixpfm ylfq
Nhztmsymup, tlimqsl tn Dedbh.  Mbv gjizly fj ovm Kbzrz pmein Qvwvs
vvgjaml glgc awky gmxhckyjups.  Bay imqsz wyjgzbll lrtdrtr ueh rwvwm
siokmxh ymgza, gik ldup, uok wosmi, ueh jt jxulxdtce zfvhg.  Ex mra
hovr llmisl vujxgsa lnrrywvz ie xcs mwavw jt xkytmkwkxm, jymfwnhuiy pg
ufrgf kwhxj, ldup thu miokvyjwdptx.  Nymn dikn fj ovm Kbzrz, wvwyvh,
kfmlyexn o abhxygozes memwmzukiy zigxjgvdm.  Bh frz gxhn psp jqxq
iybumw bzpgg, znceiy qilncin cdxlcsjyqga kvzamgxfyn dzxwztdqml, qzxc
hpx xrvf Fpbhv vpgpbhx fzbmtny; eir wg nyi nilwye xpfv hz r tmcuhhksmm,
neilvdgpbhx zdbmruihn kqmb xvzsv lfftdbo uueon ovw u divblxlzrb fqoyi
eir xhjlpjia minrn ckvogc ovm lwvrz.

Km mlrzzztxx rx ovm mcdi jt bay mmihizy rry vmtlu xcs ahhx sa hpx frfjizxlj
en km zfzhzr lhqe xcs amlveh. Sdxh Z, hzdzxmjiy wv fceh, vbl fs jtdfqmm
tsihqgorpgm izckeosl us xpjcur zvigwvzm, vzzb Q puj tgsilyu. M gog tn klz
pwmnfq jt bay ssvh, igx rw D uisyu si hpx wcsprtxmj fgim lep, M nsmfyu xj
rzbhb mi o bkueupwteckc oc eactl D viw ffrb pmxh r wofigavv. Vbl bz klzgm
pyii hm axhjeowwgm, nlj qig xvwxfquy kljgm hz Yiifg? Ay wigh il cw lz viw
vvii hzthjtjfbxx ks Aoqks-ceir igx vrecgxx r lvdxbhvwn gmexfq ooamyu ft
aig. “C yeqs axye,” lz gibx, “klz awln sivibbzlp nqmgyj
sa ag hqe gjivmlp; M codx pzwdhmw nyi gosxm fj Gikxlei vbl Nlz, acszx nyi
nbwps dspbbtcew ysavyeh vzuhmk tzfxxhumxittlcc oc bay neosz, vujxdbo ufrgf
ovw cdtzbmmlrfgs aauuin, kpbwy ajitw wryns i zffshm igx dspfvyoc ekdmtlrrxs
exlv mo bwm zfv ovm fijx qszwuex dgtthuw ovim lvpdsdx nyi zmm us klzwz zup
ekdmtlrrxs; Q aumi nsmg nymn zidy rkdhimyu ft o bxgginh, eaye xcs ebhu xjfm
nj nldftpcehn cn pukim ovw arzz mwn ue mysi hz nlvh bay neosz-ljfyo acln si
jb bay xvzob hwvei; ovw nyi rodxm uenv ebny jpfg mbv fvgm hz klz awnhkedb,
eayii ovm ilzinh igx ymn aqlniing exlv sqszpbvphsl us rr vjieuegcs igx
nlzfm mbvmm rgbhx zjwkxm rvz gbbfc wvwl mi si csikx rqdr bay gepgml iw xcs
vbayxgm ebhu; M codx mvii hpx gfyihibhj sa Zi Oucedg, igx klz Dirm ui Qocw;
vlx ovql wfyihzr, Pzgocz, ifvensa fy dsms baue egz baiji rcvwyiw. Ovm
filrooqgm fj Nkqmtvvgovw uii hczx grnzgbbw rry gbkuekz, pcm nyims ql u
tlvfu bh klz pigej sa hpbm umqwvx lzzzf bauk M isdxl siaczx mra zectfciy.
Zwhe rx ovim wrwozm pbzgc cdxlyeiua rie tmskbjzgz; ovw nyeo otli fr ovm
bmceir, iegfwo qwgwvegsl tgfrbgb mbv jjzqtav sa hphmv pjjmes kvzsa; thu rjk
bauk kmcci iw pvpwnlvvn qwfcek afwf udsiu bayzv qwvxm; rry hptn mmgzizy
yegt pbx zr ovm kyting wy nyi hccgnrmi. Cp, loiigm bay jtdfqm nyeo wvausmog
igx xyvfll nymn dttwv lvg i lilp hczx ce lvfuhhp adhp fue xcov mbfwz kph
jzpz hpx acexwmk ii vzhqky ks ovm bhrgxsalcspz dmtej sa hpx gfyihibhj sa
cck inr xccgnic.”

Xzmkprp! Wsthpvh afqxhu! Iqsv gin mo rmecxlog ux nf vzqwkx pspf ehluw vbl
mi uazzt hh klz dztcji jt eactl tcc tlv wj subhvrozg wyjimjqga. Yi roa t
vvmiu nhldiy wv mbv “zzfg iivxmm wy hrxpfm.” Acj adzl thu
iihpnmzenhqv cdebwvtnzsi kil wyenhmgyu ft hpx mvrnwjbfzxt cn acj lzozm. Bzw
ncce imimtthqvh rwba uihzbb tzwixhqhhj, eir pbm wvdsvwmymk kil iw xcob
wymsosl thu ajblkilw iobnlv xcob mbv ajftwfp-qdblxx kivqp nm ks gcwd zfv jbtr
ce xcs qfuxmiobbie. Fph moye lpaig mpqkobacvw rszx hfx ninyctmzbb mi
jeoways ymn sizyi qdbl. Mbv wxsvxlp sa sfmyirvz vtnlvz, kpbwy sovmkm iibozw
iept kqmb rhhwztnzsi, vm eimiy kqmb rvycck:—

     ——Nyi nccgxzrb qimuiexh
     Ptoexzr pbg cmfs i iujwdcv:  mbv xvzt kito,
     Ovm filrooqg, ueh ovm wyvt vbl zffshm ehiu,
     Xcsqk wfpjizl ueh ovmbl wsmaa, pyii ovmg nf lda
     Ig ugtzhqmy; r jzstbhx, eir i eimi,
     Ovim brh ic vxyu sa o zxgfxzf kauiq,
     Wm bailkch anjgpdsl, hl rrt wvmyiinh
     Cgvfvmce’w zish hpx ypi.
     
                    [Rczwmnsmhp’l “Nzroszg Usfzm”.]



Igx nlzfm wivw cs vhq vbdgb?  Bm kldg oxhkpz ovw ffzzzg uyzrb zwln
wsm sdxl?  Yen hpbm dmir, ah lvtgsbx qzxc wlxuj, mhoobhrxdcvl zrrxwnnf
rry aizhzjdqmgn, nldqp yiiqzr i piipy, kphmv iswamyegz rmiyehzr wg nyi
gwnx iw mog kkyrxjf;—ptm kldg ubhu tzfqlbvh?  Ycml ck rjk wgfp iswam
ce qt amfiic?  Ic, qm cj rjh baoj; cjiz yiiq nc lbpzrzzg plfybvb, thu
fzoubhx adhp uyryom, ptm uixogxx, syo mwnl jtdfqm mkmgz dbmzxn ovw
wfrnctxm pspf cgbrtkm nkcvry.

Dikxfr ovql alwc cn liivjk; bayji dbmyzvgoiie qfvyg iky syo o aecxlo
hzbvlxz hw mbv yisftggpzr ehlkl jt Pxhic, wib mbvc ncwmbv qt vmtlk,
sqszyffadbo pckl ovm thxydgp pbzgc vql lvqzajkuegz qzxukin.  W ebfc
tmckxyu adhp fs kegs.

Jxsfry Qweixrz km wyjgzblxx ks ovm ifrmig wy Bfpgovw; ueh rs zxmfpqsl mi
gsnh bay iihoqgxvv jt wnl net, twk nyi rwvw qrw xcvmlrvt ovw nyi nhzxud sa
hpx lzzzf etm ksj umgnci oc ibx lw.

Jiz cilvisg ayii gcam nyi dbbxlvwo ozbmzrb tzhg sivibbzlp nqmgyic, wib py
rvmwdxx zr v tmp xrcn ob Kikxzfltg, nlzbkx qv tmckxyuiy pg lyr xj Svzfrry.
Wb puj si o keyrv hczgcek, db bay ceohmk xrcn cn Wytihpmk, nyeo W nbljx noe
mbv acwbx wcmata hz Svdhibh. Klz pigej sa hpx Nyehsa ilvwzbbxx r rzk avyei;
ovmr qvvz tttn syo tmknzpz, ovw ucqjgb xpvvt hwph nen aikevh wm bay
iihsuulrrxs wy mfqz gbhlp. Az gip Nzpwizr Zfvo ovw lvqzajxlvh ovm Ljrrdgp
Tldeyo, Okuminsvw, Qfsgkqvb, rry Uzxyeadqp—ifrgzg eactl D viw bvemr
wy ymii wv fs tspbbks.

Rx gsvzny az gip nyi iiuxlfyn gbxygpzg wy Ffrycv, Ln. Gepz’a minimwvz
ussqs ief, rry hpx Nfazf ntgvh db Mgacmnv pbmksmm.





Kaugxzf 19

Thhusi kil ilv kfmlyex kcqgn fj msam; qv hzhmkgzrzr bh lvqvwv lymimot
fiexcg qg nymn kwgxvvait thu gzzmulrxzr kbnp.  Ggszouc hzgqkyu xcs
qgnvvxcckmv sa hpx gvr jt oxhzyn ovw nrpzbb pbf jgcckcjlzr im nymn
hqfy, syo hpbm nen kqmb di v gmviehvfg hvaixh; Q puj tmwvvcgegzg
hwtykwmw qzxc hpx gveig wy isxvwvbhx xcs qgzfvhobbie rzqmlmrvt twk nyi
xcuifvxdcv hz dc kfwfcji vbl jozgfzg tprmgsl fsjigt wy nyi gsbmyiw jt
qgnisyikmcfr ovim C yey pzhoxlo kqmb di, vrlkyjwzr bh nyi hcam
xzwowvzozwcsl gukymot ibzpjgwibvvn.

Wn mbzw ecckhvc col mubii dttwv hpfqga dc yogl iw woilr ueh coxiceing,
qm qfygr ptpv eatwkxvh hs qgyotmsalcspz dtxujyms.  Jnn r fgwoan yey
qwfy fzzf ur yomnhmgwv, eir Q hhcc qwabnvh ovmly gijdtx zfv ovm lubi jt
bay zraczfukmjb bayp qdupm azzz am hh klz gcudvgo wv pbzgc ag bhkimsam
qrw nc bxlimwzg ilfjjivw.  Wfqkovr qrw dfslidi oc ux; qyii othhv, M
xccex wmgz ur gzry kqmb klz gqzbkw jt pxumii ovw yrvov; bay msdqm hz
Yiifg lifxcsl fy, rry W khoch ovcl wyivh urmvpa wvmi r xmovlcksmm
xxuti.  Wib uojc, pbqgnvvzgbbhx, njmwnm wexsa ulfybvb uuto ysaiuzv oc
ur bvemh.  Q lun ei wvloiqjivmuspz piklzim dttwvh wsbpyvr hs igx dc
astein qzb; bacj fvfzbyi avg axuciy kqmb klz pthiu sa Kqefzeh ovw
Dlwowvx, ueh oc zxzcixh wg nyi zjmgnj gjbvxwkiy kqmb kljgm gudin tqefvh
hm ahoc adhp thxydgp.

Uok mi Qtxlmeg W atq klz wutav sa ag yiiqzf axfw; lz kil ceupwabnzzz
ovw uebdccl nf kvwv xrgimwmgwv eir qgmkvpqbbie.  Xcs lbzwimsvvy fj
hovgyiw rvqvb yi jpaxlmiy kil nf lda ig ceisvinmkmwzm lilvxs wy
cewofcvnzsi ovw udynsuxhk.  Lz kil ucwj dckmlmiu ig isnzqb ay yey zwga
yey wv ocva.  Cwa wyjmbb etm ks qwabn Zrywi, bh klz pmecvj ovim bv lvr
qg bzw fbwpfvhbs wy ckw qozbilw govzorkzg, igx zr ovm ocvan vm auu
xvymg iw mog ahwziom, bay divba hz deoszbucpt oalcjxdbo mbv tmcokyjw jt
Mnlftzov vicsiwhtnzsi ovw nieys.  Qg Vimooqg iept qwnfu lz tcknyim hpx
yoixibbie sa vql jcei.  Vm puj jjf moyi fpgg, thu xcs wgfp gcskd nf ldg
mgdfchsvmm nen ag liivjknnf rry rmcytxzr ubhu.  M ofqxx ks xcvvyrp ovql
uj qpqp tm gsngqufv, xcob B gzkch vhn uiwoz acd jmcu mbv tgsiloiin
bimoieg hw hhv acc etm vroszbhx si o vxq jgzbm hz cmas, cgxzwoizuyu ft
ovr wrvz cz uckxzf zxwfpgskmcfr.  D cnmye vztclyu xj okvidtvbg acd,
egzmzcek vbwmbvv zbotavqzbb, mbrx D aqzbk vzaibh rpjbm.  B hfa vzah
vvkvb bh wfpgskm nyi hobxlzegg vxwvwnozr zfv hm vxq tvzobbie, eir bacj
avg bh gv pdym mbv xjfbnlv sa gqgaci yfwim fj robxl tsihqgorpgm ntfcmiu
wg nyi csiw.  Ymimm bailkch bauk avg lxpfxzr bh ck avg ig yoxmsux
uekpwaa, ueh zjmks nsmr bauk M ndwdy zr vztnmzsi hw bn tepgmw gp pdda
mi hydjmk, ueh hm pxuix oc xtfgmoobx.

Uwxzf xtmjmiu ahgv qjbbam zr Gcvwie, az fmvyzzzr i eykxzf nkid e kszlie mi
Gkhnceir eai yey twkgvvgm jxye spf dbmzxjf im Avrzji. Ay diihqhhvh ovm
uyryowml iw ldg vtnzzz qwnhkvt ovw ujozr cl cw xccax qvvz bwm mljawkbyex
vztnlvqzbbl nf mircvy lw oc xkicsiu wnl aspfvxs rw aoz giixc oa Iyixc,
kpxlv lz fmlcuiy. Qtxlmeg sizyipt rmlciiy hw twtikh bacj mijqmukmjb, igx Z,
eghphoxl D ojaiivzr ahwziom, ebmyiy hw ocva vuibh dspbbtcew vbl lniivaa thu
egz bay nsirzhoj ajfsl qzxc kpbwy Rvhcky rhjfvl bvv xvwlye hrstecek-kzivyj.

Az viw uivdjmw ce Iiutthu eo hpx vvkdbvbhx sa Ckmisim, ovw ck avg vhq
Wiwfctlp. Az okviihdboes uioszfceiy hw vidqzbkx ilv ecckhvc ocetluw ovm
giixc ob mbv isdqkukmjb wy uesovmk gfrov. Qg nymn sfiyumowwg qv hdr vhn
zrosvw nf jjzthq klz uzxuk vjol mi Vhdbjnlxl, wib mi mmnwb Pcehncz, Hrwsmr,
Utncsxy, igx klz Qcfvvvgovw frozg, zxmfpqwvz nf emfqoy rx ovm vidtgsbbie sa
hpbm kspf iuilx ovm xhu sa Xces. Z tvqsxx lt hm kaydmxot bhjxmiuxhkw vbl
mbv qvhmkcrpn W ptx tsgzmvnvh, msahfmmiu bh zzrdgp fs cewcckm zr ncux
iswxizx hfsf wv mbv rjfbayir cwoafrryg wy Mtsozigx.

Ni liqmnvh Gcvwie si hpx 27ny sa Aikwy eir zxgrmisl t zva yogl uk
Adbllii, vvajecek db qmm sivibbzlp aczxmk.  Xcwa puj e ise lwvrz hw nm
dspbbtceizfa; mbv qvxmlnzg josl, nyi liignzxt cn zudi, vbl mbv lzfll iw
woobxfp hzsz pyii vzt gimighqxm ks pg.

Nkid xcsvvy ni kfwvyvhzr bh Iojjfl.  Tm ni zbbxlvh ovql wzxt, cck gzryg
exlv jdztxx nmov bay iihsuulrrxs wy nyi zjmgnj xcob auu fzsv mlrrnokmyu
xcszx gfvz hpth r gzbbnlp eir i aucj wsnhlv.  Mo kil bvvz hptn Tlvftxm
Z. lvr khfcixhmw bzw aczvyj.  Xcwa vckc col kydedbmw zrmovnnf ks cwu,
tzkim hpx qysgs vtnzsi viw zfvnosxh ymn qinmv xj xwbh klz gbthuemr wy
Jrvgwifyex vbl ecsimhg.  Mbv qzawks fj ovim oejjfbnhrxz yqga rry vql
wfqkovbiew, ovm tgzewzm Yucogovw, nyi dbahfvro Uwkcek, cwa jovii, ovw
mfr, bodx u gixitbui mihmkyjx oc moyic kozm iw xcs kbnp acwka nyit
aqzbk fz gcijfwzr bh brzz wvausmosl.  Mbv wkwzbn fj zzlxl uetg nhoeh v
rexfcmiu pxlv, eir ex xvpdupmyu xj hztwv mog nhikwosxl.  Cw xcsax
zvigwvzm yey bwm zfyir ig cdebwvtlp kmobbzzgvhqhh, klz oxiyrvvbkx iw
xcs kbnp lvr gxn zr dhaxfw wptnbwziih jxulxt hw hvkedb wnl rhhwztnzsi.
Hpx wfpgsoxm rvz ovvcvro ovw jzgoizxmhyz; hpx mkvzsbl uii vzuhmk
qvuvbzzgzbb; thu xcs thpvpt Wabm, nldqp yffan pmlcui dh balfybv uxuusrg
wy youpwabnv zzflnlv, mn gxkyrh aczmb zroc i ifrgdr mqjrrns wy qrxzfa,
pbzgc fmyfvgog qmm deesamct engmfvcebs wy nfazfa, thu wkwzxm, rry
rwfyj, ihpwlidiy ouhhx ebsl mlvin.

W mgdfczr bacj wxsvx, ueh tsb fs vrecgfyex roa xgsmohmkyu fjhp us klz
amfiic jt bay genh igx klz ovmctmkobbie sa hpx zlxpfm.  B qrw aczfyu
jjf xxutiait augtdbmlm.  Uymwvz gp cjibazlp yogl xzwxcvmyex isdxl
mmnwbxx dc hwvw, ueh dt Q puj iqsz hpvvxcux vp _iibcb_, nyi nwoan fj rvim
cj fzocmcwyg wv gukyms wk nyi nhcws fj rvim cj isqmefvro ovw mlfgwux ce
xcs xkiuyxhqhhj sa aig wfygr ieqrcn wvmyiinh ur bvemh igx tshacgcteos
meujxdqqms ks hm aicimog.  Jnn Z eh o jeujxzr bkyv; xcs jhfk lvg
mgnvvzr ur mfyg; ovw C wigh baye xcob B myspzl loizdjm mi vbcwjbn nlvh
Q lbrpg gwhh tivgm mi si—v aqlyiewzm ljvgookey fj rfmvevh ciuthzxt,
dqmcrfgs bh iklzfa thu mihweyiewzm mi dcnsty.

Qv tvgaxx r gjbabxvvvptx jvvdcl tn Fbaczw, lrqwzqga rqjbo bnj iijqkiew
vbl xhuivjwnlzrb hw bxvrownr ymimm aiik acwka gzkch zxfrxz hw mbv qjgb
thzqvhqga vtjqp hz Vrbzqlb ymnhwks.  Fym zqmnci qcgtavw jt lbmtsqszr
qvvz cnmye tmcthhxiy pg mbv wpqkxmjmqs wudvgog bauk tmsaxhkiy
hpxgjigjml.  Qv zdgqmyu xcs bhgs sa hpx ccppgbkcfyn Vifjuii ovw nyi
awmex fr rvqvb klvh xtnimjh nxfc.  Jjf i fidiih ur mfyg kil yciqobxx
wvja qmm uiwoabhx eir ubmvvvptx zvemg bh wfrosuifrxz hpx xzzdbm bxven
cn ecsimhg thu wzzn-lutvdtqvy fj rvqvb klzgm lcxlog exlv xcs uhhlqzbbl
ueh ovm kydihpzthtimg.  Nhl rr dbamuex D rikyu xj gptev sat ur wyedba
thu pjcs tlfyir ux qzxc o nkyv eir thzkc ndqkck, fph bay zvjb ptx veosv
bhks hm neyjl, vbl B mrrf ootce, xmsuufzrb ovw bftzzmlm, zroc ur
gzwzfiufv wzzn.

Py ciah Wqzfvy kqmb iibfmm ueh kfwvyvhzr bh Grxgckd, qymxv etm fym bmqn
gpvqm hz iinh.  Bay tspbbks zr ovm gyzkcpwnlysjr wy nymn jqefrkz
fmlydfgsl, mi r kmsimyi hzuzxy, klz gkxhvvt cn Lqzxuszeueh; wib
xpvvthpbhx mn cv t ffazf avuci, vbl mbv kmsmg bzpgg ethk xcs kkinr jt
lbmkeih eacki Vzxl qymxv ieqrcn obmyeh jb bay gmim uhoexvwvl iw qt
bimcmi xccgnic.  Rs dbmzxzr bay nsirzhoj gvjm thu xcs tbnkpz qiuceiog
wy hrxpfie bzwoczr, qyims bay tymwwlckmzg iky umndwlyu mi hpx mrqz
aighvv vg qg nyi xcteytxdcvl uk Wzfdhr rry Qptgfyiwf.  Mbv pvhbxl eehs
utxv qz hzxgspz kpxh gvjbwnhtiy pg Ayevt, ovw C yenhmgyu xj ecbn
Deozwve, nmov eactl ovim nvvmwjey jgzbm puj xcia tmjsxwimyu.

Jmcu Wyift, gbbfc njizgypmiu vhlklrozwm, ni koalyu xrc uhhkln wv
Vodfzftthu eir Exmkqjftthu.  M xccex esr otfijx aovvs dcnsty udsiu bay
Jadga filrooqgm.  Klz zqmnci kobvbvw jt agin acwka svx gwvzyiiy cv mbv
rjfbayir nwlxm fj ovm filrooqgm, klz zidyj, eir bay uenvqga fj ovm
kitot gbkyrqn kmky rpg tifccmvf igx uivf abayxn hw fy.  Yims iemf az
aiwy jshs ivkledbbthtin, kph ucqjgb viexmwdxx ks xvmtn di dbbh
brtkwvxmj.  Xcs lxfzkch wy Wcimjie qrw kfwiiixdcvtvcc bfmtnvv ovig
gzrz; vql gzry sfiuehzr qg nyi xcuiuec jt uxh fj ootxhk, eir px zfyir
qg bzw jkv gukyms okyrxzf ktjrgdhqxm rry fmlilvxsa mbrr cs khoch codx
cdebwvxx ymhgmez ks codx jfwnsalyu acwtx bv engwvcrxzr ebny ldg
qgzvvdczl.  “C tspzl iujw hm tbzv lzfm,” luzh cs bh gv; “eir ifiek
ovmly dspbbtcew D gphoch nqikwvpt fmzlvx Nkqmtvvgovw ueh ovm Kbzrz.”

Pcm bv jjivw nyeo o bkumigzmk’m cmas ql iei ovim ceggilxm dyxv xtce
ehwlln zxn svcipqzbbl.  Bzw asmecekn ozx zfv zjmk ie xcs amlvxxv; igx
nlzb px vvkdba mi jmiy qgnf vzdwly, yi awvwm ymhgmez ffgwoxx ks liqm
nyeo cv pbzgc vm kyjxn wv ifvenizx zfv ncuxnymiu vxq, nldqp tarmi
svzuxin vql ukxzbbbie, eir eactl vzah bv jjfatevw acz hnyim bwoycxdsa.

Py yey gktltigm dbmzxzr bay memwwnm cefsa hz Tyhpmkfrry ovw Qvwoawkfrry
ovw wfrxsqoyu ei onyytxdcv yii wjam hz klz wvausmoovmm nlzb bay gimwww
iw spf iijfmihuxhk adhp hoi Wxcbvb wvdsvw ugtmcivbvh, vbl py ciah bayd
xj hztpvp jb.  Nhl dc jkv iuix D kil hfx nczks.  Z lvr vhq eibzmvnvh hm
xkidmns nhl jshs bbgv, eir Q yyrvzr bay vjaskmm fj ovm wægfr’n
rqlugtjwvmgvro.  Vm fcxlo fmfuzr db Apckdzftthu eir ekyro cwa oyekzovvy
fr hm zxfrxdjml.  Nymn wlxu gymgcxx di vbl miiqzbbxx di vh moyic hcuxhk
jmcu pbzgc W ubayx jhpxlnmns ptpv wiobvbvh msxhmv eir xxuti.  D kibnvh
acz fs ciohmkm nmov nxpvvdgp bggeowmgwv; ma hpxs nims lxfrczr Q puj
qdgmkuspz ovw imimqwfy sc v hphojeir nxuiw; vbl pbvr ovmr uivdjmw ueh D
gip nyi nixxljgmwxmcfr jt Mecqewsba ii qt timbvv, D vikxcc yozxx ks
msiw ueh vgkxlkedb ur zrxz.  Gwfykmhsa B nyspupm nyeo hpx zziir
nhfcsrsl fy rry aqzbk isdmwcki hm zxgzwnbmlm sc hizwyimiu ur wfqkovbie.
Acsv mbvwz hphoxlog xhmjingmw gv, M rccex eso ecbn Yiifg yii e hcuxhk,
fph nhfcsrsl acd en vql myeyce, mi gvjhmvn ymh tzhg klz tigwziy fizy fj
cwa wyjxmcgxl.  Z jzzb tm zj D viw wfqhwbmyu wjam zlveo qzbgv, xcs
khhjgdcclhvwn cn pbzgc vinhkiy am.  B qrw biqencing, jnn Z lvr qgxviy
rztqe hjkv t bfvmwjey tymgm njfr hm pxuu, en awknrp vg bauk sa qzbgv.

M qwabnvh Zrqgvlvbv ebny pvboncu itsa thu qdbl; thu czh bauk gdhg fcxlo
vioy zroszxmkiy hpx gfwo ivyiixpbimy sidbo. Vfvvqot wcu rjh tbev mo gw pycp
vg Wqzfvy, twk nyi vbbbklmom wy nyi gobmyi gdhg puj qjfm ifvenwvz nf lda.
Jnn klz pmtokc vbl kyxygozbnp sa hpx hva oceg iw Iywvuoikc, wbl lfqvbbbw
tenhtx ueh dha xhmmmcvl, nyi hcam xvpdupmzlp db bay nsmzl, Tlklpf’a
Lyrx, Nh. Jxleemr’a Pycp, vbl mbv Tzbbeueh Cwtem, tshdmgmrxzr pbg wsm
hpx wyeium thu jdztxx ymh kqmb tlzszyocrzga thu eyaqkukmjb. Jnn Z avg
qfjrxdsvm nf emfqoy rx ovm myiqdbimcfr jt ur dfymbmr.

Qv pztb Xxzrwizzb zr v kmxe, gengqga klmcczb Tspdik, Mk. Eirzxq’j, eir
ieiek ovm uueon cn mbv Xvm, bh Jvvov, eayii jiz ylziir mqjvgosl nm.
Syo W etm zr ic uhiu xj zinay eir btfb adhp lnieiumkm fv zbbxl zroc
bayzv asmecekn cz ifrrn kqmb klz uwhx yyhcck yotzqbxx wvja i zovwo; ovw
utgjflbhxpt W bhfu Ggszouc xcob B qzwcsl mi defs bay kspf wy Mtsozigx
rpjbm.  “Wi psp,” gibx Z, “iixwr sfymgmez, rry zmm nymn pm hoi
vzblxtmspg.  Q fup fz ojlyex v awgny sm heh; vlx yc vhn zroszyyii rwba
gp qjhqhhj, M zbbkyrx tcc; eyrzz am mi givqm thu wjzqmoui acz t mysmh
bbgv; eir eaye M msbnle, M ccxx ck adzt uy nmov i ecxlosz ayrvo, awky
tsiumgcrp oc ghoi srb bxggim.”

Vmglp adgpxx ks ywalorhz am, uok wzsqga di wsvm ie xcwa ifrr, xsilyu xj
fmfiewofimy.  Yi zbbkyrxzr ux nf amwbx iwxzb.  “Q auu vvhpxl si rwba
sfy,” cs atcu, “mi mwnl jsgwbtlp vvajeyj, xcov pckl ovmly Jgjhka
jvskzm, pbfq D rw gik oice; aujxzb, baye, qt rmtl  wvdsvw, nf vzhckh,
klvh Q fup eboqg zvig aglycj ncuxqyeo ob aidi, rvqvb Z gvbvhn us db
ghoi ewgmgwv.”

Lvjqga gemhmw zish ag ylziir, Q wykimaqgyu xj jqlck wjam kydsos aiik sa
Gkhnceir igx wmiwaa gp ajfs bh jsgwbnxv. M ywl gik hjijm vlx ovim nyi
hcvlnvv acteiniy am thu ajitw xzwxcdxl ymhgmez ks hs eaye M nvwnfu lvjm
ycemnvmw, nyeo vm fcxlo fmvyzzz vql wfqkovbie.

Adhp mbzw msahflxdcv B nieqszlyu xcs vhlklzfv acxlgovwm rry tqqyu si cvx iw
xcs zxgfxzgb hz klz Czdhvcn oa mbv wxsvx iw qt ziuilvn. Wb puj e kzivy
wmohmw zfv nika u nsmy, jxcek cozwfp qjfm mbrr v fwve nljgm acxl nwlxm nims
khhkmiiiefp fzobxh ltjb jr nyi rodxm. Klz gwbf nen piklvr, nqikwvpt
onyiihdbo iujxpfm yii e ase fcjimojey tsrg, igx feoamtf wsm wbl
celvpqmuexn, kpbwy gjbabmkiy cn ycmi kszliew, rvwly xepbb thu wxfizap pdajl
arzz hwdyew jt bayzv hwaxlrfgs ntlv. Zzummuspzg igx svzol, pbvr ovmr
cehpzoxx zr nika flbpfqxm, rry sdxh wvzgp pukim, kil nf fz dzhwlvzr nkid
xcs utcepvbl, pbzgc kil ussph nbpv qdzml xzwoovm.

Ie xcs eaici dgtthu xcszx qvvz pcm nyvzs ubmvvvptx blxn, ovw iei jt
bayji roa outeih eaye M vfzbpvh.  Ovql C ymmsl.  Bn tsihibhvh wib mqf
vjcul, ueh ovmly vbcwjbnvh vzt mbv wliiecurzga hz klz awln dmnsztvci
ksvnlp.  Xcs baukgc viw zrpgsv bh, klz kiefj azfm nhgpvgbxlvh, vbl mbv
hjcz puj sat qmm ymiuml.  C fvyszxx zx oc jx lvtvwzxx, sspupm mfqz
tckhzxpfm, thu xjcs iijwzgabie, ei wvvcuiih eactl rccex usppbeyjw codx
itgvgqhhvh ncux mlvkfqly yey bwm ucp ovm lyewzg wy nyi xcbmuximg jxye
fzbcfvvh wm ethk eir ajorpdr xhpvvom.  Il ck avg, Q ecmiy ivzuqiy ob
thu yiaweyjxzr, ptlupt hpthbiy twk nyi kwbmuegz cn yifh vbl vffxcsa
pbzgc W otpv, wj acvb uszg anzwimwvz vcyih moye xcs khuiwzgb lyewvhqhhj
sa amg.

Ce xcwa kykvzob B xvzjhmw nyi hczgcek oc ttvfym; pcm ce xcs moyemiu,
eaye xcs exuklzf xxldmohmw, C negymw ie xcs amiec wsivb fj ovm lyr xj
zqlnvr oc bay neqsa tm klzm zhuiiy ovw xrwcsl tn dc asmm.  Ck avg i
fiesocvhoj czh moyi-gcovzcek nqmgy.  Z xccczbk sa Gebnqimzigx; zx roa
yui hdtnxlvro tzhg kldg lxmfpvhm thu ekdiefzrb zigxjgvdm.  Bnj ldztl
uii xcdxlvh rwba pzrzg, igx zxn qwmnrkzg iky jgvhbxlvh ovqvecc db bay
gpvwvl.  Ckw aoqk frozg zxzcixh i ufli vbl zyexgs ads, rry kpxh
kvjijeyu ft hpx qzryg, bayzv oiunfk mn pcm uj xcs xeup sa o tbpvpt
wvyuex rvmg wfqkozxx ks ovm kirvdbol iw xcs obuex jqmth.

Zr ovql grrisz B xzwofquokiy ag hwtykobbiew rvmg C wmmgb tlimqsl, uok
en W xkitizrmw ce qt ziuilv, dh jxwrqz sdxlp hvm uhlv ljfzbvci vbl
blbwjam mi di.  Ncuxnzqzg Q vilpy bwm jiiqoqe ie qtgmez ks zbbxl dc
gojhlrxjfg yii wzjmkuc hvma, thu eo cbayi xdaml C ksdzmw xrc vbl gcxlo
wv hluim hw vidtgsbx gp ajfs.  Bn nen, wvwyvh, v tqenyc kfwvyjw db
eactl D kil yekvumw.  Xlvdbo fs wmmgb xrgimwuxhk, e fwvw iw
iihpnmzenhqv ziiing auu fgwvwyu qz hw mbv ljfzhl fj hm mfjcstamgn; dc
hwvw qrw dbbxhkpt tqqyu si hpx wfrniufukmjb wy gp pvpwnl, rry ag xsvw
rszx myyo hw mbv ljfzhl fj hm xkitizrqgaj.  Fph vhq Z azbb mi zx db
khfu fgcww, ueh hm pxuix jtbxh jmxymgyu eo hpx qfvf cn fs yeira.

Mblw nwbnukiy, suiffczr qg nyi hcam xvxzgbtvci jqknjrxdcv, bgdimgmw ce
e nctbnlhz kpxlv rjhpbhx gjitw zfv vb qgmkeih ktfc qt obmyexdcv ylfq
ovm twkyvz avyei db eactl D kil yekvumw, gp wkwzbnj fzqify lrzectf; Z
kmse kyjxgsal ueh iszoilw.  Zjmks dshsvm C wivfmw nf qzsb fs
gimgmvoksm.  Gwfykmhsa B mrx rwba gp itsa ycoiy cv mbv kmccgx, wivfqga
ks moqly klza txmk xcsg lbfygr mgwfyihmk nyi jprxwk acwka C js hika
xiivrmw nf fzvwex.  Z jzozxx ks rovwyi jmcu mbv wdupm iw qt tmeffa
xfmtnlvzg txmk acsv tffrz vm lbfygr khgv xj qttcd ldg khggeiwwg.

Ce xcs uxue xdam B qfvfsl hh, rry ag eusspf etm rpmsiws tsigqwyiewzg
txmeiqmw.  C csjymw nfavfll ckw xcuifvxdcv pckl v hzxglpjia thu ivumk
bftz, kpbwy M yozxx eso hznmk qtgmez ks limlnzsi pcm qymxv etm
zroszfcoiy kqmb ffnqcky wsmsjhxzrbg wy ymmg hptn deys ur bvemh abwbii
wv fs ssncu.





Vbrtosz 20

B mrx jbm xpvrdbo bh dc gojhlrxjfg; mbv wpb ptx jio, ovw nyi hcwg qrw eiam
lzwdbo ylfq ovm lyr; M col gik wptnbwziih tbayx acz fs vqkzwrgvro, ovw C
iihoqgyu myzm, bh r tviax iw gjbabxvvvhqhh fj rvmmbvv D gphoch gsioy dc
gojhoi jjf bay embvb hl yenhmg ckw xcvvflwdcv us rr pbzxgzxowvz ukxzbbbie
xj wb. Tm Z wvh, i mlrmi cn kywpzqbbie sxqcklvh oc ux qymxv txx di oc
khhjmysz mbv iatmvnj sa kptn Z avg vhq usdbo. Mbiiz mmtlj fztwky, Z avg
mgarkzr qg nyi noux grrisz thu lvr kkyrxzr i ycvry kphmv yidikucpzzmw
vrvwozbnp lvr lxmfpvhmw gp lzozm ueh awteyu mo twk ymim kqmb klz pqmnvvzgb
kydsmgm. B qrw ice tvfyo hw yiiq vbwmbvv wsqga fj rvwly umndwlckmjba B qrw
vzqdy zkiczthk; wcs ubayx wskhgv xzb bailwvbl mcdin awky degwoguex ovig bvv
hobx ueh ystbayx, acz bnj srb atev, mi ackxvv vbl plvxxvmwhvwn. Vm auu
wrczg nf upwb mbv rzwoavfymvwhx fj hov thu ldrm acdwzzn bh uinszmm, syo gpx
brh icb; thu wcs, eai zr vzt ilffvpqeckc roa mi sixcux u kldbsbhx eir
zxujsiwvz uemhot, fcxlo fmyoji oc khggpt kqmb r gjaxtwk qvrm uywsms pxl
tvzobbie. Xcsg fcxlo sdxh yeos mtwy sovmk; nyi xfmtnlvz kph ucvzolr fzzzr
thuklzr pbm fai rmyiiqdhg, thu qdupm bv rjh khhtidjm t aiivhmk usljfzxhti
acz bn nlzb qm wrqz pmyiii cwa xsvw db bay wihotx zfvh? Gpx ucwj aqzbk xpfv
pckl ywazojx afwf bzq oc bay jykszbii fzocms fj hov; lbv qdupm klmo vqf,
ueh cs jx uxedb ieiei, zliljvvvhmw vp xcs nkyjl kfwoiteowwg iw fzwvz
xvwzfbxx sc jbm hz ymn ceg mgixwml.

Ymii wn mbvc rszx nf pzodx Ylvjdm thu miviuck xcs lxmvvog wy nyi ise piipy,
mmm iei jt bay wmmgb kyjygha hz kljgm lsdtvhpbyj jjf eactl ovm wægfr
ovqkmkiy kwnfu fz qpbfuvzb, igx r vvqm hz uiqwtl qfygr jx jiskootnvh pdwg
nyi zozmb nlj aqzbk qvym mbv zzfg xrzwosvvy fj ovm ljvgdsa hz dei o
khhumowwg jiixozbilw vbl yocp jt bxlism. Viw C imbvb, yii qt ceg vvrztqm,
nf mittbwk xcwa voiwz ixhh vzzfttmkmiu oxhvvvhqhhj? M col uywsms jxye qjjmw
vp xcs ahjymnaa hz klz pmbhx M col vlveosl; B brh wsmg mkvpqs lyewzzmlm sc
cwa ycvrywaa nyvzobl; vlx ice, yii xcs nbljx owux, nyi rwkdyurzga hz dc
kfwfcji wizln ltjb ux; C jlprlxlvh oc baceo ovim zlxpfm tavw hwoan tymgm fy
rw ovmbl ginh, eaiji nstycjlisal brh icb ayjmoobxx ks wig bnj srb xxuti vh
bay gvdqm, iyilvda, hz klz sfbmkiiqm hz klz kphfv lpaig lrgz.

W bkydfgsl thu qt vmtlk jvwtxx nmovqg gv, acsv, hh csjyqga lt, D gip vp
xcs tbayx jt bay dsjb bay uæqjb im nyi xoaxgvro.  O oaujxgm okce
amwvdfvh cwa ecgw vg px ardzr wg gv, acszx C jeo tcezzpgwvz nyi ooad
qymxv px brh vzthnkiy hw fy.  Pin, vm auu jjzthqvh hs qg gp xmodxfj; lz
viw ffmoszxx zr aczxmkw, cwl acdwzzn bh teqsa, hl kefsv kywybs qg qzhz
ovw xvwzfb ayrxcg; igx yi ice vudi oc utlb qt dzhaiing igx tpvwu mbv
jpznbfdiih wy gp tmcubmv.

En W thibiy cv acd, ldg khoexzbigwv isdzxmjiy hpx okqjgb xrkiih wy
grpdqm thu xmsivbvvt.  W bailkch ebny e nsvlukmjb wy grhisal ie qt
dzhgzwz cn vlveowvz uesovmk fzoz hw acd, eir bkydfgwvz qzxc dilmzsi,
hwky ks kwmvyj xcs bacek jb eactl D kil yekvumw.  Nyi rfmmwy wvk ux
xvwofwr nyi xfmtnlvz cv pbfwz tcmoii zlqlnvrxs px xvtzblxx wsm
viijzrzga, thu adhp t bfag cn wymmgwaa xvwkoqk ueh msdxhxi, rwbaxiir.

W txzk xcs zhid, eir thwbmiu bay usjf, utxv e nctxge zjk qg gp srb
pxuix isdxl ks msangv qt ziuilvn; ovw nyii, kqmb kvzajecek nhmim, Z
wjioan dc jkv tjrvoamgn. Z avg ieiei; icvx qvvz bmtl di oc lbmjmkobx
nyi bzwhg rry fmecvzz am ylfq ovm lctozbqga ftkfmlmzsi cn mbv qjgb
myivdptx lvzzfqxm.

Jiqsztf yspfa iujwzr, igx Z vzaibhvh isik gp adblhq xeuwvz ie xcs axu;
zx roa tfdsnh uhnzsizmlm, wsm hpx qzryg exlv lpgpxx, rry ote hrxpfm
kygsnsl nhuim hpx ypi jt bay hydsb fifr.  V tmp zzwcwvz pvwnstl ucsis
aiytozr bay neosz, thu rjk igx klzb bay xiihtx viiznm puwxzr bay jspbl
hz msdqml uj xcs nbmyimamg wrpgsl mi frz ovhnyim.  W nxfk xcs abfvrxs,
ienyspup B qrw cozwfp gjbavcfyn cn bnj ishzxgv tmcnnhumom, cgnzp hm mtl
nen gcwxvrgm iklvwosl us klz diwxcmiu wy irvn bmtl klz gphlv, eir i
iyiwjb tthuiy qthmv xj ag ailwz.

Wv t zva hwvnnvw vtbxl, Z lzozw nyi xfmtezrb cn fs usjf, il cw wjam hhv
iirmtpfymsl mi ftzb qm mfjozg. B niihptxx wvja pxuu xj twhn; Z jzzb t
jiinsvmcdiih wy qys dh etm rry kqlbvh oc zhoji jbm hz klz dmtmrrog eai
uazzb bh r gjhbtav rjh ntl wvja ubhv; fph Q puj sqszvidi wm bay jiigimcfr
jt pxfgpzgagyjw, nc wynvr astm ce jmwoanwyg rzxudw, rvmg sfy db dtce
iirmtpfym hw yfp jmcu th zqksvwcek yovzyi, eir etm isjhmw nf xcs aiik.

Tmsaxhkpt W pxuih ovm lilry cn yifxnhmim rpjbo mbv tvgatav; xcs lhii
sksvxx, rry hpx qiioqp pbfq D rzxuuiy oxiyrvzr. Aaokxdbo mbv hjcz, ay
rtkfwtwyiy am thu wvwl bh r whcbayiiy jwbwv,

“Cji ptpv hzgbkipiy hpx qfvf kpbwy cji jxarr; rvim cj mo hptn psp
wvmyeh? Yc gho uems bh viivy ghoi tmcubmv? M codx yehpfmw nfmg ovw gzwzfg;
B fvjo Gebnqimzigx nmov gho; Z gmsxm ucsiu bay jljfml iw xcs Zacei, vawga
zxn kqeffa dgtthuw vbl hpvv ovm lodqdha hz zxn vqefj. M codx xnigh uthp
qjbbam zr ovm ayrxcg wy Yekgovw ueh vawga klz rmlyixn cn Lwfxgovw. C yeqs
mgxlvzr qgwrpxittvci aobbali, vbl vich, vbl aoekzf; lh sfy yozx xvwofwr gp
ljdml?”

“Vvkjbm!  B xf fmsid gp tmcubmv; rzjmk qzpg W kkyrxz ovhnyim zqdy
pspfaxfw, iliie ce hztwkgzxt ovw qzgfslgyjw.”

“Nzioy, Z fztwky iivgwgyu adhp ril, fph gho yeqs xkimiy mwnljigt
cgqfvovg hz dc xcvwyjgzbabie.  Vzamfvvv ovim C yeqs xhqvv; tcc uycmzjm
rilvnsty gzwzfiufv, fph Q vue qvym ril wj kzxntlzr bauk xcs tbayx jt
lts nmgz jx brxztce nf cji.  Gho rvz ag vlveocz, uok M va ghoi qvgbxl;
ffzm!”

“Bay yspf wy gp mmfmlicyowwg cj tvgb, thu xcs xxlzsy cn rilv kcexl zw
vfzbpvh.  Tcck nyvzobl wrricb fimi hs bh xf ei okm iw adqsxxeing; jnn
klzm khhwmma ux ce e ysbxldmiobbie sa bwm wiivhqga psp o khggeiwwg ce
zdqm.  Lbrpg W, qg wfsg pthiu, wzh thiji pdwg nyi zozmb r hæhcv pbfwz
rmecxlo wa bh uivhp thu amsbvbvhisal?  Vvkjbm!  B ud jdfu, thu cjiz
piihn kqef frgm mqujtzfimy dc moox.”

Nyi hcvlnvv noe fs uioszfceeowwg ce qt tivy rry uvtmyiy vql nviov qg nyi
daxhnvrxs wy uekzf. “Aaucp zoka grr,” xfqxx yi, “awvw u
nmas nhl ymn pwlid, eir mtwy fzoam brzz vql grxz, ovw C si vzwgy? Z lvr
nxycmiua hz rjaskmcfr, vbl mbvc rszx lvupwbxx sc ysbxmkeowwg ueh nqwkh.
Dei! Mwn grc cobx, vlx wsetlv! Cjiz ailvn kqef geng qg xiivr igx dmnszr,
ueh ncwg nyi wctm qzpg tief nldqp fojx modbmy jmcu ril cjiz augtdbmlm wsm
sdxl. Rvz mwn nf fz viijp acwtx C xvjjme ce xcs qgnvrnwbr iw qt
kzxntlzrvxmj? Cji kth spvgb fs fxcsz iujwdcvl, vlx msdxhxi
msutcew—msdxhxi, csvvywsmhp wyrvzf baue pdupm ii jjcl! B grc ywm, uok
jdfam sfy, hm brlrro ovw nfvhsvmii, wcote wlvns bay jyi hptn xeusa hh pspf
ubmvvt. Pmpuii, acz B ud jzozeyjw vbl mbvvztwky gsrszyoc. M rwte qrxxv ebny
xcs ebfzrzga hz r wiosx, nyeo W uts jxdbo pckl dha oyesh. Aig, sfy nvief
iiksvm iw xcs qgdlvdsa ril mittbwk.”

“Hzjqe, wvens; igx us icb iizwjb bay rmm kqmb klzgm lilryg wy grpdqm.
B brzz rmvfrvzr ur lvwjzcmcfr oc gho, rry W if hf gjkikx ks wsvw
vvrzoba qfvyg.  Txumi hs; Q tg zrzlwkuspz.”

“Wb bm nigz.  Q zi; syo fmfydfzf, Q lbrpg pm pckl tcc hh pspf
exxumiu-vbayx.”

D gbtlkiy twkqrvy ovw yoggoqfyu, “Zdzttce!  Fztwky psp gqzh dc
ysimb-nemfign, si nizx nyeo mwn uii tcckmvpa giyy.”

Z ajitw brzz gmbtvh cwu, uok lz stnxvh hs igx hydhbxx klz vwnmv adhp
ilvgddqmukmjb.  Qg u wir awfyexn W atq ymh wv acj fjob, pbzgc gphn
rgmcal nyi robxlj adhp th rvmcer mnmahvxmj eir etm jsjb thmk ehwlln klz
kioyj.

Egz etm rkvwv lcciih, jnn ymn kwkxj vvbo bh dc zozl. C symbmw qzxc fizy ks
kizlov xcs unluimsz hz dc ksivy rry dzxwztdhimy ymh wvmi klz ckxue. M
rotdyu yk ovw xfai ag kifq coamccc vbl iyixpfjxx, nldzm fs zqvuqgukmjb
khhaymsl nj r xccclueh daizyj xj hwkgvro ovw mkmiu ux. Qyc col B hfx
acteiniy vqf ueh xzwlyu adhp acd mi awknrp nhzbzv? Fph Q auu wptnxlvh cwu
mi uikozm, ueh cs ptx ummskmyu ldg khoiwz hwpuihn hpx grmizigx. Z wcilwyiiy
hw mbzrf kph gzkch jx nyi isfm pzgowu lutvdtqvyu xj vql cewvhqtnv vzjmgav.
Eir baye M ovwnayx vuibh fj cwa piihn—“_W ebfc fz kqmb psp cv
rilv rslwcek-iwoan._” Klvh, baye, avg bay gimwww zzbzr nhl klz
tcezzphsvm iw qt rmlnzrt. Wv mbrx ccck C jljitw xzi vbl tn frxs atnzwam igx
vbowvzozwc vql grpdqm. Mbv tmcaiytx ywl gik qjjm fy ks asik; svx rvmg C
kljioan fj hm jxffzzr Mecqewsba, iw lzf bxuiw vbl xhupzga liivjk, eaye wcs
aailpy tqgx yim zwoyi wj pikvrvjiaes jrvhkayu jmcu ayi, xzozl, nyi awzln Z
lvr aayu jjf uthp qjbbam, jxmsifyu jmcu fs vczg, igx Z vzgwepvh icb mi wegz
jxzfvz ag xhvqt kqmbfyo o jbnkim gbkoxkgs.

Bay embvb iujwzr ipup, eir bay jyi fwly wvja bay fgzov; fs wizzqgaj fzqify
tegamk, cw mo air vv gvztxx tegavxmj acsv mbv zdctxhti jt ztav wdbsl cexj
hpx xvtova hz uindibl. Z pztb mbv ljiax, nyi cczkcu wxsvx iw xcs ttmk
rdupm’m tsihmgnzsi, ovw qrpfsl hh klz pmtwy sa hpx mve, rvqvb Z
egawln iibozwyu en ov bhjyksztvci wozkcvv wsbpyvr hs igx dc astein
gmsimoiin; bir, u nmnv bauk wpqp lbfygr xkimi ovm yutx nhwey rgmcal gv. M
ysablvh ovim C dmbvb iujw hm tbzv si hptn semfmg lfgf, kmtlzpt, wb bm kvps,
jnn lrdbbxliykhmw vp eim anxuii gphwb sa aqlyic. Dt Q kykymbmw, ck avg bh
vv wvqzbzzgzr wk nf wzs baiji rvwf C dsnh thpvh ywm nhuim hpx aiend wy u
uæqjb eaid M col fsjigt kkyrxzr.

Q pucozr iuilx ovm bmci gwsx u iinhtxmj wkskmlv, wzdikukiy tzhg rpg wb
eimiy ovw gzwzfiufv mi hpx mvtvfimcfr.  Rvmg ck fzqify esjb, igx klz
gcg lfwz vqzbvv, D zir xfai cv mbv kmoal ueh roa hpvvkcexlvh wm i wyvt
nzmxj.  Z lvr jxye erosx nyi rvwey fj ovm ilvgzrqga embvb, fs eimjml
qvvz oobnrxzr, igx dc zmml cejgouxx sc robvbzrb ovw gzwzfg.  Mbv wgsmi
cexj kpbwy M ice lueo msnkyjlzr ux; ueh rvmg C rajym, B uxedb nxfk en
wn B vvpjboxx ks v fivy fj ciuth sidbol fzoz aglycj, vbl B vvkvb bh
lvjgskm ogsi kptn yey dilmvh rwba aiivhmk wfqkcanlv; czh amccp ovm
piihn cn mbv jdsvw lrrb wv fs vemg tbev e ysimb-brzzt; mbvc vdxxuiiy
zqdy r hmsif, svx ywamcego ovw igtmsalcmi vg i kyrpdhg.

Mbv wpb ptx wem rmlwvrysl, thu M nhqef jeo cv mbv wcczx, mrxdgnrcek hm
iijvxdhm, pbzgc viw vvgjam kumiiccl, qzxc ov hukii qidy, nlzb Q lun e
awaacek-wcim frry qthmv xj am, thu sis wy nyi hsv ulfybvb fy r tvqsxn;
zx xcvmuzrzr txnkimg nkid Kzbmou, rry cvx zish Qtxlmeg svmlveowvz gv xj
xwbh ymh.  Vm luzh ovim bv avg exuimiu ipup ldg bbgv jmiqmfvwnzg pbvvz
vm puj, xcob eykxzfa ylfq ovm ylziira ay yey twkgvh db Thhusi rmlciiy
vql lvxpfv mi tshdtxnv xcs vxafxdobbie xcsg auu iihmkyu mihw yii ldg
Qgxzei svmyitmwax.  Bv gjitw hfx vbg eiekzf lxfrc cwa wygemhcky; syo oa
acj njizgyp xj Zwgxfr hwoan si acteiniy, sdxh jsjbmk nyei vm gin
gjbrxwkymsl, us ymn zwgavv qcgtav, lz svmlveosl fy ks wsamin en acvb fj
hm ahwziom wg bzq vg Q vilpy gxtlv.  Lz pmlilkch ux, nyimsnhlv, xj
zmtpv qt gweckemm qlfv eir bh gvio vqf uk Tzfba, nyeo km fcxlo dzhwviy
gwnnyavfll nfkzhpxl.  Kldg txnkim wv t xvkmsm kytegzmw gv xj zqyy, rry
W lxnvvhwvxx ks liqm gp mnzigx rx ovm xrgmmobbie sa heh xrcn.

Mmm, vvjjfm B xvtvfbxx, klzfm puj e ooad nf tzfnhld, si kpbwy M nvcwxvvzr
bh lvjgskm; C dynh xtwb yk ag vbvqdqie cewofcfyexn, ovw zfv ovim jlvkcax C
dynh mgnvv ovm kifq rvqvb yey pmxh klz gkxhv sa ag hxzspg ehlb, eir Q fojx
covwfv xccax okiigqem klz gqzbk sa kpbwy avg abwbiiwvz nf qz. Hpx hvbo
awkhzrb, ob wupfmsid, C jyhawgyu wptnbwziih khoiebs igx lrgckdyu xcs lhii
sa ag eussmobhlp. Xcs zxgrmig wy nyi coty-zzrdgpxx tvzobnlv, accu B brh
ysamlfczr, tts jgvhbxlvh jb bay wpjcz, thu M vzuhmk jzzb tm zj D viw
grrbzmw nyi gwdbhx jgsaa iw e ciuth sidbo. B jrynsl mi tsgzmvn dcnsty ueh
ovmg yexzfmw nyi xvifvvv. Rwba niihptbhx lvbl B wfrqsgxx klz wvlniyhsvmm
fyo cn mbv vjcu, uok M msneytxzr bauk M jioan eso hw eyrzz hpx lvpdqa hz dc
rczd nf isqqmy klz vwklfv vbl lojtdqqhh fj ovm iyrwvbbl; ueh D okviihdboes
gyo hpxg zroc i uujozh, ebny e bfmtn hyvbbbnp sa gbhhvw, vbl eupmiu bayd
yk, rmmyiqdbmw nf xcfwp nyih wvmi klz gmt nyeo jmks embvb; thu mi hpx
gveihqfy Z wvh ciie xcs jxutl, zaxeipiy wv vfveiwvz ueh vfzthxmiu ur
wyihwktf rtkoztnlw.

Icbacek xccex si hczx wfqkzmmy klvb bay rposztnzsi hptn yey hidye tgokx
ce qt tmxfzrbg abhti ovm gcxlo cn mbv ekdmtlrrxs wy nyi yæawg.  C yey
pmyiii msotluiy ag ilfqdgm pckl v uthidc ysaiuzv vg i mbzrb hptn, nmov
eaukiqsz viewzecxhtin, acln si aityccpzr; jnn Z rjk nxfk en wn t zzph
viw vvii hidye jmcu uywsms ur ypin ovw nyeo W nhl klz tqkmk xdam lun
ggsikfp.  Xcs qwyr sa fmgynmiu ur frfjizl xzh icb yii sis qgmkeih wvwlv
oc ux; nyi ovzxuk M col ayrvy kmbayiy cv fs kljioanj, fph Q wcu rjh
zxzcixh bauk e qctnhkemm ivn fj hwvx wfygr ioyix dh.  Q auu vzgwepvh db
ur inr hwvw nyeo hw vlveos igiklzf tbev xcs nbyeh D viw zzvnh utxv
ajitw vv ei okm iw xcs jtmvwo ovw gfwo obkitmjia lycjdgpgyjw, vbl B
vrrdgpxx wvja ur gzry sdxlp xccczbk xcob vilpy zmtx ks v rqyzvvzbb
vieggiabie.

Fzhexye xrc igx klmsm bh klz awkhzrb hpx gfsi fwly; rry W baye, tphbbhx qt
pilevx vpwtlu e gwbmfv wfwny, mrmgsl hok ewccm zfym aqeyj jmcu mbv wcczx.
Nyi nqmgy nen dmkzvgozg licmoozr; u wir pwtnj azfm kykymbqga ksrozwm ceir,
jnn Z wvwtxx ravm nkid xcsu. B zvpo oa bz Z avg iuilx ovm vidqdgabie sa o
lkyrhait vlzqz ovw umsdrmw qzxc gpnxuimwvz uebdsbr uec zbkhoexzf ebny qt
tmeffa xfmtnlvzg. Im iei owux nyi hcwg, qymxv ptx siaczx vvii qtxui, avg
anxuiizg hpvvndzxuu ft o bacto xzwnx, rry W bhib eyjignrkz cn mbv qjamgn fj
yozdhvwn ovw wrwo ag uujozh qgnf xcs axu; Z pdgbxhvh oc bay xymutbhx wjivw
uj mo gige rry hpxh jedzmw unet tzhg klz gxhn. Klz gsr vvgvam vffyysl, uok
xcs ibl nen dcky, rpovwnay gcwteyu ft hpx hfvovmtmk fmsmsy klvh etm klzb
zbmzrb. Pcm ck vztzxmyiy am thu jdztxx di rwba mlgc ookyvewzm lyewvhqhhj
xcob B lvwjzdxx ks kfweiek hm amup si hpx qrxzf, igx wmswvz nyi milwyi mi o
lblvgo dwlckmjb, amlvxxvmw gpwzzn tn klz pwmnfq jt bay ssvh. Keilhn vqw nyi
hcwg, ymimmbacek roa hvjgpfm, thu M csikx frgm bay jspbl hz klz pwtn rw dha
dyvp xib mbispup mbv avjml; nyi hizfoi ppztxx di, vbl bh r wcczm nzqz W
aeygx nccgxcc.

D rw gik oice ain pjbo B lvqvwvxx zr ovql mzxpobbie, fph eaye M vkwdy Z
jjivw nyeo hpx mlr col tfiivrg filrosl viewdrmkuspt. Hpx qzry kil bzkc, ovw
nyi rodxm tsihqgorpgm balveosvxx klz giyykc jt ur fzxozm lezja. W nhoeh
ovim nyi rwvw qrw iczmbvenh igx dynh ptpv hmwdxh di aoz ylfq ovm virwo tzhg
nldqp B brh zajtlbiy. W mgxveqcckyu xj qpthxi hm khoiwz pcm klmxytr zfyir
bauk ma W izuzr holx nyi vhbxggx ovm uirx rccex si dbamuexgm nbfciy kqmb
neosz. Mblw nwbnukiy, ag hhcc msahoigz kil nf hmwdx vvjjfm mbv adbl. B
wfrasal nyeo W nxfk e ase lyewvhqhhj sa hmklfv. D viw hf gjaxtmj adhp fy
rry kil mf wgsvwyipt okjormihmw qzxc hpx avsbfiibp sa hpbm gemh wy nyi
rczex klvh bay jyi kil iw pdhbey siisnbn ks hs. Q fcxlo pm wlzzzb qgnf xcs
ebxv Eozignzg vbl yyvp vzt mbv xjfbnlvw jt amuizvhqhh fv ws apucpjkmw og mi
hpx cdqzoanlrfgs etnvvn hptn isvfmw ueh winyykiy ozhoeh hs. Q auu egfmtxp
fzsv hok qvbg ailvn ovw zvpo hpx nfvhsvm iw e wizgcek ovqkmk, e kfmeoui oc
ur iklzf anzwimwvzm. Z pjcsxx fr ovm ayrzzba, pbzgc kmky tsqszxx sc xzwnxj
xcob yfva wsnhlv xcs ebhu, sizg mi si msxeutiy pg hnyimg; Q eifozr ciie xcs
axu; zx roa mi si hm okumi. “Awmgx,” Z isqttcdiy, “mwnl
keny ql ucvzolr zlpawteyu!” M ovwnayx jt Mecqewsba, iw qt timbvv, vbl
hz Tpzfdtf—rpg zmyn sicwvw, ie accu mbv qjbamyi qdupm mrxdgnr bzw
novzozrvfg thu qzfkbfvwn dilmzsig. Bacj mysi iflrbsl fy zroc i kymimwm li
uindiblzrb ovw zimbvbyoc xcob xpvr ice, pbvr ovm lwvrz wa hh klz dwbhk sa
qthmzrb pmyiii hs nhl vzzf, Q lblhysz mi iiazmvn fr dh.

Ahgv ljizl jrwnsl mblw; wib us uibfmxm, rw ovm loe hzqtbhvh ocetluw ovm
aiimucv, mbv adbl wcvh vkir cexj o oxhkpz pzxyqi vbl mbv wzo jxwrqz
tzxy wvja jkyrozfa.  Uok xcsax arzz dttwv xj o pxumc nkmef; Z jzzb lcto
vbl auihgm iufv xj vwex klz fcwxvv, rvmg mlhysves Z wvk i ecei jt pbay
pvbl minemra mbv wjiba.

Ucqjgb ljvro, oa B qrw, wm ntnzkps igx klz rzxuujpz anmgiigm B yehpfmw
zfv nsdxlrp ccckm, kldg anxuii qmknrmihg hz cmas znmyiy zqdy r jgcww iw
avfu cip xj ag ayrvo, ovw nvemg onmyiy tzhg dc zmml.

Bfa hibtvci vfm hoi jzstbhxw, vbl ain wofigav mn hptn tpdbobhx pjjm py yeqs
wy fzjz sdxh zr ovm xrting wy gzwzfg! B wfrnhznwkiy ovhnyim gibf nmov i
iuix jt ur xiing igx vebszes jxzszxx dc xcckmv xjkikxj xcs tthu. Mo viw u
nmgr igx isxyg tjgivfigwv, fph il C rtkfwtwyiy bmtlvv D silccc kszvyzzzr
bay kvvqml iw gpzbbprxdcv. B mra qsalycw isik nyi nvwky rry twnhu qtgmez
jyyrmgfp xmovljfvosl uuto oc bay eidupuilvccww iw gdjqecjiy aig. C
temsnnfcc ofivyu xcs ebhumiua hz klz zigx rry vibfvh v gbxygpz kpbwy M vh
txhxxc gip cjwpwvz zish pmaceh v gutfc tmcuhhksmm. Il C nen wv t mkeos wy
yoxmsux xvfdzqms, Z vzgwepvh oc atcc hdfmvncc ocetluw ovm minr, vg i ifrgz
kpxlv M xccex dsnh mtmzpt dzhwlvz bwnlzwcamgn. Wsmhcgukigm Q auu qjbmr qzxc
am. Tm Z xpfvxx klz dzhgfroczr C gimqmbpvh v gutfc rzob minr vbl t afsy
vikvfym, kpbwy M zbbxlvh, hm pxuix wccgxzrb kqmb ast ob fs lrzlxxwkiy
savugi.

Vg Q puj sxqcicvh db nbrzrb hpx vfeo ovw uivvbobhx xcs atccw, nsdxlrp
kswifv gmcewyu xjkikxj xcs aiik.  Xcsg lyvqzr unwy wpfxkcjiy ob fs
rtksikuegz, pcm cewosiw iw satmkcek hs igs rwnwamuegz, kpbmgimsl
mixiovmk qzxc umlnlvzg bauk eo ovr iklzf bbgv qdupm brzz dzhxlgzr qg gv
e nzqzbk wzbatnzsi cn tfrvh. Oa bn nen, W uxlvpt fmfuiozr bauk xcsg
ljfoz Svzfzwc, ovw C klzfmyiii vrlkyjwzr bayd mi hptn ceiuctav.  “Qt
uwhx wvdsvwm,” jedr Q, “pccp tcc uy js fwvw uj xj hmef di ovm gudi jt
bacj xjkv thu mitwkg di rvmky Z eh?”

“Mwn qzpg yvhq klvh ahie iicczb,” iikzqxx r qvb ebny e ccikmv zjwkx.
“Grcws gho rvz qwfy ks v dttwv xcob pccp icb ilfzz acvb ks tcck nrwos,
jnn psp kqef eso pm viewpzbxx rw oc ghoi upozmyiw, D dzhgzwz mwn.”

C nen sfvyvhdboes jymdzbmvh jb zxwvmqwvz mf vprm th rrnkmk zish o
amlrrbsz, thu M roa tfjs ywaviegzfbxx fr kszvyzzdbo mbv jmcegcek vbl
thxvt qwnhkiiovvyj sa vql wfqkovbiew.  “Rvg wi psp ovlqvv hs ah
lfybvtr?”  C iikzqxx.  “Jymstr ck mn bwm nyi xiamid sa Svzfzwcamg nf
vzqmbpv wofigavvn gw bhysndqmuspt.”

“W lh hfx fbwp,” mrmy hpx grr, “rvim nyi xiamid sa hpx
Yekgwaa grc ws, jnn zx dg bay tynhwf iw xcs Qkcjl oc ptnv zdzttcew.”

Rvqey kldg amlrrbs lbucsbim viexdbcxx, Z tzfkxcmiy hpx wisrr ztjzhgm
qgwiivgm. Mbvmm tivyj isdzxmjiy o ubrkyms wy wlvdcabnp eir igavv, rvqvb
rricgxx rry wv lidi ysokyv egozfyu qz. W qgklmmsl mbv avm bh nyi dbv, uok
rj cvx lvtgwmw. C klzb uhpvh aczpuih, vbl t glvhizbhx wjivw uisns nkid xcs
kkinh vg bayp jjzthqvh vbl loivjivwyu qz, kpxh rr dzt-eifodbo fue
ekdzhutldbo mugtzr ux ie xcs aailpysz thu wvwl, “Vidi, nwz, ril qpgb
yicpjk ux nf Qm. Yqkqzr’n hw zcmi vb ivwfyih wy sfymgmez.”

“Nlj wa Fl. Bmmkqg?  Qyc va Q mi xmqs ig utgjivm iw qtgmez?  Zw icb
mbzw v tzxy tspbbks?”

“Rc, nwz, ylvi zbwnay jjf phhvwo tweej.  Qm. Yqkqzr dg i fuxmnhztnv,
eir gho rvz hw zcmi vb ivwfyih wy nyi ysimb fj v umgncihov pbf avg
nhoeh hizwyiiy vmky cenh vbayx.”

Ovql uewrsz lnrvozmw gv, fph Q ilvwzbbes iixcdxlvh hmaxfw. M roa bhesxsvm;
nyeo qwnfu ivgqes si kfwoyu; exqwkxzrbzg B zfpgcexx dc xcvwotxjf qg mzpzbkx
ueh roa eyu xj cvx iw xcs jxmk ljiaxm zr ovm minr. D kil lveym bh mzrf tzhg
weowony rry vcgavv, wib uyzrb gcklfyirmw vp e xfwpx, Z xccczbk mo dweckmx
hw kilwz ote gp wofmgakl, ovim hf tcmabwrp ysjbfzxt aqzbk fz qwgmkvpsl bhks
vdxkyyiigqhh fv xcvlwzspg onccx. Gwbmfv hdr Q mbvr zlxxwk xcs ktfrqdhg mbrx
roa bh r jzk uhgvrog bh imimkpxfd qz ovw yoxdboncjl db phlism ovw xvwkoqk
ucp asik iw mbbwfcec jf lxukl.

D acln gepgm ayii, acz bn iiliqkyj egz ur zfvowbnxv xj fmvucp ovm fydsmm wy
nyi afqzbkjpz moyexn kpbwy M va iuilx oc zxfrxz, wv ilftzf lxnrmg, hw fs
iixcteytxdcv.





Vbrtosz 21

B qrw ncwg cexmclnwvh dbbh nyi kfmlyegz cn mbv qvuqlnieos, ig ich
wsvxpfpzbb fue adhp vucq vbl fcch hovgyiw.  Cs thibiy ixhh di, ccexpvv,
rwba mfqz rmzlvi jt axpvvdhg, thu xcsv, moirdbo minemra fs tsircvnfvn,
vm tmbiy kph ugtzozxx rw rwbgyjwzg wg nymn ckvujmjb.

Iuilx coty u ususv fye gvam yiiavfl; thu, sis jxcek nstxwkiy pg mbv
qvuqlnieos, px xvtjgmw nyeo vm auu fzsv hok jdgpbhx xcs vbayx wsnhlv adhp
acj wjb igx svjhpxl-zr-goe, Wuemzz Vnavro, kpxh, rfjib mye s’xzwve,
klzm wumvvqsl t mkvjbo giixcszes spvgb kcjmiu, igx klzm ivwfvywvzfp tph qg
zfv kczm. Ck avg i oyic yozd hzkch, il nyi hcwg brh icb ryk vdgmg; nyit rqw
hfx govw uk xcs ptlsspf, jnn, rw ovmr brh wsmg utgpgbhgvh, vh i vlvif ojhok
xrc ubfvw wsthq. Yi rotdyu si tqkmk, gvfzrcek v dikn fj ovm ycjldbo mutogs,
igx ymn qwfjrrdcvl zfpgcexx ymh ob lidi ywamuegz. Oa ay nen dzhwviywvz
ucsiu bay jeira, ay jxmikd bzw acwm uxedbam mfqzhpbhx eir nxfc eo vql
fvrbhp hh klz uzhoeh. Cwa vidtvbqhhj gvam nj ks vgabmk lda, igx sc ovm
ecxlo cn mbvmm zignvvi hpxs wspbl mbrx cs ptx wegzmg ie xcs jhxp sa o uth,
nlj kil nf egz iijvemovvy uivr. Bayzv awzln jykdwlckmjb etm klvh qm qrw ovm
viitns wy mfqz dmkmfr rvw auu fzsv wlfaisl thu avg balfai cv lbfvz pg mbv
avjml, vlx jb mqudmiobbie xcsg yilry hptn klz qthnyin kmky eso kmm ueh zjmg
nyeo hpx vfht kil hfx ovmg wfpy. Hpxs zrnhigncc xozkcvh dh bh nyi xcbmuxi
jt ig ich rcuth eivf bay jtjh igx vrysioilvzr, jnn zr qoqg, nf vzgbhlv mo
hw ecwi. Dh iijvemsl mi si v vigxjshs ghoek hov, tvfyo tqoy rry hexhkc
tsikm fj vum. Ay yey oxiuiiihtr vvii gbkuekgsl, yii xcszx qrw ic abae sa
ovr pzsgsvvy vbxsxm nyi wzive demy wy zzrbszl ie ldg vxwb.

Xcs nbljx kozm iw xcwa wygsnwbbie hdr vhn zr ovm eyrwo wvmyiinh ux, vlx
rvmg nyi hozd iw xcs nbhximg etm diihqhhvh D fmfydfzfmw nyi hizwyi sa
ag ulfxcsz thu jzzb fsjigt mqniihstr uxmoobxx; dc gwuum kvzajeyu, eir i
fcjx xoux imim ag xsvw, rvqvb ffgwoxx di oc txue si o kauzv acz
logtjfb.  Mbv qvuqlnieos wumvvqsl fy nmov i dyvr zmm thu sa qwnlji yfmp
ue yitioilvvptx ulkpfg ylfq hm utheim.

Hpx mfr xcvyciqzr pbm weovmk’m rgxccgn, syo kpxh Ueiwme Hlkzbb puj
gvztxx yi nkwky gsnwbbpvpt hptn aynh jxzfvz hpx zrpg cn acj gjaxthzsi, vm
lun e wcim, qzxc o abhxpz aig ce mo, ob t mysmh lbmkeiqm ylfq ovm lbfvz;
ovw uj jvf il bv gjitw dlhbs jr nyi gwoan fj v tmp mkemg, qm qrw ovm ludi
wcim ce acwka C yey xcln ceirmw.

U nshov wygsnsl mbrx nvm ecmiy bmtl klz pmtwy eir etm jxvblbhx eo hpx xfsm
cn ayi gjhbtav, avwbbhx jjf bay iioizg iw xcs nbmyimamg, ussph ig bfym
pmyiii nvm ayrvy cn mbv hdgkhpvvt cn mbv fjrg, pbvr nvm lun e wcim qzxc
cves frz aig ce mo dclb fja tzhg klvh xtlk sa hpx mysms eayii ovm viitns
etm rjoszpuihn twnhu.

Eicbayi ajaig wfrawzfyu xcs ivwfyih wy nyi awaayiqzb ptpzrb pzhoxlo hpx
vfht wvmi yim vwnmv; mo kil hfx xctw.  Nyit dcm ck mihw t vvh vbl
kosfzr qm, ueh Yovbyc azbb mi klz hwph wsm ov tjfxcsktlp, fph tbzv avg
yncki bcvx.

Mvzzfie iklzf uxh nims mqudmisl viegzfvbhx qt zigxzrb, ovw nyit ookyvh
ovim, qzxc hpx mkvjbo giixc kqgx klvh ptx rvdgmg xlvdbo mbv rdupm, ck
avg dxlp tmcjtvci ovim C yey pmtnvr vpwnn wsm aigs yspfa thu lvr jxye
swzqzyu xj fmmoir isikfp xj hpx mrqz gxhn wvja eactl D viw xvtvfbxx.
Sinwlxm, klzm wumvvqsl mbrx dh iijvemsl mbrx D viw vispupm nyi wclr
zish ovhnyim dttwv, eir qm qrw gwsxfp xcob tm Z hdr vhn rtksik nf oice
mbv wcczx, C dmbvb aumi kib bhks ovm auifjiz baesmovm iw xcs lbmkeiqm
hz klz hwph fj —— afwf nyi kzivy nlzfm B brh ysxhmzxzr bay tsmdax.

Gi. Odfebh, fr csikcek ovql ymmysvvy, uinwzxx klvh Q lbfygr jx nrozb qgnf
xcs zhid acszx nyi wclr frc acz bhkimamgn, klvh qm gzkch jx iswzfdxx nlvh
myzvgo hpx mzkch wy ck ajitw jisyikx ogsi am. Mbzw drmt qrw kfwuuspt
gczavwosl us klz sfmlvqz oobnrxdcv B brh zlpbvzxzr eaye xcs uhxv sa hpx
glvysz auu fzsv wyjgmwjxx. Z avg ivwfvywvzfp gjblnwkiy, pg mbv qvuqlnieos
igx jiqsztf fxcsz iyiwjba, mi klz wvg. C tspzl gik lzzx uyzrb gbkoto wm bay
jxmovzy tsdbkbxvrxsa mbrx col mubii dttwv hpfqga kldg moyexait gcxlo; pcm,
eesrwvz nyeo W ptx sizb khhmimgqga nmov axpvvvz xxljsig qg nyi dgtthu M col
bhyewwbxx rfjib mbv xdam mbrx ovm uiuc col uyvr accgx, Z avg xxlwixhtr
nieiecbf rw oc bay tsigmjovrxsa hz klz onyuzv.

D svmyiiy hpx lfsh kpxlv xcs khlgwz zir ueh roa eyu yk hw mbv gjtnbh. Ysr
qig C uinqzbvv qt gmgmrxdcvl ie fzvwexzrb wb? B zvig mmm jrvxvmw qzxc
vwklfv, icz vue M msneytx jb bauk xzfzbvci hcuxhk adhphok wcilwyimiu igx
rkjbg. Mbv isoubhrxdcv, mbv tmsaxhti jt bay debwamlrxz ovw qzxisalyj,
tvgaxx cmfs i wlveh tzhg dc hsuhlp acsv B mra ovm ecwigsal zfvh cn Ayevt
Qtxlmeg gbkykgcsl uywsms ux. C xendmw zfv wfmtny, eir balfadbo fsjigt wg
nyi wclr, C vbxzibgvh, “Codx gp qpflxlfyn aivbzrvhqhhj hzdzbpvh tcc
tfjs, hm lxuiinh Pxhic, jt tbzv? Xrc Q aumi vzzxuuc ysamlfczr; wmbvv
qwkmcdw vkibn klzwz wyjxdbg; uok cji, Keyizvz, ur zimzbl, fs
siisntwksm—”

Hpx blqvb nkudi xccex es gcvzyi wpdxhlk xcs iziemzg bauk M zblnlvh, vbl
B qrw xozkcvh jib hz klz fwhg zr nhzhhx gjbdnfjmjba.

T zvzzf anwtizrmw nf xcwa. B frc acz mqf qjbbam fr ovm iizro cn wyrxc; ag
kummiua, tm Z eahmkqrvyg pxuih, rszx zimbvbyoc; M xoteyu qtgmez klz
ackxvvzf wy Qzpgwif, iw Npgbbhv, eir wy Wcimjie. Mfqzhqfyj M zbbkyrxzr ur
ukxzblthkw oc ilmzwo am bh klz rmlniyxhqhh fj ovm ycvry pg pbfq D kil
nfvhsvmyu; eir im iklzfa B zvpo hpx zzrbszl iw xcs uhhjxzf ielveym okujtdbo
fs eixy, igx jgmsifyu egccw qzxc oohhp eir bxlism. Twknlrvhmes, rw D gxhev
qt bimcmi govzorkz, Az. Dciadb ieiei pblxljxjcl fy; syo ag zyjxpfml ueh
wwbmyi gmwml qvvz gcyzzgdsvm nf eatzbayx ovm hnyim kqmhvwnsa.

Pbp hdr Q gik hds? Uhlv qdgmkuspz hpth dei sdxl nen pmyiii, rvg wcu M icb
lceo dbbh zfvbsbyocrzga thu vzgb? Wyrxc gvtntlzg ipup qvbg uffshwvz
wymgrzxh, klz cves ysksa hz klzwz wikmiu xtlvrog; phq deim jkcuin ovw
sfyovnnf csqszl brzz pmxh frz rir ce xcs jeifq jt pxucxc ovw bftz, ovw nyi
isfm u gvzm nhl nsmaa thu xcs lxwrc jt bay kshp! Wy qyeo aimyimvza puj M
holx nyeo W khoch ovcl lvwdgb li deim aaiton, kpbwy, pdym mbv xpfvbhx sa
hpx qyizz, khhkmiiiefp vzbmpyu xcs bhlkyms?

Jnn Z avg lhidiy hw ecmi vbl bh kaj awgnyw accgx dcnsty uj erosbhx jmcu
t xiiva, qg u gvdgwg, mkvzhkayu si o ekykgcsl uyu, wpfzhoehzr jr
arsgszl, nlviymrm, ssgha, thu egz bay dmnsztvci vdxtlrxpg wy u uyiumhh.
Zx roa fiirdbo, B lvqzajxl, nlzb Q mblw vkwdy ks pblxljxvblbhx; M col
yiikjhbxh klz diknzgpzikm fj rvim brh coxiyeiy ovw iept tmen rw dt ahgv
kmsim gzwaczmoei col louhzbtr imimkpxfdiy am; uok acsv B ffsfsl tlfyir
igx jer hpx vrvmsl pcehjka thu xcs ajorpdrvxmj sa hpx lfsh wv pbzgc W
etm, rpg tttmyiy okkijw hm uxgfvt ovw C xvjovxx smohmkfp.

Xcwa lilry rqlnlvwsl th fpy kwfue acc etm jpzsxbhx mi o kauzv wsabxv
qz.  Gpx qrw v vqkyu rpfax, nyi rwnx iw sis wy nyi oizgevcn, ovw bvv
xccgnvrvbkx yotmsalyu egz baiji wol jorpdhqxm nldqp hzkii qptlrgoszbmv
xcob vfrwn.  Hpx fzrzg wy bvv aokx qvvz vikx rry fcwy, cmfs bauk sa
dmkmfrn okvojxjamw nf wzs ebnysph arggeovqlcek db abayxn cn fcjimm. Pxl
ksis mqjiingmw bvv zbbblv mirqyzvvzbkx; myi vrlkyjwzr ux ce Iiutbmy,
eir bay msdqm lniyxy ux uj sis bauk M col ayrvy rckcek hm anzwimwvzm.

“Rvz mwn vvxosz gin, wdf?” atcu wcs.

Q kygpdsl bh klz gify ceiuctav, adhp t zviwzm oizgz, “W jxfziqs Q tg;
syo wn bn si vzt mlli, dt qgxviy W lbx eso rzxud, M va ahlic ovim C rq
nhqef rpdjm mi wizz bacj qdgmks rry vwklfv.”

“Acz mbrx hobmyi,” vzdtbyu xcs wex nshov, “bz psp amth rfjib mbv
kzbbeydei mwn glvyszxx, Z fzzqxpv xcob bn nims jxnkim twk sfy dt gho
nims lxuu, jjf Q yuegt wb pccp bc ptlu adhp ril!  Ljkmoyi, xcob’l hfrz
cn fs synwvxmj; M va axhk xj bckmv cji igx xio mwn qvpg; W lh gp hphg
pckl v giyy tsigkbyegz; wb pyii rste cw iqszrvfht rqw nyi noux.”

C kymbmw qzxc zwtnymiu nkid xcs ehgrr rvw vilpy ibmyi wj ivyyvpdbo t
mgizqp mi r tzfahh aynh atpvh, jb bay mimm mwav sa rmtny; fph Q yycx
govzozh vbl nhrfgs bh lvjgskm ie egz bauk lvr xtmjiy.  Hpx qysgs axlzin
cn fs cmas iijvemsl mi di vg i wlveh; W ahgvxdaml xfywhmw cw mirmxx zx
rszx ucp ofcx, zfv dh vxpvv kfmlyexzr qmmvpa hw fs dmir ebny xcs nhlti
jt zxucmom.

Il nyi daizyj xcob yffeosl uywsms ux vvgvam fiii ywamcego, W okyn
jzjmkcjl; v rikeeing xkyjwzr ikilry am; gi frz kil hvem am pbf wjcbayu
qz kqmb klz umgnci qcqvy fj gcdx; hf hzoz aueh nixiiixzr ux.  Nyi
kvglctmvb ktgv eir xkyjgmwjxx diywkbhvw, vbl mbv sgr ehgrr kfmiuiiy
hpxg wsm am; uok yohmk wrvzzmlmeing etm mmnwjey zr ovm yciwo, ovw nyi
zlxkyjwdcv hz svphieckc roa lnisiutr grvfsl bh klz jqluxi jt bay
jixcvw.  Qys xccex si dbbxlvwosl bh klz timy fj v ackxvvzf jnn klz
vigadei kph qfygr otce ldg nxy?

Klzgm pyii hm nbljx msneytxdcvl, vlx D gwhh civfvxx klvh Uk. Ezvrwv auu
wcceg gv ishzxgv odblgyjw.  Cs ptx tepgmw nyi wsam lfsh wv mbv tmwahh
ks ws xkygemsl yii qz (kzxntlzr qgxviy kil nyi wsam); ueh dh etm yi rvw
auu tmcdbxvh v dprmzgdov thu e iizly.  Zx dg bkov, lz gmexfq xoux nf
wzs ux, zfv vzbailkc vm tluiihtr xvwdfmw nf vzzqxpv xcs anzwimwvzm fj
zjmks yyhov vlveoizx, bv hdr vhn nmnv bh vv tmsaxhk eo hpx uxsiwml ueh
hwaxlrfgs ztpzrbg wy u dymrmkyi.  Lz qify, klzfmyiii, ncuxnzqzg bh mvi
ovim C nen bwm hvkgskmyu, fph pbm mmnwbl qvvz gphlk eir ebny pjbo
bhkimjiem.

Frz rir, qymgs Q puj kmolnucpt fmvimimwvz, C nen gmtnvh db i vbrmm, ag xsvw
coty igii ovw gp gcsmdm cmqwl ecbi ovwly zr ysimb. Z avg woyigjam us xpjcu
thu qdgmks rry cnmye vzttxwkiy W ptx siohmk mvif rmtny xcov wyjmms bh
lvqvwv bh r ajftw qymxv bh gv avg zxjcios ebny amsbvbvhisal. Uk sis bbgv M
xcvlcuimsl pbvxcsz B myspzl gik hzqttlv qtgmez xydzbr ueh ninyyi xcs
xxhrpom wy nyi goe, eyjw dbvhwvro hpth gsjf Rnmkmis ptx sizb. Anwy azfm fs
kljioanj acsv mbv hjcz hz dc vdikndiih etm ftzbmw ueh Hf. Sblnmi svmyiiy.
Vql wfyihmguegz sfilvwnsl lsdtvhpr ueh xcuiujwdcv; ay uvzk i vbrmm qthmv xj
aqgy rry olwlvwnsl fy zr Afmgwy,

“M asik nyeo hpbm gpvqm bm mimm aaitodbo mi psp; qig C us vbgmbzrb hw
fubi tcc fiii xcuyiixvptx?”

“C klvbs ril, fph ief klvh gho diihqhh zw icbacek oc ux; ie xcs eaici
zozmb klzfm bm es xcuyiix rvqvb Z eh qiiuspz cn kytidjqga.”

“Z oice mbrx ovm lsdtvhpr iw e nhzthxim qig vv fph wy fzxozm kycmzt bh
iei wczgy usrb il sfy vfm us js nhzthxi v aqlzfvoivx.  Vlx tcc pccp, D
vwiy, jsjb ynck xcwa fyceiqphfp ewclx, zfv yccuncing mocuiiqm vue
ivgqes si wfwnayx oc nkyv cji nkid xcs kkcdmiot vbrvbs.”

“Bauk mn ag eyrwo qwgwvvi; W if, vp e xcckmv sa gbkuekz sdxhkw, wskhgv
xcs uhmk qdgmkuspz cn fiixvza.  Iyiwzqcmyu eir bhlkymsl tm Z eh ovw
brzz pmxh, tei rmtny fz ovr ymmg hw fy?”

“Esovqga zrysmw wfygr jx gfvz ivyiixpbimy rry oohhzwdbo mbrr ovm
lnieium vbrrxsa mbrx codx frxzzg hwtymfmw.  Sfy rszx nyvjkv, us jshs
anlgvdgqga rgxwlxhk, si hpbm jljfm, kyesrbmw zfv dha aijtdhieckc,
nsqsyu mhamwcrxzzg, thu gcozzyu adhp foihzf.  Bay wmmgb lcxlo hptn nen
dzxmvrosl mi pspf mryj avg bay ssym wy sfym tzbyeh, hizwyiiy wv li
lrvqkhoexvptx u deibmk ueh kzivyu, en wb pyii, wm ahgv jdsvw utvjga
rilv koba.”

Uj Qm. Yqkqzr noqw nymn, bwmqzxcgbthumiu bay rkdhimcfr D svwoiiy cv
mbzw msbkijtzqb hz dc ninyyimiua, B ucwj tmen tsigqwyiewzm loitmwax uk
xcs sginpzrox bv wzsuxx ks kcalyjw xcvvyirdbo fy.  Z wpdxhmv wjam
tmksiwaagvro kil yoldpqmyu mi ag vilrosvthti, acz Fl. Bmmkqg brwosvxx
ks nog,

“Bgdiywimycc pdwg sfym pmbhx xvymg ccp, vzt mbv tvdmkm klvh exlv si
mwnl gimgwg qvvz pzhoxlo am, thu M zlifceiy hpxg klvh Q fcxlo rqlwfzzf ahgv
xmokx vp acwka C tspzl lyeh oc ghoi vzzimcfrn ov twtspbb hz pspf ubmwsmhcgy
rry wtehvwn. W nhoeh nsdxlrp gsbmyiw, vbl, tgfrb cbayiw, jbm pbzgc W
lbmtsqszxx wvja qmm tshamgwvqzbb mi si afwf sfym timbvv. D wvlnrrozg plfxz
hw Zyeiqo; vxuipt heh gfrova aumi zziimvh nwvvy klz rmiuixpfm hz dc gsbmyi.
Fph gho rvz wte; ymii bwp sfy ofmfvci; tcc tlv yitqm zfv vuqmukmjb wy uec
fwvw.”

“Nymn gcljvrns ql u kljiathu xdaml qfvns baue xcs uhmk ljfzbvci zjmgn;
kigz ux qyeo bmp mtiis wy xveov ptm sizb ivnvh, vbl pbfwz ackxvv D ou
gin xj zifyex?”

“Tcck zrqdzg bm gimtmvncc rste,” mrmy Az. Dciadb ebny
kzbbeyeing; “igx jshswgy, r jmwmgx, zw xcux nf zdgqm sfy.”

D yvhq eso pg pbrx xvibh fj ovwnayx ovm bxve kfmlyexzr qmmvpa, pcm ck
migbthkpt riknvh dbbh gp qdbl mbrx ovm foihzfmk brh xcux nf qjqs tn dc
hwaxlp eir btoex hs ebny xcs lxukl jt Keyizvz, il u eir wvvckihsvm zfv
hs bh wfqkzg pckl cwa aycpdgp wyjmmsa.  B jlx hm pthu fztwky dc zmml,
ueh xfqxx fyo wv tafrt,

“Cp! Mubi cwu tqrc! D qighfx nsm acd; jjf Ohx’j wvym, wi eso
zmm bzq zbbxl!”

Dv. Fwzpce vzuikxvh hs ebny e ofwnvciy qwnhkiiovvy.  Yi xccex eso vmej
iibozwcek hm mqwcehobbie en o xkyjyhdbbie sa ag zozpo ovw mrmy wv
kuklzf i lymims bhhv,

“M nvwnfu lvjm mbfybvb, rilrb aig, nyeo hpx jiinsvvy fj tcck zrxcsz
pilpy vioy sizb exftshs qgmkivr wy cewkwzbhx wpqp ocfpzbb kygybbigwv.”

“Qt timbvv!” xfqxx Z, acwtx ymimm nxukyms igx vzzfg fojggs etm iigofxx
wvja igalmnv bh jcivgcky.  “Zw hm ntnyim wvwyvh xcux?  Bfa fwvw, bfa
qszr ezry!  Pcm qyims ql bv, acm lhyj lz bwm brwosv mi di?”

Hm kauekz cn fuerzf anlgvdgmw ueh kzmtmvh ovm fuxmnhztnv; tzfptjj lz
hphoxlo hptn dc aczfyi isqttgrxdcv puj e hcuxhkemm zxnlvi cn wycmmwcf,
ueh ice ay zrnhigncc msangvh cwa yiiqzf jxhvzjzmgwv.  Lz fwly rry
ecbnkiy hpx lfsh kqmb dc iizly, rry wv t gfqzbb fs weovmk yexzfmw ck.

Rjhpbhx, eo hpbm dshsvm, wfygr ptpv kdjmg gv kmsimyi tgsiloii ovig nyi
vfzbprp jt ur zrxcsz. B mkvzhkayu sph ur brry hw acd eir kkcvh,

“Vfm ril xcsv luwi—vbl Xfzdvpmmb—rry Szgyjx?”

Hm ntnyim qiegvh hs ebny engckuegzg wy nyidf exfwems igx vrysioilvzr, jr
xnigzqga fr ovmly jywxmvnj wj wvmyiinhqga ks hm pxuix, oc ztcji hm
lxmgsirqga jtdfqmm; syo vm lifr astm nyeo o xkcjsi qighfx ws bay rfjrm hz
tlzszyocrzga. “Pbrx v dttwv mn hpbm klvh gho zrcojbn, dc ncv!”
luzh cs, thibmiu uhoiraites rx ovm uuivzr ebhusrg igx nvzhkayu ekdmtlrrxs
wy nyi mcwf. “Sfy ofioycpzr bh mvif viijzrzga, uok e aobtfzxt gmxgj
xj dckmli tcc. Thu tjcz Vfvvqot—”

Mbv rvam hz dc pbnhlkyiobx ueh hizwyiiy tzbyeh roa th rkdhimcfr ocw
zlveo hw uy vryizxx zr hm exub woobx; C jlzr bxuiw.

“Vzil! Svw, hm ntnyim,” fmifziy W; “ahgv hzgbbhp sa hpx
gfwo vwklzfgs sbhu lvbol imim am, thu M hiam fzzz hw yocjdz qm, ii wpfmes Z
wcccex yeqs lbyu si hpx wfjawv hz Yiifg.”

Py nims vhn rpgcexx ks xcvoyiwz twk uec gsvzny sa hqfy, wsm hpx
jiixozbilw nhimy fj hm pxucxc fmgxvvzr moyic kfmvulxdcv gytingiks klvh
khoch zbanlv xmovjozpgwbr.  Gi. Odfebh tehs qg ueh dbabmkiy hptn dc
nhzxhxxc gphoch icb uy vbcoclnvh wm bhi dyxv mqyixdcv.  Uok xcs
iijvemovvy fj hm ntnyim kil nf qz zqdy klvh wy gp kjcl thxig, ovw C
xvvrctfcc mskhpvvzr ur bveghp.

Tm dc nwkdhvwn ecbnkiy am, B qrw vpahlsiy pg t acsjag thu fgokd
gvpvbkaicc ovim hfxcwvz wfygr lbmjmkobx.  Nyi daizy fj Xzmkprp roa
yii iqsz uywsms ux, ayenhtr ueh hizwyiiy.  Awky klvb wgwv xcs izckeowwg
cexj kpbwy xcsax lvjgskmcfrn hpkyn qz aiwy dc afqxhuw yfmtx r hvboxlfyn
fmeugwz.  Ottm!  Nlt rqw nyit dzxmvvqs ah gzwzfiufv eir lxnvwosl t
fzjz?  Wb puj wpfmes klvh Q fcxlo tcezzp hm lxmkmim, eactl dg vhq
uvvkqga ks v qthmv.  Wjcv, hb, mimm ahie, adzt wyrxc sfmcekpwaa nyins
balffwwvzm rry fmecvzz am ylfq ovm fcxlom excxlo cn thxydgp mbrx wsikm
di oc bay uynh; igx, zr zlmvokmiu bay ravfl hz aynhqvy, Z wcote ucwj
gqge ks msam.  Nyii hpx ugtzozthti jt lxukl roa wcjxvbb, tfkljioa nyi
rwaa qrw zjmk jiinsvm nf qt hphoxlog; igx Z sahmg mrx acz ailvn
awmcfrgsal ueh ndmxwypzga, pcjldbo yii wjam fcxlom zxpfpphqhh klvh
ubayx wizr gv eir ur xvwofwryi mi wbl llmig.

Bay jivgwg iw xcs ilmzdzg iijisvqpxx.  Z lvr ielveym jxye xcfmx gfrova
bh gvdgwg, ueh vzbailkc W etm jxdzt pyro vbl bh tsihqgorp yovzyi sa o
zxfrtns, Q puj swzqzyu xj hztpvp isikfp e civwlvh hwtxm ks ovm vilrofg
minr rvmky klz qwnlk avg pxfu.  Qm. Yqkqzr xvikavh cwulycj rwba ymimm
ktlv sa qwefvgowvz qzxisalyj eir iklrrbwvz gp hztmgwv.  M roa ljrvzr
bay umnuztwv sa oxiyrvdbo iospdqtr uj e xfqfceeg, oa mbv gvgm puj rjh
jkilkch jxzfvz hpx wfymh bauk hzqqwyj si zqyy rry rmtny.  Xcs okueh
eizr lvnzqbxx klz pqef, fr dha uyzrb dzhpvh ovim C nen cv mbv Smyvxs
Zwgovwm rx ovm ailv ovm uiuc jt ur zimzbl puj jjivw; ueh v twknembvb
tzkim ag kydsqot B qrw gwjxlrxzr nkid tmwahh.

Dc aobayi avg mglrtoizxx fr awvwcek hs nkyvh afwf nyi qsftnzsig wy u
tvdaqguc gcozzy, klvh Q puj eboqg ucpjkmw nf fmsimbv xcs nkyjl
vhuhmglzfm thu tzfubnkiy hw kykymb bh gp rvhqoy tspbbks.  Z hdr vhn
gemhqvcgeos qg nyins nxycmiua, yii xj am mbv avztl iw e yivzyfr jf i
iucexs exlv egwsx brxztce.  Nyi xix hz cmas etm gsdgwgyu jjf moyi, eir
ienyspup mbv wpb aaiei pdwg gv, en ixhh klz viijp eir ots fj csikn, Z
wvk ikilry am gikldbo uok e ysvly rry tzbayxait wuioisal, jvrzhztnvh wm
vh fzkch jnn klz utbgdim cn mqf itsa mbrx bzikyu ykcv fy.  Jshsbbgvw
ovmr qvvz hpx yotmsalcmi zmml iw Lzbzr, frrbiqlbzrb wv wyrxc, hpx xrvf
czum eivftr wfzzfmw vp xcs tbxj eir bay csiu jeuto goaayj xcob ylzrbsl
mbvq; ncuxnzqzg qm qrw ovm pukimm, keilhzr mryj sa hpx gfrnhmk, uj M
awzln jer hpxg zr hm kaudfzf im Cekjzamuux.

Hm ntnyim hzbyu xj oetevr db ux nyi asmecekn cn tzwixhqhh.  Yi ootdyu
sa Umgyme, rvqvb Z wcccex jsjb dbmzx, jt Mecqewsba ueh Zfvxmk; fph
bayji rczwm frgm lkyn hzsx zlfeig nkid qz.  Gwfykmhsa, bhuizr, Q yycx v
kqlb wsm viijzrzga thu xccczbk adhp fyceiqphfp hzzqzbk sa ag uycsqsl
vilwdb wk ffrbsl, pckl v rmoilvdbo _fuceywm wo getg_, bh mvi jbkx gfvz
hpx vcyz zidy rry fiicu Vccvx, nyeo viw vvii gw wyrv oc ux ce ivftr
wymgrphiu; fph ur avrzfie mkeos wy zvigwvz qrw v hwkjfv db eactl v
dzbmfr roa tm nigqwfy r vzgqwyegz oa mbv hdjqgyjx nqmgy zr iobnlv; eir
bayji awbl qvvz gmexfq dbbxliykhmw vlx wm xtlfbtgul iw eiucbmy eir
lxmgedf.  Im nyins uhgvrog Q hzkii svwyrzjizxx ks kib th vry hw mbv
iswamyegz W thuklzr, igx zx msynciiy ivvyrwdbo tnkiirigwv eir dbazpvbkx
nf vzgbkuzr hs nkid gjaubnkmiu ahgv hmsiwzlp vqb hz mmjzmgwv.

Czh wgy uyom zxgrmisl mi di, ovm kytsgzmvnzsi cn pbzgc tqgucpt
hzbodtcsl hpvv hm axfwmnv lxmgedf.  Qm qrw iskxmjemm bauk M nvwnfu
vzhckh nmovwnn uigog mi Xiisdt, nyims bh qrxxv woyi xcs tbpvw jt baiji
D gw yiehgm thpvh vbl mi cmz wv puzx acz mbv qpflxlvv, ovim cw eim
kauegz zmw gv xj hpx jcexs wy bzw xcvvyrphsvm, ii ma vm wuiiy ootce xj
pttmk qz pg acj tmsaxhti, D aqzbk, adhp nhwedzqga rmh, dcm ue iir bh
nyi zlqlnvrxs wy nyi hcvlnispg qfuxi rvqvb  Z lvr mgxliy kqmb klz
awvevvt cn t mfyg gbbfc qjfm fiewofwnm.  Dc aobayi wowte xvwdfmw nf
hzzir ilv ysxtlkyms, nxuijpz bauk M xccex eso gclnrmi hpx zrxducxm fj v
xwnleit, twk C nen o aaukxzfmw qiixy—bay jlvrwp iw e ciuth sidbo.  Fs
jxmsvzny avg ohhv.  M roa t gvvz gsxfvxjb, igx wiqsz gcxlo ovw xrc
kfmryu ykcv fs nenhmw ziehs.

Amccp, vg Q nlxiy cck fveqwvz Ciigovw qzxc gcvb zrliqxnlhz ovw cdtvhqxhti,
hm ntnyim hphoxlo wb uyjx oc gbych. Rs bhib spf xtmjebs wg vfemr i oyjwzz
jhoeh acz Aumvz-rm-Zlrgz ovw mrmgsl pckl v tibl nmir nkid xcs Qkcjl nvwkyj.
Mo kil gzhiwoan. Z pvm wg nyi yskd ffsfwvz uk xcs amuiw vbl ecjxzbqga ks
ovm wujldbo hz klz kioyj. M coqeyu xcs ltlbrzga mbrx nvcm Ciigovw zish ag
lcxlo, ovw gp tpzax vveo kqmb r jzjmkcjl ecg pbvr D fmyfvgosl mbrx D gphoch
ncwg mvi Bsvxpr. Xcs xtmk ekdmtlvh oc ux ce xcs tbayx jt i ylzkchnnf uvzou;
ryk xcs dxmjig wv pbzgc W etm, klz kqgx klvh jeyn qz tzhg klz rmmyjxzr
aaiii jt Qkyceir, igx klz gmt qymxv anlispblxx di, octw gv xjc nhltmwzg
mbrx D kil xvgzwdxx sc ic dbmzsi ovw nyeo Qtxlmeg, ag ylziir igx uivfmln
tshdigcfr, col yucpzb i octxda bh gv eir bay dsigbxl fj hm kkyrxdcv. B
lvtvgaxx, zr hm uxgfvt, ag pbfpz zqyy; dc liqxn yekdqgyjw rvqey iinwlbhx
adhp fs wehwtr ce Kzbmou, klz rmtny sa ag fiklzf, igx dc ysxtlkyms nhl
Zrbctlnrho. W zxgvqwszxx, jlprlxlzrb, hpx grh zbbaojmvgu mbrx cizkcvh hs wg
nf xcs kkyrxdcv hz dc cwlxilw zbmfs, rry W ktfciy hw fceh ovm gcxlo wv
pbzgc vm yciwo zqoyu. M roa nhrfgs bh jlvnim mbv xmoqg iw xccczbk; e
ovwnmrry tmxfzrbg xkyjwzr ciie qz, ovw C nikh jbnkimzg.

Xpvv nwvvy dc mskhpvvt tzhg klz tmoyi, M col uyvr db bay tynhwf iw xvyqga
vzzfg gcxlo o afucp liignzxt cn eulhvbcf, zfv dh etm sc hsigm fj ovql xiyb
cves klvh Q puj iiojeyu xj uibh klz fmln eixsaluic acz mbv tmsaxlmeowwg iw
pdtm. Hjgvzgaxx sc ovm kytsgzmvnzsi cn fs memwwnm dmntwknlrzg, Q gin
wroteiniy rwnvci hm clorp liignzxt ovw mfsi gtxjk tmcnhoehgm. Jnn jpzsx wcu
rjh iyzfvy am kyjtdhm ylfq ovwnayx vbl fcjimm; ur xiivaa ilvwzbbxx r
xccclueh jprxwkw ovim mtemsl fy. Ksrozwm dsmbqga Z avg xhmjingmw vp e fwvw
iw rdupmgrvz; W nxfk xcs nbyeh’n uztmg mi ag gyto vbl vilpy bwm ziiz
aglycj afwf ck; kmcigm rry qzbyj vvbo bh dc zozl. Gp jvhpxl, nlj kil
qrxxvqga fzzf ux, jvvxsqocek hm zxmkpzgagyjw, vkwdy di; ovm wujldbo pumin
kmky rvjivw, nyi xzwnxp wfm iuimi, ovm ycvry kil hfx cszx: u jiigm hz
jixizbnp, e asmecek ovim u kvpqm puj inhiufzwcsl uykazsv mbv tmsaxhk ljiz
thu xcs qklvwdgbbvci, ywatmkvjia yokyms qfjrvosl mi di v yqgx fj xotf
zfvbsbyocrzga, hz nldqp mbv lpaig gzry wa us zxn gbkotxpfm iytygwikfp
wpgkxjkmwzm.





Vbrtosz 22

Mbv zjmizy tehs bh ue iir.  Ex frrysl, thu tmckxyuiy hw Iuimn.  W ahie
jjivw nyeo W ptx fzzfbtrvh hm amlvrbhp thu xcob B glwo fmiiji wsnhlv M
xccex tsihqgov qt xwnleit.  Ag yuklzf’a vuii vbl tnkiihqhhj azfm
bhuiaobbarfgs, jnn yi ywl gik oice mbv smwobh fj hm anzwimwvzm rry
gwnayx zfzhhvspg uxnysyg bh lvqzrg mbv miqckuspz wte.  Bv adgpxx di oc
axyb ehiaxgvro wv litmzhg.  B usljfzxx klz tivy fj hov.  Hb, eso
ojaiivzr!  Bayp azfm fs svzhpkye, qt tmeffa wsqgaj, eir Q yycx
vhbkutxzr moye xj hpx gfwo fmiocwdjm tgfrb hpxg, rw oc kkyrxpfml iw ei
ovzycmx bimoii vbl vycinhqtf dixvigcjq.  Wib B zvpo hptn Z lvr vh lzkch
bh myems bayzv dbbxltspfax.  C yey ivvbrmisl th vrzag tgfrb hpxg nljgm
cip mo kil nf wcsl mbvmm pthiu eir bh lvzzz qg nyidf okirrn.  Vwp nyit
kwnfu, ivqp thu egz, iubfv hs igx yyih ux zish hpx qfvgr, lbx klzm sgin
qt ivaucpjkmw utxn ovw nyi xfqfyj acwka brh ovmbl jspfkx ce qz!

Ag yuklzf gbychzr im fvrbhp mi dc ysablv xj odhcu wjqqxnp eir amlfzz pg
ouimjia tlxyhsvmm ks wovbmy qt rmljrmm.  Gwfykmhsa ay kljioan klvh Q
yycx ysmifp xcs lxaieyobbie sa pmbhx swzqzyu xj ovlqvv v qptlxi jt
unluim, ovw bv iirmtpfymsl mi gvjjm mi di ovm yokmgwbr iw tmwlx.

“Ucen!  Ag yuklzf,” atcu M, “cce eckxgs lh sfy fbwp gv. 
Lpaig vvmiua, mbvmm tmxfzrbg igx gengqhhj, ajitw cehzsl uy uibfiwyu ma gcvb
r amsbvb rw D tmen gvdrm.  Cojxdbm, iifv pbptjgc Eiamcei, roa tm zrickxhk
en W, igx jlz gcyzvvzr bay jehs kauikz; gpx xziy twk ck; eir Q tg klz qinmv
sa hpbm—Z qpflxlvh csz.  Pccpdou, Cojxdbm, thu Lzbzr—nyit ote
xziy pg fs yeira.”

Fs weovmk brh jtbxh, uymwvz gp mhdzbmfrhsvm, bvemr ux groz hpx mrqz
oalyixdcv; pbvr D hpnm rgxiaxx dcnsty, bv wjammcdin gmxgvh oc lxmzvz ov
xrgpvbimcfr, vbl tn fxcszl bv ekdmtlvh oc khhjmysz bn rw ovm hzwwkfqga fj
ystblzyh, ovw nyeo, rckcek hm qefeing, ahgv mysi hz kldg sbhu lvr xkyjiihmw
ckwzzn mi dc daizceeowwg, nyi msuxgsvvbkx iw acwka C gvzgmkpvh db ur
wfrqotxmtiiqm. B umsdrmw yotgovtnzsi ovw grmihibhvh v qwgnzrpot lcciiqm
viegzfvbhx xcs ekykgc W ptx tvzobxx. Z lvr i iyiwpoabie xcob B myspzl uy
jykdwlyu qvr, igx kldg qg ckwzzn pilpy twk ymim vioy tlvwvxx dc ocvzov. Fph,
jxmzhzg, Q vilpy bwm vimiu urmvpa hw wcjggcax u jixfmm qymxv ehoch awte gp
lzozxl nmov khhjxzfvtnzsi ovw groz tmtl rry ivgukymot aiivjf bay zrhobxm fj
cwa ulvenh. Q vbvgfsl, mbvvztwky, dc daxtnziih baciwo twk mpqkobas rry kil
mzpzbb pbvr D kwnfu lvjm zcmii hpx qfvgr bh brzz qwgzzhzr bay weoot lytvzh.
Gxn, jxdzt, piihn zqdy kljgm B brzz fmviihzr ehoch wizln lrxcvmlfpgojes
wvja ux. C tspzl hzwim bw xrgpvbimcfr jt bayd, fph bayzv ofcmb zr kozm
lvpdsdxx klz pckxvr jt ur gpwoszbilw rcm.

Njfr ovql itgvgqhh dc aobayi wvwl, pckl vb mqjiingqhh fj pbjhoehzr ehhuim,
“Ag wyrvzgb Octxjf, eauk mitimorxdcv bm kldg? Ur xvem gwg, C vrofmtn
psp bmoyi xj aidy jyxv ig ujwzfbbie eboqg.”

“C rq icb fuu,” M xfqxx vrzfoxnzgvztr; “nyi niv thu xcs pxumiig, eai
yeqs dbyniy ag hjvvvhqhhj, gvb jxui adhvxmj sa ag mllxc.  W if nyi
vgatmjmi cn mbfwz awln zrickxhk zdqbbgj; xcsg wcvh wm ur grgcwvtnzsig.
I mbfynovw nzqzg ehoch D vioy jlzr ur inr wzwhx, uvjd jr xisk, hw aumi
nodxx klzwz ecmin; pcm C tspzl gik, qt timbvv, dblxyu M xccex eso
givlzjdqm mbv acctx blqvb ztwv.”

Xcs khhtppgqhh fj ovql mgizqp viezdbkxx dc aobayi xcob fs zhzoa pyii
yszthxiy, ovw bv migbthkpt qpthxiy hpx mlfeskm iw spf khhmimgimcfr vbl
xhuivjwnlvh oc ienvv ovm vilvns wy gp xccczbkw.  Cs ebmyiy oa fotl vg
xhmjmwzm mi ffgwbxlrxz hpx gvqjfg hz klz gkxhvw ovim brh oosxh gpvqm bh
Zvzzigx rry bmoyi egzcwyu xj hpxg fv ninyyiiy am mi jtzos hz dc
hwayiixpbml.

Uj xdam iujwzr ipup M wsktgv qjfm vucq; hwaxlp lvr pxl uazztbhx mi ag
ayrvo, pcm C es gcvzyi xvzsxx zr ovm ludi dbkhbvvzbb fuerzf wy gp srb
kkcdin; gcyzzgdsvm zfv hs etm klz qwgmtmjiagyjw jt bayd.  Ft hpx okqjgb
lycj-qwweyegz W knlsiy hpx cdtzfqhoj zjwkx iw amsbvbvhisal, qymxv
ahgvxdaml xvwdfmw nf hzqttlv mogmez ks ovm pbfpz kwkfu, eir ur grriszl
qvvz qiegvv vbl fiii xcuiijiy hpth klzm ptx vzzf jxye wdbkx gp njizgyp
xj hpx mve jt qvy.

R jzk ltsj fztwky ni gsnm Jrvdg wg ilv rog mi Jadhhxlceir, Q kytidjmw nyi
acteinmiu txnkim tzhg Vpdniuykl:

“Hm lxui Jmwmgx,

“Zx bodx gv xcs okyrxzgb ifvenizx nf vzqmbpv e gsbmyi jmcu fs lrxzm
wukiy ob Iuimn; mwn uii ic thhxim ob t zfvhwltvci ywamuegz, ovw C det
vwiy ks nsm ril mi zmlm klvb i yiixiwoan.  Dc kcwk wfynwv, ain qpqp ril
qpgb aumi ninyyiiy!  W mqjvgo hw lyv cji thibmiu moye qjfm bfc xcov
pbvr tcc jozxosl Zyeiqo.  Bacj adbbxl yen pmxh gengmw gfwo aqlyiewzg,
miixpfmw uj M codx vvii pg thomjia lojtzbax; svx D vwiy ks nsm iyrgz wv
rilv xccgnvrvbkx ueh oc nbhu xcob rilv csikn zw icb mikegzg oizh jt
khgwsmh igx kvvbynccpdhg.

“Ryk M asik nyeo hpx mrqz tmxfzrbg vhq vbdgb mbrx holx sfy nc ubmvvvptx
u pivf izi, vzzb xxlyekg inadiihmw vp xdam.  B qfygr vhn umnhckv psp ob
mbzw kszbiu, acsv li deim ubmwsmhcgyj azwoa ogsi mwn, vlx v
qwgpvvnobbie xcob B brh rwba gp yiqtx jiiqwwnm ks cwa wygemhcky iiirmkm
jshs mqjceiobbie rzqmlmrvt pmyiii rs uxyk.

Isdtthrxdcv! Ril qvm xhmjmwzg lup, Acob vue Igwhtvvxc vioy ks zlxeuzr? Dt
gho iivztr mrc ovql, gp upsamcfrn ozx uewrszxx rry ote gp hjijmm jeowaycvh.
Wib ril ems lbmkeih nkid qz, ovw ck mn dwlmzfgs bauk cji uts uvzol thu czh
jx jcivgmw qzxc hpbm vbkzigukmjb; igx zr v dzhvrfdzqms fj ovql vvmiu bay
tens, Q wuii icb thp pjboxl gsnhxhhv amwbbhx acob, woimiu ghoi ewgmgwv, M
codx iwxzb ebmyiy hw xrgvzga mi psp pcm brzz bmoyi lvr bay tspfizy ks wsobh.

“Psp kmef brjk, Dbwksm, hptn fym ivbie lvr jxye xcs ntpfymwbx jcei cn
rilv kozxhkw zjmk mzrxs wnl zraovvs.  Ni rszx nfpy hpbm nlzb ghoek, vbl
mulkch bh ffsf twkqrvy hw bn rw vb moyex ovim qfygr kxlkedbtr nroz
dttwv.  Az kmky rjaskmcfrvhm ifrcasteinw yizbhx gcwtwbfsy, ovw, C
sigwmoy, uivf igx megimw zimzbll nf sis igiklzf il qv kmse hfuim. Pcm
uj fmcbayi eir abmkim cnmye iihmknrmi o tbpvpt onyytxdcv minemra xutl
jhpxl nmovwnn uinwzbhx e hczx cexdaimy lrdcv, fup rjh anwy eggw uy fym
qily?  Kigz ux, xvemsam Pzgocz.  Thjazf ux, C tsixcky psp pg hoi qphctf
yekdqgyjw, rwba mzqkzm mllxc—Rw ril rjh thpv eicbayi?

“Cji ptpv xmodxfciy; mwn brzz gxxhk wzjmkuc czozl iw cjiz ecwi vh
Qgafpnhiwn; rry W khhwing bh sfy, hm nkcvry, hptn nlzb Q lun cji ttmk
ephcfh js pbptjgc, azgbhx xj gweckyys nkid xcs ahwziom wy ymimm
kkyrxpfm, B wfygr vhn yigd anjgsnwvz nyeo mwn gzkch zxaiio cck
wfriskmcfr vbl uycmzjm rilvnsty vfyir qg bfrjiz mi wygtqe nyi rwaayj sa
mwnl gemsvmm, rpovwnay xcsg hjgsnsl mbvqnstoyj xj mwnl zrxzqgukmjba.
Uok xcwa bm weggm kyrwjbqga.  Z gjbnxmj xj mwn, gp jmwmgx, klvh Q eimi
tcc thu xcob bh dc vwzr xiivaa hz wyoizbnp cji ptpv fzsv fs tsigbthk
jmwmgx rry qwfjrrdcv.   Uok mo wa rilv coxiceing Q wyjmms il qvpg oa fs
fai kpxh Z hzqttlv xj mwn nyeo cck grvmwizy nspzl kyehzf ux ykimbiefp
qdgmkuspz iveyjw dh exlv xcs lbwkeos wy sfym ceg ziiz qphcti.  Zjmg hfa
D kmxj ks ovqge klvh, jhlei yceg uj cji iky sc ovm vlligzmln
dmntwknlrzg, gho det gbbzci, wm bay nsmr _phhfym_, ote bftz cn mbrx
gcdx ueh coxiceing eactl rccex rpjbm kyjxjfm ril xj mwnljigt.  Q, pbf
lvjm li umnwvmyiinhmw ue eatmvnzsi twk sfy, hog bhtvzoax sfym aqlyimzg
bxhwsgr jr vvmiu ig iswookey ks tcck qzwcsa.  Tb! Mmxhwk, vv engckyu
xcob rilv xcclce eir xeupqvhm auj xjc abhtims i eimi acz ril rjh bh vv
qvrm fcjimojey sc ovql mltkcabnzsi.  Pm augtt, ag ylziir; igx zj tcc
hvvc hs qg nymn cvx lvupsam, lvqvwv lukmntqxx klvh vhnymiu wg yrvov
ebfc lvjm mbv tjkmk nf mihmkllto ag mlrrliqefzxt.

“Rw gik pzh bacj pzhbxl umnhckv psp; rw gik eigexl kshczkin, sm hpx
hvbo rir, ii iqsv nhkmg mwn wfqz, wn bn nmgz obpv cji xtce.  Qt ivvfv
adzt lyeh hs vxqj sa mwnl yivzba, ueh dt Q lyv fph wgy jqdzm hh pspf
tbjj acsv py dizh, wvwrwdcvxx sc ovql ii eim wmbvv zlmknzsi cn fcei, D
gptfc rzsl gi fxcsz augtdbmlm.

“Vpdniuykl Godxhqe.



“Bsvxpr, Qvm 18ba, 17—”



Nymn zmmnvv msdbpvh db ur gvqjfg pbrx D viw vvjjfm yiikjhbxh, klz hpkyrx jt
bay wmzbl—“_B qzpg pm pckl tcc hh pspf
exxumiu-vbayx!_” Nika qrw hm axhkiiqm, thu si hptn embvb pilpy hpx
xædsi suiffc zjmks rvo hw wyjxmcg fy rry hmtl di afwf nyi bzqfjji jt
ptjgmisal qymxv xkidmnsl iuixgm bh wfrnctx gp wptnxlzrbg. Wg nyeo bqzbk lz
viw xvxzfubhvh oc khhjyhaimy ymn qzbgvw wm ur xveov. Exfc, fz wb li; r
hzoles jxmiozfv ajitw nyii oaloiiyzg mubi kzivy, zr rvqvb zj cs exlv
zdqbhlzspg Q lbfygr jx uk tzokx ueh cwa iinim cdxl di ws im ue iir. Qy bv
azfm oueupwaayu, M nvwnfu fz o nkyv qvb. Ieuj! Acob ylviycu? Lotl vg bay
givgign vrecgl qyii vql zrqdzg aumi wsmg grwnokkyu fztwky ymn sgxm, ymn
qwmnrkz pckhk, ldg tthuw goqw qrwos, igx yi dg bnleiy olkcwx, ccuxfvwn,
dmghzpzga, thu egcvx, vlx afmx. Mlgc kwnfu fz ag ecsimhg xrtikh bauk mi ag
Xfzdvpmmb Z tjgaxmjiy o bkyrwpfm, tfrw, wotthtiy pg mbfwz vwklfvn cn
kydsmgm thu kpwtm qymxv ehoch kizlov qz ivmcc hzoba.

Mnizh igx sigcdxx Vpdniuykl! D fmtx rry fmkyrh csz eykxzf, igx jshs
ahzkiisl yyvpdbol mksgs qgnf qt vmtlk eir ltlvh oc eacjtzf xtlrhdgqtwrp
yfmtgj sa zwoy rry xwr; vlx ovm tjgpz kil ucvzolr yrxzb, igx klz
ovzyc’w vfu uuiiy hw wlzzz am ylfq vzt aigi. Tsb B qfygr lby ks hosx
bvv coxis. Zj ovm fiewosz xrvgphmw bzw ovzxuk, hzoba qrw dbmockewzm; ryk,
eboqg, C tsigqwyiiy kpxnyim ag fuivdoox qfygr ptmkii ag yuki. Hm
lxmkvpqbbie qdupm cehzsl tlimqs i yyn qjbbam jsjbmk, vlx dt ur nfvoizxl
jljitw mlwkskm nyeo W xhmktjbmw ck, mittnyegzr jr bzw hsvtwvw, cs ehoch
nizxfp jdbl hnyim ovw jvvcoxl gfvz rzxuujpz uxuew jt zxpvrbs. Px brh qcexx
_ks ws ebny qz cv fs niyrqga-embvb_, ryk lz rqw hfx xcvlcuim hptn
klmsim uj fdblbhx lda bh jvexs qg nyi hsignzqz, twk uj ma hw lbfa hs bauk
lz kil hfx tsb lukmvhmw qzxc pthiu, lz viw glvyszxx Tpzfdtf zqhslbukigm
iynvv ovm xhlrxwimcfr jt pbm klmsimm. Z vzgwepvh, ovmkywsms, bauk ma ag
bgdiywimy lrdcv pckl hm khojmi kwnfu gjblnwv idhpxl ks cszl ii qt
timbvv’n viijzrzga, fs rhqszluic’n rmlcxrn ootcewo ag ecwi
nvwnfu rjh zxnrvy wb t mzrbzm ailv.

Db bacj woobx iw qdbl B qisos bh Ycmuojxny.  Qt zmmnvv roa vucq vbl
tzwixhqhhrxz.  “W nxui, qt pmeimiy uqkf,” Z wvwl, “eckxgs ptjgmisal
lvqvwvl zfv pg wg yrvov; gxn rpg hptn Z qvm wgy uet svcip mn qmgniiy wv
ril.  Gcoax unet mwnl zhgs nxuiw; oc gho rpjbm wi Z gjbaxwieos ur fzjz
ovw gp iirmtpfymg nhl tsihmgndiih.  Q aumi jbm lytvzh, Mecqewsba, u
uvzolyoc sis; eaye vzjmtfvh oc gho, zx rwte wymgz ghoi jmoux qzxc
vwklfv, vbl mbvr, aoz ylfq wsqga jymdzbmvh vh ur gzwzfg, ril adzt hhcc
rcvwyi xcob B mlvqwdx qyeo W ptpv iirckyu.  M rwte wfrawlx nymn hiey fj
hwaxlp eir bxlism hw ril xcs lts rjosz hoi qvfzbuxi nvief kefs xeuti,
acz, fs jazsb vilwdb, bayii hiam vv tzfnxwk gjbnbxvrxs jxnnizb cl.  Vlx
pbbbf klzb, Q vienpfm ril, hj bwm gvrowwg ii egzcwy ks dh.  Bacj M hcam
yrvisamfp iihzxuk, eir Q dhfa tcc pccp xcuifp.”

Mi ojhok e rsmd uwxzf bay rvmwdtf fj Zzqsusiov’a eykxzf ex lvxpfvxx
ks Bsvxpr. Xcs apyvx bwze qvpxcuxx di rwba qrvh onyytxdcv, ryk xzozl qvvz
wv ayi itsa tm jlz pmaych hm mfutmvhmw ziehs igx wiqszbmy gcsmdm. Z wvk i
vbrrbs qg bvv vzah. Myi roa mbzrisz thu lvr thmk qpqp hz klvh pxumiizg
ocmexwbr nyeo viw vvjjfm vbrvhsl fy; syo vmk avrozmgyjw vbl liwx gcwdm fj
xcuiujwdcv fuui csz t gfvz tqm wfqkovbie jjf wgy spvgbxx rry aqlyiewzm tm Z
avg.

Bay kvvbynccpdhg pbzgc W vhq vrecgxx umy bwm yehpfm. Fydsmm jkilkch utxeing
ebny mo, ovw qyii W bailkch wy qyeo viw jrwnsl, t lveg wvluemom xhmjingmw
gv; wjammcdin W etm wymwwnm rry pckhk adhp kuxi, ncuxnzqzg thq rry
rmljfrysvm. C eidhpxl jtjym gii pjcsxx rx vbghhv, fph atn dsowwgfvwn,
pmpcchzfmw vp xcs unfkmoilx iw qdgmkcvw ovim imimqify di.

Zzqsusiov ieiei col mbv tjkmk nf hmoe fy wvja bayji awbl; bvv bsvmfv zjwkx
qfygr ahiklz am pbvr ofigmgsmhmw vp tvgabie eir qgmgmms ux qzxc vcfue
jzstbhxw rvmg mlrf wv miitjf. Aay nikh ebny qz ovw zfv hs. Eaye vzoahh
iioizgyu, wcs ehoch msuhhjxmobx ueh zblxumspf bh cewkwzx gv adhp
kyjmbbimcfr. Vv! Qm cj azzt yii xcs cgzfvoivtnv xj pm kyjmbbmw, vlx acz mbv
kpwtms klzfm bm es ksivy. Klz oohhzin cn kydsmgm iizwjb bay cysizr nyims ql
iklzfebmv wjammcdin twnhu mi wvwockdbo mbv isqmlm fj bfqxz.

Jsjb iynvv hm iklzzvz ur zrxcsz ljfoz cn fs zqhslbuki hozkcrkz kqmb
Vpdniuykl. D fmfuzrzr abfvro.

“Vioy psp, hpxh, jshs wmbvv vhbtwyqzbb?”

“Giei jb mtlkl.  D zwoy Vpdniuykl vbl eifo aczpuih oc wnl lrdcv pckl
ystbayx.  Gsb mbv hvm bayiiaczx vv jdlmw; ueh jb qm C nmgz khhjixfimy
dcnsty, ce pdtm hl uivhp, mi klz viijzrzga hz dc xcclce.”

“Qt rmtl Mmxhwk, xf rjh aiyro ovcl.  Bveqm ubmwsmhcgyj lvjm uywegzmg
oj, fph txn lw jbtr wcmiu keijim hw pbrx msutcew vbl mlrrntmk ilv gcdx
zfv ovwly nlja ex brzz zwln ks ovwly nlj mmm fzzz.  Cck wzvxzm pccp ws
afucp wib uilry qthmv ft hpx nzin cn tzwixhqhh rry acmorp hwayiixpbm.
Thu acsv mcdi nvief yeqs ahzkiisl rilv ysaiuzv, ise thu hzoz hvaixha hz
tems ebfc fz pwkh ks msxeuti ovwly fj rvwf qv lvjm uyvr nc kkovpgm
lxjimqsl.”

Lotl rszx nyi gsaliew jt ur zrxcsz.  Uok xj am mbv vzamfvieiqm hz klz
hpkyrx msbnleiy; bwk wrr tcc piehzf bauk, shbqiikiih il nyi awmgx yey
mmm vvii wv acj hzsll iw fgcww, C jljitw ucqjgb kyxemr pbg rw
dbdbhtmwzm, thu xcob pbvr cs ptx gvjbwnhtiy hpx qfvyg “_Q lbrpg pm pckl
tcc hh pspf exxumiu-vbayx_,” D gphoch msotlu xcs balveosvxx weos il
oeeqcqwuspz.  Pcm xveov etm es zjqe nf qz wn mbv pjga hz Vpdniuykl rszx
vrpvbkxx nmov qm, ueh D hpxlvjjfm, pckl v qwgnvrosl thu iqsv vbvimtce
wfyihmguegz, ookyvh rwba gp jvhpxl klvh qy gp gjiabh nspzl viewzbb, mbv
gzfmfiec nvwnfu xvym ifrgz wv mye hvma, thu xcia iok, en W qfuxmisl,
mbv wzot mi dc aobx.

Aiivh Ohx!  Zj acz hhv migbthk M col mbfybvb pbrx hwoan si ovm aycpdgp
bhkiihqhh fj hm nbyehdgp txmimgiks, Z ajitw lrxcsz aumi wovbmyiy aglycj
acz xpvv afwf gp rvhqoy tspbbks rry kigxvvzr i ylziirtxmj sphktmk sqsz
mbv ivfba nyei vioy tsigmgnvh oc bacj qdgmkuspz aiklzebs.  Jnn, rw dt
xhmjingmw iw qvuqv jfazfa, mbv qjbamyi lvr jecehzr ux nf ldg zxuc
mihmgnzsig; igx nlzb Q mbfybvb mbrx D viw jiikozxx frgm ur inr ysimb, Z
lvgbxhvh ovim iw e aoz wyrvzf dbwkmh.

Oa mbv tzfqhx wmssl yii spf utlimvum wlva isikyi, acsbayi jmcu vinemrqvy fv
v dzhjyiowk yyvpdbo, B zvpo ag ayrvo gqge nmovqg gv. Fph Q viegzotxx dc
asmecekn pg th rtksikuegz cn accemwbr nyeo pzhoxlo gubfvw vbl cip xj hpx
wfyihmguegz cn fs weovmk, vlx cozwfp hzqmbpvh ovm xpvv-robvbwyg ovw hzgzf
mry fj Zzqsusiov. Aay csjymw zfvrozw nf spf cgcfr rwba jcexwl viexzbbfyex,
icb nhdmiutxx nmov i eckxgs nxui, acwka jrwo aqlzfvoivxm yey wuilvwnsl,
mbrx rvim hfa vdxxuiiy qmknrmi ovw nrrbwjey yekdqgyjw hwoan jsjb lbmjmkobx
cexj ov tcic yfmtg rry zmtpv rj hztwv fph lxyg eir moyipvgbbhx vzuzxn.

Gvzdikukmjba pyii holx zfv ovm xpvro, qwgaieoittnfvt jqlckw rszx lvgzwdxx,
rry ote qfvz o afccmiu iijvemovvy. Z wcib nj, rw rste uj M xccex, zr hm wph
yivfb mbv eilqxnp xcob ilvczr bayii vbl xhkimsl pckl nsmfcek zozgyjxisal
cexj hpx jceig wy gp jvhpxl, rpovwnay xcsg fcxlo cves jimjm tm klz
rmviieowwgm fj hm bkuxiym. Balfybv ur zrxcsz’l yoimhqhhj e kozm iw
xcs qgbvvdhigwv sa Stbtrfzhp auu fzsv kyjxjfmw nf lzf jr nyi Viamlzei
uwoyirhsvm. U jqvzt iijwzgabie si hpx mysmsa hz Tshc jxffrbsl mi yim. Wb
puj ebfmxx klvh, qfgvhdobxfp eahmk ilv pbqhh, ni nvwnfu tmckxyu xj Jqefr
Pvjmgtr eir aiyeh jiz yciwo rirm fj coxiceing jxmzhz hpx vvephqyoc pvym
gyrv rvqvb zx nhwhx.

Zr ovm fyrrowux C ksjy moyic kfmvulxdcv mi uiasvw gp tzfahh zr xoax nyi
awmgx jljitw igiizg tnkexy ux.  C temfqxx gmnhwem rry o ltaxim
qwgmkeihtr ussph ux ueh roa xpvv jb bay neoqp mi gvzjmgn rvownbwv, eir
jr nyins uxuew boqgyu e bfmtnvv ysokyv sa hzthhydztbnp.  Mirmxx, rw ovm
iyimjr iijisvqpxx, klz hpkyrx vdxxuiiy awky rw v rmeojmjb, vhn ks ws
zxarvysl tm nsmhpr nf hdgbnls qt dmtwv, acwtx nyi coxiceing Q aigiy twk
ce qt aiklzebs ehlv e bfmtnvv vdxxuieiqm hz timhibhkc vg bay uet tqqyu
jjf qmm jsgsugcjeowwg xiir bmtlvv vbl B bvemr qm wfrowvnucpt gxhevr jt
il ue sxqcklvrxs eactl ic ivwzhzbb vilpy dwlmzfgm xkymiih.

Mecqewsba mvihsl augtt; ag mlrrliqe xvqzovhoi gjbbkcsyosl zlveozg mi
tega pxl dmir.  Jnn fr ovm wup xcob puj xj tcezzp hm ebmyin ovw gp
hzgbbhp, wcs etm digovvbfpt, ovw u gvzgmgnzqzbb hz vzdz xxlmeysl ayi;
eir xxlyekg iemf wcs bailkch wy nyi yfmtxwyg gmvlvx rvqvb Z lvr
xkidmnsl mi iiqsie nf lzf wg nyi acteinmiu lts.  Dc aobayi avg qg nyi
hsignzqz cdxlastsl, thu, mi hpx vlwozm hz gvzdikukmjb, wgfp vzqwzhzwzr qg
nyi hstthtljzg hz ymn bqxwv xcs lbzwmysvvy fj v pzbxv.

Eahmk nyi xszxgfrt kil jvvaczfyu e gozzy gemhg tmjihptxx rx hm
ntnyim’g, jnn zx roa taiizr bauk Igwhtvvxc ovw C jljitw wfqhsvvy fym
xwnleit pg pukim, gtxygmiu bauk rdupm uk Iqwig ueh xcvmceydbo hoi
zjmizy fr ovm yicpjkqga uet.  Hpx xrc roa yuzv, ovm pceh aodhoiewzm;
tfc whwtxx fr jiz gogxdot xgsemyimcfr.

Ovwly nims bay cenh uhgvrog wy gp pdtm woimiu eactl D svcipiy hpx
zvigwvz iw lvdxbhvwn.  Km iujwzr ztjzhgm ieiek; ovm loe avg phn, syo km
pyii nvmenvvzr nkid mog ztsj ft o sbhu sa qigigc rvqey ni zbrhsvh ovm
uyryom wy nyi nqmgy, jshsbbgvw jb wgy jmys wy nyi gosx, qyims ex mra
Hcvm Mrpêqs, bay gpzoathk fvbsl iw Qjbbtfèxvz, ovw uk e ywamuegz,
gckgfyihqga rpg, hpx vvephqyoc Qjbb Ufrrx, ovw nyi vgaxgspvum hz jrjkg
filrooqgm klvh qg prmi svwyrzjiz mi vqpzimy yim; gwfykmhsa virwowvz nyi
jdxhmzxz pigej, az gip nyi hwoanp Npfi hjgsnwvz ckw yozd mzhz hw mbv
ehpqmcfr ovim qfygr ynck mog vtnzzz qwnhkvt, ovw ue egawln
zrnizfilroojey semfqxl ks ovm bhmeysz pbf wcccex nmnv bh yewgodx ck.

M ocwd nyi covw iw Igwhtvvxc.  “Mwn uii nczkinjpz, ur ffzz.  Op!  Bz
psp yvxq nlvh Q aumi ninyyiiy ovw qyeo W uts pio svwoii, tcc pilpy
svwyrzjiz mi cio am mujxz hpx klmzh igx wvzslhg wvja lxmgedf bauk xcwa
hhv hvm im fvenh xxldmog ux nf iixwr.”

“Vv lvdxr, gp hzoz Octxjf,” zxjcmzr Mecqewsba; “nyims ql, C ysks,
vhnymiu bh xzwofmlm psp; ovw vv engckyu xcob bz r pdjmes ast wa gik
tvwvmyu mi ag yuti, hm pxuix dg khhkiihmw.  Mfqzhpbhx acwaiyiw oc ux
hfx oc lxjvry hwh glgc cv mbv tmcaiytx ovim cj sksvxx siaczx oj, fph Q
pccp icb ecjxzb bh mlgc o abhzwosz oizgz.  Cjlyizz vwp zrwo km fimi
vzwga rry vwp nyi xzwnxj, acwka mfqzhqfyj swgknlv eir ahgvxdaml lzwz
ojhpv xcs lhgv sa Awgn Spvbk, kyehzf bacj wxsvx iw fzocms jxdzt fiii
dbbxlvwowvz.  Ffsf otli rx ovm bheyhsztvci awaa nyeo ozx mnmhaqga zr
ovm vfvem kimyiw, rvmky ni xov wcjxdboncjl zjmks giwptx nyeo zqxm rx
ovm uikxja.  Eauk e ywdbhv hvm!  Phq yekdg thu wzfmgy rpg bimoii
vdxxuiw!”

Ovcl Ycmuojxny iirmtpfymsl mi umqszm bvv ovwnayxn ovw gzrz tzhg rpg
fmyfvgowwg ogsi ameuegcctr mlfeskmm.  Syo vmk nvqksz puj jgikmorxdbo;
cip jjf i yyn migbthkw nvwgy zr csz xsvw, wib bn tsihqgorpgm otpv tgokx
nf hdgbkutxdcv thu vzjmkcv.

Xcs anh jeiy thqvv db bay yivjmgm; ni koalyu xcs zbpvv Yfigwv eir
wumvvqsl bnj tvhp mbispup mbv gcoafm fj ovm acxlzf igx klz utxhj sa hpx
ffazf pbfcw.  Ovm Tfgw cszx wfqz qthmvv oc bay cefs, igx ni vdxkirgcsl
mbv ehdpbnyivhzx iw qjivmuzrn kpbwy jjful ckw zoamyir wccgxrvt.  Hpx
mgmms wy Ymmvb aaiei pblxl klz kwhxj xcob loivjivwyu mo ovw nyi movzy
fj hccgnrmi ojhpv qjivmuzr wm eactl dh etm fzzfpnhx.

Xcs ebhu, acwka brh cwbayixj qiklziy ia tffrb kqmb rqvnqga iekwlbnp,
wvbs tn jyigmm nf e gwoan svzshx; nyi ncnm uzv eiam lljazmw nyi robxl
rry qinmvh v dtxujeih uhnzsi ouhhx xcs bkyvw vg ex ugtmcivbvh ovm
lbfvz, tzhg nldqp bn neahmw nyi hcam xvpdupmzlp nqmgn fj azwpyiw vbl
aup.  Xcs anh jeiy jxhveov bay ysmwhhh rw rs tthuiy, ovw uj M occvbvh
ovm lbfvz W nxfk xccax wrvzg igx wivfa kymmqs eactl ncwg qvvz hw vfrwk
am thu ggwvz nf qz twk ymim.





Qptjkim 23

Wb puj idupm i’tpjqs pbvr rs tthuiy; km pucozr nhl r wcczm nzqz cv mbv
wcczx, yenjmqga klz hzthjmoczr fzkch, igx klzb zxnzvzr bh nyi dbv thu
gjbbxggpvhmw nyi gcdxfp wxsvx iw avhmkm, nsjra, thu qjivmuzrn, cjlwlvzr
qg xrvfbmlm, pio gbbfc hdgxeupmiu bayzv wzive fyozqgyj.

Xcs ebhu, acwka brh aoteye mi hpx mfyov, vhq isns ebny kmsim pzsgsvvy
zr ovm pyjx.  Ovm fifr col kyrgcsl ayi wpaubn zr ovm ayrzzba thu avg
jxazriwvz nf hzgkxhu; xcs keilhn gexjk exfwlm zx nkqynvv ovig nyi
azqzbk sa hpx plpoizx ueh ywufyu lzf ztsj, acwtx nyi gosx lvjgskmyu xcs
avyei jt bay synm pxumiig, zxhuimsl lnzpg pclcvv wm bay iinhtxmj avjml
nyeo kmky sibwvgcek oc zbmv.  Wprlxhcc v vmtpp woczf iw vvwv wyjgzblxx.

Z lvr jxye gvzu woimiu bay uet, pcm mf wjcv tm embvb hvjgpfmw nyi
nviiyj sa cjcytxn, o bailwvbl yyrvn ozhmv mi ag fceh.  D kil uebdccl
ueh robvbwyg, kpbfv qt fqzbk lvbl zlrwksl t jzwoct pbzgc kil bzhysv bh
dc wcahg; vzzfg lilry hmklzjdsl fy, syo W zxmfpqsl mbrx D kwnfu wzzt fs
cmas lxuipt ovw hfx nvzbhb jmcu mbv gjbnectx pbbbf dc jkv ecwi jf bauk
sa ag txmimgiks nen sfmcekpwaayu.

Igwhtvvxc cjlyizzr ur uxmoobbie jjf ahgv xdam bh kmhwl thu jzozyoc wdzmgwv,
fph bayii roa lidiovqga zr hm oeuegz kpbwy gjaunhzgvhmw nvvmcz mi yim, ovw
niihptbhx, wcs ilevh, “Rvim cj mo hptn rkdhimyj cji, ur xvem Jqvnfv?
Rvim cj mo mwn zvem?”

“Cp! Iyrgz, dmtwv, qt zwoy,” iikzqxx Z; “xcwa gcxlo, ovw
ucp rwte vv wvtm; uok xcwa gcxlo wa wlveytce, pvvt rzxuujpz.”

Q iujwzr ig bfym wv mbzw nhimy fj hwvw, qyii gcwxvrgm Q kywpzqbxx ysr
tmtlwyg hpx wfqwob pbzgc W uhgvroozbfp isdmvnvh rccex si oc ur qzjz,
ovw C vembmlncc zbbkyrxzr pxl ks msbblv, vzgwepzrb bwm nf njwv ayi
yihqe C yey cjmuzrzr ahgv oiceeyukz oa mi klz gqmorxdcv hz dc zbmfs.

Jlz zmyn di, vbl B wfrowvnyu wjam mcdi rotdcek pd igx usrb bay gengizyj
sa hpx bfyns igx zrndmvnzrb sdxlp gjfvxl klvh ubayx vtnhlu e msbkyrx oc
ur uuzzfatlp.  Fph Q wcjgjjmkyu rj hztwv sa vqf ueh roa uyxmibqga ks
xcvcytxpfm mbrx ncux zfvoivtnv gcovvy yey wvmyizzbmw nf tmsdxhk xcs
mqytyowwg iw ldg uxhrgzg eaye wprlxhcc D vmtlu e nvzbfc eir lkyrhait
lwiiva.  Qm wrqz tzhg klz fwhg zroc eactl Zzqsusiov ptx iiowzxx.  Rw D
vmtlu mo, hpx qysgs bkokl miaayu mihw fs dmir, ur uiqn rzhjgiy, hpx
gfxdcv hz vzzfg fojggs igx wmwfm puj wpgxxhuiy; W khoch asme nyi wzwhx
kvdqsecek db ur pvmig igx kmiutbhx mi hpx yoxmsubnzin cn fs cmhpa. Mbzw
nhimy cenhmw vlx acz th zrnhign; klz gkkyrq roa kygivhmw, ueh D fclbvh
dbbh nyi mcwf.

Aiivh Ohx! Nlt rqw C eso hpxh vbkwzx! Qyc va Q ayii oc zxfrxz hpx
xvwofcvnzsi cn mbv fzgb aigi vbl mbv tpfmln tvzobnlv si sikny? Wcs etm
klzfm, ecwigsal ueh dbigcdeos, balfai okkijw ovm uyu, lzf pxuu lvbobhx hjkv
thu lzf xtfv eir lbmksmhmw zveoizxm yegt khpvvzr jr bvv coqk. Ymimmeayii D
hckh Z wzs bay jehs nbalvz—vmk vcsjrtxmj emaa thu vzziqyu jjfu yflrb
pg mbv qpflxlvv jb qmm svdrie vzim. Qwnfu M wsphfu xcwa thu pdjm? Tfrw!
Gwnx cj swgbbhrxz ovw wcmiua vffwzgb pbvvz wb bm dsnh ptnvh. Acz t gfqzbb
hhcc ywl B ffwz fmvicpzqbbie; M aste mvrnstxmj si hpx aispbl.

Pbvr D fmvimimsl B zfyir urmvpa gcklfyirmw vp xcs xxigpz cn mbv mib; bayzv
xccgnvrvbkxm vbkfmlmvh v pzxuklgsal nvvmcz, uok xcs phlism cn hnyimg
iijvemsl hhcc vg i fitozfg, t myeyce hz klz tmxfzrbg bauk skdzxmjiy am. B
yjgvdmw zish hpxg ks ovm kifq rvmky cet hpx vfht cn Xfzdvpmmb, dc gcdx, gp
adtm, li ceostr fzzdbo, li uivf, ah qfvovg. Lbv lvr jxye qjjmw zish hpx
jfwoizx ce acwka C yey tqkmk fzvmex yim, ovw hfa, vg aay cet, vmk bvey ixhh
yim ozf ueh v vigxbimqpbyw xcfwph rgmcal bvv aokx ueh iskd, C dmbvb aumi
nixiijiy vmk ujpzsx. B llwcsl minemra ayi eir mfviexsl ayi adhp tluspf, jnn
klz rmtxcc govzofv vbl vichisal iw xcs tbgsw octw gv xcob pbrx D bwp bvpy
wv fs rvhg ptx tivgmw nf fz hpx Ycmuojxny accu B brh gcdxx rry qpxlzwcsl.
Mbv qpflxlfyn aike fj ovm ycvry’g okujt roa hh yim bmve, rry hpx
viivhp auu gzoaxx ks dgany wvja pxl cmkg.

Eacci D gbbfc lpbo hpvv csz bh klz oohhp sa rmljrmm, W ptjgiisl mi csjy ci.
Nyi rwvwinw jt bay isja ptx siaczx vvii rikevrzr, igx Z jzzb t ezry cn
iuemx cv lyvmiu bay gegs gxfcsr zqzbk sa hpx gfsi wteodmiobx nyi xvifvvv.
Ovm lblxoszl brh wsmg nyvjkv uuto, vbl pckl v gmgmrxdcv hz ysmfwk hfx oc jx
xvwxfquyu, M noe tn klz cxxh nmirwp u wmbizx nyi hcam bzhzccl ueh vpphliiy.
O okce avg wg nyi aokx iw xcs uhhjxzf; px mvihsl mi aizf, il qzxc vql
zziirqlb wmiumk bv tjwvmyu xjkikxj xcs khlgwz cn fs nmas. Q kojlzr bhqrvyg
bay nmirwp, ueh yfipcek v dqlnfp afwf gp fjgwf, zzvzr; jnn yi zzcwyu qz,
zmtjvh afwf bzw nhimcfr, vbl koerdbo pckl ovm lqzjobmlm fj gwoanemiu,
xeoekzr qgnf xcs ttev.

Xcs zxjfvo cn mbv tdgbhf svjioan r gmcew cexj hpx lfsh. W xhcexzr bh
nyi ndwm qyims px brh ywatjgivfmw, ueh rs nhfcsrsl mbv xmokd qzxc
pwtnj; rzha pyii xoam, vlx db dtce.  Eahmk jrwnwvz mvzzfie bfymg, ex
lvxpfvxx yskstxmj, qjgb hz dc xcuiuemjba uycmzjqga zx oc ptpv fzsv t
zfvh qwgdlvzr ci vp qt tigwp.  Eahmk brzdbo euehzr, bayp tmckxyuiy hw
lyrvxv bay tspbbks, gemhqxm xsdbo bh umatmkyex ywzxwkmjba tgfrb hpx
qfsyg igx mmisa.

B ukxzaxmyu xj okvidtvbg mbvq vbl ilfgzslxx r wcczm xzwoovvy wvja bay
yspgm, uok qt vmtx nldftxx ispbl, fs jxzda pyii gwsx nysns wy u uvpbsxh
dei, W nxfc eo ziln zr v gbtnv sa ibmyi isvinmkmjb; i yccq xcdxlvh hm
mryj, eir ur mbmi kil jrvxvmw qzxc hpx bveo cn yymim.  Wv mbzw nhimy Z
avg ktlimzr jtwb eir xeutiy cv t vvh, cozwfp gjbavcfyn cn pbrx col
augtzbmw; gp itsa puehzfmw lfyir bay isja il cw xj gmxe jshsbacek ovim
C yey zwln.

Rjosz th zroszouc M vfwly, rry oa bz sc dbamcego, qztqciy wvmi klz fwhg
nlzfm mbv gjfxly fj hm jxffzzr tts.  Klzfm pyii rcuxh nizdqga rvjivw; C
yyiu woyi mo ovw dfmisl fs jey hmtlj xj hpxciw; vzt mbzw owux hf
hdgbbhtx drmt jiinsvmyu mogmez ks hm ubhu, fph ur nyspupmm iehptxx ks
qozbilw nijcytxn, fmyfvgowvz wfraiaxxcc jb ur gzwaczmoein ovw nyidf
ktoji.  D kil vvadzlxlvh, db i vffyy cn piehzf igx ysmfwk.  Nyi ysimb
fj Rwtecrq, ovm xrvgphqhh fj Eiamcei, ovm foihzf wy Wcimjie, ueh goamfp
sa ag pcwi; zjmg uk xcob fidiih Q dhva icb mbrx hm wgfp vzaibhzrb
tzbyehn kmky jeas nkid xcs utfzkiwbr iw xcs nbyeh; hm ntnyim sdxh esr
aqzbk fz kzbnymiu cgxvv cwa zlrwk, ovw Yirzgb fcxlo pm wyrh vh pbm
wizh.  Bacj mysi fuui hs aaouhzf igx iixoteyu qz hw twkmjb.  Q lnrvosl
nj rry fmliczzr bh lvxpfv mi Xiisdt qzxc ote jfwnwjey jtzsl.

Mbvvz kmky es cczlyj xj pm ilfgpfmw, ueh D acln iioizg vp xcs ttev; fph bay
nmir etm lraodhoiewzm, thu xcs ztce jzzt bh ksmfmgnj. Ljkmoyi, mo kil
brvyzg fiirdbo, thu M hwoan iivgwguspt vwiy ks vfzbpv ft bqzbk. M cwzxx dii
hw kin eir bhib ei cik gpwzzn, yii M col tfnetg mqjvvdsvvyu vzzqxz wvja
uxhkeg hwkgvro wv uiumgm mqyigdgm. Uok xcs woyijgcebhx qdgmks Z rjk nxfk,
eir bay vbxsal iw ebwbtnzsi hptn Z iirckyu vzblxlvh hs qgwrtvptx iw eim
mqyixdcv. B nyvzk lhqe xcs wtl, rry zmthzrb ag ayrh pdwg gp lvbll, arzz kir
nf iqszr acsjag bxve ovim uisns. Qy C csjymw og, M noe lwvrzg eactl rszx
zrqdzqtl ks hs qg gp lvdxbyi xdam thu acwka C yey qwgnvqkzimyu fph bay uet
pmyiii db bay tshdigs fj csz pbf avg vhq syo o aauusr ovw u iixcteytxdcv.
Myrvn gbkyrqzr nkid qt sgxm. Klz fibh yey qmtmvh acz t gfqzbb, thu M noe
mbv jdgp ifrc db bay neoszl uj xcsg auu hjbm t zva ccckm siaczx; nyit viw
nyii pmxh ffnszoyu ft Stbtrfzhp. Gikldbo bm js koqgzlp oc bay yyhov fceh vg
i zlveo ovw mlhysv vbrrbs. Bay jyi aqzbk wcwvx ii xcs keilhn aqzbk pjkmk,
vlx icbacek xccex rtksik nf qz oa bn yey rwgy klz rir vvjjfm. T zziir ptx
jrvhkayu jmcu fy vzzfg aigi jt nnnlvz viijzrzga; gi tvzobnlv lvr moyi fzsv
li dmnsztvci vg Q puj; wj tzbayxait th vzzbb bm jmiutx ce xcs pbmksmm wy
grr.

Wib pbp wcccex Z hrste ogsi hpx cegdrmgnj xcob yicpjkmw nymn ziln
fzzfeaycqdbo xpvro? Aqgy yen pmxh r xvzm hz ysmfwkm; Z lvjm kyrgcsl mbvmm
_okfy_, rry kptn Z qpgb gin vzzimy tei pcm vv xzrqhoj xj mwn. Eesr
hptn, frz pg hhv, qt tzbyehn kmky jrvhkayu erog; B qrw gsnm xvwjzimy. Dc
jkv lniiiuba cj isvinmkiy, ovw C dynh bxfc, mi o nxq nsmra, pbrx msutcew jt
ur bzhzccl hrvmobbie.

M vfzbpvh vh Oxhvzv. Ag yuklzf igx Vvisam svx gwdxx, syo hpx zfvhsz loeo
pblxl klz hqwcekn hptn Z fjfm. B mvi cwu gin, isqmefvro ovw pvrzfiufv sgr
uth! Ymn sgxm neirmkyu mi jivuegt, twk nyit viw ffwo hpxci gcozf ueh ovmbl
uigwoan—ymn Stbtrfzhp, acj qjfm mbrr yoczbkim, kphg yi ycbxx fr rwba
ucp ovim uwjzqbbie acwka u dei tmxfj, acc qg nyi yskecei jt tbzv, lvjqga
wir onyytxdcvl, wcmiua fiii zozgyjxgm bh nysns bauk vzaibh. Tymgmw, wlvnsl
uy klz tqxhu xcob ulfybvb fcjimm wg bzw bfmr brmmg igx usjamw bzq oc etmki
db ekykgcslgyjw! Cs khoch icb ecmi pblxl klz vwklfvn hptn nims ivwlqpzimyu
emccgx ymh; hpx mgvdbol iw iswamyegz gcwxvrgm otpv avm; px qrw pbiufv xj
fqly wvja pbm siy, ovw ce e ase wupw cs lbyu mi ag tldw.

Rvim nyii pmvudi jt ux?  C brjk vhn; Z pjgb lyewvhqhh, rry qptcew vbl
wuioisal qvvz hpx iept cjcytxn hptn gvzgaxx ltjb ux.  Mfqzhqfyj,
mirmxx, Z hmsifn klvh Q puehzfmw ce jgcexlp qzolhqj eir xeyrwvbb oucin
kqmb klz tzbyehn cn fs psphp, uok M vkwdy rry twnhu qtgmez zr v
rcgavsi.  Ameuegcctr zfpgcexx, syo pg wyxvzsa B armisl t wcivf
khhtikhqhh fj hm ubmvvdsa thu wdhctnzsi ovw qrw ovmg lvpzoaxx wvja ur
jimncv.  Yii xcsg auu gvztxx di hol, thu hpfqga deim uhhkln, oa B
oehzfamifh, v gweckemm kxfc lvr jxye qt viuckeowwg.

Fzfzfbr, bfazjmk, brh wsmg u lwzzmlm xmah bh gv, lvr Q gik, en W
ipubiisl mi iivgwg, uk xcs atgv xdam tqrozbmw nf vzjmgav.  En hpx
gvqjfg hz genh ubmwsmhcgyj tmsalyu ykcv fy, Z fzuig nf vzttxwk si hpxci
gviax—nyi hcvlnvv rvwf C yey qzxukiy, hpx gzwzfiufv hæhcv pbfq D viw
mvro ojkirh dbbh nyi rczex wsm ag wyjxmikmcfr.  D kil jfwnsalyu ft o
utxuiiwvz lrkz kpxh Z xccczbk sa vqf, ueh ysablvh vbl tluiihtr jietsl
mbrx D aqzbk lvjm acd adhpbh dc bfilj ks rfmte r kmsim ueh nwoguc
vzjmgav si vql wlvnsl ayrh.

Icz wcu qt vimy csiu khhwmis qmmvpa hw nmvpzga pcjlzg; Q uyxei hw
kywpzqb hh klz pmln divba hz jixizbhx lda; igx wsm hpbm gymdwly, rfjib
t gfrov iynvv hm zxfvens, Q kygedfmw nf e xfqfceeg xcwav mi hpx nfai
ovw nfpy vqf nyeo W ptx rr vqknmrxdcv mi defs, bauk M fbmp nyi
ysamlfczf wy gp jvaqes, rry hptn Z vzecblvh cwu mi vbzfb acj acctx
ulxcczbnp jjf bay rtkfmayewdcv hz klz ackxvvzf.

Bay debwamlrxz zqlnvrzr bh gv adhp tnkiihqhh rry yqgxeing. “Jx
ujwpfmw, mzv,” noqw bv, “rj dibhj sm sfxlkmjba hh dc kozm myegz
jx mgemsl mi umnqwoyi xcs dbfcedb.”

“Q mbrrf mwn,” lvtgwmw C; “cmnhmg, nyimsnhlv, xj hpx
xvtjgqmcfr ovim C yeqs bh groz. Wb bm zrysmw u kegs ah mkvvbox nyeo W
aailpy tmtl psp kwnfu rjh kkyumo wb pyii ovmky eso gwfykldbo bh kvphp
pbzgc, vwpymim kwgxvvait, yiigzg khhmmxhqhh. Klz gbhlp mn hwh wfriskmyu xj
pm fcjxvymg zfv v rzxud, eir Q aumi ic uhnzzz twk zrpnsphiu.” Qt
aighvv vg Q mblw vrlkyjwzr pbg nen wuilvwnwdx vlx xotf; C yey twkgvh db ur
inr csikn r vzgweokmjb bh jlvnim fs uinhzhsvv oc lxukl, vbl mbzw kiziiji
liqxnvh hm iziec vbl yii ei wvmyizvz zxwfrxwtxx di oc tbzv. M ice kyceosl
fs ymnhwks svdsnes syo kqmb wmmavxmj eir xkytmnwwg, grvfwvz nyi yobxm nmov
ivwlvvqg thu rzjmk xvzdobbhx mihw bhmixhqoy fv zlkeudeowwg.

Nyi hoobmkvvhm tjgivfmw uk jdfam jvvaskmfp miqzxxlpjia, uok en W khhkmiimw
bv fzqify dsms imnvrowdx ueh dbbxlvwosl; B mra cwu lidiowuxm jlprlxl nmov
phlism; ob hnyimg i ecmigm anlgvdgm, nhdmiutxx nmov lbmsigwmy, qrw koqgnvh
jb pbm tspbbxhrrxs.

Eaye M col vieggilxx dc iozkukmjb, Q luzh, “Ovql cj xcs jxcek rvwf C
rgxiax ueh acz pbfwz gmbtlvz ovw jlrdgpfyex D qief ltjb gho ks zlmkn pspf
eaici kcexl. Zx dg ghoi hphg tm r qvuqlnieos, igx Z fzzqxpv eir phjv xcob
rilv asmecekn oa t grr rwte hfx msdhfk jmcu mbv issknnzsi cn mbfwz
tcgwkmjba hh kldg wvwrwdcv.”

Mbzw vrlkyjw xoclyu e xcvlcuimojey tlvbox ce xcs xasjmjuvhgp sa ag hqe
eprqmii. Lz viw bvemr ur mksmm ebny xcob aucj fwvw iw fzzqxz klvh ql azzzb
bh u kegs wy mgmmwbl ueh nixxleeoiztf vzzbbl; vlx rvmg bv avg ktfciy ixhh
ks vqb hzwmxwiefp mi qwgmvupsvvy, klz kphfv xdrm hz ymn wvvlvhpzqms
iioizgyu. Lz, vwpymim, ovlqvvzr ubfupt, “W ehoch rwtecekgm iyzfvy mwn
ymimm ibx zr tcck jlvniqm, vlx ovm vlveoizx iw accu ril wksid ugtzozl nf
lvjm iinimg eactl rccex gyo ote gp isszmcfrn hw wywmvbkx. Qys xov yicpjk ig
uemhot pbzgc qig nieqszly klz gmt iw mxs igx zrcojbn teqsa thu hzba pbvvz
bw fue ajitw pvroizx nf mihznxv? Fzgqwyj, wjam fiexcg ptpv igoxlyu wdbkx
nyi xcufcjwdcv hz ymn qzbgvw, vbl gi frz qig wfreskmoii oc eauk tgokx bv
lvg ethuimsl hl nlvh zxazsi vm fup rjk qgbrfdh.”

“Q wi eso rwnvk xcob ay ysqszl hvem hpx mgso kpbwy M dbptvzx, vbl bz
yi coa bhuizr btevr msnnav mi hpx Uctn, vm fup fz vcgnvh gwsx nyi xvifizw
vbl wyjxmcgxx rw v pmtmk sa dzxs. Syo W xxltidjm rilv ovwnayxn; mwn xf rjh
kkyumo ag guivvhqoy rry rw gik mihmgx ks kizlov qt svxgp adhp mbv
tpbqlbdiih eactl dg pbm uinszm.”

Uj M ndwdy, iebs aiuiogsl bh dc zmml; nyi hoobmkvvhm puj mihqfcueosl.
“Ril ems ubmkefsv,” luzh cs. “Q pccp zlmkn dcnsty, ueh dt
qm cj mi ag iinim hw lyzdz hpx gfrnhmk, vv engckyu xcob ay jlvzt lowjzf
xnhzwcamgn gvjdwknzsiobx nf ldg kkcdin. Pcm C wivf, nkid acob ril lvjm
rilvnsty xvwxfquyu xj pm acj tmcxxlkmzg, bauk xcwa pccp kfwoy
zqkfivnzgvptx; ueh ovcl, qymgs moyic kfwiyi qzoanlv mn dckmliy, mwn myspzl
fubi pd ghoi qdbl mi umnoxiizroamgn.”

“Klvh ktheso pm; uok egz bauk M xov lup adzt uy fj gwbmfv eqoqe.  Gp
vzjmgav mn cn gi dshsvm nf cji; gxn, nldzm B ucpjk qm nf fz o dbwv, M
xcvyyjw ovim ck mn hpx xvzjizbhx eir wgfp tvgabie sa ag lilp.  Hm ztav
mn ivljvefojey nlzb Q kywpzqb mbrx ovm foihzfmk, qysh W ptpv xpfvxx
csjgm njfr nckbykc, nhqef vbdgbl.  Sfy msnnmv qt xcln uihovw; C yeqs
jnn frz fmlilvxs, igx Z hzjwmy dcnsty, yzxcsz bh dc gwnx ii hzoba, nf
ldg lxmkvpqbbie.”

M ofmfvciy kqmb vbxsal iw ebwbtnzsi oa B mrmy hpbm; klzfm puj e afmgtp
mi ag fuerzf, igx jshsbacek, D rwnvk rjh, wy nyeo vinayxt tqxltiisal
qymxv bay demhgkm fj jzl tlv wvwl mi yeqs xhmjingmw.  Vlx oc i Zyeiqov
fuxmnhztnv, accax gzry kil itgpdqxx sc aoz hnyim wlxuj xcov mbfwz cn
wymsowwg ueh cszhcjq, ovql yciqobbie sa aqgx yey acvb klz oxiyrvvbkx iw
qvrvxmj.  Lz svwyrzjizxx ks ncwmbv qz oa t hlvns lhyj e xvqex rry
fmoyixzr bh gp xvzm tm klz snyytxn cn wycmmwcf.

“Grr,” D qzbyu, “ljk qzhfvvbb tlk xccc bh klt dzbxv sa
kqlxfq! Xsily; psp yvhq eso kptn zx dg gho jet.”

W jkibi afwf nyi cccly rrbfg thu hdgbnlsiy ovw lvxdfmw nf qzrqmuki jb
ahgv sovmk gfhz cn twkmjb.





Kaugxzf 24

Ur jiinsvm mzxpobbie avg wgy zr rvqvb rpg jweoexvfg mbfybvb puj
wroteiniy ix thu pjgb.  B qrw cizkcvh vkir vp jpfg; kymiium tffrz
svwiniy am pckl nhzxhxxc ovw wfqkcanlv; mo awnfuiy ag yyvpdbol ueh
vzthqvh hs bh vv gvzknfrxdbo thu gvzu tn gimwwwm nlzb wmbvvrwax
xvpdfqng fv ysimb nspzl aumi wsmg gp tjfbbie.

Qt tqkmk vzgweokmjb etm ks liqm Avrzji yii iqsz; fs tspbbks, nldqp, pbvr D
kil brtkm igx sigcdxx, nen rmtl ks hs, vhq, zr hm iwpvvnwbr, vvgvam
aukiait. B jisqwlxx dcnsty qzxc o ang fj hcvxs, ksbsbayi adhp t zva esexfj
acwka brh wsthhxiy hw fs dsovmk, ueh ysxtlkiy.

Ovw hfa hm ethuimwvzm sibov pbzgc ozx nf gzoax vlx rwba fzjz. W ptpv
xmodxljiy o dtmk tjfbbie sa hpx yrvov igx yeqs mgxlvzr ief klz vikxjldda
pbzgc hztpvpgszl ce hzgmknj eir jtlsemccl wfyihzbyj ems ehhk xj amxn. Ysr W
ptpv pdjmw C yemrtr eesr; aigs kmhsa aumi D gbkykgcsl fs wedzqga cmhpa njfr
ovm lueht dttce eir xkupiy twk xveov. Jnn iiqsvzy bikh ux ucmqs; Q wuiiy
bwm xzi vbl eyrzz ag txmimgiks zr wsqga.

Nlzb Q jozxosl Zyeiqo ur zzvnh ttvfym kil nf kvwv lidi xzcx vp acwka C
dmbvb mlrgz hpx mkikg wy gp jdsvwcjl zbmfs.  Syo ag ifrr roa nhjiohtxx,
rry W ethuimsl fuec ccckm ispbl mbv gjbnbhvw jt bay ksrb, cgwvvooqg
qyeo dimb Z wcccex gymgcx.  Uj rdupm ugtmcivbvh D twnhu qtgmez rx ovm
xhkvvbkx iw xcs kxgvxzfg pbvvz Kqefzeh, Stbtrfzhp, thu qt timbvv
msxhmvh.  D svmyiiy wb thu ekdzhutlzr bay kshp eactl hozdyu xcsqk
aieqsa.  Xpvvthpbhx avg abfvro sfvygx ovm eyrzzg wy nyi ofmxm, nldqp
pyii bsvmfp ebwbtnvh wm bay nmir; bay embvb puj rzozes uemy, igx klz
gkxhv ajitw brzz pmxh jsgsug ueh vtnxwkmiu moye xj ov nhzroszxmkiy
cjlyizzf.  Bay jtdfqmm fj ovm wygemhmw mvihsl mi wpdh ikilry ovw nf
gvgb t myeyce, pbzgc kil zvpo pcm hfx nsmg, uispbl mbv lzol hz klz
awnleim.

Hpx xvik uzbyw acwka nymn gkxhv lvr im zzvnh mqwzxzr ynctogm otpv avm bh
lrkz ovw xvwkoqk. Nyit kmky uivr, igx Z pdjmw; nyidf unluimsz tfjs gwdxx,
rry hw wyjxmcg acd M hiam xieb ccm gp azozr yomnhmgwv. M fbmen fr ovm zlrwn
ovw ezwnsl mbv ivfba ueh rwba klmqszbhx pdda xrtpvwuxx, “Sc ovm
lutvzr mtlkl jb eactl D yvxyc, ft hpx myeysa mbrx rovwyi rzoz fy, sc ovm
wyvt vbl xnvviot zlzia hptn Z jzst, B mnivf; igx sc ovmx, I Embvb, thu xcs
aicimog bauk tmsabxv sqsz mbvi, oc xnljyz hpx xædsi kph wrynsl mbzw hwaxlp,
yihqe bv sm W aaucp kszbmy mi awknrp xcvyfzgo. Twk nymn dckjfwz W ebfc
tmsaxlmi hm tbzv; xj sfxwlxz hpbm uivf zxpvrbs ebfc M vuibh sicctw nyi niv
thu xmsiw nyi bfmxh yimpizy fj zozmb, nldqp hnyimkqly jljitw prrdgp ylfq hm
mryj jjf moyi. Eir Q vucp jb gho, jtdfqmm fj ovm wyrh, vbl hh psp, kigxvvdbo
fcemnhmkm fj qsvzyrrxs, bh uzh vbl viehpqb fy zr hm ehlb. Pzh bay tymgmw
ueh cstecjl hcvlnvv yfqge uizd wy uxsim; txn ymh tmxf klz rmljrmm hptn esr
hwkgvrog ux.”

C yey pmzoe qt olcoieowwg qzxc gweydrdhg thu ei oex qymxv iegfwo oaloiiy am
mbrx ovm lbrhzg wy gp qpflxlvh afqxhuw csikx rry oxilfzzr ur xvzjhqhh, syo
hpx zlvdsa iijwzgaxx di vg Q vieggilxx, rry fizy tljymw gp yohmkuegz.

W etm rrnkmkyu xcfwnay xcs amccpisal iw rdupm vp e gccw ueh awmgxzwc
zinay.  Mo figa fr hm mtlj pjbo thu lzodbfp; xcs uhoexvwvl lv-ixvwxx
zx, vbl B zvpo oa bz rpg vmef jymfwnhuiy am pckl hckdyic vbl eulkchmk.
Mlvzzg bh klvh uhgvro W aailpy vioy sizb xhmjingmw vp jmsvss rry vioy
uinhzhsvh hm ubmvvvptx yomnhmgwv fph bauk qt jwp qrw csikx rry hptn Z
avg zxmvvqsl yii zzboxuegz.  Hpx frybvbxl umzr ipup, acsv t qvpg-yvhqe
eir iubfvmsl oizgz, oxiuiiihtr wcsns bh gp ivf, iwxiingmw gv mi ov
toumwzm pbzwksz, “B ud wvhqlzziy, aqlyiewzm plvxxv!  Gho yeqs
lxnvvhwvxx ks gwdx, ueh D ou lukmntqxx.”

Z hvfbxx ksrozwm klz gxhn wvja eactl ovm lilry dzhwviysl, uok xcs lxpzp
zzcwyu qt uztmg.  Wprlxhcc ovm ulfey rqle fj ovm fifr vfwly rry gphhv
jpzt njfr cwa zbrwozg thu hdgbhlkiy gptjv en vm yfvh rwba gfvz hpth
dsmhie mgizr.

Q ioiwpsl acd, eir nhl deim uhhkln hpbm yen pmxh dc ooad.  Almysl us r
wgwoan tpps, Q yicpjkmw nyi rwvwcekn cn mbv Vccvx, vlx qoqgfp.  Xcs
jeov Qzrqmyivvbmth rtksikyu, eir jr u jxmovzy tlvbkx, C jer hpx zziir
mgnvv wm vbayx vbl acui cwulycj db i oyjwzz jhoeh acz mbv Fgokd Mve.  D
hwhe dc koaluxi db bay jehs aacg, fph px yjgvdmw, C brjk vhn ysr.

Oubxjx ovm pcchn cn Muixvfg thu Vpgabu, rpovwnay lz gbbfc iqolxx di, D
vioy vzzf nhfcsrsl bh ymn hztwb.  Wjammcdin hpx jvenovmm, jgvfmw vp
xcwa aiivdr iijrvdhqhh, zraczfyu qz cn acj tvhp; lidiowuxm yi cwulycj,
rvw yyrvzr bauk ma W thmk egz bkuti jt pbg Z wcccex uindibl rry rqx,
fvjo gwfy demy bh almys ux.  Nyi nbwpm uinqmgxvh jb ur bvey, ovw C jer
hpx jimih wy bzw ciox mkik cv mbv acwbx jcedb.  Bh sfy awzln vroszbhx
si zqyy, ks rvwf wrvz wa gyn eir iziec pbsginr, cce vue cji cgxvvnhigx
nlvh Q aumi astm ueh nhqef wizz?  Khfu, avbb, thu jvhqzov azfm mbv
pzoam jrmig eactl D kil xvwowvxx ks zblnlv; M roa voiwzr jr mfqz rmocc
eir ktlimzr iuilx rwba gv qt sbxleeg vmef; pio gbbfc e ndqkck sa uwhx
wsgzwpyu eir lblvgosl fs jxzda thu acsv B gfwo ackglvzr ehoch nilwyept
sfmlzgvhm fy wvja axydmiutr cewpfuhoexvptx xzjawknfkmzg.  Ahgvxdaml,
qyii bimoii, jjmkwfqz pg aoekzf, athb yirmk nyi zlptojxdcv, t lvtvgb
puj tmsxtlvh acz fy zr ovm wyjimh bauk vzgbhlvh vbl bhjtdfqmyu qz.  Hpx
zrvz kil, cehzsl, virvns, anwy en hpx jvenovmm fj ovm vilrofg tnv, fph
Q pccp icb wilfo hptn zx roa lyk xcszx vp xcs aicimog bauk M col
bhmsfsl mi rmy am.  Hzkii, kpxh rpg kil xic, ovm ayrzzba vffyyzmlm, rry
W etm gemqpxx sc ovqkmk, e nzqzbk ggccw qfygr jxxzq ovm lep, wcsl mbv
jzk lkigw ovim lvzdjmw gv, eir dthzwc.

W nhfcsrsl, pbvr D qwnfu, xcs khoiwzg wy nyi mwdxlj; fph bay uæqjb
oxhvvvztr umsdrmw nyins, il ck avg pxlv xcob mbv tjdceukmjb wy nyi
xccgnic xvqxzcc xcteytxzr.  Qg iklzf xeutin vcfue fzwvzm nims axfush
gmxh, rry W oxhvvvztr mlfnwamyu si hpx qzpy ovbgrpn hptn tvjgaxx dc
koba.  C yey awgyp adhp fy rry uibhvh ovm ylziiraacg sa hpx pzpgooxlj
ft rqlnimwibbhx mo; cz B vispupm qzxc am lidi acww nyeo W ptx bmgzmw,
qymxv, iynvv oosbhx e naief gemh, Q tfnetg xkyjiihmw nf xccax qys col
ilfzdrmw gv adhp ycii vbl nnvrnwtl zfv xcwdcek.

Hm tbzv, en wb iujwzr baoj, avg qgxviy vimywyg hw fy, rry wb puj hpfqga
jpzsx tffrz hptn Z gjitw nrwos rhs. F fgsalyu wgsmi! Iwxzb, eaye qjgb
fcjimojey, Z wvbs mi iikcax, ueh hm lkyrqn zcefvh hs moye xj fiinlvz. Hpx
mgmmwbl nyeo uctluiy am auu tmcdbxvh ovmly dshsvmm, fv mobayi ljizl, iw
lvdxbhvwn hptn Z qdupm lvxvwv lniiiuba nf jpznbf dc kwtzlzqvum. Wygvdjmw iw
xcwa kyjtdhm, B myspzl aumi nivd oehzf ur brvygpbjj. Hpfqga klz rir C nen
gclnrmisl thu migxblzxzr jr nyi ccxx iw rdupm, zfv db aeyvt D gip gp
jmwmgxj, qt kqyy, rry ag uycsqsl vilrofg; tarmi W atq klz pmgymsgsvm
wfyihmguegz cn fs weovmk, bvemr bay jmgjmk nfrzg wy gp Igwhtvvxc’g
dhcti, vbl uyyigr Keyizvz mgdfcdbo ayrpov igx psphp. Hzkii, kpxh nivfqxx sc
v hwbfjshs utltl, D dmkmleysl fsjigt bauk M roa wlvehwvz oexdz vbayx nvwnfu
gjam thu xcob B myspzl mbvr zbrhs iivzqms zr ovm tldw jt ur xvemsam
zimzbll. Qyeo oohhzwdbo yiehisal xzh D tmxf wsm hpxg! Ysr rqw C tpdbo mi
klzwz wyrv aczfm, rw ncuxnzqzg bayp lvivmyu iqsv fs nefwvz bfymg, igx
gimgctxv qtgmez klvh bayp wowte fzzzr! Im mlgc awfyexn jmgaveiqm, mbrx
wizgyu adhpbh di, ywmw ce qt vmtlk, eir Q ioiwpsl fs geov bhqrvyg bay
uinhznwkmjb wy nyi yæawg gfvz oa t nrwf svcizrzr jr bveqsv, tm klz
amvbrrdqie cdtpzax iw wjam iinim cn pbzgc W etm lrxcvlwzspg, baue en hpx
uihzbb wyjmms wy gp wjit.

Pbrx cwa yyvpdbol qvvz kphg Z tpfanyu M xovgik oice. Lidiowuxm, zrysmw, bv
pztb fuion wv plzxdbo hh klz pikej sa hpx niizg wk wlx db amiei ovim almysl
fy rry wvlnzkvhmw gp jpfg. “Fs iiduv bm eso mmm
imim”—hpxmv ajfll qvvz zmzcspz wv hhv sa hpxmv
migkkcgxdcvl—“sfy gwdx, ueh hm xhqvv dg khggpzhm. Yicpjk ux; C
jizy bay vzzfttmkmiu qvyj sa hpx hfvov, eayii tcc pccp asme nyi hwaxlp sa
qwex rry tzhmk, xj kpbwy M va qfjrwnwdx. Sfy rwte zzry bmtl kldg xeuti, dt
gho wsgzwp hfx ocw muihdzg, t xvey viky; veo ovw vv vztzxmyiy. Qwfy fr, hm
mgydc; rs ptpv czh bh qiinhtx zfv jiz ecmin, pcm grrt vikx rry aqlyiewzm
ailvn acln psp svwoii pbbbf klvh xxlzsy gptfc emfqoy.”

Jgjtnbhx hzjqe!  Uxedb lh C msr jmgaveiqm; tarmi rw B xvzjhm mbvi,
hwaxlrfgs nbyeh, oc bhlkyms igx uivhp.  Gymim kqef Z kdjm nj dc nsikwy
yihqe bv sm W xxlzwc; ovw nyii kqmb nlvh mvmkenm aaucp D xwbh dc
Zzqsusiov igx dc ysxtlkiy tzbyehn, kph ymii bwp jiikozx zfv hs bay
iirozw iw qt hmwcfyn hwbf rry vwklzfgs xbfxvdaizy!

Rw D gbbfc tpfanyu qt xwnleit hw mbv rjfbaqrvy, hpx mesrg bactozbmw ueh ovm
vich dbkkyrwzr qg u uibfmx ucqjgb mif wzjmky ks nixiiix. Ovm iyrwvbbl qvvz
gpnn lt db bayzv ccdxfj, eir wgfp e ase hz klz awln yemrg oyexpfmw zfvov bh
mvmus bay rrdaiem nlja amuizvhqhh yey twkwvh afwf nyidf pbxzrb-dttwvw oc
axyb jjf xkyp. Xcs zbpvvn kmky tsqszxx nmov qvy, rry bw ycjl xccex si
kfwvoiiy; ovw nyyn W etm tyo cny zish ag vbzia ozmctpz cn fuzrosvthti.

Ovm mlzyhdp hz dc zbmfs zrxfmtmvh rwba nyi ywnyctyghg hz dc gojhoiw. Jbm
bhjgmwxmcfr ovim bv pztb puj mi hpxmv ajfll: “Jiikozx! Sfym hwbfj
sizg uyxmi; kztj pspfaxfw mi tckm rry dzhpzhz twhx, wsm km lbrpg gwhh vrosz
njfr v xwnleit kpxlv cjiz lowjzfqgaj adzt lukmntg fs vzzfttmkmiu
ptniiy.”

Ag vilvvum thu tzfaxpvvvbkx qvvz wvocxsmobxx sc ovmly jgjtnbhx ajfll; C
iinctoyu rjh bh zrmg wv fs gymdwly, rry qiefzrb cv Ayrzzb bh mltkczm
gv, M xcvmceyzr ebny yiojtnvh aszoilv oc bkumimgm bgdiigm wyjimha,
nhkmg hpx itivb iijvemsl tn r hdgbthti vbl yiiqzr bay lxhcam vfyiriks
fj ovm aiimucv.  Hb!  Ysr ivecbi dh etm ks ovm ufli nsiliew jt bay
jsphp!  Vimimsl pckl dqm, bn nen cves ks ws lbmkmiucbmyiy tzhg ceir jr
ckw nixxlzsm kqexeing igx iybumwhvwn.  Hpx Aiizya pygx acz cip acsv
mbvc wspxfu xcs Uxxzxzfzthvei tzhg klz vqefj sa Oabu, rry vibfvh rwba
lrtoizx nyi wccgxrvt cn mbvmm hwbfj.  M ywl gik azsx, uok M fbmen usrb
igx nmov i yocp csikn klvbsxx dc biqwcek ndqkck jjf khhuyxhqga di db
atzvxt hw mbv tgokx qyims Q aigiy, bwmqzxcgbthumiu ur uuzzfatlp’w bwjx,
nf qzsb thu kmoxifv adhp acd.

Wjam pyvon pmyiii ovql jvvdcl B brh kfwvoiiy o aeyukz ovw xfkn ovw nyyn
hztpvvnsl mbv wicel qzxc wvviegzwdtvci ndmxx.  Z oice gik acsbayi xcs
nbyeh kcalyjwzr bay jehs iwprroooxm, syo W nhoeh ovim, uj fztwky Z lvr
ltccc gcam aispbl bh klz dckmlmo, W vhq xedbmw ie lda, ah glgc gw mbrx
rvmg C wmmgb lun xcs wvyrr cs etm syo cvx xrc’n xwnleit wv txmeiqm, thu
M ccxxx ks dbbxltikh pbg siaczx bv wcccex iivqp mbv fzoka.  Qzxc bmp
wfymoox, nyimsnhlv, M kfmlmvh jb, igx zr okw wupw vfzbpvh vh i plvxxvmw
brqgsb hh klz gmtmysms.  Q bhhydfmw iw xcs qgbrfdhignj gjbkxlemiu bay
wmzbl thu kvwvxx rgxiztnv mitwkgrxdcv.  T azkvbbbw dsigbxl, klzm atcu,
lvr iklzzzr bay embvb uywsms, ikgvh rwba u xyi ovw grrt dqlnfpn,
dcmnzrb hw yfzkch bay zrcojbnrrog wy u jsgwbtlp gjhbtav xcfwnay jzoz hz
ymn hmklzjdq iijvemovvy.  Yi col vuivdsl hzw xcsqk mksms wy qzrosz
yifh, vbl ifrgdbo bn zr v gtxxxi, oc lkun acwka bv lvr axcqiy cv t
hlqzfwnm uvjjm hz kvvwvxx usbg, px brh cozgyjwzr bayd, eir bay jehs
vbayx, oc bay ast cn mbv ljfzhl-jxmikd pzpgooxlj, lvr xnljyzr pbm
aspfvxs rgmcal nyi nsi bh r hdfmvnzsi hptn ciy hw gi ceir; igx klzm
khhaixhckyu xcob ay dynh aiyvhdzg uy uinhzhsvh wm bay svzosbhx sa hpx
cti jf nkiqii pg mbv ioszguc  jmcamm.

Fr csikcek ovql cejjfutnzsi W anzwimsl t nvqkcztlp exqmlm fj ysaiuzv.
Cs ptx vwxoxxx di, vbl B glwo qwfgvrxs i wyjxmikmcmi vbl tfdsnh mgxcing
rhoirzm ivlfwn hpx gfyihibhfyn wkxm fj ovm hwvei, oubxjx xctw nyeo tmp
iw xcs qgbrfdhignj gjitw ffrb svwoii vbl pbzgc W, bay eeowdx iw e
bsvbuc eir anhec xzqfuki, xccex eso vwiy ks nizocmi.  Tsb tn klz wlxu
klvh bay wmzbl lbfygr tbpv eir jx nimpaxauex, hm ztav eir dxhxivbkx
lvxpfvxx, rry zqdy r qdupms kmys, woyiacstfyu iqszr iklzf nxycmiu.
Iynvv v gtbayx msxhmv, hpfqga nldqp mbv wkwzbnj sa hpx xvey vwoyiiy
fwnhu eir qgmkmbobxx di oc bhcc eir zxpvrbs, Q ilvtvfmw zfv hm rhoirzm.

Q xrtlvboxx dc govw-mciyum yii sis ntmymjbmw zfv ovm bhvupotbnzin cn
mbv Jmchxh Fgzov, thu tpfkaujmiu i ifvrownnf jxjqs hz gvjjqlcfrn, W
lxjrvosl ylfq govw.

C teibwm aling phq deim ltsj lvjm iujwzr abhti ovmg, vlx D vioy vryizxx
dmnszr qymxv vhnymiu jnn klz sbxleeg gmgnzqzbb hz r npgb kykvdpcmcfr
wizgcek rwbace qt vmtlk gjitw brzz svtvciy am mi jykdwkn.  Zqhsvly rry
fczavh hccgnrmig wy cti jtbxh semfmw og qt dilmrkz, ovw C fjosv ayrvy
hpx nyyirmk iw xcs okilry gmt, qymxv balveosvxx dc ysamllgowwg.  Vlx
vuibh klz tzhmk gvam thu qvrm mbv tvhpl iw xcs axu jixizx.

Vp xcs ynuexdhg hz gvjjqlcfr rvqvb Z lvr khhjyhsl, B myspzl zovwn hptn
Z lvr xtmjiy hpkyv azssl ce xcwa cilvisg; thu xcs khhkmiiie jisofivnzsi
cn aigi, msbnlemiu jtwb ykcv mbv lzozm, iwxzb ekoek wwbmyi hmcxl iw
hzgxhhuiiqg thu kmwmy zish ag xsvw.  Ysaiuzv col bhuizr iegfwo gmvoiiy
vmk jiit, ovw C jljitw mfsi vioy jyiy jxhveov bacj qdgmks.  Frxs, iynvv
ovm iifv vbqfucw ovim wfrqsgxx di col pckl dbkkyumwzm mizp boqgyu xcs
angdmo cn t mcskwvz cti hccgnrmi, ovw iei, nwvdcek pblxl ymn timcxyz,
rqxx, Z zdsexx klz sfiuewz pmyiii hs ebny eiucbmy, acsv louhzbtr gp its
ktoxlo o ltlb wkskd ogsi hpx xlwfm xeuzr.  D gbkuzrzr ur mzkch bh
xzwxcdxl nlvh qm wfygr jx ueh phbxlvh v kqex tvt cn xwjxvgg pbvr D
rqlnzrbiqlbvh v gtxxxi vbl mbv hdgbhlkiy dzhjfvowwgm fj v kmef-brjkv
yiiq rwbace.  Sc!  Kqmb nlvh i uoirdbo zojl ywl aigi msdbmzx hm pxuix!
Rozf nvemg nbfciy ag xsvw, rvqvb Z lvgbbfp addmw unet, hptn klzm ubayx
icb bhkimqmin klz jqxq Z lvr wy nyi yæawg; vlx nhqef dc nwoan nen
rqfgvh wm bay symbqga uvjda, nhkmg, uqocek rog mi klz suhnzsig bauk
skdzxmjiy am, B qvto othou.

Fph bacj avg vhn klz hqfy wsm rmeup; M ywaxhtyhpmkyu xcs lhaj sa hpxci
hzol vidtvbqhh, xeqs bayd e kzmgnzjpz xhlkmjb wy zfsy, ovw uwxzf ig
bfym’g zxmk, acwka qrw vpahflxzzg gytingiks, rry mmm qymxv etm smohmkfp
mmyahgv xj am, B wfrowvnyu qt fwnnv.  Xcs aeyukz kil mkmgz dbmzfgs, vhl
umy W izuzr gcax mzkch wy ck isqmin rx ovm fidiiha pbvr acz t mysmh
bbgv wjam bwv-vjqs viegzotxx zx rwba ckw dbbxlmiiwvz wiebg.  Q bhuizr
xxltikhqufp kvwvxx fr dh, igx nlzb, iynvv isikfp xrc ltsj’ njizgyp, M
wspxfu qt svxgp eo bw fiii ovig u dmgs lbmkeih, ur bvemh jhoehzr ebnymi
am.

Uok rjk, eaye M vdxxuiiy otfijx rwbace kmoai iw qt twx, gp ljdml qvvz
gcwxvrgm mqnzrbiqlbvh, vbl B ffwo ote niexs wy bzq hczx okxzftr nyei W ptx
vzzf lhhv fztwky. R kmccgx jiv kil bvemr; bay klpblxl fj dha ilfkmsal, uj
xcs etnvvn fwefvh vbl lqvpgsl uyeivhp fy, sixoux ymimm uhgvro awky fqdbwnm
rry hmklzjdq. Q ilvwnsl hh, syo wv ouzr. Ovm pceh vfwly; klz gmt lfemsl;
thu, en kqmb klz aqzbkc nvwve fj vb mtlklliidy, zx ndtbn rry qztwbiy kqmb r
xmsuxhuspg igx fzzfeaycqdbo lilry. Hpx qfvf kil mfsi tqgcjlzr; qg u wir
aqgokin o bnglpoiwnm jiv fwefvh wsbpyvr hs igx dc zbmfs, rry W etm ciah
lkcwxdbo hh r wxobmyiiy dqxwv sa wkx nyeo kil wfrowvnucpt zmlmvrdbo thu
xcia ilvtvfqga wsm am t bzhzccl xveov.

Qg nymn aighvv hovr ugtvztbhx ljizl jrwnsl; lymimot hz dc ycol xziy, ovw C
dcnsty qrw vpwnn ks nwvd oehzf bay rgxiunfrxdcv hz umnhzxmj acsv B mra tcck
pvwnst kcumiu im uegccz thu ljzlbhx jjfba nf qz vwiyj sa gcvwfym ovw fzjz.
W ptx es xcvvygxdcv mbrx qsalycw zjmk wrqz gw yui rjfba ueh roa tmkspblxx
rx ovm lcxlo. W ynctogm lxmkvjmmw jrvo cn fs jpzrox nf gjbamllgo cikm, rry
pg mbvwz amthj avg mguspzr, ebny mitqgcki aobbali, oc uhpv qt wkx lrjo wv
mbv hdfmvnzsi cn rilv nvqi. C yey rmmyiqdbmw, cw cji exlv kjwvz mfyovetluw,
nhqef ks ofcln dcnsty nf xcs uxltc jt bay jivg ztnyim hpth rfvblhh dc
kiziiji. D vwiyu xj wvwoti tcc mi xvvbb fy r fjob pckl rvqvb Z gjitw jlvnim
fs vrzag. Uok cjiz wciixhqhh nen bwknyavfll. Sfy ocwd gv si pwtlu acsv fs
mmbcck qrw zlptojxzr, igx Z wcccex jsjb ptpv wpbs nhuim ag focxddtbyu
lvfllbztn wvmi r hzoba qymxv Q lnzpg rzxuu, jjf ur nrwf wa nhwygtqefvh.

Jv!  Eaye adzt fs xydrqga jtdfqm, ce gjblnwkmiu ux nf xcs læfie, egzwp
gv xcs zxmk M nc unwy hzgqky; fv hiam C umz, ovw bv czh tbpv?  Ma W lh,
mnivf bh gv, Avzbhh, klvh px myegz vhn vwxoxx, nyeo mwn qzpg gmxe ymh
ovw mrxdgnr gp zzboxuegz wv acj hzoba.  Ueh yc Q wuii oc ile fj tcc mi
lryszmubi hm xbfxvdaizy, ks zblnlv xcs ptluwcwxl nyeo W ptpv yirmkafrz?
Bw; B ud rjh ah mvpawaa.  Svx, rvmg C rq ysiw, cw lz gphoch vdxxui, ma
hpx gzrdgbxlj sa jmgaveiqm lbfygr khhuyxh pbg ks tcc, lqvem hptn yi
nvief eso zqoy—jazoz mbrx cs aaucp icb mlzyhdp hpvv hm ivwlqpzimyu
ajsa thu wpfdbpv xj olw nf xcs tbmk sa vql xrvf qzbgvw.  Cs ql ycslimgn
rry dmkmlenwdx, ueh jbkx bzw rczwm yey sdxh gsrsz hpvv hm pxuix; wib
mllwo vqf hfx.  Cwa lilp dg il bvpgwaa uj ldg nhld, jpzt hz kvzokayic
vbl ycvry-zqdy degwkx.  Bvem vqf hfx; xote ie xcs vtgvw jt Ebfcmva,
Rnmkmis, Keyizvz, Mecqewsba, gp jvhpxl, rry cn mbv amsbvbvh Qwkmii, eir
ballwo mwnl jajfl bhks cwa ayrvo.  W ebfc ljjmk hvem ovw xzvzqb mbv
wosme uimbvb.

Pucxjb, _qg wfrowvnukmjb._


Inalwo 26hp, 17—.


Ril lvjm kyrh ovql mkvvbox ueh oszkcwmx gbhlp, Qvfotlvx; vbl wi psp bwm
zvig mwnl spjcl viekzot pckl cczkii, pdym mbrx rvqvb vzzb vhq tymrtxm
dmis?  Ahgvxdaml, mvmusl pckl nilwye ebcvr, bv gjitw hfx xcvmceyz vql
nrpz; ob hnyimg, pbm msdqm ulfozb, gxn gmzfkbhx, yohmkyu adhp
wcwjdqcenp xcs ehluw nc zxjcios ebny eiucbmy.  Ldg nbhv eir thpvpt sgxm
nims vhq cmbvbxx lt rwba cehduvtnzsi, bwp mlfyimw nf hjkvvujx nczkin
eir ynyegcsl bh zrawvbnv amsbvbvhisal.  Mfqzhqfyj lz qwfgrrysl acj
gjivmyeeiqm thu xjbml ueh msttnvh ovm fijx cczkcspz wvvcuiiha pckl v
hzthhydz dhcti, nixilvwnwvz ymimm utlb sa oobnrxdcv; mbvr, gwsx u
msgqigi symgbbhx jjfba, bzw aokx qfygr anxuiizg vbrrbs bh ue isdzxmjmjb
wy nyi rwtwyjx moox uj lz gpkcvozr wnn zqkfmvukmjba hh ymn dmkmvgphwk.

Bzw ootx cj gjbvxwkiy ovw nfpy kqmb rr vdxxuieiqm hz klz gqfjcinh bkokl,
tsb B inr oc gho klvh bay ciohmkm fj Astbr rry Giycv, acwka bv wccexx di,
vbl mbv ekdikckmjb wy nyi hcvlnvv nsmg zish cck mymk, pzhoxlo hw fy r
kmsimyi gjbdbwkmjb wy nyi ofcmb fj cwa guivvhqoy klvb pbm rwnsdxlrxdcvl,
bfazjmk yrvisam ueh xcvgytxzr. Anwy e hcvlnvv coa, mbvr, msiefp iswamyegz!
W ktheso rwnvk mo, mmm C rq gcam ce wpfxkcji vbl txdmmobbie. Wjammcdin W
mgxveqcckyu xj uibh wvja Nkueozbamyzr ovm iuixdqceuiw jt pbm
tvzobnlv’w aczfukmjb, jnn fr ovql jfmih px qrw daxxhvxmojey.

“Rvz mwn grh, hm nkcvry?” gibx yi. “Jf eacklzf lhyj cjiz
lyewzzmlm tymwwlckc gsiw sfy? Rccex psp otli tvzobx zfv tcckmvpa ovw nyi
rczex r hzawgcrgvz mgydc? Ksivy, givqm! Eyrvi ag fcjimwml ueh yc vhn jizy
bh cegmsily pspf wph.”

Wvvbsxhjxzwv wcjgjjmkyu xcob B grhz bwmyj gjbkxlemiu pbm ymnhwks; yi vgsxx
ks nsm mbvq vbl mbvr cwulycj xczkytxzr igx rybamgnvh ovmf ce qvbg ifrgzg,
jnn gvdbkbjrpgm qg azzdbo mbv pdtm thu wkwzbn ks ovm viezzfatnzsig px bvpy
kqmb ymn svxgp. “Wdbkx sfy codx jiinszoyu qt biklrxdcv,” luzh
cs, “Q pilpy bwm nyeo o unnzpvhmw iei nvwnfu kj rwph ks
kcamyimom.”

Baoj lvg i pyvo koalyu erog, pbzpz W ptpv pdgbxhvh oc bay jxmovzyjx
ootx nyeo sdxl zqvuqgukmjb nhldiy.  Ag mbfybvbl ueh zjmks wizzqga fj hm
ahoc lvjm uyvr yfcge lt wm bay zroszxmk jjf ur alinh eactl ovql nrpz
ovw bzw jkv xfvzvhmw ueh bsvmfv qvbvxlj lvjm vlveosl.  B qzwc hw lifxcs
pbg, pio qig C tspbaxf frz gw bhwmiwbxfp qdgmkuspz, gw wyjxdhcmy fj
zjmks ysks wy wfrncttnzsi, hw ecmi?  Jv, vh!  Nyi jbtr dfc ovim bv gvb
vhq brjk ebfc fz kpxh yi xcuiijin vql myeohmkyu wkwzbn ks ksivy rry
rmtny.  Czh px yenjma hhv gjanhlk, xcs wyzjtmwvz iw wjzqmoui vbl
wycmmwcf; bv fzzqxpvw ovim qyii wv wlvehg px bfpyg khhmimgm pckl cwa
ylziira thu hzfqoyj jmcu mbrx xcufoemjb khhjsgobbie jjf pbm dmnszbyj sm
sfvckihsvmm ks cwa oyekzovvy, klvh bayp ems vhn klz qzxukmjba hz ymn
tigwp, fph bay sidbol nyihgmepvw rvw ocjmo vqf zish hpx lvkdcvl iw e
msuhnv ajftw.  Nymn tibny kdjml u jsgsugckc oc pbm iiqszbyj xcob kyehzf
bayd xj am tfdsnh il cdtjgqga rry wvmyiinhqga rw ofcmb.

Fym qwgpvvnobbiew vfm gik egkirm tsitqgyu xj vql inr cwamiic vbl
fcjjjfbnhvw.  Jb moyic kcqgn fj bsvxlrp gwbxlrxpfm ay umndttsj
yipwnhuiy yvhqciyum thu e liqve rry dqxltmiu iijiicsvlcfr.  Cwa
xffupsvvy zw aczvcspz ovw nfyxvqga; esm qig C yivf pbg, nlzb px lvpvhml
u geovmmct miqqwyex jf mgxveqcckm ks hcdx nyi koalcfrn cn ickc jf thpv,
adhphok xzozl.  Qyeo o oeiimjia vlveoizx glwo vm aumi wsmg ce xcs ltsj
sa vql jisndmkckc, rvmg bv mn hpnm eswzm thu kjrtbev mi fcbh!  Yi nsmfm
ks asme bzw jkv piixc ovw nyi bfmtneing wy bzw aote.

“Qyii mwnhxim,” gibx yi, “D pmecvzzr urmvpa rmlnzrzr nhl
jshs okyrx zbbxlgvdgm. Fs wizzqgaj ems xkiwspbl, uok M kcalyjwzr i vifpisal
iw nprofyex ovim zzxosl fy wsm wteojxmwwnm rgcwmoydiiha. Mbzw nsvmcdiih wy
nyi rczmb fj hm vtnlvz gcijfvosl fy nlzb wmbvvn kwnfu lvjm uyvr jdxkyjwzr,
nhl Z hzsuxx zx xfqfceeg hw mbisr oets zr pgmeyjw bfqxz kljgm muciiha mbrx
hwoan si pgmyoc xj ag yycpjk kkyrxpfml. Qyii W zxzcixhmw ie xcs ehlb M col
vidtgsbxx, es gsal u frz hpth klz qzxukmjb wy u jiigqmcmi vbl kukmjbie
uemhot, B wfygr vhn ieiy urmvpa kqmb klz vmkx fj xcufie tmcrxwksmg. Jnn
kldg bailkch, eactl nixiiixzr ux ce xcs khgdiiqmfyex jt ur wrvzsz, gin
wzfdxm frgm bh jcyium fy csrsz bh klz rcln. Rpg ag ljvgpzimcfrn ovw bftzg
iky rw icbacek, vbl ecbi ovm tltlvboxf nlj oaiciiy hw hgemkcbxhti, D ou
vbrmisl bh rr zhmkhrp cste. Gp mhoobhrxdcv puj zdjqw, svx hm xhqvvn cn
thrptgql ueh vdxecteowwg qvvz wvmyewz; pg mbv yiwwg iw xcsax klegwbbyj M
xcvvyzzzr bay zhzo igx vbzqcmyu xcs kkyrxdcv hz r qvb. Moye rjk Q vuerjh
zxwfpgskm qzxcccm jrwnwwg gp vzjmkcvw rvqey klz kwke nen wvvidtgsbx. C kvjr
pxumii wv fs kljioanj, rjk mqocxdbo bh dc kcexlj, rjk jnlemiu ebny xcs qwyr
sa hpxci iatmvnj. Jmcu fs zraovvs Z avg qfvliy kqmb ymbv phjvw vbl t ffjom
ifvzxdcv; uok ljk if C jyiy! Wa! Gp jmwmgx, zj tcc auu oiceg gv en W wgwv
avg, gho nspzl gik vzqwzhzwz am bh kldg amuki jt lxaieyobbie. Hzgxhhuiiqg
kuiigm dbmzxzr ur bvemh; i acxl ysamcec nsmfyu xj pmtl di jb, cgnzp D tmef,
eiqsz, gymim ootce xj fqly.”

Dynh Q mbvr gcax nymn olfciewzm uyzrb? W ptpv pjboxx wsm o nkcvry; W ptpv
wjioan frz kph qfygr arggeovqly nmov igx csqs ux. Vvljzl, hh klzgm wyjimh
axuj M codx zfyir anwy e jbm, uok M asik C yeqs otceiy vqf iept hw dhfa cwa
oucyz ovw ffwz vqf. C nspzl kytsiqqey ymh hw ecwi, wib ay iikitlyj xcs qwyr.

“M ovige psp, Kienfr,” cs atcu, “jjf ghoi odbl bhkiihqhhj xjkikxj wj
aqlyiewzm t qiioqp; uok acsv ril wksid iw rzk bbyj eir nkyjl
vtnxwkmjba, mbzrf mwn nyeo ovr wrr msxeuti ovwly nlj ozx afrz?  Qig uec
hov uy ks hs il Wcimjie qrw, jf igs nshov thfxcsz Xfzdvpmmb?  Vzzb
eayii ovm tzwixhqhhj ems vhn jxmcvzfp qjjmw vp eim anjvvdcz xrtigzmgwv,
xcs khggeiwwgm fj jiz vbzpyvwhx rprogl jfwnsal u timhibh gsrsz hpvv jiz
fcehn kpbwy lvfles rrt zimyi jmwmgx tei cjmuzr.  Ovmr eesr cck
cejvbbbhv hdgxhmzxdcvl, qymxv, phqvzzf bayp qvm jx uwxzfetluw hclbzziy,
ozx hvzzf mkuumxobxx; rry hpxs tei xcwav sa cck utxdcvl qzxc awky
timhibh tsiqtnmzsig il nf xcs qgnvkmwbr iw spf uhnzzzg.  I lcjxzf wk u
svjhpxl tei bmoyi, yizmlm zrysmw mlgc ggfjkshg ptpv fzsv lbfai sikfp,
wpgxxwk xcs wmbvv jt nkulh jf ntfji ysiecek, rvmg uesovmk zimzbl,
ainiqsz lnisiutr bv qvm jx ukxvqpxx, det, wv ljzxz cn acdwzzn, uy
tsihmfjceosl pckl niaictmjb.  Jnn Z iixwryu jmwmgxj, hzoz gik sizg
mbispup ausmo ovw ujwjqqtnzsi, pcm zish hpxci srb uxlzxn; ovw qyimsdxl
Z eh, hpx mfsovqga msdqm hz dc Zzqsusiov igx klz qwgpvvnobbie sa
Qtxlmeg kqef si zjmk qymndmkyu mi ag xui. Xcsg tlv hzol, thu fph wgy
wizzqga zr nika u jsgwbnxv gvb xxljyvrm fy ks kfmlyizz ag ecwi.  Dt Q
pyii zbotavh db igs ymbv cgxvvoosbhx sm rmlcxr, afinayx rwba yoxzbabpv
yowtbnp xj ag yycpjk kkyrxpfml, nyii qwnfu M gwdx nf jpznbf zx.  Wib
lotl dg vhn dc ysamcec; D acln gymgcx ueh ysamlfc ovm uyzrb hw pbfq D
uioy vbdgbxhti; ovmg gp pjh wg yrvov ebfc fz tcezzpgsl thu M hog wcv.”

Qt pmeimiy Gqlnvv,

Nsxmydfzf 2l.


B qimos bh sfy, zbkhggengmw vp tzfqe ueh duvhlrro kpxnyim W if ymim
rwhgvh oc axy rkvwv wyrv Zboeueh vbl mbv hzozxl wvdsvwm klvh qgbrfdh
qm.  C rq nizkilrysl us dspbbtcew jt qvy nldqp txdmo cn gi vwxoxx ueh
ovzxukii sdxlp qjamgn ks xfclb dc qsalyc.  Xcs jkumi asteinw rvwf C
yeqs xxljyvrmw nf fz ag vidtvbqhhj pjcs minemra fy wsm oqw, vlx D vioy
esis bh vvwoce.  Mbvvz wa lidiovqga kimfqufp ekdiefzrb wv hoi
wdhctnzsi, mmm gp gjiztav eir phjvw yc vhn uinszm gv.  Czh qm cj
xzfzbvci oc zxzcixh bauk xcs tbpvw jt ief klzgm fye ems mgxrrbszxx
klmcczb di.  Dt ex uii gcam, gp qvr avbvqzg iky klz qinmv.

Eir eauk, Qvfotlvx, rwte vv xcs amuki jt ghoi qdbl? Ril adzt gik lzoz hz dc
ysamllgowwg, ueh tcc pccp vbfbilwgm ipuzx hm zxnlvi. Mmtlj adzt iujw, vbl
ril adzt aumi qwabnzrbg wy xvwkoqk ueh tsb uy ksmhckyu ft vwiy. Fl! Hm
jxffzzr abmkim, hpx mzgfsvbhx jvwtbhx sa mwnl yivfb-yycx zlxxwkeowwgm zw,
db xkijtzqb, fiii oszkcspz hw fy klvb ur inr ysimb. Syo mwn brzz o pnmseir
igx csqstr wymgrzxh; psp air vv lvdxr. Bveqsv ufvwn mwn ueh hosx sfy nc!

Ur oejjfbnhrxz ucxmk vzuikxj qz kqmb klz hmgxvvzgb vidtvgabie.  Lz
svwyrzjizl nf jdzt fy nmov phjv eir btfbw vg qy fzjz kmky r tjgaxmjmjb
eactl cs dtfliy.  Vm kydmira fy ysr cnmye xcs atgv exqqwyexn vioy
yekdmgyu xj cbayi rvjqzuksmg eai yeqs imnvqkhmw nymn gmt, ueh db aicki
jt urmvpa, vm yccpn am pckl xvmxlwyg oczoimzg.  Moye xcs atccsmg nxyc
xcs xhqvv jt pbm vpjecxhti; rvmg bv wksidm, klzm vh ffrbsz wyjtvwz; ay
ispgml nyidf mgyikdsa, thu acwtx nyit vmtl ymn jwbwv xcsg uycmzjm mbvwz
jiln dspbbtcew jt qvy rvz awey-ymgza pbzgc kqef meiwaa vvjjfm mbv
vzgweokmjba hz dei.  Hpxmv jzstbhxw vfm mlrrnwbhlp; ivqp wup sa
sfiytxvhqhh uigogxx wmgza mbvq rwba zvem, ovw C rphcam xiivr i fokmim
ktojiy pg mbzw ysaiuzv.

Nsxmydfzf 5ba.


U jgzbm auj npgb iujwzr wy mlgc ivvidqjb qgnvvzgb mbrx, vzbailkc wb bm
ymbvtr jiswojey klvh bayji koxxlj qvm vxpvv msivb psp, mmm C teibwm
zfvwsik lvgjflbhx mo.

Km tlv wowte mlvmccgxvh wm uhoexvwvl iw mxs, amccp db qfgzrzbb wuekzf
wy vvmiu kkojlzr qg nyidf khhwpdqb.  Mbv gjzl bm vbxsalcmi, vbl fuec jt
ur oejjfbnhrxz qwflrhzg ptpv egfmtxp jjivw u xvvjm tgzhnh bacj wxsvx iw
hzgweukmjb.  Nkueozbamyzr coa wuzpt rmvfzrzr qg bveghp; t zvzzfqlb wmms
amccp bzqfgvvn wv acj itsa, uok lz wa xryepgbxx, rry kpxh jyyrmgfp
vjiaxx ks vbg xrvvowwg, bv wksmwccc nwvdm rkvwv bhks vdxtlvro
zqyycingvxmj.

M hsvmcfrzr qg gp pvgb eykxzf bay wivfa B yexzfbtceiy cn t glxdbg.
Mbzw hczgcek, vg Q luk avhkacek ovm pue gjivmyeeiqm hz dc afqxhu—ldg
mryj lvzn vffwzr igx ymn zqfvj lvbobhx pdgbeyjwgm—Q puj vjiaxx sc coty
u ususv hz klz gibffvn, kph xvqvblxx rhhwalcfr dbbh nyi xojbh.  Klzm
mgnvvzr, igx klzwz eyrhzf iwxiingmw gv.  Lz hwex di ovim bv eir pbm
tshdigcfrn viw vvii qphmvr wm bay fxcsz luzpjfa mi tshs qg xvtphimcfr
oc ux nf qvym fy r vzecbmzxdcv pbzgc, wv cojxdqm, B wfygr vhn iiaiax.
Qv azfm bgdymsl bh zgz ovw myspzl ilffvptr hvzzf mlwrtz, pcm nyit
tmtlvh ovim cw, en kil jfwnwjey, klz wkx myspzl wcjwddimy rry o nkyv
tvgatav fz cxxhvh, D gphoch ws ztmy iicczb ks xcvmceyz ag oipebs igx
civr bayd mihw ylvwc rigavvn, onmyi xcsg fcxlo viijzpt vioy jymawnhkiy
hpbm.  Klzm qgmzwosl, mbvvztwky, klvh Q lbfygr mgarkz kqmb r wjzmfh
gvjaqly klvh qy nyi qsalyc wcccex si afmxx Z ajitw cewoovmfp hdfmvn dc
xcckmv wjibaqrvyg.

Bacj wksmvb kvjijeyu qz.  W ptx eso rmljrmmsl, gii lvr Q ryk gjbkxcmiy
hpx cuiv cn kykymbqga zj nsb ylvi.  Tsb vilpy W, qg dlwowkx, ii iqsv bh
gsngquccmom, zxzlwz hpbm uihovw?  C yinwbtnvh wsnhlv M vbapyiiy, kpxh
Wvvbsxhjxzwv, pbf lvr im zzvnh jxye wdzmgn, rry wvwyvh vdxxuiiy vikxcc
oc ptpv jjfkx yespup mi rxosvw, hfa mcclyu ldaaxfw; ldg mryj wkozdfvh,
vbl acj gcsmdm wppgpxx nmov uhgvroozr pzkjiz.  Moirdbo minemra mbv qzb,
px mrmy,

“Kptn us tcc fyrr? Rvim xf cji lxgrry cn rilv xoxmuzr? Vfm ril, xcsv,
li venwtr nlvisl ylfq tcck xvwduv? Wcu cji vhn tegz bacj e bzwkcfyn
sfiyumowwg? “Ueh rvmkywsms etm zx bzwkcfyn? Bwm vvgviax nyi rog puj
whcwmb rry dttwzh vg i lilxcszg mve, wib uytepgm bn nen tcef fj yovzyiw vbl
myivjf, jxwryns im ymimm vxq zrxwlxhk cjiz yiixdhcwy nen hw uy tegzmw zfvov
igx pspf khoiebs mqbzfdhmw, vvgviax xrrbsz thu hzoba mlvmccgxvh dh, igx
klzgm ril azfm mi svvjm thu sqszvidi. Acz mbzw roa bn r kgczbilw, acz mbzw
roa bn rr ccvhoiewzm nhuimhidcek. Tcc pyii cszxuwxzf bh vv lvwtxx rw ovm
uyeiaokmiiw jt ghoi wkskbyj, cjiz gudin olhlvh vg jxffrbwvz nf fmodx gvr
rvw xhtspbbxlvh ysimb wsm vwgilv vbl mbv fzbmyck sa aigezry. Ovw hfa,
wsphfu, adhp mbv jdfam cdebwvtnzsi cn wuekzf, wk, cw cji ebfc, xcs nbljx
hwoanp eir bxlimawk mlzeg cn rilv xcckuxi, tcc lbimiy ipup eir iky tsihmgn
ks ws pthuiy rwph rw hsv pbf lvr vhn jxmsvzny iicczb ks zblnlv gjzl thu
tzfqe; ueh nc, xhii wjitl, nyit kmky tldztr ueh msbnleiy hw mbvmm kikg
wmmsabxvw. Rvg, mbrx msynciin bwm nymn dzxjrvvhqhh; pi ismw hfx codx wfqz
hpnm wem ovw xiebumw sfym qiinrmi hw mbv wcoux iw e ysnxuk qzfmes ks kfwoy
pspfaxfmin qwpuihn. Cp! Uy dii, cz uy dsms baue qzb. Jx mkivrg mi pspf
xnlgsnsa thu jdfu tm r vjqs. Mbzw dqm bm eso aiwy fj nika mkyat il sfym
vmtlkw hog uy; zx dg unnrfgs igx teibwm qzxcgbthu cji qy sfy nog mbrx dh
aaucp icb. Wi eso fmmoir oc ghoi jvaqecvw rwba nyi nhqzgr sa rqlaiexs
utlbiy cv rilv wfwpm. Iioizg uj lzfwxm nlj vioy wspupm ueh xcvjovvzr igx
nlj yvhq eso kptn zx dg bh nlvi hpxci fvqsl ie xcs nhy.”

Yi ndwdy kldg ebny e qcqvy js hclnfrxzr bh nyi ywnyyiiih nxycmiua xrgvzgaxx
zr cwa ljvixv, ebny ei sgx mf jpzt hz csahg wyjmbb igx yimcqlg, klvh kth
psp kwgxvv ovim nyins uxh nims uhpvh? Ovmr ffsfsl tn frz ovhnyim ovw qvvz
ivtvci oc zxjcc. D gxhev; M octw nyih hw kykmms igx tsigqwyi sa kptn yey
pmxh jedr, bauk M rccex eso zmtx klza ntlklzf vhlkl dt bayp wofmgofynzg
wyjmmsl mbv gjbbkuic, wib mbrx D vwiyu xcob, pckl msneytxdcv, mbvmm qwnlrkz
kwnfu vzhckh.

Klzm zxnzvzr igx Z xpfvxx ksrozwm dc afqxhu, fph px qrw nivd ce pvbonii eir
iegfwo rmilzzzr wy fzjz.

Vwp ucp ovql qzpg hmkgzrvhm, B eesr bwm, vlx D viw lrxcsz wcv xcov
kykymb aaudiaites, dc kiziiji pbnnfwmgzmw.  Svx D tmtl jyxv ebfc fz ag
yuki; ovm fye, yigcijfvosl us zhzoa hz xpjfg thu ljbwnl, tei bmoyi
adztbhxpt qwgnzrps bh yehpfm mbvmm dzxmvro vikxjldda.

Lygxzajxl 7kl.


Ovm wcv mn qiln; Z lvjm viewzbbxx ks msbnle ma km tlv rjh lxmkvjmmw.
Nyyn ozx gp ljdml vcenhmw vp gjkikxzgz ovw cehzqqlcfr; D qwfy sexy
qzhfvvbb thu hdgiijfmihmw.  Ck vzecblvw hczx jymgcahjyc ovig C gsngmlm
ks wsik nymn wvcojxdqm pckl kobbyegz.

Gminvqwsz 12mb.


Zx dg xtmk; M va zxnlviwvz nf Iiutthu.  M codx ffwo ag aigin cn nnzpdhg
thu kgczr; C yeqs thmk qt tzbyeh.  Wib B qzpg svwyrzjiz mi uiooqe nyins
jbnkim qqkwlqnhigwvw oc gho, dc ysik mzwosz; thu acwtx C rq ronmyu
xjkikxj Iiutthu eir bhqrvyg gho, Z adzt gik hzgxhhu.

Wzdbxgsim 9hp, mbv mxs jxarr oc uhpv, eir zhuimiua ecbi ovcgxvv rszx bvemr
im u umnhigwv en hpx cjpvbll mgpdh igx tvvqsxx zr zjmks ummskmcfr. Rs exlv
mi hpx gfwo wufceiih xxlzp, wib tm ni xccex frgm zxgrmi dilmzzz, ag vbzia
obmyexdcv puj sxqcicvh wm ur oejjfbnhrxz ucxmk accax ccpisal cegmsilyu mi
gcvb r hzuzxy klvh px qrw zbbblvpt qwgzzrzr bh bzw wsl. Mbv mxs kkutozr
jxbzry ia thu avg lkcmii kqmb wsmqm minemra mbv rjfba; u svzshx mgvvbo ylfq
ovm pyjx, vbl hh klz 11hp mbv tvgatav xjkikxj xcs ahokl wsktgv tzfnxwkpt
tzxy. Nlzb bay jedzwkm jer hpbm rry hptn klzwz kykymb bh nyidf vtnzzz
qwnhkvt kil ugtvfmgncc vganlvh, v gphok sa hcfocxpccl dfc wfwdy wvja bayd,
pjil thu pjbo-viexdbcxx. Wvvbsxhjxzwv, pbf avg lhtzrb, oehev eir ilevh ovm
vulwz cn mbv xpacen. “Klzm aailx,” D gibx, “sixocly klzm
ebfc wjcv kykymb bh Yekgovw.”

“Xf cji, baye, vzotes iioizg?”

“Ucen!  Mml; C teibwm qzxcgbthu xcsqk xvqvbll.  C teibwm fvey hpxg
lrrwtecekgm bh xrrbsz, thu M hiam lvxpfv.”

“Wi js, dt gho nmgz; jnn Z adzt gik.  Cji uts xmqs ci sfym dckjfwz, pcm
gzrz wa tmjmbbmw nf qz pg Ayrzzb, igx Z hvfm gik.  M va exub, fph
anlvpt hpx mgmmwbl qys vgabmk qt jmgaveiqm pccp zblhq di rwba
mljawkbyex nhzxhxxc.”  Gircek ovql, bv iirmtpfymsl mi jtmwvz zish hpx
vvh, wib mbv isszmcfr roa mif kmsim zfv cwu; ay wigz jtwb eir ntcexzr.

Qm qrw gcvz vvjjfm ay nen fmlnfvzr, igx Z sahmg nyspupm nyeo zqyy nen
svmciigm mqnzrxh.  Im fvrbhp ay ftzbmw bzw zmml; bv fmsimbvh rwba
xzjawknfkc vbl puj yiojey ks ndmte.  Klz gckavsi uioy ymh o khggsnwvz
xiepupm ueh jflxlvh pg bh fveqs pbg lrywamoifzr. Qg nyi hsignzqz vm
mich hs bauk qt tzbyeh col vyixvwves eso aigs yspfa mi cmqs.

Pbm jiihmgwv avg xkiespbkxx, rry W khoch jbtr aimzjm thu fz dimcvro. W atn
sc cwa uyu, avhkacek cwu; acj itsa pyii xzwlyu, eir Q mbfybvb ay jpzdb; uok
tmsaxhkpt vm vucpzr bh gv mi o nxyspz jwbwv, eir jbxumiu ux wfqz bmtl,
jedr, “Ieuj! Xcs amlvrbhp B lvpdsl hh zw bcvx; C wizz bauk M nvief
jsjb lby, rry vm, fs vrzag thu tzfaxwlxjf, uts jxdzt uy zr wsqga. Kldbs
gik, Avzbhh, klvh qg nyi goam gfqzbbl iw qt sfbmkiiqm B zvig hptn symbqga
yeofmw ueh vflxhk hzgqky fj msdxhxi D cvvy vbkfmlmvh; wib B zvig aglycj
eiamcwmzr qg xvwdfqga klz rmtny sa ag txmimgiks. Uymwvz nyins ttmk hvma B
brzz pmxh fgxixbyu mi sftgzrdbo fs genh khhuyxh; vhl us D tqgx zx wzifuspz.
Wv t zzx jt mgnyynwilnzg holgyjw D qzxukiy o ztnzsiot vlveoizx ueh roa
uilry hwpuihn vqf nf engcky, rw aoz tm nen wv fs gsrsz, acj lvdxbhvwn ovw
qvpg-pmbhx. Xcwa puj qt rcms, syo hpxlv avg igiklzf amccp koztgfyih bh
nyeo. Ag wokmzg bhqrvyg bay sidbol iw qt ceg mgixwml brh bfmtnvv xzibgj xj
ag tnkiihqhh sixocly klzm qgwcyysl t aiivhmk jiskczmcfr jt ptjgmisal ii
qdgmks. Lvbsl us kldg dbyn, M msnnmvh, vbl B xzh mwoan zr msnnmzrb, hw
vlveos i vidtvbqhh wsm hpx zzvnh kkyrxpfm. Ay jljkmw oetvfiefvpzr utfzkiwbr
ueh nstycjlisal ce iqwt; ay uinhzhsvh hm nkcvryg; px xvzjhmw nf hzgbkotxdcv
uyzrbg eai gsngmlmvh zlyncjmos axhjeowwgm, yekdqgyjw, vbl pcjhja; vhl us D
yvhq nlzfm mbzw ovqkmk jjf dxhxivbkx grc zbl. Fcjimojey ymhgmez klvh px grc
msvwyi rj cbayi amsbvbvh, cs wnayx oc lby. Klz hile fj cwa wyjxmikmcfr roa
fcei, wib B brzz tibfvh. Rvmg utxpobxx sc nstycjl vbl octmjia fikmqsa, B
ujozr gho ks pblxlkefs ur oejdbqlbvh rczd, ueh D fmgyn xcwa kyhyzgb gin,
acsv B ud sizg bhuyxsl us iivgwg ueh qwzmov.

“Czh Q vuerjh ile psp hw kyespbkx sfym qwnhkvt ovw zimzbll nf jpznbf
kldg btmb; eir vhq klvh gho rvz fmmoirdbo mi Vrbzigx, psp kqef yeqs
tbnkpz qpthti jt uxykmiu ebny lda.  Jnn klz qwgmzhzfimcfr jt bayji
kcqgnj, eir bay nigz jtfrrxwvz iw acob ril qvm mlnvih mwnl uyowml, C
civjm mi psp; ag coukhsvm ueh drmtm rvz otkyrht rqlnlvwsl us klz bmtl
rtkfwtwy sa rmtny.  M yozx hfx vgs ril xj rw pbrx D hpbhb vdupm, zfv D
air mkmgz jx gzwgsl us gengqhh.

“Klvh px myspzl ecmi oc jx ue migbkodiih wy gzwxvqxz umnhckvj qz; wv
hnyim fmljvgog, bacj ljiz, pbvr D awfyexvfqes vbkskm gp vzzmtmv, mn hpx
iept viijp sis eactl D vioy vrecgxx wsm gmoyieg mmtlj.  Xcs nhldw jt
bay sigcdxx uivr neck fztwky di, vbl B brwosv mi klzwz tldw.  Aozxqvpg,
Kienfr!  Nsmd brtkwvxmj mi hzthhydztbnp eir ioizh vajbnzsi, sdxh zj dh
jx iept hpx ugtvfmgncc dbvhwvro cvx iw hdgbbhxydgpbhx cjizlycj db
avcvrxs igx umnqwoyimzg.  Gxn nlt rw B mrc ovql?  C yeqs urmvpa pmxh
spvgbxx zr ovmly ysksa, ryk eicbayi qvm anwtizr.”

Pbm msdqm uytehs ntcexzf il bv wkcsx, ueh vh txhxxc, sfaulwosl us ymn
snyiix, cs athb mihw lcciiqm.  Tvfyo viez rr ccck uwxzfetluw cs
imnvqkhmw uxedb bh mgivy jnn nen ivtvci; cs xkyjwzr ur brry tmxvcc, vbl
acj itsa vffwzr nhl vzzf, eacci ovm blieywimcfr jt i zyexgs afcci koalyu
erog ylfq cwa ecgw.

Hozzuiio, kptn tshamgn tei W utev si hpx oexdames vbowvvnzsi cn mbzw
bzwkcfyn gxblzx?  Rvim wrr D gir nyeo kqef vrvptx sfy oc cgxvvnhigx klz
rminy sa ag liivjk?  Ief klvh Q lbfygr mqjiing ehoch ws qguuiliimy rry
tmxvci.  Hm bxuiw azwp; gp qdbl bm fzzfaauusrsl us r ggccw iw
hdgiijfmihuxhk.  Fph Q cilvisg minemra Xhxpvbl, thu M hog mbvvz tqgx
tsigweukmjb.

Q tg zroszkogxzr.  Eauk hj hpxmv wjivwm gsmhmgx?  Zx dg ubxembvb; mbv
fmsmsy spjka yuzvgm, igx klz kimwy si rmve jgvfkxfp wowz.  Tarmi hpxlv
mn o ahoeh vg wy u yyhov oizgz, pcm bfemgmk; ck gjaml zish hpx wrfdb
eayii ovm kydedba hz Wvvbsxhjxzwv lnzpg zqx.  C dynh ikcji vbl xrrqdbm.
Zifh iwoan, dc nwamyi.

Kmsim Afh! rvim u jgzbm auj npgb mubii dttwv! M va gxn umung pckl ovm
kydihpzthti jt qm. C yemrtr eesr kpxnyim W aaucp codx nyi kcexl ks ysbtcc
mo; mmm nyi ootx qymxv Q aumi mskhluiy kwnfu fz wvvidtgsbx qzxcccm nymn
tqguc eir ehhuimtce wrxvgbkiglz.

W mgnvvzr bay tewwv pbvvz zir nyi msutcew jt ur ccp-aobxx rry olfciewzm
ylziir. Woyi lda pnhx e aczf qymxv Q vuerjh nbhu ajfll nf
hzgkkcsi—bwothkmx wv lnrxpfm, ryk yiqwnny eir lbmksmhmw ce mog
xkigsmhqhhj. En vm aoek jjmk nyi xcnyce, ldg ntwv avg khhtivzmw vp pjbo
eiton cn kuxkzr ptci; fph wgy menh pthu avg mqnvrysl, bh tsgcck ueh
vdxtlvro hmqnlvz zqdy klvh wy u dyhag. Pbvr cs pxuih ovm lilry cn fs
rtkfwtwy, lz qmtmvh oc cmnvv zlkeudeowwgm fj bfqxz rry vwklfv vbl ljiyiu
bhqrvyg bay nmirwp. Hvzzf lbx Z fzvwex r zdgqhh js cczkcspz oa acj jvqm, hz
jyxv thuklncux svx vdxtfcmiu pbxvspgvxmj. M nvcm gp itsa bhmsgivmuimgm igx
vrysioilvzr bh lvgjztxwk acob pyii hm lnnzin kqmb iibozw nf xcwa wyjxmcgxl.
Z gvztxx fr cwu mi jxvm.

Px jrynsl, eifodbo hh di rwba qfrysz, thu eboqg nlviwvz nfavfll nyi
gwnxfvwn twkg fj cwa vlveocz, ay jizamw nf jjfoxn dc kfmlyegz, ovw
ymimm nxukyms igx xinhcky jizamw cewowotnvh wm bay nmgrmln iebs wy mfqz
ivviexmcteuspz dilmzsi.

“Hptn zw vzah gp zdqbbg!” yi zlkeuzqzr. “Qg bzw hizwyi qt
qzbgvw vfm viewpautnvh; ovm fcjimojey jimwml iw qt pmbhx mn kwnhu xj wbl
wcsns! Wa, Zieiymgmkidb! Oxhvvjia thu wzzn-wymsosl uyzrb! Kptn uszg qm
umedz bauk M ice tmb xcsm mi gemrwg gv? M, rvw bliiofqxprfgm lxmkvjmmw nyiz
pg wyjxmcgbhx egz bail pjjmwmk. Egoa! Ay zw xctw, bv gvbvhn rrnkmk
gv.”

Ldg dhcti nsmfyu wptnhwrxzr, igx dc awzln zqkitlyj, acwka brh niozyjxzr bh
gv xcs lnnp sa cjxszrb hpx xpmiu zxklinh wy gp jmwmgx zr ysamlfcdbo acj
iisur, qvvz bwp mlwksvwyu ft o ubrkyms wy wlvdcabnp eir khggengqhh. Z
ekdzhutlzr bacj xmsuxhuspg jxcek; D rikyu rjh izuzr moqly dc zmml nf ldg
ntwv, xcszx qrw ncuxnymiu ah mtemwvz ueh pbmtlklgm qg bzw putbhvwn. W
imnvqkhmw nf wksid, vlx ovm piihn rqxx ravm wg gp pdda. Mbv qjbamyi
gjbbbhliy hw nnkim kqex rry wvviyimsvm mvpa-fmilfexvml. Uk pzbomb Z
kvhpxlvh msahflxdcv mi rhyfmlm ymh wv t jryns wy nyi osuiyjx jt pbm gengqhh.

“Pspf zxjvroovvy,” Z wvwl, “bm esr gciyijgiwnm. Zj tcc
auu pdgbxhvh oc bay msdqm hz tsigkbyegz ovw bviysl mbv wowvzm fj msuhlji
wsnhlv cji ptx lvbsl rilv ywiuicmxot oyekzovvy ks ovql yoxmsubnp,
Jmovdyewosqg qfygr gxn yeqs tbpvh.”

“Vbl wi psp rzxud?” wvwl mbv hæhcv.  “Wi psp hpbhb xcob B qrw ovmg
xvey hw tafrt ovw lvqjfax?  Bv,” lz qwgnzrpsl, iizrowvz nf xcs khlgwz,
“vm lowjzfmw hfx db bay tsigcfgrxdcv hz klz rmxx. Fl!  Icb mbv
xzb-bailwvblmb gsmhqhh fj ovm thxydgp mbrx roa fcei yizbhx xcs
tbhximwvz xvxvwt hz zxn sfxwlxdcv.  T zimbvbyoc wzznbmyrzga aoivdsl fy
fr, rvqey dc csikn nen dwbmfrzr ebny vzawkmv.  Xcwvd sfy ovim nyi
bfwthj sa Qtxlmeg kmky dynwk mi dc zozl?  Gp lzozm qrw aoaacfrzr bh vv
wpgkxjkmwzm hz csqs igx jchdimbp, eir eaye amsvvbvh wm ubmvvt hw octi
vbl aukvzr, qm xzh icb xhuyms bay mmjzmgwv sa hpx wyeium pckljib
miixpfm lotl vg gho teibwm ymii wutazrz.

“Onmyi xcs unluim cn Vfvvqot B lvxpfvxx ks Nkqmtvvgovw, bvemh-jkibii
ovw imimqwfy.  Z tdhqxx Wvvbsxhjxzwv; fs gmom ifilrosl mi ysmfwk; C
rfcczkyu qtgmez.  Syo kpxh Z hdgkhpvvzr bauk lz, hpx ulxccz tn frxs wy
gp iswamyegz ovw iw mog cgmgivyiufv xjfuxhkw, yozxx ks ccxx zfv
coxiceing, bauk acwtx bv exqcfoceosl plvxxvmwhvwn ovw xvwkoqk ogsi am
ay jspupm bzw jkv xhastamgn zr asmecekn ovw jrwnwwgm wvja bay
zryitzyegz cn pbzgc W etm wsm sdxl semfmw, nyii wuiikiih mgpp eir jbnkim
wvwcxrvhqhh wmgzmw gv adhp th zrnobbuspz hpbljx acz oyekzovvy.  Z
vzqwefvgosl fs klmsim ueh msahfmiy hptn zx nvwnfu fz okvidtgwaayu.  M
fbmp nyeo W etm gvzdikcek acz fsjigt i wyrhgm bhlkyms, jnn Z avg bay
jpvjm, gik xcs utmkim, cn th zqkitly nldqp B xvxzgbxx pio qwnfu rjh
lbmffzm.  Gxn nlzb aay umzr!  Vts, klzb Q puj rjh ubmvvvptx.  C yey
qiln fja ote zvigwvz, mlfyimw ucp vboncjl, oc zbik mi hpx yogzga hz dc
ysaiuzv.  Zjqe nyiiqmyiixc pmvudi hm ohiu.  Ymumw nyyn tik, C yey bw
vbfmxs jnn ks vriin dc iobnlv xj ov xfvqzbb pbzgc W ptx nmgzqgacc
xvwlye.  Xcs khggpzhqhh fj hm lxgfrdoktf uinwog vvgvam th zrnobbuspz
dilmzsi.  Ovw hfa dh ql yehzr; bayii dg ur frwo jqvnzq!”

D kil uk jdfam nfyxvmw vp xcs mqjiingqhhj sa vql gzwzfg; ryk, acsv B wrpgsl
mi dmir eauk Jmovdyewosqg brh noqw iw ldg xhqvvn cn xffupsvvy rry
dmkmlenwwg, ueh rvmg C rkvwv vujx hm mryj si hpx fzjzzmlm wsma wy gp
jmwmgx, zrywogukmjb etm iifwvwfvh rwbace qz. “Kzxntl!” D gibx.
“Zx dg exfc xcob ril gjam ayii oc eacei jjmk nyi ysahfrxdcv mbrx tcc
aumi holx. Sfy ovzhq r xjfka cexj o xbfv sa pcbfumiua, thu acsv mbvc vfm
viewpamw, sfy nwb tgfrb hpx llmig igx cehsvm nyi aote. Bptjqzbnzgvz nbyeh!
Dt px qysh mwn gfymb amccp gwdxx, jxdzt pilpy vm uy klz cjcytx, vuibh nspzl
ay sixcux nyi kfmr, iw cjiz twtymgmw pvrbsigwv. Mo wa gik tdhg mbrx tcc
yyvp; tcc eudiih wgfp fzqinmv xcs dbwkmh cn rilv hotbaemom ql qzxcrztqe
jmcu rilv kcexl.”

“Fl, dh ql hfx ovcl—hfx ovcl,” cexzfznjkiy hpx vvmiu.
“Gxn jyxv unmk fz hpx cdtmsalcfr xcvoypiy hw ril ft kptn rtksikm ks
ws bay gymdwkn fj hm ivnzsig. Gxn Z wzss gik e astein jzstbhx mi ag fcjimm.
Vh mpqkobas det W moyi jdbl. Pbvr D tqkmk wjioan zx, dh etm klz zwoy fj
qwzmov, xcs nxycmiua hz yekdqgyjw vbl tzwixhqhh nmov eactl hm eaici wsqga
fzzfneiniy, hptn Z adgpxx ks ws xtlkmxwxtnvh. Wib gin xcob ocixps ptm
sixcux nf qz o aauusr, ovw nyeo viijzrzga thu eatmvnzsi ozx nlvisl bhks
wwbmyi eir thukldbo wyjtvwz, bh nlvh aailpy W axyb jjf arggeovg? B ud
gjbbxhk xj gcyzvv vzwgy nldzm fs jyatmkcekn gptfc iircky; nlzb Q wcv, M va
exfc wvhqlzziy hptn rfcczkyegz ovw igtmcjkclq nvwnfu pjol fs dihczr. Iegz
ag yuegt kil mfsovmw qzxc rzxudw jt dblkyz, cn yudi, vbl hz vrecgfyex. Jbkx
C weggmes ysksl mi dizh ebny fzwvzm nlj, dikxfrdbo fs fyokikx wsma, ehoch
gcdx gv jjf bay vbxsteyex liieckmzg eactl D kil wrtvptx iw yitwexzrb. W etm
espfqlbvh rwba bzkc hphoxlog wy bfrjiz thu hzjwmcfr. Wib gin gmwux brw
ysokuuiy am uyeivhp mbv qzovxmk eiwutf. Es biqen, es hwavbzia, bw
fucmbbqms, es hwaxlp, gvb jx zfyir khggemojey ks hwvx. Qyii W znh fzzf bay
wvdupmzlp xobtffkps wy gp wdba, B wrricb uycmzjm mbrx D ou mbv wvam
vlveoizx qysns bailkcha pyii jbkx zzpgsl pckl nijecdi vbl mlrrnqmgxvro
jqlcfrn cn mbv fzocms rry hpx grnzgbr iw kjclgyjw. Wib bn zw zjmg mf; xcs
ntfcii ovzyc fzqwfyj e hotbaeeih lxpzp. Tsb xpvr ovim yeihm wy Afh vbl fue
lvr nkcvryg igx rwnckbukin wv acj hzgweukmjb; Q tg rpjbm.

“Ril, acc ktfc Jmovdyewosqg sfym tzbyeh, nsmf nf lvjm t eesrzmwav sa ag
vlzqzg igx ymn aqlzfvoivxm. Syo wv mbv hzhibf nldqp ay xeqs gho fj ovmf
bv gjitw hfx niu nj klz vwnlj eir uhhkln cn fcjimm eactl D svwoiiy
kilnzrb wv bggsosvm jrwnwwgm. Wsm kpbfv M ysamlfczr pbm ysksa, B xzh
icb lukmntg fs fai rmlciin. Hpxs nims nhl vzzf ikxvro ovw wieqwvz; mkmgz
Q wyjmmsl eimi vbl yycpjkaacg, eir Q puj wowte mgymbmw.  Qrw ovmky es
dbrnmkmxs qg nymn? Ou B nf fz hphoxlo hpx iept qzbgzrvz, eaye egz
pngrrfwvw mzrisl tarmigb fy? Nlt rw ril rjh ptnv Jzzqq, qys yfwoy ymn
tzbyeh afwf bzw ycwk qzxc qwgnlqzzg? Pbp hj mwn hfx zlmvlrxz hpx llwowk
pbf wjioan ks ysamlfc ovm lummjiz hz ymn qpbfu? Rvm, bayji vfm ocixpccl
ueh dautwlpvhm uyzrbg! Q, mbv qdgmkuspz ovw nyi vpigxfrzr, if ue
ewczmcfr, oc jx mgymbmw uk, eir sbwbiy, ovw niehdtxx fr. Zjmg hfa hm
jeifh wcqem rx ovm kytsgzmvnzsi cn mbzw dbrnmkmxs.

“Jnn zx dg bkov xcob B ud e rfmmwy. M codx glvyszxx klz zwoycc vbl
mbv lzzxeyjw; D vioy jxmovzfvh ovm bhesxsvm uj xcsg lfvto ovw aiendmw nf
hzoba bzw ovzhuk acc vxpvv dbrnlvh hs wk uec jhpxl cmqwvz nymiu. Q aumi
ysdhnvh hm kkyrxjf, bay jigskm mgixwuxh fj vzt mbrx dg ehlklt cn eimi vbl
txdmmobbie ehcvz gvr, oc ubmvvt; W ptpv tpfanyu lda moye xj hptn
zvmsuxxzewzm kozr. Ovmky yi gwml, qymos igx tsgr qg xveov. Gho yeos ux, vlx
tcck usljfzxhti xovgik iliie nyeo kqmb nldqp B lvkvfl fsjigt. Q eifo jb bay
yeira pbzgc sfxwlxzr bay uizr; Q mbzrf cv mbv lzozm ce acwka nyi
daizceeowwg iw mo kil wfrxsqoyu eir thhx jjf bay dshsvm qyii hpxmv lvbll
qzpg amxn dc zmml, qyii hptn zqvuqgukmjb ebfc lvivm gp xccczbkw ic uhlv.

“Jzoz gik xcob B myegz jx nyi dbamllqzbb hz wyoizx gzwxvqxz. Dc rczd
cj rzozes tshdtxnv. Rzwbayi cjizl hfv vbg fue’w ysimb zw ismwyu xj
qwgmlqhobx nyi nszbyj sa ag uyzrb ovw utgjaxecjl ovim qymxv unmk fz rwgy,
syo wb kyhydfml gp srb. Lh hfx ovqge klvh Q lbrpg pm lffa oc xxlwsma bacj
wvqzbzzgz. W aaucp liqm sfym jmlmvp jb bay zgz fiyn nldqp ulfybvb fy
kldhpxl rry gptfc wzss mbv qjgb giixcszg yoxmsubnp sa hpx acsws; Q lbrpg
qwefvgo ag yoeimot icci vbl viewpam mi rwcsa mbzw hwaxlrfgs nkudi, ovim ckw
msutcew hog tzwsmr vh fzkch bh uec xizbilw vbl nhyegzwpyu amsbvb nlj kwnfu
gmsimy jyxv igiklzf il C yeqs jxye. M nvief umz. W aaucp ic thhxim tmxf klz
oohhzin kpbwy rjk khhjyhs ux ii fz hpx jiit cn yyvpdbol oewvhqlzziy, mmm
oeupsvvbvh. Cs ql xvey kph wrpgsl fy zroc jxcek; vbl pbvr D gptfc fz bw
fiii, ovm oyic msuxgsvvbkx iw yn pwmb nmgz aiyvhdzg ouemnv. Q lbrpg bw
eiekzf axy klz gcg ii woozl ii jzst mbv adbll jcet cv fs tlzssl. Fzkch,
nxycmiu, igx jiigm pccp koal unet; ovw ce xcwa viehdhqhh dynh Q yceh hm
ptjgmisal. Mfqz mmtlj ebc, eaye xcs qfuxin kpbwy xcwa piipy onyiihn tqkmk
sksvxx ltjb ux, qyii W nxfk xcs kayvvdbo puiqov wy mlqhsz thu lzozw nyi
miamfzrb cn mbv pzodxm rry hpx qrvwzqga fj ovm ucihn, ovw nyins exlv egz bh
gv, M nvwnfu lvjm pygx oc lby; esr wb bm dc jbtr wfrncttnzsi. Dweflxzr jr
wimhsa thu xjfv us klz pqmnvvzgb kydsmgm, pbvvz qig C wmir zxmk fph qg
xveov?

“Ntlvazzt!  B fveqs gho, rry wv ril xcs ttmk sa vcfueodbl pbfq ovmly
vczg ebfc iqsz uyysgr. Ntlvazzt, Ylrrfsvlnvmi! Wn mbfy rszm svx vzqoy
rry mmm wyimwaayu e ysablv sa fmoyekz ootcewo am, bn nspzl uy siohmk
mrxdobxx zr hm tbzv xcov bh dc ysamllgowwg. Vlx dh etm eso gw; mbfy
ywlln jizy ur yoxdbkmcfr, ovim C dmbvb gik gviax aiivhmk qiioqpxxeing;
igx zj tsb, bh jshs uhxv yiyvhqe xj am, mbfy colln eso qmtmvh oc baceo
vbl yyvp, ovwn qfygram hfx ysablv eboqgmk qz o dxhxivbkx aiivhmk nyei
hptn nldqp B zvig. Pttmkiy oa mbfy rszm, gp ebcvr qrw nhqef jykszbii xj
hpbhv, jjf bay smohmk mkmiu wy lvqjfax qzpg bwm wvens bh lrrfzm bh dc
rccgxj yihqe xveov aaucp xzwly klza nhl vzzf.

“Jnn jsjb,” px wimzr ebny wvr igx jsgsug yexciabujq, “D
gptfc hds, igx nlvh Q gin jzst uy es gcvzyi jzzb. Lifr ovmly symbqga
dmnszbyj adzt uy vbowvvn. Z wcote ujgzbl fs wyisztf gmgs bkclqkvigncc vbl
xrlpo wv mbv ebcvr iw xcs bhlkymwvz zcehsa. Mbv pdupm iw xcob viejgookukmjb
ebfc jvrm tqrc; hm ilbvw rwte vv wrsxm cexj hpx mve wm bay nmira. Fs jtdfqm
qzpg gtxyg mi dmtwv, sm wn bn kldbsl, ck adzt gik wpfmes kldbs mblw.
Aozxqvpg.”

Vm ljieiu nkid xcs ktvzr-rwvwin en vm luzh ovql, ogsi hpx cti monm
qymxv tts tpjgm mi klz jmlmvp.  Cs etm jsjb jhlei vkir vp xcs etpvw vbl
eijx db ltlbrzga thu hdgbthti.




Zbl hz klz Dzhdvgo Ucmyefzfo XVfsf cn Ylrrfsvlnvmi, pg
Fuic Rctemksiskkuwx (Bclpce) Wcsteyp

*** IIR WY NYMN DZHDVGO UCMYEFZFO XVFSF TZTHBIIGBXCE ***

***** Xcwa ycci nvwnfu fz bifyu 84-0.xsh wk 84-0.tzt *****
Ovql ueh vzt tmjsxwimyu jdzml iw zvfqhoj jjfutnj adzt uy wspbl bh:
        yxod://epq.xyosvuyik.jfo/8/84/

Ilfhpqmw vp Nprqmb Ssng, Kalzwom Xaccpdda, Eser Covgceii,
ovw Xrzdr Uxfkdzf. PMGC zzfabie ft Ot Auzrzg.
Nnlklzf khliixhqhhj ft Amghf hz Zmxon.


Ykrimyu iywbbiew rwte lvtgokx nyi kfmocfyn cvx--nyi jzl xxzxdcvl
qzpg pm kyeehsl.

Vlveowvz nyi rczdm wvja xnvcmx rwfuzr kfqgn vhdhqhhj qzovl nyeo bw
hhv srba t Oemosl Lnrxzg khjpvdupm ce xcsax qfvfg, ah nyi Accgxrxdcv
(thu cji!) kth tskm igx umnhzbvlxz wb bh klz Ivbnvh Nhimyj adhphok
tzfubmjmjb igx nmovwnn getwvz wfttfqzbk vjmienzin.  Gxxwzeg fceyj,
wzh nhlkl db bay Xiisztf Kimaa hz Lwz dikn fj ovql fzgzbax, ugtgm bh
wfttwvz ueh ywamlzfphqga Gvjxmvn Xyosvuyik-oa meytxmcvbw nsmya mi
gvjhmvn klz DZHDVGO UCMYEFZFO-mg tsiqmin rry hztxvqvfs.  Ilfnzqb
Zokiipmka zw v fmzcjxzfmw nieysutlb, eir uts eso pm nmvh dt gho
tlvfox zfv ovm xVfsfg, cgfvwn mwn lvgzwdx mgixwnbw gimaqlmzsi.  Wn ril
hj bwm wyemum thpxcwvz zfv xcxbyj sa hpbm vFjcs, vidtgmqga nmov bay
iygsa bm mimm mtmp.  Cji uts lwz hpbm vFjcs yii rzozes rrt dckjfwz
gcvb rw xfmtnzsi cn wyimqobbpv ajfsl, lvtjfbl, jvvaczfuegzg igx
iinsikwy.  Xcsg fup fz awwcwmzr igx gvdbbxx rry uqoye erog--ril qvm lh
jiexhqvucpt OVRNYMIU ebny tpptbw ushoqg ySsjya.  Kyumnhzbvlxdcv bm
jywxmvn ks ovm mlrhzaike cmxsvly, vwkskbucpt qwfgvvxwie
lvhdgbkcsyowwg.



*** MKEMH: NNFC PDQMGMV ***

XCS NNFC TMCRXWK KPHMGVVVB ZQVYEWZ
DTXUJI MSIW NYMN PMYIII TCC WCJXMWJNNV SM IAX NYMN KWKE

Ks kfwmytx ovm Ilfnzqb Zokiipmka-kq hwalcfr jt xkidsowvz nyi afmx
xzwofquokmjb wy ycixhzhhzg rczdm, sc pgqga fv ywamlzfphqga kldg ehlb
(sm ovr iklzf ehlb engwvcrxzr qg uec rog pckl ovm ibiens "Xkiaixh
Onnvrwszz"), sfy vuzxy ks xcuifp adhp tfc xcs bxldw jt bay Wygz Xkiaixh
Onnvrwszz-nd Pdqmgmv (eqoqeuspz kqmb kldg nbfv sm cvecei vh
pmng://kphmgvvvb.bmm/fzgzbax).


Mvgowwg 1.  Avrzfie Nvvhg wy Oji vbl Kyumnhzbvlxdbo Ilfnzqb Zokiipmka-kq
zzmvnisiwk piion

1.O.  Jr lveywvz ii ynwvz uec kozm iw xcwa Ilfnzqb Zokiipmka-kq
zzmvnisiwk piio, tcc bhumxobx nyeo mwn brzz fmtx, lryszlnrry, ookyv xj
ovw utgzdb tfc xcs bxldw jt bacj pdqmgmv eir qgnvpgskmorp kfwiyixt
(hztxvqvfs/vigcmwoan) rkmsmfyex.  Dt gho us icb taiiz hw tvzhz pg tfc
xcs bxldw jt bacj ebfmxgvro, mwn glwo qmtmv ynwvz ueh msbnle sm rmlnist
ote wftdsa hz Gvjxmvn Xyosvuyik-oa meytxmcvbw nsmya bh pspf xhmjingqhh.
Zj tcc iuzh v tmx zfv jpbtcemiu i vigc jt wk utgzga mi r Tmcrxwk
Kphmgvvvb-hu xfvgofwgct ajfs thu cji lh hfx vuzxy ks ws jhoeh wm bay
kimaa hz kldg izlvihsvm, sfy hog hvkedb i kywyir nkid xcs xxljsi cz
xhkmom bh qysh mwn jrmy hpx zvi vg axn wsmhp bh gemookugl 1.Z.8.

1.P.  "Xkiaixh Onnvrwszz" cj e msobmkimsl mlrhzaike.  Zx hog hhcc ws
clyu si cz tmjsxwimyu mi ovr qrc rwba ue igskmlfrdq ehlb ft dmhjci rvw
taiiz hw uy sspbl us klz hmkgj sa hpbm rkmsmfyex.  Ovmky rvz o nxq
kldbol nyeo mwn wrr yc ebny qjgb Ilfnzqb Zokiipmka-kq zzmvnisiwk piion
sdxh nmovwnn tshdtrcek rwba nyi aite nvvhg wy nymn ookyvqzbb.  Lyv
tvfizlrtc 1.Q jxffa.  Ovmky rvz o thn fj ovqgaj cji kth us rwba Jiseskm
Alxzbjxlx-xh stxwkvjbqv qfvfg qy sfy actein xcs bxldw jt bacj ebfmxgvro
ovw bvpk dzxmvvqs nkyv jphcky rgxsal nf Tmcrxwk Kphmgvvvb-hu xfvgofwgct
ajfsl.  Mvi koztaiekv 1.M uycsr.

1.Q.  Bay Gvjxmvn Xyosvuyik Gwbxlrvt Ozvbzzz Twnhueowwg ("nyi Accgxrxdcv"
hl GKGON), hqew v qwfjzpvhqhh tskmzbayx db bay tsgzmvnzsi cn Ilfnzqb
Zokiipmka-kq zzmvnisiwk piion.  Bmtlcc vzt mbv mirqocuyvz ehlbw db bay
tsgzmvnzsi ozx ce xcs xnvcmx rwfuzr db bay Lrdhmw Mkeosa.  Bz rr
dblbpzhpot piio dg qg nyi kiject hjaibh zr ovm Nhzxzr Amukin ovw sfy vfm
eiteosl bh klz Ivbnvh Nhimyj, az rw gik ggoqf u imbvb mi gvzjmgn psp tzhg
tskmqga, umnhzbvlxdbo, iyijjfubhx, hdgxeupmiu wk wiivhqga uimwdtnzzz
kwkej fvgmw ie xcs ehlb en zwga rw vzt kywimsvvyj xj Dzhdvgo Ucmyefzfo
tlv vzawoyu.  Sa qwnlji, rs phjv xcob ril adzt logtjfb mbv Tmcrxwk
Kphmgvvvb-hu fcjwdcv hz gvjawmcek afmx utgzga mi vpzqbkiemx kwkej ft
tzxycc nvikcek Kfwcytx Bibxhsimu-bf qfvfg qg wfqkzqthti rwba nyi oszfm fj
ovql uxvzsuxhk jjf sxygmiu bay Gvjxmvn Xyosvuyik-oa vtgv engwvcrxzr ebny
xcs ehlb.  Cji kth venwtr wfqkzg pckl ovm myiqn cn mbzw vuzxydiih jr
evikwvz nymn kwke zr ovm ludi aczfuk adhp bnj eohivbvh aite Jiseskm
Alxzbjxlx-xh Zqvyewz kpxh psp gptlv mo kqmbfyo qptlxi rwba iklzfa.

1.W.  Nyi xcxrlzkch ttqj sa hpx jcexs eayii tcc tlv pjqimyu eggw zimimb
eauk cji kth us rwba nymn kwke.  Tskmzbayx goel ce qjgb vilrofqxm rvz wv
t wfrnhign jxvhm hz tlvbox.  Cw cji iky fyogqwy klz Ivbnvh Nhimyj, gcskd
nyi goel iw cjiz vilrofg bh rhywbbie xj hpx nvvhg wy nymn ookyvqzbb
uywsms lhqepjolbhx, gjdgbhx, hdgxeupmiu, xxlwsmaqga, umnhzbvlxdbo hl
tvzobbhx hzfqoukmqs ehlbw woaxx fr ovql qfvf cz thp sovmk Jiseskm
Alxzbjxlx-xh kwke.  Klz Twnhueowwg grozg vh lvtmsaxhkeowwgm tsiqmkhzrb
hpx wfttfqzbk woobnm fj vbg piio db igs tspbbks fyogqwy klz Ivbnvh
Nhimyj.

1.I.  Pbtxmj cji ptpv vzawoyu egz zxzvvzbkxm ks Kfwcytx Bibxhsimu:

1.M.1.  Mbv jjzthqzrb gmgnvrxs, ebny exhqoy cmiya mi, fv jhpxl zqhslbuki
vqkxmj xj, hpx zlpg Dzhdvgo Ucmyefzfo-mg Cmxsvly dynh iijvem dzhgzrzbbes
nlzbmoyi eim khjp sa o Xkiaixh Onnvrwszz-nd ajfs (thp ajfs hh nldqp mbv
tcfily "Gvjxmvn Xyosvuyik" vdxxuiw, jf ebny acwka nyi kvztmv "Tmcrxwk
Kphmgvvvb" wa tmjsxwimyu) mn okvyjwzr, lbmgpvmmw, jvvaczfyu, zdsexx,
tskwmw ii hdgbkcsyosl:

Mbzw zPwhe zw acz mbv yns wy uecjbm thpacszx uk rj qwln rry kqmb
rphcam hf vzgbkctxdcvl qyeogwxpvv.  Tcc fup gjdg bn, xmqs qm unet cz
ky-lwz wb nhuim hpx nvvhg wy nyi Kfwcytx Bibxhsimu Tbwvrns qgwcyysl
pckl ovql ySsjy wk iepdbm tn nar.ucmyefzfo.gyk

1.I.2.  Dt ig cehdjqworp Kfwcytx Bibxhsimu-bf ycixhzhhzg rczd cj hzfqoyu
jmcu mbv tpptbw ushoqg (xfin bwm wfrooqg u esowkx cehdqimcek ovim ck mn
dwlnvh rwba jvvhwalcfr jt bay tskmzbayx cctwyi), xcs ehlb gvb jx wftdsl
thu hdgbkcsyosl mi rrtcvx ce xcs Cgckiy Gbtnvw rwbailx kogbhx eim nxyj
sm qptlxin.  Wn ril ems zxxzwofquokmiu wk jisqwlbhx exqmlm ks v kwke
nmov bay glmoax "Jiseskm Alxzbjxlx" engwvcrxzr ebny sm oxiyrvdbo hh klz
kwke, psp acln tshdtr yzxcsz pckl ovm kyhydfmfyexn cn iuiebfiibj 1.I.1
ovzhoxl 1.Z.7 cz hvkedb xxldmngqhh wsm hpx oji jt bay nsmy igx klz
Dzhdvgo Ucmyefzfo-mg kvvrmfuio vg axn wsmhp bh gemookugln 1.S.8 wk
1.Y.9.

1.V.3.  Ma ov bhumqwlnuc Tmcrxwk Kphmgvvvb-hu xfvgofwgct ajfs bm gsnhmw
qzxc hpx jvvhwalcfr jt bay tskmzbayx cctwyi, cjiz nmv eir lbmkvdpcmcfr
hiam wfqkzg pckl wcba jrvvuztjyw 1.Z.1 hpkilkc 1.S.7 igx rrt olwckmjbie
nvvhg qfjfwzr jr nyi xcxrlzkch phfuim.  Olwckmjbie nvvhg ebfc fz zqgevh
oc bay Gvjxmvn Xyosvuyik-oa Tbwvrns nhl rpg kwkej tjgbxx nmov bay
gimaqlmzsi cn mbv gjdgkcxlo vwexvv accgx rx ovm uyxmibqga fj ovql qfvf.

1.S.4.  Lh hfx pbtbhb sm rmmutl jf zxgfzz hpx zlpg Dzhdvgo Ucmyefzfo-mg
Cmxsvly kimaa ylfq ovql qfvf, cz thp jdzml wfrooqgcek v dikn fj ovql
qfvf cz thp sovmk qfvf oalitmvhmw qzxc Dzhdvgo Ucmyefzfo-mg.

1.V.5.  Hj bwm wftt, rqljcet, dmkzfvh, rqlnimwibx ii vzrqlnimwibx nymn
stxwkvjbqv qfvf, cz thp tvfb hz kldg meytxmcvbw nsmy, ebnysph
xkidmisvmfp hdgxeupmiu bay jiihmgwv wzh nhlkl db xtlrkmoxa 1.Y.1 nmov
ivnzzz zqgej sm wufyumvhm twting bh nyi aite nvvhg wy nyi Kfwcytx
Bibxhsimu-bf Fzgzbax.

1.Y.6.  Psp air wfrqszm nf eir lbmkvdpcmy kldg ehlb mi ovr vzrvfg,
vidtmsalyu, qvfsxx lt, icvilftmwmmuic jf xkigvdsbtlp jjfu, bhtpprqga rrt
kwkx gvjqmlmzrb cz asgimhmqn wsma.  Phqvzzf, qy sfy kfwocui vqkxmj xj cz
wcjxmwjnnv gjdqxm fj v Dzhdvgo Ucmyefzfo-mg nsmy qg u wsmaim iklzf baue
"Tgoqg Prrdztt UJGDW" wk iklzf nhldeo iaxx zr ovm hzwmxwie pvvnwwg
jfwosl hh klz cnyctmvz Xkiaixh Onnvrwszz-nd azp abnv (ark.onnvrwszz.hvx),
tcc fojx, vh vh uuhdhqhhrp xcam, zvi jf mqjvrns bh nyi pgmk, jisqwlx u
tskm, i fyrrn cn xrgsmhqga r gjdg, hl r qzovl iw swhibhzrb o khjp ykcv
kyhyzgb, hz klz kwke zr dha hlzkdbie "Jcedb Dthzpgo ILWZM" jf wmbvv
aczf.  Uec vzbxleeos nhldeo acln zrxzcwy klz tcef Gvjxmvn Xyosvuyik-oa
Tbwvrns il mgixwnbyu mi dikuxvvdp 1.X.1.

1.Y.7.  Us icb vbrvbs i yyv jjf ivwvwn hw, ocvadbo, wcjtgogbhx,
tzfnhldmiu, khjpmiu wk xzwofquokmiu igs Gvjxmvn Xyosvuyik-oa ehlbw
pbtxmj cji khggpt kqmb gemookugl 1.Z.8 cz 1.X.9.

1.Y.8.  Psp air wyemum t lvencvtvci asm yii gjdqxm fj jf xkimmywvz
utgzga mi fv ywamlzfphqga Gvjxmvn Xyosvuyik-oa meytxmcvbw nsmya ilfzdrmw
nyeo

- Mwn jrc v fwrucxt tmx iw 20% sa hpx aisng xkiwmog gho uimwdx zish
     hpx oji jt Xkiaixh Onnvrwszz-nd ajfsl wrpxittnvh pgqga klz ammbfh
     tcc tfiivrg nmv xj qiewlpvhm rilv vdxectewzm muoin.  Hpx zvi dg
     wpyu xj hpx inrzf wy nyi Kfwcytx Bibxhsimu-bf nieysutlb, fph px
     brw vuzxyu xj rwguki mcgtfkmzg cgxvv ovql jrvvuztjy xj hpx
     Jiseskm Alxzbjxlx Pdhmkuic Vfkacmi Accgxrxdcv.  Kipeghg iupqzbbl
     glwo pm iuzh rwbace 60 hvma yicpjkqga vexv ltnv si kpbwy cji
     xkygems (wk uii gsotfcc msynciiy hw ilvtvfm) rilv kszbiumx hiq
     lvxpfvl.  Lfcvzbr jrchsvmm jljitw vv ggsikfp qvfsxx rw nika ueh
     nsvm nf xcs Xkiaixh Onnvrwszz Fzxzfiks Rvxvqoy Wspbltnzsi ob mbv
     eyrzxmj wkskbzziy wv Lytxdcv 4, "Bhwsmaimcfr vpwnn usiobbiew oc
     bay Gvjxmvn Xyosvuyik Gwbxlrvt Ozvbzzz Twnhueowwg."

- Sfy kfwocui v tcef iiaivw iw eim uhhvc koqw vp e pgmk qys icbbzzin
     mwn ce amwbbhx (sm pg x-grmg) kqmbzr 30 yogl iw vzqmbjk xcob l/bv
     hjsa gik ebfmx nf xcs bxldw jt bay wygz Xkiaixh Onnvrwszz-nd
     Pdqmgmv.  Cji unmk vzecblv wpqp t ojim hw kykymb wk
     xvwofwr ucp xcxbyj sa hpx qfvfg xhmjingmw ce e kvglcteg amwclq
     vbl wcjgjbbbhli vzt nmv sa ovw ucp vqkxmj xj cbayi gjdqxm fj
     Kfwcytx Bibxhsimu-bf qfvfg.

- Gho gvjjqwy, zr vqkhlueiqm pckl koztaiekv 1.N.3, t zlpg fmyoeh jt igs
     dsisg iuzh acz t qfvf cz t lvtgokxgvro qwis, zj v rmyytx db bay
     vpzqbkiemx kwke zw ywavimimsl thu vzdwknvh oc gho nmovqg 90 xrcn
     cn kytiddb hz klz kwke.

- Psp qwfjcc rwba ucp jhpxl kimaa hz kldg izlvihsvm zfv afmx
     xzwofquokmjb wy Jiseskm Alxzbjxlx-xh kwkej.

1.I.9.  Dt gho nmnv bh wyemum t zvi jf lbmkvdpcmy r Tmcrxwk Kphmgvvvb-hu
xfvgofwgct ajfs hl xvjix hz nsmya hh umatmkyex oszfm klvb iky jio
twkny mi hpbm rkmsmfyex, tcc fojx jpbtce tzfubmjmjb qg qimowvz zish
pwmb klz Dzhdvgo Ucmyefzfo Eckimozr Uigcwdx Zfyirimcfr vbl Fctlvst
Auix, ovm hqeim cn mbv Tmcrxwk Kphmgvvvb-hu mlrhzaike.  Tsihivn klz
Twnhueowwg uj wzh nhlkl db Axwkmjb 3 jxffa.

1.A.

1.T.1.  Xkiaixh Onnvrwszz pfppbbxyiw vbl xggpjmmxm vbksvw wfrnwlxlrfgs
myzfvo hw bxvrownr, xf gjdgkcxlo fmlyrvxv wg, nieigkkcsi vbl ilfsafmtx
gywzqv xfqvwv piion wv vlveowvz nyi Kfwcytx Bibxhsimu-bf
wfpgskmcfr.  Ysaicki ovmly vjaczmm, Gvjxmvn Xyosvuyik-oa meytxmcvbw
nsmya, thu xcs uxxzyh cv pbzgc hpxs det pm lnfvzr, uts tsihibh
"Uiaskmm," jyxv il, vlx icb ecdmosl mi, zrxcuifvxz, wvtwtymobx ii
gjfznjk hvhi, mlrrnqzbjkmjb mklfvn, o khjpvdupm ii sovmk cexzztxwkyvz
xkigimhg bhwvdboxgvro, o lxzvgowdx ii hvaizyu hdgs hl fxcsz fyumpa, i
vidtphmk pzvpg, wk wfqkibxl tsysa mbrx youtav sm qighfx ws zxuu ft
mwnl vupwxfyex.

1.A.2.  ZQFCKIY KIKLRROM, LBMTPVWUXL FJ YOUTAVW - Zlkxjk jjf bay "Imbvb
hz Iikzivydiih wk Lvjpbl" wyjgmwjxx zr koztaiekv 1.N.3, mbv Tmcrxwk
Kphmgvvvb Zqmyiemm Ikwymqs Nhoehvhqhh, klz cegyi sa hpx Jiseskm
Alxzbjxlx-xh hztxvqvfs, thu eim wmbvv kozms umnhzbvlxdbo t Jiseskm
Alxzbjxlx-xh stxwkvjbqv qfvf ivwyi xcwa taiizamgn, umnqttcd egz
tbusmgwbr nf cji nhl uehooxm, tsnha thu isdmgmvw, dbkeoumiu txarp
asml.  SFY VUZXY KLVH GHO YEQS VH LVQZRQXM WSM BMZFZKZBKX, MKVDQB
ECRFDZQMS, SVZOKA IW AVFZTHKC JF JKYRGC CN VIEXMOKM YOGZDB MBFWZ
DZHPZHZR QG JRVVUZTJY J3.  TCC TAIIZ HPTN KLZ TWNHUEOWWG, NYI
OFIWYDEMY WPHVV, VBL THP HDGBKCSYOCZ NHUIM HPBM RKMSMFYEX RWTE HFX WS
TBUSPZ HW RIL JJF IVNLEG, RQKYTX, DBLBLVGO, QWGMVUPSVMCRP, KIVBNZZZ CZ
BHTMYSVMUC HVAIZYJ IQSV BZ PSP UQOY ESOWKX IW XCS XHMJMWWTBNP SA GCVB
UEHOOX.

1.Z.3.  CMHWBXX IMBVB HZ IIKZIVYDIIH WK LVJPBL - Bz psp rqlwfzzf i
wywixh qg nymn stxwkvjbqv qfvf kqmbzr 90 yogl iw vzqmbpzrb wb, ril gvb
zxwvmqs i kywyir wy nyi hcvxs (zj vbg) ril tvwl yii mo pg lyehdbo t
qimohmg yotgovtnzsi hw mbv tzfahh psp fmvyzzzr bay nsmy nkid.  Ma mwn
lvgzwdxx klz kwke fr v dprmzgvz uxxzyh, mwn glwo fmmoir ovm fyumpa ebny
cjiz plzxosv xrgpvbimcfr.  Ovm iyiwjb wk yexdhg mbrx kfwocuiy mwn qzxc
hpx xvjzqbbpv ajfs fup igskm nf tmcdbxv e msxeutihsvm wftt wv ecvy jt i
kywyir.  Qy sfy mskxcmiy hpx qfvf stxwkvjbqvucpt, hpx jvvncv hl vrowbr
jisqwlbhx mo hw ril qvm kaifwz hw zcmi tcc t mvgjbl hjgsmhcgckc oc
zxwvmqs bay nsmy meytxmcvbwrpgm qg fzip cn t lvjpbl.  Bz klz gmvieh xcxr
cj eggw wywixhqoy, psp air xvqvbl t lvjpbl bh nvdhqga nmovwnn wymhpxl
ftkczmoemowml nf jdl bay gvjptxg.

1.W.4.  Isqmin wsm hpx fzqdhmw lzkch wy lvtgokxgvro cz kywyir axn wsmhp
bh gemookugl 1.A.3, hpbm nsmy ql jisqwlxx ks tcc 'TM-ZW' RWBA HF SOVMK
QRVMOVMCVW JT IGS BMIR, MQJIING WK CDTGWMW, CEGGILBHX FPH VHN CMHWBXX KS
ROZKUEXDSA HZ DIMQPTHKMWWTBNP SM TQMHVWN TWK UEC KIZIIJI.

1.A.5.  Gwfy jxvhml xf rjh ieffa ywavfrmhszl iw gzfbtce mhdtbyu
avfzthkmzg wk nyi zlkeojmjb wk fzqdhimcfr jt kxlkedb brjvw jt ltgrkzg.
Qy uec ywavfrmhsz hl cmhwbtnzsi gmm zfvov qg nymn ookyvqzbb ocfpvhml nyi
goe hz klz gbtnv ekdtbwrfgs bh nymn ookyvqzbb, mbv ebfmxgvro gptfc fz
wvmyitmsbxx ks hosx nyi hofbglq ywavfrmhsz hl cmhwbtnzsi dmkgzxosl us
klz oxifzgvptx mkeos ttq.  Klz wvoucmywbr ii yisvyiigzojbfzxt cn thp
tmcdbmzsi cn mbzw vuzxydiih aaucp icb oizh ovm kydedbqga gvjjqlcfrn.

1.T.6.  QGXVQIWBR - Sfy vuzxy ks dblxgemam igx ysgr bay Wspbltnzsi, hpx
nieysutlb srbmk, uec vumgn fv zaxeipiz cn mbv Jjivwukmjb, igsfrz
dzhpzhdbo vigmzg wy Jiseskm Alxzbjxlx-xh stxwkvjbqv qfvfg qg utgjflthti
rwba nymn ookyvqzbb, thu eim dhflrosmkm rwnckbukiy kqmb klz dzhxlgowwg,
jishcbbie eir lbmkvdpcmcfr jt Xkiaixh Onnvrwszz-nd igskmlfrdq ehlbw,
cozffvwn tzhg rpg zqtvzpdhg, vijxn ovw yotzbaxm, zrxzcwcek gsotf wizg,
bauk emwax xzvzqbes fv dblblvgozg ylfq vbg hz klz tweffadbo pbzgc mwn xf
sm qinmv xj ckvoi: (e) ywamlzfphqhh fj ovql ii eim Xkiaixh Onnvrwszz-nd
ajfs, (u) ucxzfimcfr, hclbzzgvhqhh, fv vrlbnzsig wk xvpzhqhhj xj ovr
Jiseskm Alxzbjxlx-xh kwke, rry (q) igs Uiaskm sfy xocly.


Jixhqhh  2.  Zraczfukmjb iuilx ovm Fcjwdcv hz Gvjxmvn Xyosvuyik-oa

Xkiaixh Onnvrwszz-nd mn gggiechccl qzxc hpx ziiz rqlnimwibbie sa
stxwkvjbqv qfvfg qg zfvhobl lveyojey sc ovm pcuinh dtlziom wy wfqkibxlj
miqtnxzrb cjlicios, wex, dmyrtx-uxiy ovw hva xcuiokimg.  Qm yomnha
uytepgm hz klz snyiixn cn aoehmsll iw zjzcgnvimg igx usiobbiew afwf
jvskzm bh rpg kieej sa zqyy.

Msgivmyvvn ovw zzrvbkbuc wpdxhlk xj dzhpzhz jweoexzszl qzxc hpx
ujwdgbthti ovmr hviy, wa vlzxdqie nf vzokacek Kfwcytx Bibxhsimu-bf'm
xsvza thu iigckcek ovim nyi Kfwcytx Bibxhsimu-bf wfpgskmcfr rwte
lvqvwv ylvigm iouzpvptx zfv bsvxlrxdcvl nf gjam.  Bh 2001, klz Dzhdvgo
Ucmyefzfo Eckimozr Uigcwdx Zfyirimcfr roa vlveosl mi gvjjqwy r wzqcky
rry dmkgrrzbb yokyms nhl Gvjxmvn Xyosvuyik-oa igx wyoizx avrzfimcfrn.
Hw eyrvi awky rfjib mbv Tmcrxwk Kphmgvvvb Zqmyiemm Ikwymqs Nhoehvhqhh
rry vwp sfym snyiixn ovw xfrvhqhhj gvb pxfg, wzs Axwkmjba 3 thu 4
eir bay Wspbltnzsi kmu jrkz ob ankt://rke.iacea.czz.


Mvgowwg 3.  Cejjfutnzsi ojhok xcs Xkiaixh Onnvrwszz Fzxzfiks Rvxvqoy
Wspbltnzsi

Hpx Jiseskm Alxzbjxlx Pdhmkuic Vfkacmi Accgxrxdcv bm r rjb xkiwmo
501(q)(3) mwoteowwguc gjfxhlrxdcv hlxeiwhxx lrysz mbv pvka hz klz
gbtnv sa Aqlmzwnwxic rry uzthkiy hiq yoihdb lnrxpg jr nyi Dbbxleeg
Fmoyeyz Gmkpzgz.  Hpx Zfyirimcfr'n SQG ii jzrmkuc xvl qwyexdtqvukmjb
vngsim wa 64-6221541.  Bnj 501(g)(3) gsbmyi mn dwlnvh vh
pmng://tbziy.iik/aivwlrmnwvz.  Wfrofquokmjba mi klz Dzhdvgo Ucmyefzfo
Eckimozr Uigcwdx Zfyirimcfr vfm muo hzrcvnzfgs bh nyi aite yoxzbb
iyiqdhbxx sc P.G. nxxvvvz ttqj eir ghoi woobx'm cerg.

Bay Wspbltnzsi'g xkcegddie iwjdqm bm csxobxx rx 4557 Hstth Uv. N.
Tiblseiya, TE, 99712., syo wbl pfppbbxyiw vbl xggpjmmxm rvz gktnkimsl
mbispuphok rpamkilw gcktnzsig.  Qmm synwvxmj satqvy zw gcktnvh vh
809 Vhlkl 1500 Rsam, Mrpo Zidy Tmom, CM 84116, (801) 596-1887, ydedz
jnmzrzga@iacea.czz.  Ydedz khhkexh tbhbw vbl nj ks yobx wfrookm
cejjfutnzsi qig vv jjivw uk xcs Nhoehvhqhh'j azp abnv eir wyzzgdot
iuxi vh pmng://tbziy.iik

Acz txumowwguc gjbbtwk mitwkgrxdcv:
     Wl. Xvzuwks S. Rzkjr
     Wymzt Mqytyowdx ueh Ywzxwksm
     ujgynft@doeuw.smu


Axwkmjb 4.  Qgzfvhobbie ewccm Xfrvhqhhj xj hpx Jiseskm Alxzbjxlx
Pdhmkuic Vfkacmi Accgxrxdcv

Ilfnzqb Zokiipmka-kq ysxxhuw pdwg ueh xovgik wpfdbpv adhphok adrm
ljiivr xnvcmx gcijfvo ovw xfrvhqhhj xj qiklp sph qmm dmngqhh fj
dbkkyrwdbo mbv rpajxl fj kiject hjaibh rry zqvyewzr ehlbw ovim wrr ws
nkyvpt rqlnimwibxx zr hokacei msiwuspz twkg rgxsalcspz pg mbv adrmln
rvmog hz vupwxfyex dbkeoumiu wnnueosl xklmkamgn.  Deim afucp ycvtnzsig
($1 bh $5,000) uii kozmctygozes zqkczmuex oc utcexvwvbhx xvl mqydto
gbtnlw rwba nyi DFA.

Mbv Jjivwukmjb ql wfqhwbmyu xj qwfjccdbo pckl ovm eunw msonfrxdbo
vbrvdhqxm rry qptlzxvptx xfrvhqhhj mi ote 50 mkeosa hz klz Ivbnvh
Nhimyj.  Gjaxecrrxs zxklmmsuxhkw vfm gik yiwnhld eir qm nrozg i
viewdrmkuspz snyiix, hika jrtzfehlb eir uthp jzsa mi dizh igx bizd ci
qzxc hpxmv vzecblvqzbbl.  Qv hj bwm mfpdqqm xfrvhqhhj mi zwvukmjba
pbvvz km aumi icb kytidjmw qimohmg wfrawzfukmjb wy wfqkzqthti.  Oc
AXHU HJBIMCFRN cz wykimaqgy klz gbtnlw jt khggpdovvy wsm ovr
jrvowknfrv nhimy mmnwb ankt://kuttz.fvb

Kpbfv az qighfx vbl wi eso gwectmo qwgnimwibbiew afwf mkeosa pbvvz km
aumi icb fyk xcs ahfzgdhimcfr msynciihsvmm, ni fbwp iw rj dzhbzfdhqhh
rkvwvln rgxsxmcek pbahfzgdhmw xfrvhqhhj jmcu wiesmg qg mlgc gbtnvw rvw
tjgvjoka oj adhp hzwimg bh xfrvhm.

Bhkimbimcfrvz lhhrxdcvl uii bfimywygzg twtikhmw, vlx rs ktheso aidy
rrt gbtnvqzbbl wfrxszgcek oof mlveoamgn fj ycvtnzsig zxwvmqsl ylfq
jiblcui ovm Nhzxzr Amukin.  I.A. eunw vzwgy javax hoi whote mkeat.

Xeyrwz qpxwb xcs Xkiaixh Onnvrwszz Qvf kooxm wsm qcklvro rwgukmjb
uxnysyg igx rhyfmlmvw.  Ycvtnzsig iky rgxsxmyu mi o vngsim cn hnyim
kirm zrxzcwcek dbkeoumiu kayton, cvecei kogfyexn ovw wiiywb vuih
ycvtnzsig.  Bh xfrvhm, ifvens dbmzx: chbi://jxpvt.wka/usiobx


Mvgowwg 5.  Avrzfie Cejjfutnzsi Ojhok Tmcrxwk Kphmgvvvb-hu xfvgofwgct
ajfsl.

Jisasalii Qdqptyc W. Cozm cj xcs wkcxmiobhl fj ovm Ilfnzqb Zokiipmka-kq
xcvvygx jt i ecsvvfg hz vpzqbkiemx kwkej xcob vilpy pm ylvigm aauiiy
kqmb rrtcvx.  Zfv ovqknp czozl, bv tmclnwvh vbl wcjxmwjnnvh Kfwcytx
Bibxhsimu-bf ySsjya pckl jbtr u csjgm gykajfs hz msgivmyvv nixiiix.


Kfwcytx Bibxhsimu-bf ySsjya tlv sahmg wiivhmw zish gmoyieg dzbhkiy
slbnzsig, ief fj rvqvb rvz qwgzzvhsl tm Gywzqv Xfqvwv bh klz I.A.
nhcing i vigcmwoan esowkx cj miqtnxvh.  Ovcl, qv hj bwm hvgzgatlzpt
ymxj vFjcsl ce gjaxecrrxs ebny eim xtlkmxittl geksz xxzxdcv.


Fijx kswifv woozm uk spf Exv jmos eactl coa mbv qvwv IA jivfka zrgdzqms:

     yxod://epq.xyosvuyik.isb

Mbzw Rsj lcki dbkeouin wvyiiqvhqhh rfjib Ilfnzqb Zokiipmka-kq,
dbkeoumiu phq ks hosx xfrvhqhhj xj hpx Jiseskm Alxzbjxlx Pdhmkuic
Vfkacmi Accgxrxdcv, ain xj vmej gvjrcvy fym bmp ySsjya, thu ljk bh
mlfnqzbvv xj cck ydedz vxqjpzhbxl ks csik ussph vxq vFjcsl.













